
 
 
 
 Produced by Judith Smith and Natalie Salter
 
 
 
 
 HELL
 
 OR THE INFERNO FROM THE DIVINE COMEDY
 
 BY
 
 DANTE ALIGHIERI
 
 
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 THE REV. H. F. CARY, M.A.
 
 
 
 
 
 HELL
 
 
 Cantos 1 - 34
 
 
 
 CANTO I
 
 
 IN the midway of this our mortal life,
 I found me in a gloomy wood, astray
 Gone from the path direct: and e'en to tell
 It were no easy task, how savage wild
 That forest, how robust and rough its growth,
 Which to remember only, my dismay
 Renews, in bitterness not far from death.
 Yet to discourse of what there good befell,
 All else will I relate discover'd there.
 How first I enter'd it I scarce can say,
 Such sleepy dullness in that instant weigh'd
 My senses down, when the true path I left,
 But when a mountain's foot I reach'd, where clos'd
 The valley, that had pierc'd my heart with dread,
 I look'd aloft, and saw his shoulders broad
 Already vested with that planet's beam,
 Who leads all wanderers safe through every way.
 
 Then was a little respite to the fear,
 That in my heart's recesses deep had lain,
 All of that night, so pitifully pass'd:
 And as a man, with difficult short breath,
 Forespent with toiling, 'scap'd from sea to shore,
 Turns to the perilous wide waste, and stands
 At gaze; e'en so my spirit, that yet fail'd
 Struggling with terror, turn'd to view the straits,
 That none hath pass'd and liv'd.  My weary frame
 After short pause recomforted, again
 I journey'd on over that lonely steep,
 
 The hinder foot still firmer.  Scarce the ascent
 Began, when, lo! a panther, nimble, light,
 And cover'd with a speckled skin, appear'd,
 Nor, when it saw me, vanish'd, rather strove
 To check my onward going; that ofttimes
 With purpose to retrace my steps I turn'd.
 
 The hour was morning's prime, and on his way
 Aloft the sun ascended with those stars,
 That with him rose, when Love divine first mov'd
 Those its fair works: so that with joyous hope
 All things conspir'd to fill me, the gay skin
 Of that swift animal, the matin dawn
 And the sweet season.  Soon that joy was chas'd,
 And by new dread succeeded, when in view
 A lion came, 'gainst me, as it appear'd,
 
 With his head held aloft and hunger-mad,
 That e'en the air was fear-struck.  A she-wolf
 Was at his heels, who in her leanness seem'd
 Full of all wants, and many a land hath made
 Disconsolate ere now.  She with such fear
 O'erwhelmed me, at the sight of her appall'd,
 That of the height all hope I lost.  As one,
 Who with his gain elated, sees the time
 When all unwares is gone, he inwardly
 Mourns with heart-griping anguish; such was I,
 Haunted by that fell beast, never at peace,
 Who coming o'er against me, by degrees
 Impell'd me where the sun in silence rests.
 
 While to the lower space with backward step
 I fell, my ken discern'd the form one of one,
 Whose voice seem'd faint through long disuse of speech.
 When him in that great desert I espied,
 "Have mercy on me!" cried I out aloud,
 "Spirit! or living man! what e'er thou be!"
 
 He answer'd: "Now not man, man once I was,
 And born of Lombard parents, Mantuana both
 By country, when the power of Julius yet
 Was scarcely firm.  At Rome my life was past
 Beneath the mild Augustus, in the time
 Of fabled deities and false.  A bard
 Was I, and made Anchises' upright son
 The subject of my song, who came from Troy,
 When the flames prey'd on Ilium's haughty towers.
 But thou, say wherefore to such perils past
 Return'st thou?  wherefore not this pleasant mount
 Ascendest, cause and source of all delight?"
 "And art thou then that Virgil, that well-spring,
 From which such copious floods of eloquence
 Have issued?"  I with front abash'd replied.
 "Glory and light of all the tuneful train!
 May it avail me that I long with zeal
 Have sought thy volume, and with love immense
 Have conn'd it o'er.  My master thou and guide!
 Thou he from whom alone I have deriv'd
 That style, which for its beauty into fame
 Exalts me.  See the beast, from whom I fled.
 O save me from her, thou illustrious sage!"
 
 "For every vein and pulse throughout my frame
 She hath made tremble."  He, soon as he saw
 That I was weeping, answer'd, "Thou must needs
 Another way pursue, if thou wouldst 'scape
 From out that savage wilderness.  This beast,
 At whom thou criest, her way will suffer none
 To pass, and no less hindrance makes than death:
 So bad and so accursed in her kind,
 That never sated is her ravenous will,
 Still after food more craving than before.
 To many an animal in wedlock vile
 She fastens, and shall yet to many more,
 Until that greyhound come, who shall destroy
 Her with sharp pain.  He will not life support
 By earth nor its base metals, but by love,
 Wisdom, and virtue, and his land shall be
 The land 'twixt either Feltro.  In his might
 Shall safety to Italia's plains arise,
 For whose fair realm, Camilla, virgin pure,
 Nisus, Euryalus, and Turnus fell.
 He with incessant chase through every town
 Shall worry, until he to hell at length
 Restore her, thence by envy first let loose.
 I for thy profit pond'ring now devise,
 That thou mayst follow me, and I thy guide
 Will lead thee hence through an eternal space,
 Where thou shalt hear despairing shrieks, and see
 Spirits of old tormented, who invoke
 A second death; and those next view, who dwell
 Content in fire, for that they hope to come,
 Whene'er the time may be, among the blest,
 Into whose regions if thou then desire
 T' ascend, a spirit worthier then I
 Must lead thee, in whose charge, when I depart,
 Thou shalt be left: for that Almighty King,
 Who reigns above, a rebel to his law,
 Adjudges me, and therefore hath decreed,
 That to his city none through me should come.
 He in all parts hath sway; there rules, there holds
 His citadel and throne.  O happy those,
 Whom there he chooses!"  I to him in few:
 "Bard! by that God, whom thou didst not adore,
 I do beseech thee (that this ill and worse
 I may escape) to lead me, where thou saidst,
 That I Saint Peter's gate may view, and those
 Who as thou tell'st, are in such dismal plight."
 
 Onward he mov'd, I close his steps pursu'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO II
 
 NOW was the day departing, and the air,
 Imbrown'd with shadows, from their toils releas'd
 All animals on earth; and I alone
 Prepar'd myself the conflict to sustain,
 Both of sad pity, and that perilous road,
 Which my unerring memory shall retrace.
 
 O Muses!  O high genius! now vouchsafe
 Your aid!  O mind! that all I saw hast kept
 Safe in a written record, here thy worth
 And eminent endowments come to proof.
 
 I thus began: "Bard! thou who art my guide,
 Consider well, if virtue be in me
 Sufficient, ere to this high enterprise
 Thou trust me.  Thou hast told that Silvius' sire,
 Yet cloth'd in corruptible flesh, among
 Th' immortal tribes had entrance, and was there
 Sensible present.  Yet if heaven's great Lord,
 Almighty foe to ill, such favour shew'd,
 In contemplation of the high effect,
 Both what and who from him should issue forth,
 It seems in reason's judgment well deserv'd:
 Sith he of Rome, and of Rome's empire wide,
 In heaven's empyreal height was chosen sire:
 Both which, if truth be spoken, were ordain'd
 And 'stablish'd for the holy place, where sits
 Who to great Peter's sacred chair succeeds.
 He from this journey, in thy song renown'd,
 Learn'd things, that to his victory gave rise
 And to the papal robe.  In after-times
 The chosen vessel also travel'd there,
 To bring us back assurance in that faith,
 Which is the entrance to salvation's way.
 But I, why should I there presume?  or who
 Permits it?  not, Aeneas I nor Paul.
 Myself I deem not worthy, and none else
 Will deem me.  I, if on this voyage then
 I venture, fear it will in folly end.
 Thou, who art wise, better my meaning know'st,
 Than I can speak."  As one, who unresolves
 What he hath late resolv'd, and with new thoughts
 Changes his purpose, from his first intent
 Remov'd; e'en such was I on that dun coast,
 Wasting in thought my enterprise, at first
 So eagerly embrac'd.  "If right thy words
 I scan," replied that shade magnanimous,
 "Thy soul is by vile fear assail'd, which oft
 So overcasts a man, that he recoils
 From noblest resolution, like a beast
 At some false semblance in the twilight gloom.
 That from this terror thou mayst free thyself,
 I will instruct thee why I came, and what
 I heard in that same instant, when for thee
 Grief touch'd me first.  I was among the tribe,
 Who rest suspended, when a dame, so blest
 And lovely, I besought her to command,
 Call'd me; her eyes were brighter than the star
 Of day; and she with gentle voice and soft
 Angelically tun'd her speech address'd:
 "O courteous shade of Mantua! thou whose fame
 Yet lives, and shall live long as nature lasts!
 A friend, not of my fortune but myself,
 On the wide desert in his road has met
 Hindrance so great, that he through fear has turn'd.
 Now much I dread lest he past help have stray'd,
 And I be ris'n too late for his relief,
 From what in heaven of him I heard.  Speed now,
 And by thy eloquent persuasive tongue,
 And by all means for his deliverance meet,
 Assist him.  So to me will comfort spring.
 I who now bid thee on this errand forth
 Am Beatrice; from a place I come
 
 (Note: Beatrice.  I use this word, as it is
 pronounced in the Italian, as consisting of four
 syllables, of which the third is a long one.)
 
 Revisited with joy.  Love brought me thence,
 Who prompts my speech.  When in my Master's sight
 I stand, thy praise to him I oft will tell."
 
 She then was silent, and I thus began:
 "O Lady! by whose influence alone,
 Mankind excels whatever is contain'd
 Within that heaven which hath the smallest orb,
 So thy command delights me, that to obey,
 If it were done already, would seem late.
 No need hast thou farther to speak thy will;
 Yet tell the reason, why thou art not loth
 To leave that ample space, where to return
 Thou burnest, for this centre here beneath."
 
 She then: "Since thou so deeply wouldst inquire,
 I will instruct thee briefly, why no dread
 Hinders my entrance here.  Those things alone
 Are to be fear'd, whence evil may proceed,
 None else, for none are terrible beside.
 I am so fram'd by God, thanks to his grace!
 That any suff'rance of your misery
 Touches me not, nor flame of that fierce fire
 Assails me.  In high heaven a blessed dame
 Besides, who mourns with such effectual grief
 That hindrance, which I send thee to remove,
 That God's stern judgment to her will inclines."
 To Lucia calling, her she thus bespake:
 "Now doth thy faithful servant need thy aid
 And I commend him to thee."  At her word
 Sped Lucia, of all cruelty the foe,
 And coming to the place, where I abode
 Seated with Rachel, her of ancient days,
 She thus address'd me: "Thou true praise of God!
 Beatrice! why is not thy succour lent
 To him, who so much lov'd thee, as to leave
 For thy sake all the multitude admires?
 Dost thou not hear how pitiful his wail,
 Nor mark the death, which in the torrent flood,
 Swoln mightier than a sea, him struggling holds?"
 "Ne'er among men did any with such speed
 Haste to their profit, flee from their annoy,
 As when these words were spoken, I came here,
 Down from my blessed seat, trusting the force
 Of thy pure eloquence, which thee, and all
 Who well have mark'd it, into honour brings."
 
 "When she had ended, her bright beaming eyes
 Tearful she turn'd aside; whereat I felt
 Redoubled zeal to serve thee.  As she will'd,
 Thus am I come: I sav'd thee from the beast,
 Who thy near way across the goodly mount
 Prevented.  What is this comes o'er thee then?
 Why, why dost thou hang back?  why in thy breast
 Harbour vile fear?  why hast not courage there
 And noble daring?  Since three maids so blest
 Thy safety plan, e'en in the court of heaven;
 And so much certain good my words forebode."
 
 As florets, by the frosty air of night
 Bent down and clos'd, when day has blanch'd their leaves,
 Rise all unfolded on their spiry stems;
 So was my fainting vigour new restor'd,
 And to my heart such kindly courage ran,
 That I as one undaunted soon replied:
 "O full of pity she, who undertook
 My succour! and thou kind who didst perform
 So soon her true behest!  With such desire
 Thou hast dispos'd me to renew my voyage,
 That my first purpose fully is resum'd.
 Lead on: one only will is in us both.
 Thou art my guide, my master thou, and lord."
 
 So spake I; and when he had onward mov'd,
 I enter'd on the deep and woody way.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO III
 
 "THROUGH me you pass into the city of woe:
 Through me you pass into eternal pain:
 Through me among the people lost for aye.
 Justice the founder of my fabric mov'd:
 To rear me was the task of power divine,
 Supremest wisdom, and primeval love.
 Before me things create were none, save things
 Eternal, and eternal I endure.
 
 "All hope abandon ye who enter here."
 
 Such characters in colour dim I mark'd
 Over a portal's lofty arch inscrib'd:
 Whereat I thus: "Master, these words import
 Hard meaning."  He as one prepar'd replied:
 "Here thou must all distrust behind thee leave;
 Here be vile fear extinguish'd. We are come
 Where I have told thee we shall see the souls
 To misery doom'd, who intellectual good
 Have lost."  And when his hand he had stretch'd forth
 To mine, with pleasant looks, whence I was cheer'd,
 Into that secret place he led me on.
 
 Here sighs with lamentations and loud moans
 Resounded through the air pierc'd by no star,
 That e'en I wept at entering.  Various tongues,
 Horrible languages, outcries of woe,
 Accents of anger, voices deep and hoarse,
 With hands together smote that swell'd the sounds,
 Made up a tumult, that for ever whirls
 Round through that air with solid darkness stain'd,
 Like to the sand that in the whirlwind flies.
 
 I then, with error yet encompass'd, cried:
 "O master!  What is this I hear?  What race
 Are these, who seem so overcome with woe?"
 
 He thus to me: "This miserable fate
 Suffer the wretched souls of those, who liv'd
 Without or praise or blame, with that ill band
 Of angels mix'd, who nor rebellious prov'd
 Nor yet were true to God, but for themselves
 Were only.  From his bounds Heaven drove them forth,
 Not to impair his lustre, nor the depth
 Of Hell receives them, lest th' accursed tribe
 Should glory thence with exultation vain."
 
 I then: "Master! what doth aggrieve them thus,
 That they lament so loud?"  He straight replied:
 "That will I tell thee briefly.  These of death
 No hope may entertain: and their blind life
 So meanly passes, that all other lots
 They envy.  Fame of them the world hath none,
 Nor suffers; mercy and justice scorn them both.
 Speak not of them, but look, and pass them by."
 
 And I, who straightway look'd, beheld a flag,
 Which whirling ran around so rapidly,
 That it no pause obtain'd: and following came
 Such a long train of spirits, I should ne'er
 Have thought, that death so many had despoil'd.
 
 When some of these I recogniz'd, I saw
 And knew the shade of him, who to base fear
 Yielding, abjur'd his high estate.  Forthwith
 I understood for certain this the tribe
 Of those ill spirits both to God displeasing
 And to his foes.  These wretches, who ne'er lived,
 Went on in nakedness, and sorely stung
 By wasps and hornets, which bedew'd their cheeks
 With blood, that mix'd with tears dropp'd to their feet,
 And by disgustful worms was gather'd there.
 
 Then looking farther onwards I beheld
 A throng upon the shore of a great stream:
 Whereat I thus: "Sir! grant me now to know
 Whom here we view, and whence impell'd they seem
 So eager to pass o'er, as I discern
 Through the blear light?"  He thus to me in few:
 "This shalt thou know, soon as our steps arrive
 Beside the woeful tide of Acheron."
 
 Then with eyes downward cast and fill'd with shame,
 Fearing my words offensive to his ear,
 Till we had reach'd the river, I from speech
 Abstain'd.  And lo! toward us in a bark
 Comes on an old man hoary white with eld,
 
 Crying, "Woe to you wicked spirits! hope not
 Ever to see the sky again.  I come
 To take you to the other shore across,
 Into eternal darkness, there to dwell
 In fierce heat and in ice.  And thou, who there
 Standest, live spirit! get thee hence, and leave
 These who are dead."  But soon as he beheld
 I left them not, "By other way," said he,
 "By other haven shalt thou come to shore,
 Not by this passage; thee a nimbler boat
 Must carry."  Then to him thus spake my guide:
 "Charon! thyself torment not: so 't is will'd,
 Where will and power are one: ask thou no more."
 
 Straightway in silence fell the shaggy cheeks
 Of him the boatman o'er the livid lake,
 Around whose eyes glar'd wheeling flames.  Meanwhile
 Those spirits, faint and naked, color chang'd,
 And gnash'd their teeth, soon as the cruel words
 They heard.  God and their parents they blasphem'd,
 The human kind, the place, the time, and seed
 That did engender them and give them birth.
 
 Then all together sorely wailing drew
 To the curs'd strand, that every man must pass
 Who fears not God.  Charon, demoniac form,
 With eyes of burning coal, collects them all,
 Beck'ning, and each, that lingers, with his oar
 Strikes.  As fall off the light autumnal leaves,
 One still another following, till the bough
 Strews all its honours on the earth beneath;
 
 E'en in like manner Adam's evil brood
 Cast themselves one by one down from the shore,
 Each at a beck, as falcon at his call.
 
 Thus go they over through the umber'd wave,
 And ever they on the opposing bank
 Be landed, on this side another throng
 Still gathers.  "Son," thus spake the courteous guide,
 "Those, who die subject to the wrath of God,
 All here together come from every clime,
 And to o'erpass the river are not loth:
 For so heaven's justice goads them on, that fear
 Is turn'd into desire.  Hence ne'er hath past
 Good spirit.  If of thee Charon complain,
 Now mayst thou know the import of his words."
 
 This said, the gloomy region trembling shook
 So terribly, that yet with clammy dews
 Fear chills my brow.  The sad earth gave a blast,
 That, lightening, shot forth a vermilion flame,
 Which all my senses conquer'd quite, and I
 Down dropp'd, as one with sudden slumber seiz'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO IV
 
 BROKE the deep slumber in my brain a crash
 Of heavy thunder, that I shook myself,
 As one by main force rous'd.  Risen upright,
 My rested eyes I mov'd around, and search'd
 With fixed ken to know what place it was,
 Wherein I stood.  For certain on the brink
 I found me of the lamentable vale,
 The dread abyss, that joins a thund'rous sound
 Of plaints innumerable.  Dark and deep,
 And thick with clouds o'erspread, mine eye in vain
 Explor'd its bottom, nor could aught discern.
 
 "Now let us to the blind world there beneath
 Descend;" the bard began all pale of look:
 "I go the first, and thou shalt follow next."
 
 Then I his alter'd hue perceiving, thus:
 "How may I speed, if thou yieldest to dread,
 Who still art wont to comfort me in doubt?"
 
 He then: "The anguish of that race below
 With pity stains my cheek, which thou for fear
 Mistakest.  Let us on.  Our length of way
 Urges to haste."  Onward, this said, he mov'd;
 And ent'ring led me with him on the bounds
 Of the first circle, that surrounds th' abyss.
 Here, as mine ear could note, no plaint was heard
 Except of sighs, that made th' eternal air
 Tremble, not caus'd by tortures, but from grief
 Felt by those multitudes, many and vast,
 Of men, women, and infants.  Then to me
 The gentle guide: "Inquir'st thou not what spirits
 Are these, which thou beholdest?  Ere thou pass
 Farther, I would thou know, that these of sin
 Were blameless; and if aught they merited,
 It profits not, since baptism was not theirs,
 The portal to thy faith.  If they before
 The Gospel liv'd, they serv'd not God aright;
 And among such am I. For these defects,
 And for no other evil, we are lost;"
 
 "Only so far afflicted, that we live
 Desiring without hope."  So grief assail'd
 My heart at hearing this, for well I knew
 Suspended in that Limbo many a soul
 Of mighty worth.  "O tell me, sire rever'd!
 Tell me, my master!"  I began through wish
 Of full assurance in that holy faith,
 Which vanquishes all error; "say, did e'er
 Any, or through his own or other's merit,
 Come forth from thence, whom afterward was blest?"
 
 Piercing the secret purport of my speech,
 He answer'd: "I was new to that estate,
 When I beheld a puissant one arrive
 Amongst us, with victorious trophy crown'd.
 He forth the shade of our first parent drew,
 Abel his child, and Noah righteous man,
 Of Moses lawgiver for faith approv'd,
 Of patriarch Abraham, and David king,
 Israel with his sire and with his sons,
 Nor without Rachel whom so hard he won,
 And others many more, whom he to bliss
 Exalted.  Before these, be thou assur'd,
 No spirit of human kind was ever sav'd."
 
 We, while he spake, ceas'd not our onward road,
 Still passing through the wood; for so I name
 Those spirits thick beset.  We were not far
 On this side from the summit, when I kenn'd
 A flame, that o'er the darken'd hemisphere
 Prevailing shin'd.  Yet we a little space
 Were distant, not so far but I in part
 Discover'd, that a tribe in honour high
 That place possess'd.  "O thou, who every art
 And science valu'st! who are these, that boast
 Such honour, separate from all the rest?"
 
 He answer'd: "The renown of their great names
 That echoes through your world above, acquires
 Favour in heaven, which holds them thus advanc'd."
 Meantime a voice I heard: "Honour the bard
 Sublime! his shade returns that left us late!"
 No sooner ceas'd the sound, than I beheld
 Four mighty spirits toward us bend their steps,
 Of semblance neither sorrowful nor glad.
 
 When thus my master kind began: "Mark him,
 Who in his right hand bears that falchion keen,
 The other three preceding, as their lord.
 This is that Homer, of all bards supreme:
 Flaccus the next in satire's vein excelling;
 The third is Naso; Lucan is the last.
 Because they all that appellation own,
 With which the voice singly accosted me,
 Honouring they greet me thus, and well they judge."
 
 So I beheld united the bright school
 Of him the monarch of sublimest song,
 That o'er the others like an eagle soars.
 When they together short discourse had held,
 They turn'd to me, with salutation kind
 Beck'ning me; at the which my master smil'd:
 Nor was this all; but greater honour still
 They gave me, for they made me of their tribe;
 And I was sixth amid so learn'd a band.
 
 Far as the luminous beacon on we pass'd
 Speaking of matters, then befitting well
 To speak, now fitter left untold.  At foot
 Of a magnificent castle we arriv'd,
 Seven times with lofty walls begirt, and round
 Defended by a pleasant stream.  O'er this
 As o'er dry land we pass'd.  Next through seven gates
 I with those sages enter'd, and we came
 Into a mead with lively verdure fresh.
 
 There dwelt a race, who slow their eyes around
 Majestically mov'd, and in their port
 Bore eminent authority; they spake
 Seldom, but all their words were tuneful sweet.
 
 We to one side retir'd, into a place
 Open and bright and lofty, whence each one
 Stood manifest to view.  Incontinent
 There on the green enamel of the plain
 Were shown me the great spirits, by whose sight
 I am exalted in my own esteem.
 
 Electra there I saw accompanied
 By many, among whom Hector I knew,
 Anchises' pious son, and with hawk's eye
 Caesar all arm'd, and by Camilla there
 Penthesilea.  On the other side
 Old King Latinus, seated by his child
 Lavinia, and that Brutus I beheld,
 Who Tarquin chas'd, Lucretia, Cato's wife
 Marcia, with Julia and Cornelia there;
 And sole apart retir'd, the Soldan fierce.
 
 Then when a little more I rais'd my brow,
 I spied the master of the sapient throng,
 Seated amid the philosophic train.
 Him all admire, all pay him rev'rence due.
 There Socrates and Plato both I mark'd,
 Nearest to him in rank; Democritus,
 Who sets the world at chance, Diogenes,
 With Heraclitus, and Empedocles,
 And Anaxagoras, and Thales sage,
 Zeno, and Dioscorides well read
 In nature's secret lore.  Orpheus I mark'd
 And Linus, Tully and moral Seneca,
 Euclid and Ptolemy, Hippocrates,
 Galenus, Avicen, and him who made
 That commentary vast, Averroes.
 
 Of all to speak at full were vain attempt;
 For my wide theme so urges, that ofttimes
 My words fall short of what bechanc'd.  In two
 The six associates part.  Another way
 My sage guide leads me, from that air serene,
 Into a climate ever vex'd with storms:
 And to a part I come where no light shines.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO V
 
 FROM the first circle I descended thus
 Down to the second, which, a lesser space
 Embracing, so much more of grief contains
 Provoking bitter moans.  There, Minos stands
 Grinning with ghastly feature: he, of all
 Who enter, strict examining the crimes,
 
 Gives sentence, and dismisses them beneath,
 According as he foldeth him around:
 For when before him comes th' ill fated soul,
 It all confesses; and that judge severe
 Of sins, considering what place in hell
 Suits the transgression, with his tail so oft
 Himself encircles, as degrees beneath
 He dooms it to descend.  Before him stand
 Always a num'rous throng; and in his turn
 Each one to judgment passing, speaks, and hears
 His fate, thence downward to his dwelling hurl'd.
 
 "O thou! who to this residence of woe
 Approachest?"  when he saw me coming, cried
 Minos, relinquishing his dread employ,
 "Look how thou enter here; beware in whom
 Thou place thy trust; let not the entrance broad
 Deceive thee to thy harm."  To him my guide:
 "Wherefore exclaimest?  Hinder not his way
 By destiny appointed; so 'tis will'd
 Where will and power are one.  Ask thou no more."
 
 Now 'gin the rueful wailings to be heard.
 Now am I come where many a plaining voice
 Smites on mine ear.  Into a place I came
 Where light was silent all.  Bellowing there groan'd
 A noise as of a sea in tempest torn
 By warring winds.  The stormy blast of hell
 With restless fury drives the spirits on
 Whirl'd round and dash'd amain with sore annoy.
 
 When they arrive before the ruinous sweep,
 There shrieks are heard, there lamentations, moans,
 And blasphemies 'gainst the good Power in heaven.
 
 I understood that to this torment sad
 The carnal sinners are condemn'd, in whom
 Reason by lust is sway'd.  As in large troops
 And multitudinous, when winter reigns,
 The starlings on their wings are borne abroad;
 So bears the tyrannous gust those evil souls.
 On this side and on that, above, below,
 It drives them: hope of rest to solace them
 Is none, nor e'en of milder pang.  As cranes,
 Chanting their dol'rous notes, traverse the sky,
 Stretch'd out in long array: so I beheld
 Spirits, who came loud wailing, hurried on
 By their dire doom.  Then I: "Instructor! who
 Are these, by the black air so scourg'd?"--"The first
 'Mong those, of whom thou question'st," he replied,
 "O'er many tongues was empress.  She in vice
 Of luxury was so shameless, that she made
 Liking be lawful by promulg'd decree,
 To clear the blame she had herself incurr'd.
 This is Semiramis, of whom 'tis writ,
 That she succeeded Ninus her espous'd;
 And held the land, which now the Soldan rules.
 The next in amorous fury slew herself,
 And to Sicheus' ashes broke her faith:
 Then follows Cleopatra, lustful queen."
 
 There mark'd I Helen, for whose sake so long
 The time was fraught with evil; there the great
 Achilles, who with love fought to the end.
 Paris I saw, and Tristan; and beside
 A thousand more he show'd me, and by name
 Pointed them out, whom love bereav'd of life.
 
 When I had heard my sage instructor name
 Those dames and knights of antique days, o'erpower'd
 By pity, well-nigh in amaze my mind
 Was lost; and I began: "Bard! willingly
 I would address those two together coming,
 Which seem so light before the wind."  He thus:
 "Note thou, when nearer they to us approach."
 
 "Then by that love which carries them along,
 Entreat; and they will come."  Soon as the wind
 Sway'd them toward us, I thus fram'd my speech:
 "O wearied spirits! come, and hold discourse
 With us, if by none else restrain'd."  As doves
 By fond desire invited, on wide wings
 And firm, to their sweet nest returning home,
 Cleave the air, wafted by their will along;
 Thus issu'd from that troop, where Dido ranks,
 They through the ill air speeding; with such force
 My cry prevail'd by strong affection urg'd.
 
 "O gracious creature and benign! who go'st
 Visiting, through this element obscure,
 Us, who the world with bloody stain imbru'd;
 If for a friend the King of all we own'd,
 Our pray'r to him should for thy peace arise,
 Since thou hast pity on our evil plight.
 ()f whatsoe'er to hear or to discourse
 It pleases thee, that will we hear, of that
 Freely with thee discourse, while e'er the wind,
 As now, is mute.  The land, that gave me birth,
 Is situate on the coast, where Po descends
 To rest in ocean with his sequent streams.
 
 "Love, that in gentle heart is quickly learnt,
 Entangled him by that fair form, from me
 Ta'en in such cruel sort, as grieves me still:
 Love, that denial takes from none belov'd,
 Caught me with pleasing him so passing well,
 That, as thou see'st, he yet deserts me not.
 
 "Love brought us to one death: Caina waits
 The soul, who spilt our life."  Such were their words;
 At hearing which downward I bent my looks,
 And held them there so long, that the bard cried:
 "What art thou pond'ring?"  I in answer thus:
 "Alas! by what sweet thoughts, what fond desire
 Must they at length to that ill pass have reach'd!"
 
 Then turning, I to them my speech address'd.
 And thus began: "Francesca! your sad fate
 Even to tears my grief and pity moves.
 But tell me; in the time of your sweet sighs,
 By what, and how love granted, that ye knew
 Your yet uncertain wishes?"  She replied:
 "No greater grief than to remember days
 Of joy, when mis'ry is at hand!  That kens
 Thy learn'd instructor.  Yet so eagerly
 If thou art bent to know the primal root,
 From whence our love gat being, I will do,
 As one, who weeps and tells his tale.  One day
 For our delight we read of Lancelot,
 How him love thrall'd.  Alone we were, and no
 Suspicion near us.  Ofttimes by that reading
 Our eyes were drawn together, and the hue
 Fled from our alter'd cheek.  But at one point
 Alone we fell.  When of that smile we read,
 The wished smile, rapturously kiss'd
 By one so deep in love, then he, who ne'er
 From me shall separate, at once my lips
 All trembling kiss'd.  The book and writer both
 Were love's purveyors.  In its leaves that day
 We read no more."  While thus one spirit spake,
 The other wail'd so sorely, that heartstruck
 I through compassion fainting, seem'd not far
 From death, and like a corpse fell to the ground.
 
 CANTO VI
 
 MY sense reviving, that erewhile had droop'd
 With pity for the kindred shades, whence grief
 O'ercame me wholly, straight around I see
 New torments, new tormented souls, which way
 Soe'er I move, or turn, or bend my sight.
 In the third circle I arrive, of show'rs
 Ceaseless, accursed, heavy, and cold, unchang'd
 For ever, both in kind and in degree.
 Large hail, discolour'd water, sleety flaw
 Through the dun midnight air stream'd down amain:
 Stank all the land whereon that tempest fell.
 
 Cerberus, cruel monster, fierce and strange,
 Through his wide threefold throat barks as a dog
 Over the multitude immers'd beneath.
 His eyes glare crimson, black his unctuous beard,
 His belly large, and claw'd the hands, with which
 He tears the spirits, flays them, and their limbs
 Piecemeal disparts.  Howling there spread, as curs,
 Under the rainy deluge, with one side
 The other screening, oft they roll them round,
 A wretched, godless crew.  When that great worm
 Descried us, savage Cerberus, he op'd
 His jaws, and the fangs show'd us; not a limb
 Of him but trembled.  Then my guide, his palms
 Expanding on the ground, thence filled with earth
 Rais'd them, and cast it in his ravenous maw.
 
 E'en as a dog, that yelling bays for food
 His keeper, when the morsel comes, lets fall
 His fury, bent alone with eager haste
 To swallow it; so dropp'd the loathsome cheeks
 Of demon Cerberus, who thund'ring stuns
 The spirits, that they for deafness wish in vain.
 
 We, o'er the shades thrown prostrate by the brunt
 Of the heavy tempest passing, set our feet
 Upon their emptiness, that substance seem'd.
 
 They all along the earth extended lay
 Save one, that sudden rais'd himself to sit,
 Soon as that way he saw us pass.  "O thou!"
 He cried, "who through the infernal shades art led,
 Own, if again thou know'st me.  Thou wast fram'd
 Or ere my frame was broken."  I replied:
 "The anguish thou endur'st perchance so takes
 Thy form from my remembrance, that it seems
 As if I saw thee never.  But inform
 Me who thou art, that in a place so sad
 Art set, and in such torment, that although
 Other be greater, more disgustful none
 Can be imagin'd."  He in answer thus:
 
 "Thy city heap'd with envy to the brim,
 Ay that the measure overflows its bounds,
 Held me in brighter days.  Ye citizens
 Were wont to name me Ciacco.  For the sin
 Of glutt'ny, damned vice, beneath this rain,
 E'en as thou see'st, I with fatigue am worn;
 Nor I sole spirit in this woe: all these
 Have by like crime incurr'd like punishment."
 
 No more he said, and I my speech resum'd:
 "Ciacco! thy dire affliction grieves me much,
 Even to tears.  But tell me, if thou know'st,
 What shall at length befall the citizens
 Of the divided city; whether any just one
 Inhabit there: and tell me of the cause,
 Whence jarring discord hath assail'd it thus?"
 
 He then: "After long striving they will come
 To blood; and the wild party from the woods
 Will chase the other with much injury forth.
 Then it behoves, that this must fall, within
 Three solar circles; and the other rise
 By borrow'd force of one, who under shore
 Now rests.  It shall a long space hold aloof
 Its forehead, keeping under heavy weight
 The other oppress'd, indignant at the load,
 And grieving sore.  The just are two in number,
 But they neglected.  Av'rice, envy, pride,
 Three fatal sparks, have set the hearts of all
 On fire."  Here ceas'd the lamentable sound;
 And I continu'd thus: "Still would I learn
 More from thee, farther parley still entreat.
 Of Farinata and Tegghiaio say,
 They who so well deserv'd, of Giacopo,
 Arrigo, Mosca, and the rest, who bent
 Their minds on working good.  Oh! tell me where
 They bide, and to their knowledge let me come.
 For I am press'd with keen desire to hear,
 If heaven's sweet cup or poisonous drug of hell
 Be to their lip assign'd."   He answer'd straight:
 "These are yet blacker spirits.  Various crimes
 Have sunk them deeper in the dark abyss.
 If thou so far descendest, thou mayst see them.
 But to the pleasant world when thou return'st,
 Of me make mention, I entreat thee, there.
 No more I tell thee, answer thee no more."
 
 This said, his fixed eyes he turn'd askance,
 A little ey'd me, then bent down his head,
 And 'midst his blind companions with it fell.
 
 When thus my guide: "No more his bed he leaves,
 Ere the last angel-trumpet blow.  The Power
 Adverse to these shall then in glory come,
 Each one forthwith to his sad tomb repair,
 Resume his fleshly vesture and his form,
 And hear the eternal doom re-echoing rend
 The vault."  So pass'd we through that mixture foul
 Of spirits and rain, with tardy steps; meanwhile
 Touching, though slightly, on the life to come.
 For thus I question'd: "Shall these tortures, Sir!
 When the great sentence passes, be increas'd,
 Or mitigated, or as now severe?"
 
 He then: "Consult thy knowledge; that decides
 That as each thing to more perfection grows,
 It feels more sensibly both good and pain.
 Though ne'er to true perfection may arrive
 This race accurs'd, yet nearer then than now
 They shall approach it."  Compassing that path
 Circuitous we journeyed, and discourse
 Much more than I relate between us pass'd:
 Till at the point, where the steps led below,
 Arriv'd, there Plutus, the great foe, we found.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO VII
 
 "AH me!  O Satan!  Satan!" loud exclaim'd
 Plutus, in accent hoarse of wild alarm:
 And the kind sage, whom no event surpris'd,
 To comfort me thus spake: "Let not thy fear
 Harm thee, for power in him, be sure, is none
 To hinder down this rock thy safe descent."
 Then to that sworn lip turning, "Peace!"  he cried,
 
 "Curs'd wolf! thy fury inward on thyself
 Prey, and consume thee!  Through the dark profound
 Not without cause he passes.  So 't is will'd
 On high, there where the great Archangel pour'd
 Heav'n's vengeance on the first adulterer proud."
 
 As sails full spread and bellying with the wind
 Drop suddenly collaps'd, if the mast split;
 So to the ground down dropp'd the cruel fiend.
 
 Thus we, descending to the fourth steep ledge,
 Gain'd on the dismal shore, that all the woe
 Hems in of all the universe.  Ah me!
 Almighty Justice! in what store thou heap'st
 New pains, new troubles, as I here beheld!
 Wherefore doth fault of ours bring us to this?
 
 E'en as a billow, on Charybdis rising,
 Against encounter'd billow dashing breaks;
 Such is the dance this wretched race must lead,
 Whom more than elsewhere numerous here I found,
 From one side and the other, with loud voice,
 Both roll'd on weights by main forge of their breasts,
 Then smote together, and each one forthwith
 Roll'd them back voluble, turning again,
 Exclaiming these, "Why holdest thou so fast?"
 Those answering, "And why castest thou away?"
 So still repeating their despiteful song,
 They to the opposite point on either hand
 Travers'd the horrid circle: then arriv'd,
 Both turn'd them round, and through the middle space
 Conflicting met again.  At sight whereof
 I, stung with grief, thus spake: "O say, my guide!
 What race is this?  Were these, whose heads are shorn,
 On our left hand, all sep'rate to the church?"
 
 He straight replied: "In their first life these all
 In mind were so distorted, that they made,
 According to due measure, of their wealth,
 No use.  This clearly from their words collect,
 Which they howl forth, at each extremity
 Arriving of the circle, where their crime
 Contrary' in kind disparts them.  To the church
 Were separate those, that with no hairy cowls
 Are crown'd, both Popes and Cardinals, o'er whom
 Av'rice dominion absolute maintains."
 
 I then: "Mid such as these some needs must be,
 Whom I shall recognize, that with the blot
 Of these foul sins were stain'd."  He answering thus:
 "Vain thought conceiv'st thou.  That ignoble life,
 Which made them vile before, now makes them dark,
 And to all knowledge indiscernible.
 Forever they shall meet in this rude shock:
 These from the tomb with clenched grasp shall rise,
 Those with close-shaven locks.  That ill they gave,
 And ill they kept, hath of the beauteous world
 Depriv'd, and set them at this strife, which needs
 No labour'd phrase of mine to set if off.
 Now may'st thou see, my son! how brief, how vain,
 The goods committed into fortune's hands,
 For which the human race keep such a coil!
 Not all the gold, that is beneath the moon,
 Or ever hath been, of these toil-worn souls
 Might purchase rest for one."  I thus rejoin'd:
 
 "My guide! of thee this also would I learn;
 This fortune, that thou speak'st of, what it is,
 Whose talons grasp the blessings of the world?"
 
 He thus: "O beings blind! what ignorance
 Besets you?  Now my judgment hear and mark.
 He, whose transcendent wisdom passes all,
 The heavens creating, gave them ruling powers
 To guide them, so that each part shines to each,
 Their light in equal distribution pour'd.
 By similar appointment he ordain'd
 Over the world's bright images to rule.
 Superintendence of a guiding hand
 And general minister, which at due time
 May change the empty vantages of life
 From race to race, from one to other's blood,
 Beyond prevention of man's wisest care:
 Wherefore one nation rises into sway,
 Another languishes, e'en as her will
 Decrees, from us conceal'd, as in the grass
 The serpent train.  Against her nought avails
 Your utmost wisdom.  She with foresight plans,
 Judges, and carries on her reign, as theirs
 The other powers divine.  Her changes know
 Nore intermission: by necessity
 She is made swift, so frequent come who claim
 Succession in her favours.  This is she,
 So execrated e'en by those, whose debt
 To her is rather praise; they wrongfully
 With blame requite her, and with evil word;
 But she is blessed, and for that recks not:
 Amidst the other primal beings glad
 Rolls on her sphere, and in her bliss exults.
 Now on our way pass we, to heavier woe
 Descending: for each star is falling now,
 That mounted at our entrance, and forbids
 Too long our tarrying."  We the circle cross'd
 To the next steep, arriving at a well,
 That boiling pours itself down to a foss
 Sluic'd from its source.  Far murkier was the wave
 Than sablest grain: and we in company
 Of the' inky waters, journeying by their side,
 Enter'd, though by a different track, beneath.
 Into a lake, the Stygian nam'd, expands
 The dismal stream, when it hath reach'd the foot
 Of the grey wither'd cliffs.  Intent I stood
 To gaze, and in the marish sunk descried
 A miry tribe, all naked, and with looks
 Betok'ning rage.  They with their hands alone
 Struck not, but with the head, the breast, the feet,
 Cutting each other piecemeal with their fangs.
 
 The good instructor spake; "Now seest thou, son!
 The souls of those, whom anger overcame.
 This too for certain know, that underneath
 The water dwells a multitude, whose sighs
 Into these bubbles make the surface heave,
 As thine eye tells thee wheresoe'er it turn."
 Fix'd in the slime they say: "Sad once were we
 In the sweet air made gladsome by the sun,
 Carrying a foul and lazy mist within:
 Now in these murky settlings are we sad."
 Such dolorous strain they gurgle in their throats.
 But word distinct can utter none."  Our route
 Thus compass'd we, a segment widely stretch'd
 Between the dry embankment, and the core
 Of the loath'd pool, turning meanwhile our eyes
 Downward on those who gulp'd its muddy lees;
 Nor stopp'd, till to a tower's low base we came.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO VIII
 
 MY theme pursuing, I relate that ere
 We reach'd the lofty turret's base, our eyes
 Its height ascended, where two cressets hung
 We mark'd, and from afar another light
 Return the signal, so remote, that scarce
 The eye could catch its beam.  I turning round
 To the deep source of knowledge, thus inquir'd:
 "Say what this means?  and what that other light
 In answer set?  what agency doth this?"
 
 "There on the filthy waters," he replied,
 "E'en now what next awaits us mayst thou see,
 If the marsh-gender'd fog conceal it not."
 
 Never was arrow from the cord dismiss'd,
 That ran its way so nimbly through the air,
 As a small bark, that through the waves I spied
 Toward us coming, under the sole sway
 Of one that ferried it, who cried aloud:
 "Art thou arriv'd, fell spirit?"--"Phlegyas, Phlegyas,
 This time thou criest in vain," my lord replied;
 "No longer shalt thou have us, but while o'er
 The slimy pool we pass."  As one who hears
 Of some great wrong he hath sustain'd, whereat
 Inly he pines; so Phlegyas inly pin'd
 In his fierce ire.  My guide descending stepp'd
 Into the skiff, and bade me enter next
 Close at his side; nor till my entrance seem'd
 The vessel freighted.  Soon as both embark'd,
 Cutting the waves, goes on the ancient prow,
 More deeply than with others it is wont.
 
 While we our course o'er the dead channel held.
 One drench'd in mire before me came, and said;
 "Who art thou, that thou comest ere thine hour?"
 
 I answer'd: "Though I come, I tarry not;
 But who art thou, that art become so foul?"
 
 "One, as thou seest, who mourn:" he straight replied.
 
 To which I thus: "In mourning and in woe,
 Curs'd spirit! tarry thou.g I know thee well,
 E'en thus in filth disguis'd."  Then stretch'd he forth
 Hands to the bark; whereof my teacher sage
 Aware, thrusting him back: "Away! down there;
 
 "To the' other dogs!" then, with his arms my neck
 Encircling, kiss'd my cheek, and spake: "O soul
 Justly disdainful! blest was she in whom
 Thou was conceiv'd!  He in the world was one
 For arrogance noted; to his memory
 No virtue lends its lustre; even so
 Here is his shadow furious.  There above
 How many now hold themselves mighty kings
 Who here like swine shall wallow in the mire,
 Leaving behind them horrible dispraise!"
 
 I then: "Master! him fain would I behold
 Whelm'd in these dregs, before we quit the lake."
 
 He thus: "Or ever to thy view the shore
 Be offer'd, satisfied shall be that wish,
 Which well deserves completion."  Scarce his words
 Were ended, when I saw the miry tribes
 Set on him with such violence, that yet
 For that render I thanks to God and praise
 "To Filippo Argenti:" cried they all:
 And on himself the moody Florentine
 Turn'd his avenging fangs.  Him here we left,
 Nor speak I of him more.  But on mine ear
 Sudden a sound of lamentation smote,
 Whereat mine eye unbarr'd I sent abroad.
 
 And thus the good instructor: "Now, my son!
 Draws near the city, that of Dis is nam'd,
 With its grave denizens, a mighty throng."
 
 I thus: "The minarets already, Sir!
 There certes in the valley I descry,
 Gleaming vermilion, as if they from fire
 Had issu'd."  He replied: "Eternal fire,
 That inward burns, shows them with ruddy flame
 Illum'd; as in this nether hell thou seest."
 
 We came within the fosses deep, that moat
 This region comfortless.  The walls appear'd
 As they were fram'd of iron.  We had made
 Wide circuit, ere a place we reach'd, where loud
 The mariner cried vehement: "Go forth!
 The' entrance is here!"  Upon the gates I spied
 More than a thousand, who of old from heaven
 Were hurl'd.  With ireful gestures, "Who is this,"
 They cried, "that without death first felt, goes through
 The regions of the dead?"  My sapient guide
 Made sign that he for secret parley wish'd;
 Whereat their angry scorn abating, thus
 They spake: "Come thou alone; and let him go
 Who hath so hardily enter'd this realm.
 Alone return he by his witless way;
 If well he know it, let him prove.  For thee,
 Here shalt thou tarry, who through clime so dark
 Hast been his escort." Now bethink thee, reader!
 What cheer was mine at sound of those curs'd words.
 I did believe I never should return.
 
 "O my lov'd guide! who more than seven times
 Security hast render'd me, and drawn
 From peril deep, whereto I stood expos'd,
 Desert me not," I cried, "in this extreme.
 And if our onward going be denied,
 Together trace we back our steps with speed."
 
 My liege, who thither had conducted me,
 Replied: "Fear not: for of our passage none
 Hath power to disappoint us, by such high
 Authority permitted.  But do thou
 Expect me here; meanwhile thy wearied spirit
 Comfort, and feed with kindly hope, assur'd
 I will not leave thee in this lower world."
 
 This said, departs the sire benevolent,
 And quits me.  Hesitating I remain
 At war 'twixt will and will not in my thoughts.
 
 I could not hear what terms he offer'd them,
 But they conferr'd not long, for all at once
 To trial fled within.  Clos'd were the gates
 By those our adversaries on the breast
 Of my liege lord: excluded he return'd
 To me with tardy steps.  Upon the ground
 His eyes were bent, and from his brow eras'd
 All confidence, while thus with sighs he spake:
 "Who hath denied me these abodes of woe?"
 Then thus to me: "That I am anger'd, think
 No ground of terror: in this trial I
 Shall vanquish, use what arts they may within
 For hindrance.  This their insolence, not new,
 Erewhile at gate less secret they display'd,
 Which still is without bolt; upon its arch
 Thou saw'st the deadly scroll: and even now
 On this side of its entrance, down the steep,
 Passing the circles, unescorted, comes
 One whose strong might can open us this land."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO IX
 
 THE hue, which coward dread on my pale cheeks
 Imprinted, when I saw my guide turn back,
 Chas'd that from his which newly they had worn,
 And inwardly restrain'd it.  He, as one
 Who listens, stood attentive: for his eye
 Not far could lead him through the sable air,
 And the thick-gath'ring cloud.  "It yet behooves
 We win this fight"--thus he began--"if not--
 Such aid to us is offer'd.--Oh, how long
 Me seems it, ere the promis'd help arrive!"
 
 I noted, how the sequel of his words
 Clok'd their beginning; for the last he spake
 Agreed not with the first.  But not the less
 My fear was at his saying; sith I drew
 To import worse perchance, than that he held,
 His mutilated speech.  "Doth ever any
 Into this rueful concave's extreme depth
 Descend, out of the first degree, whose pain
 Is deprivation merely of sweet hope?"
 
 Thus I inquiring. "Rarely," he replied,
 "It chances, that among us any makes
 This journey, which I wend.  Erewhile 'tis true
 Once came I here beneath, conjur'd by fell
 Erictho, sorceress, who compell'd the shades
 Back to their bodies.  No long space my flesh
 Was naked of me, when within these walls
 She made me enter, to draw forth a spirit
 From out of Judas' circle.  Lowest place
 Is that of all, obscurest, and remov'd
 Farthest from heav'n's all-circling orb.  The road
 Full well I know: thou therefore rest secure.
 That lake, the noisome stench exhaling, round
 The city' of grief encompasses, which now
 We may not enter without rage."  Yet more
 He added: but I hold it not in mind,
 For that mine eye toward the lofty tower
 Had drawn me wholly, to its burning top.
 Where in an instant I beheld uprisen
 At once three hellish furies stain'd with blood:
 In limb and motion feminine they seem'd;
 Around them greenest hydras twisting roll'd
 Their volumes; adders and cerastes crept
 Instead of hair, and their fierce temples bound.
 
 He knowing well the miserable hags
 Who tend the queen of endless woe, thus spake:
 
 "Mark thou each dire Erinnys. To the left
 This is Megaera; on the right hand she,
 Who wails, Alecto; and Tisiphone
 I' th' midst."  This said, in silence he remain'd
 Their breast they each one clawing tore; themselves
 Smote with their palms, and such shrill clamour rais'd,
 That to the bard I clung, suspicion-bound.
 "Hasten Medusa: so to adamant
 Him shall we change;" all looking down exclaim'd.
 "E'en when by Theseus' might assail'd, we took
 No ill revenge."  "Turn thyself round, and keep
 Thy count'nance hid; for if the Gorgon dire
 Be shown, and thou shouldst view it, thy return
 Upwards would be for ever lost."  This said,
 Himself my gentle master turn'd me round,
 Nor trusted he my hands, but with his own
 He also hid me.  Ye of intellect
 Sound and entire, mark well the lore conceal'd
 Under close texture of the mystic strain!
 
 And now there came o'er the perturbed waves
 Loud-crashing, terrible, a sound that made
 Either shore tremble, as if of a wind
 Impetuous, from conflicting vapours sprung,
 That 'gainst some forest driving all its might,
 Plucks off the branches, beats them down and hurls
 Afar; then onward passing proudly sweeps
 Its whirlwind rage, while beasts and shepherds fly.
 
 Mine eyes he loos'd, and spake: "And now direct
 Thy visual nerve along that ancient foam,
 There, thickest where the smoke ascends." As frogs
 Before their foe the serpent, through the wave
 Ply swiftly all, till at the ground each one
 Lies on a heap; more than a thousand spirits
 Destroy'd, so saw I fleeing before one
 Who pass'd with unwet feet the Stygian sound.
 He, from his face removing the gross air,
 Oft his left hand forth stretch'd, and seem'd alone
 By that annoyance wearied.  I perceiv'd
 That he was sent from heav'n, and to my guide
 Turn'd me, who signal made that I should stand
 Quiet, and bend to him. Ah me! how full
 Of noble anger seem'd he!  To the gate
 He came, and with his wand touch'd it, whereat
 Open without impediment it flew.
 
 "Outcasts of heav'n!  O abject race and scorn'd!"
 Began he on the horrid grunsel standing,
 "Whence doth this wild excess of insolence
 Lodge in you? wherefore kick you 'gainst that will
 Ne'er frustrate of its end, and which so oft
 Hath laid on you enforcement of your pangs?
 What profits at the fays to but the horn?
 Your Cerberus, if ye remember, hence
 Bears still, peel'd of their hair, his throat and maw."
 
 This said, he turn'd back o'er the filthy way,
 And syllable to us spake none, but wore
 The semblance of a man by other care
 Beset, and keenly press'd, than thought of him
 Who in his presence stands.  Then we our steps
 Toward that territory mov'd, secure
 After the hallow'd words.  We unoppos'd
 There enter'd; and my mind eager to learn
 What state a fortress like to that might hold,
 I soon as enter'd throw mine eye around,
 And see on every part wide-stretching space
 Replete with bitter pain and torment ill.
 
 As where Rhone stagnates on the plains of Arles,
 Or as at Pola, near Quarnaro's gulf,
 That closes Italy and laves her bounds,
 The place is all thick spread with sepulchres;
 So was it here, save what in horror here
 Excell'd: for 'midst the graves were scattered flames,
 Wherewith intensely all throughout they burn'd,
 That iron for no craft there hotter needs.
 
 Their lids all hung suspended, and beneath
 From them forth issu'd lamentable moans,
 Such as the sad and tortur'd well might raise.
 
 I thus: "Master! say who are these, interr'd
 Within these vaults, of whom distinct we hear
 The dolorous sighs?"  He answer thus return'd:
 
 "The arch-heretics are here, accompanied
 By every sect their followers; and much more,
 Than thou believest, tombs are freighted: like
 With like is buried; and the monuments
 Are different in degrees of heat."  This said,
 He to the right hand turning, on we pass'd
 Betwixt the afflicted and the ramparts high.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO X
 
 NOW by a secret pathway we proceed,
 Between the walls, that hem the region round,
 And the tormented souls: my master first,
 I close behind his steps.  "Virtue supreme!"
 I thus began; "who through these ample orbs
 In circuit lead'st me, even as thou will'st,
 Speak thou, and satisfy my wish.  May those,
 Who lie within these sepulchres, be seen?
 Already all the lids are rais'd, and none
 O'er them keeps watch."  He thus in answer spake
 "They shall be closed all, what-time they here
 From Josaphat return'd shall come, and bring
 Their bodies, which above they now have left.
 The cemetery on this part obtain
 With Epicurus all his followers,
 Who with the body make the spirit die.
 Here therefore satisfaction shall be soon
 Both to the question ask'd, and to the wish,
 Which thou conceal'st in silence."  I replied:
 "I keep not, guide belov'd! from thee my heart
 Secreted, but to shun vain length of words,
 A lesson erewhile taught me by thyself."
 
 "O Tuscan! thou who through the city of fire
 Alive art passing, so discreet of speech!
 Here please thee stay awhile. Thy utterance
 Declares the place of thy nativity
 To be that noble land, with which perchance
 I too severely dealt."  Sudden that sound
 Forth issu'd from a vault, whereat in fear
 I somewhat closer to my leader's side
 Approaching, he thus spake: "What dost thou?  Turn.
 Lo, Farinata, there! who hath himself
 Uplifted: from his girdle upwards all
 Expos'd behold him."  On his face was mine
 Already fix'd; his breast and forehead there
 Erecting, seem'd as in high scorn he held
 E'en hell.  Between the sepulchres to him
 My guide thrust me with fearless hands and prompt,
 This warning added: "See thy words be clear!"
 
 He, soon as there I stood at the tomb's foot,
 Ey'd me a space, then in disdainful mood
 Address'd me: "Say, what ancestors were thine?"
 
 I, willing to obey him, straight reveal'd
 The whole, nor kept back aught: whence he, his brow
 Somewhat uplifting, cried: "Fiercely were they
 Adverse to me, my party, and the blood
 From whence I sprang: twice therefore I abroad
 Scatter'd them."  "Though driv'n out, yet they each time
 From all parts," answer'd I, "return'd; an art
 Which yours have shown, they are not skill'd to learn."
 
 Then, peering forth from the unclosed jaw,
 Rose from his side a shade, high as the chin,
 Leaning, methought, upon its knees uprais'd.
 It look'd around, as eager to explore
 If there were other with me; but perceiving
 That fond imagination quench'd, with tears
 Thus spake: "If thou through this blind prison go'st.
 Led by thy lofty genius and profound,
 Where is my son? and wherefore not with thee?"
 
 I straight replied: "Not of myself I come,
 By him, who there expects me, through this clime
 Conducted, whom perchance Guido thy son
 Had in contempt."  Already had his words
 And mode of punishment read me his name,
 Whence I so fully answer'd.  He at once
 Exclaim'd, up starting, "How! said'st thou he HAD?
 No longer lives he?  Strikes not on his eye
 The blessed daylight?"  Then of some delay
 I made ere my reply aware, down fell
 Supine, not after forth appear'd he more.
 
 Meanwhile the other, great of soul, near whom
 I yet was station'd, chang'd not count'nance stern,
 Nor mov'd the neck, nor bent his ribbed side.
 "And if," continuing the first discourse,
 "They in this art," he cried, "small skill have shown,
 That doth torment me more e'en than this bed.
 But not yet fifty times shall be relum'd
 Her aspect, who reigns here Queen of this realm,
 Ere thou shalt know the full weight of that art.
 So to the pleasant world mayst thou return,
 As thou shalt tell me, why in all their laws,
 Against my kin this people is so fell?"
 
 "The slaughter and great havoc," I replied,
 "That colour'd Arbia's flood with crimson stain--
 To these impute, that in our hallow'd dome
 Such orisons ascend."  Sighing he shook
 The head, then thus resum'd: "In that affray
 I stood not singly, nor without just cause
 Assuredly should with the rest have stirr'd;
 But singly there I stood, when by consent
 Of all, Florence had to the ground been raz'd,
 The one who openly forbad the deed."
 
 "So may thy lineage find at last repose,"
 I thus adjur'd him, "as thou solve this knot,
 Which now involves my mind.  If right I hear,
 Ye seem to view beforehand, that which time
 Leads with him, of the present uninform'd."
 
 "We view, as one who hath an evil sight,"
 He answer'd, "plainly, objects far remote:
 So much of his large spendour yet imparts
 The' Almighty Ruler; but when they approach
 Or actually exist, our intellect
 Then wholly fails, nor of your human state
 Except what others bring us know we aught.
 Hence therefore mayst thou understand, that all
 Our knowledge in that instant shall expire,
 When on futurity the portals close."
 
 Then conscious of my fault, and by remorse
 Smitten, I added thus: "Now shalt thou say
 To him there fallen, that his offspring still
 Is to the living join'd; and bid him know,
 That if from answer silent I abstain'd,
 'Twas that my thought was occupied intent
 Upon that error, which thy help hath solv'd."
 
 But now my master summoning me back
 I heard, and with more eager haste besought
 The spirit to inform me, who with him
 Partook his lot.  He answer thus return'd:
 
 "More than a thousand with me here are laid
 Within is Frederick, second of that name,
 And the Lord Cardinal, and of the rest
 I speak not."  He, this said, from sight withdrew.
 But I my steps towards the ancient bard
 Reverting, ruminated on the words
 Betokening me such ill.  Onward he mov'd,
 And thus in going question'd: "Whence the' amaze
 That holds thy senses wrapt?"  I satisfied
 The' inquiry, and the sage enjoin'd me straight:
 "Let thy safe memory store what thou hast heard
 To thee importing harm; and note thou this,"
 With his rais'd finger bidding me take heed,
 
 "When thou shalt stand before her gracious beam,
 Whose bright eye all surveys, she of thy life
 The future tenour will to thee unfold."
 
 Forthwith he to the left hand turn'd his feet:
 We left the wall, and tow'rds the middle space
 Went by a path, that to a valley strikes;
 Which e'en thus high exhal'd its noisome steam.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XI
 
 UPON the utmost verge of a high bank,
 By craggy rocks environ'd round, we came,
 Where woes beneath more cruel yet were stow'd:
 And here to shun the horrible excess
 Of fetid exhalation, upward cast
 From the profound abyss, behind the lid
 Of a great monument we stood retir'd,
 
 Whereon this scroll I mark'd: "I have in charge
 Pope Anastasius, whom Photinus drew
 From the right path.--Ere our descent behooves
 We make delay, that somewhat first the sense,
 To the dire breath accustom'd, afterward
 Regard it not."  My master thus; to whom
 Answering I spake: "Some compensation find
 That the time past not wholly lost."  He then:
 "Lo! how my thoughts e'en to thy wishes tend!
 My son! within these rocks," he thus began,
 "Are three close circles in gradation plac'd,
 As these which now thou leav'st. Each one is full
 Of spirits accurs'd; but that the sight alone
 Hereafter may suffice thee, listen how
 And for what cause in durance they abide.
 
 "Of all malicious act abhorr'd in heaven,
 The end is injury; and all such end
 Either by force or fraud works other's woe
 But fraud, because of man peculiar evil,
 To God is more displeasing; and beneath
 The fraudulent are therefore doom'd to' endure
 Severer pang.  The violent occupy
 All the first circle; and because to force
 Three persons are obnoxious, in three rounds
 Hach within other sep'rate is it fram'd.
 To God, his neighbour, and himself, by man
 Force may be offer'd; to himself I say
 And his possessions, as thou soon shalt hear
 At full.  Death, violent death, and painful wounds
 Upon his neighbour he inflicts; and wastes
 By devastation, pillage, and the flames,
 His substance.  Slayers, and each one that smites
 In malice, plund'rers, and all robbers, hence
 The torment undergo of the first round
 In different herds.  Man can do violence
 To himself and his own blessings: and for this
 He in the second round must aye deplore
 With unavailing penitence his crime,
 Whoe'er deprives himself of life and light,
 In reckless lavishment his talent wastes,
 And sorrows there where he should dwell in joy.
 To God may force be offer'd, in the heart
 Denying and blaspheming his high power,
 And nature with her kindly law contemning.
 And thence the inmost round marks with its seal
 Sodom and Cahors, and all such as speak
 Contemptuously' of the Godhead in their hearts.
 
 "Fraud, that in every conscience leaves a sting,
 May be by man employ'd on one, whose trust
 He wins, or on another who withholds
 Strict confidence.  Seems as the latter way
 Broke but the bond of love which Nature makes.
 Whence in the second circle have their nest
 Dissimulation, witchcraft, flatteries,
 Theft, falsehood, simony, all who seduce
 To lust, or set their honesty at pawn,
 With such vile scum as these.  The other way
 Forgets both Nature's general love, and that
 Which thereto added afterwards gives birth
 To special faith.  Whence in the lesser circle,
 Point of the universe, dread seat of Dis,
 The traitor is eternally consum'd."
 
 I thus: "Instructor, clearly thy discourse
 Proceeds, distinguishing the hideous chasm
 And its inhabitants with skill exact.
 But tell me this: they of the dull, fat pool,
 Whom the rain beats, or whom the tempest drives,
 Or who with tongues so fierce conflicting meet,
 Wherefore within the city fire-illum'd
 Are not these punish'd, if God's wrath be on them?
 And if it be not, wherefore in such guise
 Are they condemned?"  He answer thus return'd:
 "Wherefore in dotage wanders thus thy mind,
 Not so accustom'd? or what other thoughts
 Possess it?  Dwell not in thy memory
 The words, wherein thy ethic page describes
 Three dispositions adverse to Heav'n's will,
 Incont'nence, malice, and mad brutishness,
 And how incontinence the least offends
 God, and least guilt incurs?  If well thou note
 This judgment, and remember who they are,
 Without these walls to vain repentance doom'd,
 Thou shalt discern why they apart are plac'd
 From these fell spirits, and less wreakful pours
 Justice divine on them its vengeance down."
 
 "O Sun! who healest all imperfect sight,
 Thou so content'st me, when thou solv'st my doubt,
 That ignorance not less than knowledge charms.
 Yet somewhat turn thee back," I in these words
 Continu'd, "where thou saidst, that usury
 Offends celestial Goodness; and this knot
 Perplex'd unravel."  He thus made reply:
 "Philosophy, to an attentive ear,
 Clearly points out, not in one part alone,
 How imitative nature takes her course
 From the celestial mind and from its art:
 And where her laws the Stagyrite unfolds,
 Not many leaves scann'd o'er, observing well
 Thou shalt discover, that your art on her
 Obsequious follows, as the learner treads
 In his instructor's step, so that your art
 Deserves the name of second in descent
 From God.  These two, if thou recall to mind
 Creation's holy book, from the beginning
 Were the right source of life and excellence
 To human kind.  But in another path
 The usurer walks; and Nature in herself
 And in her follower thus he sets at nought,
 Placing elsewhere his hope.  But follow now
 My steps on forward journey bent; for now
 The Pisces play with undulating glance
 Along the' horizon, and the Wain lies all
 O'er the north-west; and onward there a space
 Is our steep passage down the rocky height."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XII
 
 THE place where to descend the precipice
 We came, was rough as Alp, and on its verge
 Such object lay, as every eye would shun.
 
 As is that ruin, which Adice's stream
 On this side Trento struck, should'ring the wave,
 Or loos'd by earthquake or for lack of prop;
 For from the mountain's summit, whence it mov'd
 To the low level, so the headlong rock
 Is shiver'd, that some passage it might give
 To him who from above would pass; e'en such
 Into the chasm was that descent: and there
 At point of the disparted ridge lay stretch'd
 The infamy of Crete, detested brood
 Of the feign'd heifer: and at sight of us
 It gnaw'd itself, as one with rage distract.
 
 To him my guide exclaim'd: "Perchance thou deem'st
 The King of Athens here, who, in the world
 Above, thy death contriv'd.  Monster! avaunt!
 He comes not tutor'd by thy sister's art,
 But to behold your torments is he come."
 
 Like to a bull, that with impetuous spring
 Darts, at the moment when the fatal blow
 Hath struck him, but unable to proceed
 Plunges on either side; so saw I plunge
 The Minotaur; whereat the sage exclaim'd:
 "Run to the passage! while he storms, 't is well
 That thou descend."  Thus down our road we took
 Through those dilapidated crags, that oft
 Mov'd underneath my feet, to weight like theirs
 Unus'd.  I pond'ring went, and thus he spake:
 
 "Perhaps thy thoughts are of this ruin'd steep,
 Guarded by the brute violence, which I
 Have vanquish'd now. Know then, that when I erst
 Hither descended to the nether hell,
 This rock was not yet fallen.  But past doubt
 (If well I mark) not long ere He arrived,
 Who carried off from Dis the mighty spoil
 Of the highest circle, then through all its bounds
 Such trembling seiz'd the deep concave and foul,
 I thought the universe was thrill'd with love,
 Whereby, there are who deem, the world hath oft
 Been into chaos turn'd: and in that point,
 Here, and elsewhere, that old rock toppled down.
 But fix thine eyes beneath: the river of blood
 Approaches, in the which all those are steep'd,
 Who have by violence injur'd."  O blind lust!
 O foolish wrath! who so dost goad us on
 In the brief life, and in the eternal then
 Thus miserably o'erwhelm us.  I beheld
 An ample foss, that in a bow was bent,
 As circling all the plain; for so my guide
 Had told.  Between it and the rampart's base
 On trail ran Centaurs, with keen arrows arm'd,
 As to the chase they on the earth were wont.
 
 At seeing us descend they each one stood;
 And issuing from the troop, three sped with bows
 And missile weapons chosen first; of whom
 One cried from far: "Say to what pain ye come
 Condemn'd, who down this steep have journied?  Speak
 From whence ye stand, or else the bow I draw."
 
 To whom my guide: "Our answer shall be made
 To Chiron, there, when nearer him we come.
 Ill was thy mind, thus ever quick and rash."
 
 Then me he touch'd, and spake: "Nessus is this,
 Who for the fair Deianira died,
 And wrought himself revenge for his own fate.
 He in the midst, that on his breast looks down,
 Is the great Chiron who Achilles nurs'd;
 That other Pholus, prone to wrath."  Around
 The foss these go by thousands, aiming shafts
 At whatsoever spirit dares emerge
 From out the blood, more than his guilt allows.
 
 We to those beasts, that rapid strode along,
 Drew near, when Chiron took an arrow forth,
 And with the notch push'd back his shaggy beard
 To the cheek-bone, then his great mouth to view
 Exposing, to his fellows thus exclaim'd:
 "Are ye aware, that he who comes behind
 Moves what he touches?  The feet of the dead
 Are not so wont."  My trusty guide, who now
 Stood near his breast, where the two natures join,
 Thus made reply: "He is indeed alive,
 And solitary so must needs by me
 Be shown the gloomy vale, thereto induc'd
 By strict necessity, not by delight.
 She left her joyful harpings in the sky,
 Who this new office to my care consign'd.
 He is no robber, no dark spirit I.
 But by that virtue, which empowers my step
 To treat so wild a path, grant us, I pray,
 One of thy band, whom we may trust secure,
 Who to the ford may lead us, and convey
 Across, him mounted on his back; for he
 Is not a spirit that may walk the air."
 
 Then on his right breast turning, Chiron thus
 To Nessus spake: "Return, and be their guide.
 And if ye chance to cross another troop,
 Command them keep aloof."  Onward we mov'd,
 The faithful escort by our side, along
 The border of the crimson-seething flood,
 Whence from those steep'd within loud shrieks arose.
 
 Some there I mark'd, as high as to their brow
 Immers'd, of whom the mighty Centaur thus:
 "These are the souls of tyrants, who were given
 To blood and rapine.  Here they wail aloud
 Their merciless wrongs.  Here Alexander dwells,
 And Dionysius fell, who many a year
 Of woe wrought for fair Sicily.  That brow
 Whereon the hair so jetty clust'ring hangs,
 Is Azzolino; that with flaxen locks
 Obizzo' of Este, in the world destroy'd
 By his foul step-son."  To the bard rever'd
 I turned me round, and thus he spake; "Let him
 Be to thee now first leader, me but next
 To him in rank."  Then farther on a space
 The Centaur paus'd, near some, who at the throat
 Were extant from the wave; and showing us
 A spirit by itself apart retir'd,
 Exclaim'd: "He in God's bosom smote the heart,
 Which yet is honour'd on the bank of Thames."
 
 A race I next espied, who held the head,
 And even all the bust above the stream.
 'Midst these I many a face remember'd well.
 Thus shallow more and more the blood became,
 So that at last it but imbru'd the feet;
 And there our passage lay athwart the foss.
 
 "As ever on this side the boiling wave
 Thou seest diminishing," the Centaur said,
 "So on the other, be thou well assur'd,
 It lower still and lower sinks its bed,
 Till in that part it reuniting join,
 Where 't is the lot of tyranny to mourn.
 There Heav'n's stern justice lays chastising hand
 On Attila, who was the scourge of earth,
 On Sextus, and on Pyrrhus, and extracts
 Tears ever by the seething flood unlock'd
 From the Rinieri, of Corneto this,
 Pazzo the other nam'd, who fill'd the ways
 With violence and war."  This said, he turn'd,
 And quitting us, alone repass'd the ford.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIII
 
 ERE Nessus yet had reach'd the other bank,
 We enter'd on a forest, where no track
 Of steps had worn a way.  Not verdant there
 The foliage, but of dusky hue; not light
 The boughs and tapering, but with knares deform'd
 And matted thick: fruits there were none, but thorns
 Instead, with venom fill'd. Less sharp than these,
 Less intricate the brakes, wherein abide
 Those animals, that hate the cultur'd fields,
 Betwixt Corneto and Cecina's stream.
 
 Here the brute Harpies make their nest, the same
 Who from the Strophades the Trojan band
 Drove with dire boding of their future woe.
 Broad are their pennons, of the human form
 Their neck and count'nance, arm'd with talons keen
 The feet, and the huge belly fledge with wings
 These sit and wail on the drear mystic wood.
 
 The kind instructor in these words began:
 "Ere farther thou proceed, know thou art now
 I' th' second round, and shalt be, till thou come
 Upon the horrid sand: look therefore well
 Around thee, and such things thou shalt behold,
 As would my speech discredit."  On all sides
 I heard sad plainings breathe, and none could see
 From whom they might have issu'd.  In amaze
 Fast bound I stood.  He, as it seem'd, believ'd,
 That I had thought so many voices came
 From some amid those thickets close conceal'd,
 And thus his speech resum'd: "If thou lop off
 A single twig from one of those ill plants,
 The thought thou hast conceiv'd shall vanish quite."
 
 Thereat a little stretching forth my hand,
 From a great wilding gather'd I a branch,
 And straight the trunk exclaim'd: "Why pluck'st thou me?"
 
 Then as the dark blood trickled down its side,
 These words it added: "Wherefore tear'st me thus?
 Is there no touch of mercy in thy breast?
 Men once were we, that now are rooted here.
 Thy hand might well have spar'd us, had we been
 The souls of serpents."  As a brand yet green,
 That burning at one end from the' other sends
 A groaning sound, and hisses with the wind
 That forces out its way, so burst at once,
 Forth from the broken splinter words and blood.
 
 I, letting fall the bough, remain'd as one
 Assail'd by terror, and the sage replied:
 "If he, O injur'd spirit! could have believ'd
 What he hath seen but in my verse describ'd,
 He never against thee had stretch'd his hand.
 But I, because the thing surpass'd belief,
 Prompted him to this deed, which even now
 Myself I rue.  But tell me, who thou wast;
 That, for this wrong to do thee some amends,
 In the upper world (for thither to return
 Is granted him) thy fame he may revive."
 
 "That pleasant word of thine," the trunk replied
 "Hath so inveigled me, that I from speech
 Cannot refrain, wherein if I indulge
 A little longer, in the snare detain'd,
 Count it not grievous.  I it was, who held
 Both keys to Frederick's heart, and turn'd the wards,
 Opening and shutting, with a skill so sweet,
 That besides me, into his inmost breast
 Scarce any other could admittance find.
 The faith I bore to my high charge was such,
 It cost me the life-blood that warm'd my veins.
 The harlot, who ne'er turn'd her gloating eyes
 From Caesar's household, common vice and pest
 Of courts, 'gainst me inflam'd the minds of all;
 And to Augustus they so spread the flame,
 That my glad honours chang'd to bitter woes.
 My soul, disdainful and disgusted, sought
 Refuge in death from scorn, and I became,
 Just as I was, unjust toward myself.
 By the new roots, which fix this stem, I swear,
 That never faith I broke to my liege lord,
 Who merited such honour; and of you,
 If any to the world indeed return,
 Clear he from wrong my memory, that lies
 Yet prostrate under envy's cruel blow."
 
 First somewhat pausing, till the mournful words
 Were ended, then to me the bard began:
 "Lose not the time; but speak and of him ask,
 If more thou wish to learn."  Whence I replied:
 "Question thou him again of whatsoe'er
 Will, as thou think'st, content me; for no power
 Have I to ask, such pity' is at my heart."
 
 He thus resum'd; "So may he do for thee
 Freely what thou entreatest, as thou yet
 Be pleas'd, imprison'd Spirit! to declare,
 How in these gnarled joints the soul is tied;
 And whether any ever from such frame
 Be loosen'd, if thou canst, that also tell."
 
 Thereat the trunk breath'd hard, and the wind soon
 Chang'd into sounds articulate like these;
 
 "Briefly ye shall be answer'd.  When departs
 The fierce soul from the body, by itself
 Thence torn asunder, to the seventh gulf
 By Minos doom'd, into the wood it falls,
 No place assign'd, but wheresoever chance
 Hurls it, there sprouting, as a grain of spelt,
 It rises to a sapling, growing thence
 A savage plant.  The Harpies, on its leaves
 Then feeding, cause both pain and for the pain
 A vent to grief.  We, as the rest, shall come
 For our own spoils, yet not so that with them
 We may again be clad; for what a man
 Takes from himself it is not just he have.
 Here we perforce shall drag them; and throughout
 The dismal glade our bodies shall be hung,
 Each on the wild thorn of his wretched shade."
 
 Attentive yet to listen to the trunk
 We stood, expecting farther speech, when us
 A noise surpris'd, as when a man perceives
 The wild boar and the hunt approach his place
 Of station'd watch, who of the beasts and boughs
 Loud rustling round him hears.  And lo! there came
 Two naked, torn with briers, in headlong flight,
 That they before them broke each fan o' th' wood.
 "Haste now," the foremost cried, "now haste thee death!"
 
 The' other, as seem'd, impatient of delay
 Exclaiming, "Lano! not so bent for speed
 Thy sinews, in the lists of Toppo's field."
 And then, for that perchance no longer breath
 Suffic'd him, of himself and of a bush
 One group he made.  Behind them was the wood
 Full of black female mastiffs, gaunt and fleet,
 As greyhounds that have newly slipp'd the leash.
 On him, who squatted down, they stuck their fangs,
 And having rent him piecemeal bore away
 The tortur'd limbs.  My guide then seiz'd my hand,
 And led me to the thicket, which in vain
 Mourn'd through its bleeding wounds: "O Giacomo
 Of Sant' Andrea! what avails it thee,"
 It cried, "that of me thou hast made thy screen?
 For thy ill life what blame on me recoils?"
 
 When o'er it he had paus'd, my master spake:
 "Say who wast thou, that at so many points
 Breath'st out with blood thy lamentable speech?"
 
 He answer'd: "Oh, ye spirits: arriv'd in time
 To spy the shameful havoc, that from me
 My leaves hath sever'd thus, gather them up,
 And at the foot of their sad parent-tree
 Carefully lay them.  In that city' I dwelt,
 Who for the Baptist her first patron chang'd,
 Whence he for this shall cease not with his art
 To work her woe: and if there still remain'd not
 On Arno's passage some faint glimpse of him,
 Those citizens, who rear'd once more her walls
 Upon the ashes left by Attila,
 Had labour'd without profit of their toil.
 I slung the fatal noose from my own roof."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIV
 
 SOON as the charity of native land
 Wrought in my bosom, I the scatter'd leaves
 Collected, and to him restor'd, who now
 Was hoarse with utt'rance.  To the limit thence
 We came, which from the third the second round
 Divides, and where of justice is display'd
 Contrivance horrible.  Things then first seen
 Clearlier to manifest, I tell how next
 A plain we reach'd, that from its sterile bed
 Each plant repell'd. The mournful wood waves round
 Its garland on all sides, as round the wood
 Spreads the sad foss.  There, on the very edge,
 Our steps we stay'd.  It was an area wide
 Of arid sand and thick, resembling most
 The soil that erst by Cato's foot was trod.
 
 Vengeance of Heav'n!  Oh! how shouldst thou be fear'd
 By all, who read what here my eyes beheld!
 
 Of naked spirits many a flock I saw,
 All weeping piteously, to different laws
 Subjected: for on the' earth some lay supine,
 Some crouching close were seated, others pac'd
 Incessantly around; the latter tribe,
 More numerous, those fewer who beneath
 The torment lay, but louder in their grief.
 
 O'er all the sand fell slowly wafting down
 Dilated flakes of fire, as flakes of snow
 On Alpine summit, when the wind is hush'd.
 As in the torrid Indian clime, the son
 Of Ammon saw upon his warrior band
 Descending, solid flames, that to the ground
 Came down: whence he bethought him with his troop
 To trample on the soil; for easier thus
 The vapour was extinguish'd, while alone;
 So fell the eternal fiery flood, wherewith
 The marble glow'd underneath, as under stove
 The viands, doubly to augment the pain.
 
 Unceasing was the play of wretched hands,
 Now this, now that way glancing, to shake off
 The heat, still falling fresh.  I thus began:
 "Instructor! thou who all things overcom'st,
 Except the hardy demons, that rush'd forth
 To stop our entrance at the gate, say who
 Is yon huge spirit, that, as seems, heeds not
 The burning, but lies writhen in proud scorn,
 As by the sultry tempest immatur'd?"
 
 Straight he himself, who was aware I ask'd
 My guide of him, exclaim'd: "Such as I was
 When living, dead such now I am.  If Jove
 Weary his workman out, from whom in ire
 He snatch'd the lightnings, that at my last day
 Transfix'd me, if the rest be weary out
 At their black smithy labouring by turns
 In Mongibello, while he cries aloud;
 "Help, help, good Mulciber!" as erst he cried
 In the Phlegraean warfare, and the bolts
 Launch he full aim'd at me with all his might,
 He never should enjoy a sweet revenge."
 
 Then thus my guide, in accent higher rais'd
 Than I before had heard him: "Capaneus!
 Thou art more punish'd, in that this thy pride
 Lives yet unquench'd: no torrent, save thy rage,
 Were to thy fury pain proportion'd full."
 
 Next turning round to me with milder lip
 He spake: "This of the seven kings was one,
 Who girt the Theban walls with siege, and held,
 As still he seems to hold, God in disdain,
 And sets his high omnipotence at nought.
 But, as I told him, his despiteful mood
 Is ornament well suits the breast that wears it.
 Follow me now; and look thou set not yet
 Thy foot in the hot sand, but to the wood
 Keep ever close."  Silently on we pass'd
 To where there gushes from the forest's bound
 A little brook, whose crimson'd wave yet lifts
 My hair with horror.  As the rill, that runs
 From Bulicame, to be portion'd out
 Among the sinful women; so ran this
 Down through the sand, its bottom and each bank
 Stone-built, and either margin at its side,
 Whereon I straight perceiv'd our passage lay.
 
 "Of all that I have shown thee, since that gate
 We enter'd first, whose threshold is to none
 Denied, nought else so worthy of regard,
 As is this river, has thine eye discern'd,
 O'er which the flaming volley all is quench'd."
 
 So spake my guide; and I him thence besought,
 That having giv'n me appetite to know,
 The food he too would give, that hunger crav'd.
 
 "In midst of ocean," forthwith he began,
 "A desolate country lies, which Crete is nam'd,
 Under whose monarch in old times the world
 Liv'd pure and chaste.  A mountain rises there,
 Call'd Ida, joyous once with leaves and streams,
 Deserted now like a forbidden thing.
 It was the spot which Rhea, Saturn's spouse,
 Chose for the secret cradle of her son;
 And better to conceal him, drown'd in shouts
 His infant cries.  Within the mount, upright
 An ancient form there stands and huge, that turns
 His shoulders towards Damiata, and at Rome
 As in his mirror looks.  Of finest gold
 His head is shap'd, pure silver are the breast
 And arms; thence to the middle is of brass.
 And downward all beneath well-temper'd steel,
 Save the right foot of potter's clay, on which
 Than on the other more erect he stands,
 Each part except the gold, is rent throughout;
 And from the fissure tears distil, which join'd
 Penetrate to that cave.  They in their course
 Thus far precipitated down the rock
 Form Acheron, and Styx, and Phlegethon;
 Then by this straiten'd channel passing hence
 Beneath, e'en to the lowest depth of all,
 Form there Cocytus, of whose lake (thyself
 Shall see it) I here give thee no account."
 
 Then I to him: "If from our world this sluice
 Be thus deriv'd; wherefore to us but now
 Appears it at this edge?"  He straight replied:
 "The place, thou know'st, is round; and though great part
 Thou have already pass'd, still to the left
 Descending to the nethermost, not yet
 Hast thou the circuit made of the whole orb.
 Wherefore if aught of new to us appear,
 It needs not bring up wonder in thy looks."
 
 Then I again inquir'd: "Where flow the streams
 Of Phlegethon and Lethe? for of one
 Thou tell'st not, and the other of that shower,
 Thou say'st, is form'd."  He answer thus return'd:
 "Doubtless thy questions all well pleas'd I hear.
 Yet the red seething wave might have resolv'd
 One thou proposest.  Lethe thou shalt see,
 But not within this hollow, in the place,
 Whither to lave themselves the spirits go,
 Whose blame hath been by penitence remov'd."
 He added: "Time is now we quit the wood.
 Look thou my steps pursue: the margins give
 Safe passage, unimpeded by the flames;
 For over them all vapour is extinct."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XV
 
 One of the solid margins bears us now
 Envelop'd in the mist, that from the stream
 Arising, hovers o'er, and saves from fire
 Both piers and water.  As the Flemings rear
 Their mound, 'twixt Ghent and Bruges, to chase back
 The ocean, fearing his tumultuous tide
 That drives toward them, or the Paduans theirs
 Along the Brenta, to defend their towns
 And castles, ere the genial warmth be felt
 On Chiarentana's top; such were the mounds,
 So fram'd, though not in height or bulk to these
 Made equal, by the master, whosoe'er
 He was, that rais'd them here.  We from the wood
 Were not so far remov'd, that turning round
 I might not have discern'd it, when we met
 A troop of spirits, who came beside the pier.
 
 They each one ey'd us, as at eventide
 One eyes another under a new moon,
 And toward us sharpen'd their sight as keen,
 As an old tailor at his needle's eye.
 
 Thus narrowly explor'd by all the tribe,
 I was agniz'd of one, who by the skirt
 Caught me, and cried, "What wonder have we here!"
 
 And I, when he to me outstretch'd his arm,
 Intently fix'd my ken on his parch'd looks,
 That although smirch'd with fire, they hinder'd not
 But I remember'd him; and towards his face
 My hand inclining, answer'd: "Sir!  Brunetto!
 
 "And art thou here?"  He thus to me: "My son!
 Oh let it not displease thee, if Brunetto
 Latini but a little space with thee
 Turn back, and leave his fellows to proceed."
 
 I thus to him replied: "Much as I can,
 I thereto pray thee; and if thou be willing,
 That I here seat me with thee, I consent;
 His leave, with whom I journey, first obtain'd."
 
 "O son!" said he, "whoever of this throng
 One instant stops, lies then a hundred years,
 No fan to ventilate him, when the fire
 Smites sorest.  Pass thou therefore on.  I close
 Will at thy garments walk, and then rejoin
 My troop, who go mourning their endless doom."
 
 I dar'd not from the path descend to tread
 On equal ground with him, but held my head
 Bent down, as one who walks in reverent guise.
 
 "What chance or destiny," thus he began,
 "Ere the last day conducts thee here below?
 And who is this, that shows to thee the way?"
 
 "There up aloft," I answer'd, "in the life
 Serene, I wander'd in a valley lost,
 Before mine age had to its fullness reach'd.
 But yester-morn I left it: then once more
 Into that vale returning, him I met;
 And by this path homeward he leads me back."
 
 "If thou," he answer'd, "follow but thy star,
 Thou canst not miss at last a glorious haven:
 Unless in fairer days my judgment err'd.
 And if my fate so early had not chanc'd,
 Seeing the heav'ns thus bounteous to thee, I
 Had gladly giv'n thee comfort in thy work.
 But that ungrateful and malignant race,
 Who in old times came down from Fesole,
 Ay and still smack of their rough mountain-flint,
 Will for thy good deeds shew thee enmity.
 Nor wonder; for amongst ill-savour'd crabs
 It suits not the sweet fig-tree lay her fruit.
 Old fame reports them in the world for blind,
 Covetous, envious, proud.  Look to it well:
 Take heed thou cleanse thee of their ways.  For thee
 Thy fortune hath such honour in reserve,
 That thou by either party shalt be crav'd
 With hunger keen: but be the fresh herb far
 From the goat's tooth.  The herd of Fesole
 May of themselves make litter, not touch the plant,
 If any such yet spring on their rank bed,
 In which the holy seed revives, transmitted
 From those true Romans, who still there remain'd,
 When it was made the nest of so much ill."
 
 "Were all my wish fulfill'd," I straight replied,
 "Thou from the confines of man's nature yet
 Hadst not been driven forth; for in my mind
 Is fix'd, and now strikes full upon my heart
 The dear, benign, paternal image, such
 As thine was, when so lately thou didst teach me
 The way for man to win eternity;
 And how I priz'd the lesson, it behooves,
 That, long as life endures, my tongue should speak,
 What of my fate thou tell'st, that write I down:
 And with another text to comment on
 For her I keep it, the celestial dame,
 Who will know all, if I to her arrive.
 This only would I have thee clearly note:
 That so my conscience have no plea against me;
 Do fortune as she list, I stand prepar'd.
 Not new or strange such earnest to mine ear.
 Speed fortune then her wheel, as likes her best,
 The clown his mattock; all things have their course."
 
 Thereat my sapient guide upon his right
 Turn'd himself back, then look'd at me and spake:
 "He listens to good purpose who takes note."
 
 I not the less still on my way proceed,
 Discoursing with Brunetto, and inquire
 Who are most known and chief among his tribe.
 
 "To know of some is well;" thus he replied,
 "But of the rest silence may best beseem.
 Time would not serve us for report so long.
 In brief I tell thee, that all these were clerks,
 Men of great learning and no less renown,
 By one same sin polluted in the world.
 With them is Priscian, and Accorso's son
 Francesco herds among that wretched throng:
 And, if the wish of so impure a blotch
 Possess'd thee, him thou also might'st have seen,
 Who by the servants' servant was transferr'd
 From Arno's seat to Bacchiglione, where
 His ill-strain'd nerves he left.  I more would add,
 But must from farther speech and onward way
 Alike desist, for yonder I behold
 A mist new-risen on the sandy plain.
 A company, with whom I may not sort,
 Approaches.  I commend my TREASURE to thee,
 Wherein I yet survive; my sole request."
 
 This said he turn'd, and seem'd as one of those,
 Who o'er Verona's champain try their speed
 For the green mantle, and of them he seem'd,
 Not he who loses but who gains the prize.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVI
 
 NOW came I where the water's din was heard,
 As down it fell into the other round,
 Resounding like the hum of swarming bees:
 When forth together issu'd from a troop,
 That pass'd beneath the fierce tormenting storm,
 Three spirits, running swift.  They towards us came,
 And each one cried aloud, "Oh do thou stay!
 Whom by the fashion of thy garb we deem
 To be some inmate of our evil land."
 
 Ah me! what wounds I mark'd upon their limbs,
 Recent and old, inflicted by the flames!
 E'en the remembrance of them grieves me yet.
 
 Attentive to their cry my teacher paus'd,
 And turn'd to me his visage, and then spake;
 "Wait now! our courtesy these merit well:
 And were 't not for the nature of the place,
 Whence glide the fiery darts, I should have said,
 That haste had better suited thee than them."
 
 They, when we stopp'd, resum'd their ancient wail,
 And soon as they had reach'd us, all the three
 Whirl'd round together in one restless wheel.
 As naked champions, smear'd with slippery oil,
 Are wont intent to watch their place of hold
 And vantage, ere in closer strife they meet;
 Thus each one, as he wheel'd, his countenance
 At me directed, so that opposite
 The neck mov'd ever to the twinkling feet.
 
 "If misery of this drear wilderness,"
 Thus one began, "added to our sad cheer
 And destitute, do call forth scorn on us
 And our entreaties, let our great renown
 Incline thee to inform us who thou art,
 That dost imprint with living feet unharm'd
 The soil of Hell.  He, in whose track thou see'st
 My steps pursuing, naked though he be
 And reft of all, was of more high estate
 Than thou believest; grandchild of the chaste
 Gualdrada, him they Guidoguerra call'd,
 Who in his lifetime many a noble act
 Achiev'd, both by his wisdom and his sword.
 The other, next to me that beats the sand,
 Is Aldobrandi, name deserving well,
 In the' upper world, of honour; and myself
 Who in this torment do partake with them,
 Am Rusticucci, whom, past doubt, my wife
 Of savage temper, more than aught beside
 Hath to this evil brought."  If from the fire
 I had been shelter'd, down amidst them straight
 I then had cast me, nor my guide, I deem,
 Would have restrain'd my going; but that fear
 Of the dire burning vanquish'd the desire,
 Which made me eager of their wish'd embrace.
 
 I then began: "Not scorn, but grief much more,
 Such as long time alone can cure, your doom
 Fix'd deep within me, soon as this my lord
 Spake words, whose tenour taught me to expect
 That such a race, as ye are, was at hand.
 I am a countryman of yours, who still
 Affectionate have utter'd, and have heard
 Your deeds and names renown'd.  Leaving the gall
 For the sweet fruit I go, that a sure guide
 Hath promis'd to me.  But behooves, that far
 As to the centre first I downward tend."
 
 "So may long space thy spirit guide thy limbs,"
 He answer straight return'd; "and so thy fame
 Shine bright, when thou art gone; as thou shalt tell,
 If courtesy and valour, as they wont,
 Dwell in our city, or have vanish'd clean?
 For one amidst us late condemn'd to wail,
 Borsiere, yonder walking with his peers,
 Grieves us no little by the news he brings."
 
 "An upstart multitude and sudden gains,
 Pride and excess, O Florence! have in thee
 Engender'd, so that now in tears thou mourn'st!"
 Thus cried I with my face uprais'd, and they
 All three, who for an answer took my words,
 Look'd at each other, as men look when truth
 Comes to their ear.  "If thou at other times,"
 They all at once rejoin'd, "so easily
 Satisfy those, who question, happy thou,
 Gifted with words, so apt to speak thy thought!
 Wherefore if thou escape this darksome clime,
 Returning to behold the radiant stars,
 When thou with pleasure shalt retrace the past,
 See that of us thou speak among mankind."
 
 This said, they broke the circle, and so swift
 Fled, that as pinions seem'd their nimble feet.
 
 Not in so short a time might one have said
 "Amen," as they had vanish'd. Straight my guide
 Pursu'd his track.  I follow'd; and small space
 Had we pass'd onward, when the water's sound
 Was now so near at hand, that we had scarce
 Heard one another's speech for the loud din.
 
 E'en as the river, that holds on its course
 Unmingled, from the mount of Vesulo,
 On the left side of Apennine, toward
 The east, which Acquacheta higher up
 They call, ere it descend into the vale,
 At Forli by that name no longer known,
 Rebellows o'er Saint Benedict, roll'd on
 From the' Alpine summit down a precipice,
 Where space enough to lodge a thousand spreads;
 Thus downward from a craggy steep we found,
 That this dark wave resounded, roaring loud,
 So that the ear its clamour soon had stunn'd.
 
 I had a cord that brac'd my girdle round,
 Wherewith I erst had thought fast bound to take
 The painted leopard.  This when I had all
 Unloosen'd from me (so my master bade)
 I gather'd up, and stretch'd it forth to him.
 Then to the right he turn'd, and from the brink
 Standing few paces distant, cast it down
 Into the deep abyss.  "And somewhat strange,"
 Thus to myself I spake, "signal so strange
 Betokens, which my guide with earnest eye
 Thus follows."  Ah! what caution must men use
 With those who look not at the deed alone,
 But spy into the thoughts with subtle skill!
 
 "Quickly shall come," he said, "what I expect,
 Thine eye discover quickly, that whereof
 Thy thought is dreaming."  Ever to that truth,
 Which but the semblance of a falsehood wears,
 A man, if possible, should bar his lip;
 Since, although blameless, he incurs reproach.
 But silence here were vain; and by these notes
 Which now I sing, reader!  I swear to thee,
 So may they favour find to latest times!
 That through the gross and murky air I spied
 A shape come swimming up, that might have quell'd
 The stoutest heart with wonder, in such guise
 As one returns, who hath been down to loose
 An anchor grappled fast against some rock,
 Or to aught else that in the salt wave lies,
 Who upward springing close draws in his feet.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVII
 
 "LO! the fell monster with the deadly sting!
 Who passes mountains, breaks through fenced walls
 And firm embattled spears, and with his filth
 Taints all the world!"  Thus me my guide address'd,
 And beckon'd him, that he should come to shore,
 Near to the stony causeway's utmost edge.
 
 Forthwith that image vile of fraud appear'd,
 His head and upper part expos'd on land,
 But laid not on the shore his bestial train.
 His face the semblance of a just man's wore,
 So kind and gracious was its outward cheer;
 The rest was serpent all: two shaggy claws
 Reach'd to the armpits, and the back and breast,
 And either side, were painted o'er with nodes
 And orbits.  Colours variegated more
 Nor Turks nor Tartars e'er on cloth of state
 With interchangeable embroidery wove,
 Nor spread Arachne o'er her curious loom.
 As ofttimes a light skiff, moor'd to the shore,
 Stands part in water, part upon the land;
 Or, as where dwells the greedy German boor,
 The beaver settles watching for his prey;
 So on the rim, that fenc'd the sand with rock,
 Sat perch'd the fiend of evil.  In the void
 Glancing, his tail upturn'd its venomous fork,
 With sting like scorpion's arm'd.  Then thus my guide:
 "Now need our way must turn few steps apart,
 Far as to that ill beast, who couches there."
 
 Thereat toward the right our downward course
 We shap'd, and, better to escape the flame
 And burning marle, ten paces on the verge
 Proceeded.  Soon as we to him arrive,
 A little further on mine eye beholds
 A tribe of spirits, seated on the sand
 Near the wide chasm.  Forthwith my master spake:
 "That to the full thy knowledge may extend
 Of all this round contains, go now, and mark
 The mien these wear: but hold not long discourse.
 Till thou returnest, I with him meantime
 Will parley, that to us he may vouchsafe
 The aid of his strong shoulders."  Thus alone
 Yet forward on the' extremity I pac'd
 Of that seventh circle, where the mournful tribe
 Were seated.  At the eyes forth gush'd their pangs.
 Against the vapours and the torrid soil
 Alternately their shifting hands they plied.
 Thus use the dogs in summer still to ply
 Their jaws and feet by turns, when bitten sore
 By gnats, or flies, or gadflies swarming round.
 
 Noting the visages of some, who lay
 Beneath the pelting of that dolorous fire,
 One of them all I knew not; but perceiv'd,
 That pendent from his neck each bore a pouch
 With colours and with emblems various mark'd,
 On which it seem'd as if their eye did feed.
 
 And when amongst them looking round I came,
 A yellow purse I saw with azure wrought,
 That wore a lion's countenance and port.
 Then still my sight pursuing its career,
 Another I beheld, than blood more red.
 A goose display of whiter wing than curd.
 And one, who bore a fat and azure swine
 Pictur'd on his white scrip, addressed me thus:
 "What dost thou in this deep?  Go now and know,
 Since yet thou livest, that my neighbour here
 Vitaliano on my left shall sit.
 A Paduan with these Florentines am I.
 Ofttimes they thunder in mine ears, exclaiming
 'O haste that noble knight! he who the pouch
 With the three beaks will bring!'"  This said, he writh'd
 The mouth, and loll'd the tongue out, like an ox
 That licks his nostrils.  I, lest longer stay
 He ill might brook, who bade me stay not long,
 Backward my steps from those sad spirits turn'd.
 
 My guide already seated on the haunch
 Of the fierce animal I found; and thus
 He me encourag'd.  "Be thou stout; be bold.
 Down such a steep flight must we now descend!
 Mount thou before: for that no power the tail
 May have to harm thee, I will be i' th' midst."
 
 As one, who hath an ague fit so near,
 His nails already are turn'd blue, and he
 Quivers all o'er, if he but eye the shade;
 Such was my cheer at hearing of his words.
 But shame soon interpos'd her threat, who makes
 The servant bold in presence of his lord.
 
 I settled me upon those shoulders huge,
 And would have said, but that the words to aid
 My purpose came not, "Look thou clasp me firm!"
 
 But he whose succour then not first I prov'd,
 Soon as I mounted, in his arms aloft,
 Embracing, held me up, and thus he spake:
 "Geryon! now move thee! be thy wheeling gyres
 Of ample circuit, easy thy descent.
 Think on th' unusual burden thou sustain'st."
 
 As a small vessel, back'ning out from land,
 Her station quits; so thence the monster loos'd,
 And when he felt himself at large, turn'd round
 There where the breast had been, his forked tail.
 Thus, like an eel, outstretch'd at length he steer'd,
 Gath'ring the air up with retractile claws.
 
 Not greater was the dread when Phaeton
 The reins let drop at random, whence high heaven,
 Whereof signs yet appear, was wrapt in flames;
 Nor when ill-fated Icarus perceiv'd,
 By liquefaction of the scalded wax,
 The trusted pennons loosen'd from his loins,
 His sire exclaiming loud, "Ill way thou keep'st!"
 Than was my dread, when round me on each part
 The air I view'd, and other object none
 Save the fell beast.  He slowly sailing, wheels
 His downward motion, unobserv'd of me,
 But that the wind, arising to my face,
 Breathes on me from below.  Now on our right
 I heard the cataract beneath us leap
 With hideous crash; whence bending down to' explore,
 New terror I conceiv'd at the steep plunge:
 
 For flames I saw, and wailings smote mine ear:
 So that all trembling close I crouch'd my limbs,
 And then distinguish'd, unperceiv'd before,
 By the dread torments that on every side
 Drew nearer, how our downward course we wound.
 
 As falcon, that hath long been on the wing,
 But lure nor bird hath seen, while in despair
 The falconer cries, "Ah me! thou stoop'st to earth!"
 Wearied descends, and swiftly down the sky
 In many an orbit wheels, then lighting sits
 At distance from his lord in angry mood;
 So Geryon lighting places us on foot
 Low down at base of the deep-furrow'd rock,
 And, of his burden there discharg'd, forthwith
 Sprang forward, like an arrow from the string.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVIII
 
 THERE is a place within the depths of hell
 Call'd Malebolge, all of rock dark-stain'd
 With hue ferruginous, e'en as the steep
 That round it circling winds.  Right in the midst
 Of that abominable region, yawns
 A spacious gulf profound, whereof the frame
 Due time shall tell.  The circle, that remains,
 Throughout its round, between the gulf and base
 Of the high craggy banks, successive forms
 Ten trenches, in its hollow bottom sunk.
 
 As where to guard the walls, full many a foss
 Begirds some stately castle, sure defence
 Affording to the space within, so here
 Were model'd these; and as like fortresses
 E'en from their threshold to the brink without,
 Are flank'd with bridges; from the rock's low base
 Thus flinty paths advanc'd, that 'cross the moles
 And dikes, struck onward far as to the gulf,
 That in one bound collected cuts them off.
 Such was the place, wherein we found ourselves
 From Geryon's back dislodg'd. The bard to left
 Held on his way, and I behind him mov'd.
 
 On our right hand new misery I saw,
 New pains, new executioners of wrath,
 That swarming peopled the first chasm.  Below
 Were naked sinners.  Hitherward they came,
 Meeting our faces from the middle point,
 With us beyond but with a larger stride.
 E'en thus the Romans, when the year returns
 Of Jubilee, with better speed to rid
 The thronging multitudes, their means devise
 For such as pass the bridge; that on one side
 All front toward the castle, and approach
 Saint Peter's fane, on th' other towards the mount.
 
 Each divers way along the grisly rock,
 Horn'd demons I beheld, with lashes huge,
 That on their back unmercifully smote.
 Ah! how they made them bound at the first stripe!
 
 None for the second waited nor the third.
 
 Meantime as on I pass'd, one met my sight
 Whom soon as view'd; "Of him," cried I, "not yet
 Mine eye hath had his fill."  With fixed gaze
 I therefore scann'd him.  Straight the teacher kind
 Paus'd with me, and consented I should walk
 Backward a space, and the tormented spirit,
 Who thought to hide him, bent his visage down.
 But it avail'd him nought; for I exclaim'd:
 "Thou who dost cast thy eye upon the ground,
 Unless thy features do belie thee much,
 Venedico art thou.  But what brings thee
 Into this bitter seas'ning?" He replied:
 "Unwillingly I answer to thy words.
 But thy clear speech, that to my mind recalls
 The world I once inhabited, constrains me.
 Know then 'twas I who led fair Ghisola
 To do the Marquis' will, however fame
 The shameful tale have bruited.  Nor alone
 Bologna hither sendeth me to mourn
 Rather with us the place is so o'erthrong'd
 That not so many tongues this day are taught,
 Betwixt the Reno and Savena's stream,
 To answer SIPA in their country's phrase.
 And if of that securer proof thou need,
 Remember but our craving thirst for gold."
 
 Him speaking thus, a demon with his thong
 Struck, and exclaim'd, "Away! corrupter! here
 Women are none for sale."  Forthwith I join'd
 My escort, and few paces thence we came
 To where a rock forth issued from the bank.
 That easily ascended, to the right
 Upon its splinter turning, we depart
 From those eternal barriers. When arriv'd,
 Where underneath the gaping arch lets pass
 The scourged souls: "Pause here," the teacher said,
 "And let these others miserable, now
 Strike on thy ken, faces not yet beheld,
 For that together they with us have walk'd."
 
 From the old bridge we ey'd the pack, who came
 From th' other side towards us, like the rest,
 Excoriate from the lash.  My gentle guide,
 By me unquestion'd, thus his speech resum'd:
 "Behold that lofty shade, who this way tends,
 And seems too woe-begone to drop a tear.
 How yet the regal aspect he retains!
 Jason is he, whose skill and prowess won
 The ram from Colchos. To the Lemnian isle
 His passage thither led him, when those bold
 And pitiless women had slain all their males.
 There he with tokens and fair witching words
 Hypsipyle beguil'd, a virgin young,
 Who first had all the rest herself beguil'd.
 Impregnated he left her there forlorn.
 Such is the guilt condemns him to this pain.
 Here too Medea's inj'ries are avenged.
 All bear him company, who like deceit
 To his have practis'd.  And thus much to know
 Of the first vale suffice thee, and of those
 Whom its keen torments urge."  Now had we come
 Where, crossing the next pier, the straighten'd path
 Bestrides its shoulders to another arch.
 
 Hence in the second chasm we heard the ghosts,
 Who jibber in low melancholy sounds,
 With wide-stretch'd nostrils snort, and on themselves
 Smite with their palms.  Upon the banks a scurf
 From the foul steam condens'd, encrusting hung,
 That held sharp combat with the sight and smell.
 
 So hollow is the depth, that from no part,
 Save on the summit of the rocky span,
 Could I distinguish aught.  Thus far we came;
 And thence I saw, within the foss below,
 A crowd immers'd in ordure, that appear'd
 Draff of the human body.  There beneath
 Searching with eye inquisitive, I mark'd
 One with his head so grim'd, 't were hard to deem,
 If he were clerk or layman.  Loud he cried:
 "Why greedily thus bendest more on me,
 Than on these other filthy ones, thy ken?"
 
 "Because if true my mem'ry," I replied,
 "I heretofore have seen thee with dry locks,
 And thou Alessio art of Lucca sprung.
 Therefore than all the rest I scan thee more."
 
 Then beating on his brain these words he spake:
 "Me thus low down my flatteries have sunk,
 Wherewith I ne'er enough could glut my tongue."
 
 My leader thus: "A little further stretch
 Thy face, that thou the visage well mayst note
 Of that besotted, sluttish courtezan,
 Who there doth rend her with defiled nails,
 Now crouching down, now risen on her feet.
 
 "Thais is this, the harlot, whose false lip
 Answer'd her doting paramour that ask'd,
 'Thankest me much!'--'Say rather wondrously,'
 And seeing this here satiate be our view."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIX
 
 WOE to thee, Simon Magus! woe to you,
 His wretched followers! who the things of God,
 Which should be wedded unto goodness, them,
 Rapacious as ye are, do prostitute
 For gold and silver in adultery!
 Now must the trumpet sound for you, since yours
 Is the third chasm.  Upon the following vault
 We now had mounted, where the rock impends
 Directly o'er the centre of the foss.
 
 Wisdom Supreme! how wonderful the art,
 Which thou dost manifest in heaven, in earth,
 And in the evil world, how just a meed
 Allotting by thy virtue unto all!
 
 I saw the livid stone, throughout the sides
 And in its bottom full of apertures,
 All equal in their width, and circular each,
 Nor ample less nor larger they appear'd
 Than in Saint John's fair dome of me belov'd
 Those fram'd to hold the pure baptismal streams,
 One of the which I brake, some few years past,
 To save a whelming infant; and be this
 A seal to undeceive whoever doubts
 The motive of my deed.  From out the mouth
 Of every one, emerg'd a sinner's feet
 And of the legs high upward as the calf
 The rest beneath was hid.  On either foot
 The soles were burning, whence the flexile joints
 Glanc'd with such violent motion, as had snapt
 Asunder cords or twisted withs.  As flame,
 Feeding on unctuous matter, glides along
 The surface, scarcely touching where it moves;
 So here, from heel to point, glided the flames.
 
 "Master! say who is he, than all the rest
 Glancing in fiercer agony, on whom
 A ruddier flame doth prey?"  I thus inquir'd.
 
 "If thou be willing," he replied, "that I
 Carry thee down, where least the slope bank falls,
 He of himself shall tell thee and his wrongs."
 
 I then: "As pleases thee to me is best.
 Thou art my lord; and know'st that ne'er I quit
 Thy will: what silence hides that knowest thou."
 Thereat on the fourth pier we came, we turn'd,
 And on our left descended to the depth,
 A narrow strait and perforated close.
 Nor from his side my leader set me down,
 Till to his orifice he brought, whose limb
 Quiv'ring express'd his pang.  "Whoe'er thou art,
 Sad spirit! thus revers'd, and as a stake
 Driv'n in the soil!"  I in these words began,
 "If thou be able, utter forth thy voice."
 
 There stood I like the friar, that doth shrive
 A wretch for murder doom'd, who e'en when fix'd,
 Calleth him back, whence death awhile delays.
 
 He shouted: "Ha! already standest there?
 Already standest there, O Boniface!
 By many a year the writing play'd me false.
 So early dost thou surfeit with the wealth,
 For which thou fearedst not in guile to take
 The lovely lady, and then mangle her?"
 
 I felt as those who, piercing not the drift
 Of answer made them, stand as if expos'd
 In mockery, nor know what to reply,
 When Virgil thus admonish'd: "Tell him quick,
 I am not he, not he, whom thou believ'st."
 
 And I, as was enjoin'd me, straight replied.
 
 That heard, the spirit all did wrench his feet,
 And sighing next in woeful accent spake:
 "What then of me requirest?  If to know
 So much imports thee, who I am, that thou
 Hast therefore down the bank descended, learn
 That in the mighty mantle I was rob'd,
 And of a she-bear was indeed the son,
 So eager to advance my whelps, that there
 My having in my purse above I stow'd,
 And here myself.  Under my head are dragg'd
 The rest, my predecessors in the guilt
 Of simony.  Stretch'd at their length they lie
 Along an opening in the rock.  'Midst them
 I also low shall fall, soon as he comes,
 For whom I took thee, when so hastily
 I question'd.  But already longer time
 Hath pass'd, since my souls kindled, and I thus
 Upturn'd have stood, than is his doom to stand
 Planted with fiery feet.  For after him,
 One yet of deeds more ugly shall arrive,
 From forth the west, a shepherd without law,
 Fated to cover both his form and mine.
 He a new Jason shall be call'd, of whom
 In Maccabees we read; and favour such
 As to that priest his king indulgent show'd,
 Shall be of France's monarch shown to him."
 
 I know not if I here too far presum'd,
 But in this strain I answer'd: "Tell me now,
 What treasures from St. Peter at the first
 Our Lord demanded, when he put the keys
 Into his charge?  Surely he ask'd no more
 But, Follow me!  Nor Peter nor the rest
 Or gold or silver of Matthias took,
 When lots were cast upon the forfeit place
 Of the condemned soul.  Abide thou then;
 Thy punishment of right is merited:
 And look thou well to that ill-gotten coin,
 Which against Charles thy hardihood inspir'd.
 If reverence of the keys restrain'd me not,
 Which thou in happier time didst hold, I yet
 Severer speech might use.  Your avarice
 O'ercasts the world with mourning, under foot
 Treading the good, and raising bad men up.
 Of shepherds, like to you, th' Evangelist
 Was ware, when her, who sits upon the waves,
 With kings in filthy whoredom he beheld,
 She who with seven heads tower'd at her birth,
 And from ten horns her proof of glory drew,
 Long as her spouse in virtue took delight.
 Of gold and silver ye have made your god,
 Diff'ring wherein from the idolater,
 But he that worships one, a hundred ye?
 Ah, Constantine! to how much ill gave birth,
 Not thy conversion, but that plenteous dower,
 Which the first wealthy Father gain'd from thee!"
 
 Meanwhile, as thus I sung, he, whether wrath
 Or conscience smote him, violent upsprang
 Spinning on either sole.  I do believe
 My teacher well was pleas'd, with so compos'd
 A lip, he listen'd ever to the sound
 Of the true words I utter'd.  In both arms
 He caught, and to his bosom lifting me
 Upward retrac'd the way of his descent.
 
 Nor weary of his weight he press'd me close,
 Till to the summit of the rock we came,
 Our passage from the fourth to the fifth pier.
 His cherish'd burden there gently he plac'd
 Upon the rugged rock and steep, a path
 Not easy for the clamb'ring goat to mount.
 
 Thence to my view another vale appear'd
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XX
 
 AND now the verse proceeds to torments new,
 Fit argument of this the twentieth strain
 Of the first song, whose awful theme records
 The spirits whelm'd in woe.  Earnest I look'd
 Into the depth, that open'd to my view,
 Moisten'd with tears of anguish, and beheld
 A tribe, that came along the hollow vale,
 In silence weeping: such their step as walk
 Quires chanting solemn litanies on earth.
 
 As on them more direct mine eye descends,
 Each wondrously seem'd to be revers'd
 At the neck-bone, so that the countenance
 Was from the reins averted: and because
 None might before him look, they were compell'd
 To' advance with backward gait.  Thus one perhaps
 Hath been by force of palsy clean transpos'd,
 But I ne'er saw it nor believe it so.
 
 Now, reader! think within thyself, so God
 Fruit of thy reading give thee! how I long
 Could keep my visage dry, when I beheld
 Near me our form distorted in such guise,
 That on the hinder parts fall'n from the face
 The tears down-streaming roll'd.  Against a rock
 I leant and wept, so that my guide exclaim'd:
 "What, and art thou too witless as the rest?
 Here pity most doth show herself alive,
 When she is dead.  What guilt exceedeth his,
 Who with Heaven's judgment in his passion strives?
 Raise up thy head, raise up, and see the man,
 Before whose eyes earth gap'd in Thebes, when all
 Cried out, 'Amphiaraus, whither rushest?
 'Why leavest thou the war?'  He not the less
 Fell ruining far as to Minos down,
 Whose grapple none eludes.  Lo! how he makes
 The breast his shoulders, and who once too far
 Before him wish'd to see, now backward looks,
 And treads reverse his path.  Tiresias note,
 Who semblance chang'd, when woman he became
 Of male, through every limb transform'd, and then
 Once more behov'd him with his rod to strike
 The two entwining serpents, ere the plumes,
 That mark'd the better sex, might shoot again.
 
 "Aruns, with more his belly facing, comes.
 On Luni's mountains 'midst the marbles white,
 Where delves Carrara's hind, who wons beneath,
 A cavern was his dwelling, whence the stars
 And main-sea wide in boundless view he held.
 
 "The next, whose loosen'd tresses overspread
 Her bosom, which thou seest not (for each hair
 On that side grows) was Manto, she who search'd
 Through many regions, and at length her seat
 Fix'd in my native land, whence a short space
 My words detain thy audience.  When her sire
 From life departed, and in servitude
 The city dedicate to Bacchus mourn'd,
 Long time she went a wand'rer through the world.
 Aloft in Italy's delightful land
 A lake there lies, at foot of that proud Alp,
 That o'er the Tyrol locks Germania in,
 Its name Benacus, which a thousand rills,
 Methinks, and more, water between the vale
 Camonica and Garda and the height
 Of Apennine remote.  There is a spot
 At midway of that lake, where he who bears
 Of Trento's flock the past'ral staff, with him
 Of Brescia, and the Veronese, might each
 Passing that way his benediction give.
 A garrison of goodly site and strong
 Peschiera stands, to awe with front oppos'd
 The Bergamese and Brescian, whence the shore
 More slope each way descends.  There, whatsoev'er
 Benacus' bosom holds not, tumbling o'er
 Down falls, and winds a river flood beneath
 Through the green pastures.  Soon as in his course
 The steam makes head, Benacus then no more
 They call the name, but Mincius, till at last
 Reaching Governo into Po he falls.
 Not far his course hath run, when a wide flat
 It finds, which overstretchmg as a marsh
 It covers, pestilent in summer oft.
 Hence journeying, the savage maiden saw
 'Midst of the fen a territory waste
 And naked of inhabitants.  To shun
 All human converse, here she with her slaves
 Plying her arts remain'd, and liv'd, and left
 Her body tenantless.  Thenceforth the tribes,
 Who round were scatter'd, gath'ring to that place
 Assembled; for its strength was great, enclos'd
 On all parts by the fen.  On those dead bones
 They rear'd themselves a city, for her sake,
 Calling it Mantua, who first chose the spot,
 Nor ask'd another omen for the name,
 Wherein more numerous the people dwelt,
 Ere Casalodi's madness by deceit
 Was wrong'd of Pinamonte.  If thou hear
 Henceforth another origin assign'd
 Of that my country, I forewarn thee now,
 That falsehood none beguile thee of the truth."
 
 I answer'd: "Teacher, I conclude thy words
 So certain, that all else shall be to me
 As embers lacking life.  But now of these,
 Who here proceed, instruct me, if thou see
 Any that merit more especial note.
 For thereon is my mind alone intent."
 
 He straight replied: "That spirit, from whose cheek
 The beard sweeps o'er his shoulders brown, what time
 Graecia was emptied of her males, that scarce
 The cradles were supplied, the seer was he
 In Aulis, who with Calchas gave the sign
 When first to cut the cable.  Him they nam'd
 Eurypilus: so sings my tragic strain,
 In which majestic measure well thou know'st,
 Who know'st it all.  That other, round the loins
 So slender of his shape, was Michael Scot,
 Practis'd in ev'ry slight of magic wile.
 
 "Guido Bonatti see: Asdente mark,
 Who now were willing, he had tended still
 The thread and cordwain; and too late repents.
 
 "See next the wretches, who the needle left,
 The shuttle and the spindle, and became
 Diviners: baneful witcheries they wrought
 With images and herbs.  But onward now:
 For now doth Cain with fork of thorns confine
 On either hemisphere, touching the wave
 Beneath the towers of Seville.  Yesternight
 The moon was round.  Thou mayst remember well:
 For she good service did thee in the gloom
 Of the deep wood."  This said, both onward mov'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXI
 
 THUS we from bridge to bridge, with other talk,
 The which my drama cares not to rehearse,
 Pass'd on; and to the summit reaching, stood
 To view another gap, within the round
 Of Malebolge, other bootless pangs.
 
 Marvelous darkness shadow'd o'er the place.
 
 In the Venetians' arsenal as boils
 Through wintry months tenacious pitch, to smear
 Their unsound vessels; for th' inclement time
 Sea-faring men restrains, and in that while
 His bark one builds anew, another stops
 The ribs of his, that hath made many a voyage;
 One hammers at the prow, one at the poop;
 This shapeth oars, that other cables twirls,
 The mizen one repairs and main-sail rent
 So not by force of fire but art divine
 Boil'd here a glutinous thick mass, that round
 Lim'd all the shore beneath.  I that beheld,
 But therein nought distinguish'd, save the surge,
 Rais'd by the boiling, in one mighty swell
 Heave, and by turns subsiding and fall.  While there
 I fix'd my ken below, "Mark! mark!" my guide
 Exclaiming, drew me towards him from the place,
 Wherein I stood.  I turn'd myself as one,
 Impatient to behold that which beheld
 He needs must shun, whom sudden fear unmans,
 That he his flight delays not for the view.
 Behind me I discern'd a devil black,
 That running, up advanc'd along the rock.
 Ah! what fierce cruelty his look bespake!
 In act how bitter did he seem, with wings
 Buoyant outstretch'd and feet of nimblest tread!
 His shoulder proudly eminent and sharp
 Was with a sinner charg'd; by either haunch
 He held him, the foot's sinew griping fast.
 
 "Ye of our bridge!" he cried, "keen-talon'd fiends!
 Lo! one of Santa Zita's elders!  Him
 Whelm ye beneath, while I return for more.
 That land hath store of such.  All men are there,
 Except Bonturo, barterers: of 'no'
 For lucre there an 'aye' is quickly made."
 
 Him dashing down, o'er the rough rock he turn'd,
 Nor ever after thief a mastiff loos'd
 Sped with like eager haste.  That other sank
 And forthwith writing to the surface rose.
 But those dark demons, shrouded by the bridge,
 Cried "Here the hallow'd visage saves not: here
 Is other swimming than in Serchio's wave.
 Wherefore if thou desire we rend thee not,
 Take heed thou mount not o'er the pitch."  This said,
 They grappled him with more than hundred hooks,
 And shouted: "Cover'd thou must sport thee here;
 So, if thou canst, in secret mayst thou filch."
 
 E'en thus the cook bestirs him, with his grooms,
 To thrust the flesh into the caldron down
 With flesh-hooks, that it float not on the top.
 
 Me then my guide bespake: "Lest they descry,
 That thou art here, behind a craggy rock
 Bend low and screen thee; and whate'er of force
 Be offer'd me, or insult, fear thou not:
 For I am well advis'd, who have been erst
 In the like fray."  Beyond the bridge's head
 Therewith he pass'd, and reaching the sixth pier,
 Behov'd him then a forehead terror-proof.
 
 With storm and fury, as when dogs rush forth
 Upon the poor man's back, who suddenly
 From whence he standeth makes his suit; so rush'd
 Those from beneath the arch, and against him
 Their weapons all they pointed.  He aloud:
 "Be none of you outrageous: ere your time
 Dare seize me, come forth from amongst you one,
 
 "Who having heard my words, decide he then
 If he shall tear these limbs."  They shouted loud,
 "Go, Malacoda!"  Whereat one advanc'd,
 The others standing firm, and as he came,
 "What may this turn avail him?" he exclaim'd.
 
 "Believ'st thou, Malacoda!  I had come
 Thus far from all your skirmishing secure,"
 My teacher answered, "without will divine
 And destiny propitious?  Pass we then
 For so Heaven's pleasure is, that I should lead
 Another through this savage wilderness."
 
 Forthwith so fell his pride, that he let drop
 The instrument of torture at his feet,
 And to the rest exclaim'd: "We have no power
 To strike him."  Then to me my guide: "O thou!
 Who on the bridge among the crags dost sit
 Low crouching, safely now to me return."
 
 I rose, and towards him moved with speed: the fiends
 Meantime all forward drew: me terror seiz'd
 Lest they should break the compact they had made.
 Thus issuing from Caprona, once I saw
 Th' infantry dreading, lest his covenant
 The foe should break; so close he hemm'd them round.
 
 I to my leader's side adher'd, mine eyes
 With fixt and motionless observance bent
 On their unkindly visage.  They their hooks
 Protruding, one the other thus bespake:
 "Wilt thou I touch him on the hip?"  To whom
 Was answer'd: "Even so; nor miss thy aim."
 
 But he, who was in conf'rence with my guide,
 Turn'd rapid round, and thus the demon spake:
 "Stay, stay thee, Scarmiglione!"  Then to us
 He added: "Further footing to your step
 This rock affords not, shiver'd to the base
 Of the sixth arch.  But would you still proceed,
 Up by this cavern go: not distant far,
 Another rock will yield you passage safe.
 Yesterday, later by five hours than now,
 Twelve hundred threescore years and six had fill'd
 The circuit of their course, since here the way
 Was broken.  Thitherward I straight dispatch
 Certain of these my scouts, who shall espy
 If any on the surface bask.  With them
 Go ye: for ye shall find them nothing fell.
 Come Alichino forth," with that he cried,
 "And Calcabrina, and Cagnazzo thou!
 The troop of ten let Barbariccia lead.
 With Libicocco Draghinazzo haste,
 Fang'd Ciriatto, Grafflacane fierce,
 And Farfarello, and mad Rubicant.
 Search ye around the bubbling tar.  For these,
 In safety lead them, where the other crag
 Uninterrupted traverses the dens."
 
 I then: "O master! what a sight is there!
 Ah! without escort, journey we alone,
 Which, if thou know the way, I covet not.
 Unless thy prudence fail thee, dost not mark
 How they do gnarl upon us, and their scowl
 Threatens us present tortures?"  He replied:
 "I charge thee fear not: let them, as they will,
 Gnarl on: 't is but in token of their spite
 Against the souls, who mourn in torment steep'd."
 
 To leftward o'er the pier they turn'd; but each
 Had first between his teeth prest close the tongue,
 Toward their leader for a signal looking,
 Which he with sound obscene triumphant gave.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXII
 
 IT hath been heretofore my chance to see
 Horsemen with martial order shifting camp,
 To onset sallying, or in muster rang'd,
 Or in retreat sometimes outstretch'd for flight;
 Light-armed squadrons and fleet foragers
 Scouring thy plains, Arezzo! have I seen,
 And clashing tournaments, and tilting jousts,
 Now with the sound of trumpets, now of bells,
 Tabors, or signals made from castled heights,
 And with inventions multiform, our own,
 Or introduc'd from foreign land; but ne'er
 To such a strange recorder I beheld,
 In evolution moving, horse nor foot,
 Nor ship, that tack'd by sign from land or star.
 
 With the ten demons on our way we went;
 Ah fearful company! but in the church
 With saints, with gluttons at the tavern's mess.
 
 Still earnest on the pitch I gaz'd, to mark
 All things whate'er the chasm contain'd, and those
 Who burn'd within.  As dolphins, that, in sign
 To mariners, heave high their arched backs,
 That thence forewarn'd they may advise to save
 Their threaten'd vessels; so, at intervals,
 To ease the pain his back some sinner show'd,
 Then hid more nimbly than the lightning glance.
 
 E'en as the frogs, that of a wat'ry moat
 Stand at the brink, with the jaws only out,
 Their feet and of the trunk all else concealed,
 Thus on each part the sinners stood, but soon
 As Barbariccia was at hand, so they
 Drew back under the wave.  I saw, and yet
 My heart doth stagger, one, that waited thus,
 As it befalls that oft one frog remains,
 While the next springs away: and Graffiacan,
 Who of the fiends was nearest, grappling seiz'd
 His clotted locks, and dragg'd him sprawling up,
 That he appear'd to me an otter.  Each
 Already by their names I knew, so well
 When they were chosen, I observ'd, and mark'd
 How one the other call'd. "O Rubicant!
 See that his hide thou with thy talons flay,"
 Shouted together all the cursed crew.
 
 Then I: "Inform thee, master! if thou may,
 What wretched soul is this, on whom their hand
 His foes have laid."  My leader to his side
 Approach'd, and whence he came inquir'd, to whom
 Was answer'd thus: "Born in Navarre's domain
 My mother plac'd me in a lord's retinue,
 For she had borne me to a losel vile,
 A spendthrift of his substance and himself.
 The good king Thibault after that I serv'd,
 To peculating here my thoughts were turn'd,
 Whereof I give account in this dire heat."
 
 Straight Ciriatto, from whose mouth a tusk
 Issued on either side, as from a boar,
 Ript him with one of these.  'Twixt evil claws
 The mouse had fall'n: but Barbariccia cried,
 Seizing him with both arms: "Stand thou apart,
 While I do fix him on my prong transpierc'd."
 Then added, turning to my guide his face,
 "Inquire of him, if more thou wish to learn,
 Ere he again be rent."  My leader thus:
 "Then tell us of the partners in thy guilt;
 Knowest thou any sprung of Latian land
 Under the tar?"--"I parted," he replied,
 "But now from one, who sojourn'd not far thence;
 So were I under shelter now with him!
 Nor hook nor talon then should scare me more."--.
 
 "Too long we suffer," Libicocco cried,
 Then, darting forth a prong, seiz'd on his arm,
 And mangled bore away the sinewy part.
 Him Draghinazzo by his thighs beneath
 Would next have caught, whence angrily their chief,
 Turning on all sides round, with threat'ning brow
 Restrain'd them.  When their strife a little ceas'd,
 Of him, who yet was gazing on his wound,
 My teacher thus without delay inquir'd:
 "Who was the spirit, from whom by evil hap
 Parting, as thou has told, thou cam'st to shore?"--
 
 "It was the friar Gomita," he rejoin'd,
 "He of Gallura, vessel of all guile,
 Who had his master's enemies in hand,
 And us'd them so that they commend him well.
 Money he took, and them at large dismiss'd.
 So he reports: and in each other charge
 Committed to his keeping, play'd the part
 Of barterer to the height: with him doth herd
 The chief of Logodoro, Michel Zanche.
 Sardinia is a theme, whereof their tongue
 Is never weary.  Out! alas! behold
 That other, how he grins!  More would I say,
 But tremble lest he mean to maul me sore."
 
 Their captain then to Farfarello turning,
 Who roll'd his moony eyes in act to strike,
 Rebuk'd him thus: "Off! cursed bird!  Avaunt!"--
 
 "If ye desire to see or hear," he thus
 Quaking with dread resum'd, "or Tuscan spirits
 Or Lombard, I will cause them to appear.
 Meantime let these ill talons bate their fury,
 So that no vengeance they may fear from them,
 And I, remaining in this self-same place,
 Will for myself but one, make sev'n appear,
 When my shrill whistle shall be heard; for so
 Our custom is to call each other up."
 
 Cagnazzo at that word deriding grinn'd,
 Then wagg'd the head and spake: "Hear his device,
 Mischievous as he is, to plunge him down."
 
 Whereto he thus, who fail'd not in rich store
 Of nice-wove toils; "Mischief forsooth extreme,
 Meant only to procure myself more woe!"
 
 No longer Alichino then refrain'd,
 But thus, the rest gainsaying, him bespake:
 "If thou do cast thee down, I not on foot
 Will chase thee, but above the pitch will beat
 My plumes.  Quit we the vantage ground, and let
 The bank be as a shield, that we may see
 If singly thou prevail against us all."
 
 Now, reader, of new sport expect to hear!
 
 They each one turn'd his eyes to the' other shore,
 He first, who was the hardest to persuade.
 The spirit of Navarre chose well his time,
 Planted his feet on land, and at one leap
 Escaping disappointed their resolve.
 
 Them quick resentment stung, but him the most,
 Who was the cause of failure; in pursuit
 He therefore sped, exclaiming; "Thou art caught."
 
 But little it avail'd: terror outstripp'd
 His following flight: the other plung'd beneath,
 And he with upward pinion rais'd his breast:
 E'en thus the water-fowl, when she perceives
 The falcon near, dives instant down, while he
 Enrag'd and spent retires.  That mockery
 In Calcabrina fury stirr'd, who flew
 After him, with desire of strife inflam'd;
 And, for the barterer had 'scap'd, so turn'd
 His talons on his comrade. O'er the dyke
 In grapple close they join'd; but the' other prov'd
 A goshawk able to rend well his foe;
 
 And in the boiling lake both fell.  The heat
 Was umpire soon between them, but in vain
 To lift themselves they strove, so fast were glued
 Their pennons.  Barbariccia, as the rest,
 That chance lamenting, four in flight dispatch'd
 From the' other coast, with all their weapons arm'd.
 They, to their post on each side speedily
 Descending, stretch'd their hooks toward the fiends,
 Who flounder'd, inly burning from their scars:
 And we departing left them to that broil.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIII
 
 IN silence and in solitude we went,
 One first, the other following his steps,
 As minor friars journeying on their road.
 
 The present fray had turn'd my thoughts to muse
 Upon old Aesop's fable, where he told
 What fate unto the mouse and frog befell.
 For language hath not sounds more like in sense,
 Than are these chances, if the origin
 And end of each be heedfully compar'd.
 And as one thought bursts from another forth,
 So afterward from that another sprang,
 Which added doubly to my former fear.
 For thus I reason'd: "These through us have been
 So foil'd, with loss and mock'ry so complete,
 As needs must sting them sore.  If anger then
 Be to their evil will conjoin'd, more fell
 They shall pursue us, than the savage hound
 Snatches the leveret, panting 'twixt his jaws."
 
 Already I perceiv'd my hair stand all
 On end with terror, and look'd eager back.
 
 "Teacher," I thus began, "if speedily
 Thyself and me thou hide not, much I dread
 Those evil talons.  Even now behind
 They urge us: quick imagination works
 So forcibly, that I already feel them."
 
 He answer'd: "Were I form'd of leaded glass,
 I should not sooner draw unto myself
 Thy outward image, than I now imprint
 That from within.  This moment came thy thoughts
 Presented before mine, with similar act
 And count'nance similar, so that from both
 I one design have fram'd.  If the right coast
 Incline so much, that we may thence descend
 Into the other chasm, we shall escape
 Secure from this imagined pursuit."
 
 He had not spoke his purpose to the end,
 When I from far beheld them with spread wings
 Approach to take us.  Suddenly my guide
 Caught me, ev'n as a mother that from sleep
 Is by the noise arous'd, and near her sees
 The climbing fires, who snatches up her babe
 And flies ne'er pausing, careful more of him
 Than of herself, that but a single vest
 Clings round her limbs.  Down from the jutting beach
 Supine he cast him, to that pendent rock,
 Which closes on one part the other chasm.
 
 Never ran water with such hurrying pace
 Adown the tube to turn a landmill's wheel,
 When nearest it approaches to the spokes,
 As then along that edge my master ran,
 Carrying me in his bosom, as a child,
 Not a companion.  Scarcely had his feet
 Reach'd to the lowest of the bed beneath,
 
 When over us the steep they reach'd; but fear
 In him was none; for that high Providence,
 Which plac'd them ministers of the fifth foss,
 Power of departing thence took from them all.
 
 There in the depth we saw a painted tribe,
 Who pac'd with tardy steps around, and wept,
 Faint in appearance and o'ercome with toil.
 Caps had they on, with hoods, that fell low down
 Before their eyes, in fashion like to those
 Worn by the monks in Cologne.  Their outside
 Was overlaid with gold, dazzling to view,
 But leaden all within, and of such weight,
 That Frederick's compar'd to these were straw.
 Oh, everlasting wearisome attire!
 
 We yet once more with them together turn'd
 To leftward, on their dismal moan intent.
 But by the weight oppress'd, so slowly came
 The fainting people, that our company
 Was chang'd at every movement of the step.
 
 Whence I my guide address'd: "See that thou find
 Some spirit, whose name may by his deeds be known,
 And to that end look round thee as thou go'st."
 
 Then one, who understood the Tuscan voice,
 Cried after us aloud: "Hold in your feet,
 Ye who so swiftly speed through the dusk air.
 Perchance from me thou shalt obtain thy wish."
 
 Whereat my leader, turning, me bespake:
 "Pause, and then onward at their pace proceed."
 
 I staid, and saw two Spirits in whose look
 Impatient eagerness of mind was mark'd
 To overtake me; but the load they bare
 And narrow path retarded their approach.
 
 Soon as arriv'd, they with an eye askance
 Perus'd me, but spake not: then turning each
 To other thus conferring said: "This one
 Seems, by the action of his throat, alive.
 And, be they dead, what privilege allows
 They walk unmantled by the cumbrous stole?"
 
 Then thus to me: "Tuscan, who visitest
 The college of the mourning hypocrites,
 Disdain not to instruct us who thou art."
 
 "By Arno's pleasant stream," I thus replied,
 "In the great city I was bred and grew,
 And wear the body I have ever worn.
 but who are ye, from whom such mighty grief,
 As now I witness, courseth down your cheeks?
 What torment breaks forth in this bitter woe?"
 "Our bonnets gleaming bright with orange hue,"
 One of them answer'd, "are so leaden gross,
 That with their weight they make the balances
 To crack beneath them.  Joyous friars we were,
 Bologna's natives, Catalano I,
 He Loderingo nam'd, and by thy land
 Together taken, as men used to take
 A single and indifferent arbiter,
 To reconcile their strifes.  How there we sped,
 Gardingo's vicinage can best declare."
 
 "O friars!"  I began, "your miseries--"
 But there brake off, for one had caught my eye,
 Fix'd to a cross with three stakes on the ground:
 He, when he saw me, writh'd himself, throughout
 Distorted, ruffling with deep sighs his beard.
 And Catalano, who thereof was 'ware,
 
 Thus spake: "That pierced spirit, whom intent
 Thou view'st, was he who gave the Pharisees
 Counsel, that it were fitting for one man
 To suffer for the people.  He doth lie
 Transverse; nor any passes, but him first
 Behoves make feeling trial how each weighs.
 In straits like this along the foss are plac'd
 The father of his consort, and the rest
 Partakers in that council, seed of ill
 And sorrow to the Jews."  I noted then,
 How Virgil gaz'd with wonder upon him,
 Thus abjectly extended on the cross
 In banishment eternal.  To the friar
 He next his words address'd: "We pray ye tell,
 If so be lawful, whether on our right
 Lies any opening in the rock, whereby
 We both may issue hence, without constraint
 On the dark angels, that compell'd they come
 To lead us from this depth."  He thus replied:
 "Nearer than thou dost hope, there is a rock
 From the next circle moving, which o'ersteps
 Each vale of horror, save that here his cope
 Is shatter'd.  By the ruin ye may mount:
 For on the side it slants, and most the height
 Rises below."  With head bent down awhile
 My leader stood, then spake: "He warn'd us ill,
 Who yonder hangs the sinners on his hook."
 
 To whom the friar: At Bologna erst
 "I many vices of the devil heard,
 Among the rest was said, 'He is a liar,
 And the father of lies!'"  When he had spoke,
 My leader with large strides proceeded on,
 Somewhat disturb'd with anger in his look.
 
 I therefore left the spirits heavy laden,
 And following, his beloved footsteps mark'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIV
 
 IN the year's early nonage, when the sun
 Tempers his tresses in Aquarius' urn,
 And now towards equal day the nights recede,
 When as the rime upon the earth puts on
 Her dazzling sister's image, but not long
 Her milder sway endures, then riseth up
 The village hind, whom fails his wintry store,
 And looking out beholds the plain around
 All whiten'd, whence impatiently he smites
 His thighs, and to his hut returning in,
 There paces to and fro, wailing his lot,
 As a discomfited and helpless man;
 Then comes he forth again, and feels new hope
 Spring in his bosom, finding e'en thus soon
 The world hath chang'd its count'nance, grasps his crook,
 And forth to pasture drives his little flock:
 So me my guide dishearten'd when I saw
 His troubled forehead, and so speedily
 That ill was cur'd; for at the fallen bridge
 Arriving, towards me with a look as sweet,
 He turn'd him back, as that I first beheld
 At the steep mountain's foot.  Regarding well
 The ruin, and some counsel first maintain'd
 With his own thought, he open'd wide his arm
 And took me up.  As one, who, while he works,
 Computes his labour's issue, that he seems
 Still to foresee the' effect, so lifting me
 Up to the summit of one peak, he fix'd
 His eye upon another.  "Grapple that,"
 Said he, "but first make proof, if it be such
 As will sustain thee."  For one capp'd with lead
 This were no journey.  Scarcely he, though light,
 And I, though onward push'd from crag to crag,
 Could mount.  And if the precinct of this coast
 Were not less ample than the last, for him
 I know not, but my strength had surely fail'd.
 But Malebolge all toward the mouth
 Inclining of the nethermost abyss,
 The site of every valley hence requires,
 That one side upward slope, the other fall.
 
 At length the point of our descent we reach'd
 From the last flag: soon as to that arriv'd,
 So was the breath exhausted from my lungs,
 I could no further, but did seat me there.
 
 "Now needs thy best of man;" so spake my guide:
 "For not on downy plumes, nor under shade
 Of canopy reposing, fame is won,
 Without which whosoe'er consumes his days
 Leaveth such vestige of himself on earth,
 As smoke in air or foam upon the wave.
 Thou therefore rise: vanish thy weariness
 By the mind's effort, in each struggle form'd
 To vanquish, if she suffer not the weight
 Of her corporeal frame to crush her down.
 A longer ladder yet remains to scale.
 From these to have escap'd sufficeth not.
 If well thou note me, profit by my words."
 
 I straightway rose, and show'd myself less spent
 Than I in truth did feel me.  "On," I cried,
 "For I am stout and fearless."  Up the rock
 Our way we held, more rugged than before,
 Narrower and steeper far to climb.  From talk
 I ceas'd not, as we journey'd, so to seem
 Least faint; whereat a voice from the other foss
 Did issue forth, for utt'rance suited ill.
 Though on the arch that crosses there I stood,
 What were the words I knew not, but who spake
 Seem'd mov'd in anger.  Down I stoop'd to look,
 But my quick eye might reach not to the depth
 For shrouding darkness; wherefore thus I spake:
 "To the next circle, Teacher, bend thy steps,
 And from the wall dismount we; for as hence
 I hear and understand not, so I see
 Beneath, and naught discern."--"I answer not,"
 Said he, "but by the deed.  To fair request
 Silent performance maketh best return."
 
 We from the bridge's head descended, where
 To the eighth mound it joins, and then the chasm
 Opening to view, I saw a crowd within
 Of serpents terrible, so strange of shape
 And hideous, that remembrance in my veins
 Yet shrinks the vital current.  Of her sands
 Let Lybia vaunt no more: if Jaculus,
 Pareas and Chelyder be her brood,
 Cenchris and Amphisboena, plagues so dire
 Or in such numbers swarming ne'er she shew'd,
 Not with all Ethiopia, and whate'er
 Above the Erythraean sea is spawn'd.
 
 Amid this dread exuberance of woe
 Ran naked spirits wing'd with horrid fear,
 Nor hope had they of crevice where to hide,
 Or heliotrope to charm them out of view.
 With serpents were their hands behind them bound,
 Which through their reins infix'd the tail and head
 Twisted in folds before.  And lo! on one
 Near to our side, darted an adder up,
 And, where the neck is on the shoulders tied,
 Transpierc'd him.  Far more quickly than e'er pen
 Wrote O or I, he kindled, burn'd, and chang'd
 To ashes, all pour'd out upon the earth.
 When there dissolv'd he lay, the dust again
 Uproll'd spontaneous, and the self-same form
 Instant resumed.  So mighty sages tell,
 The' Arabian Phoenix, when five hundred years
 Have well nigh circled, dies, and springs forthwith
 Renascent.  Blade nor herb throughout his life
 He tastes, but tears of frankincense alone
 And odorous amomum: swaths of nard
 And myrrh his funeral shroud.  As one that falls,
 He knows not how, by force demoniac dragg'd
 To earth, or through obstruction fettering up
 In chains invisible the powers of man,
 Who, risen from his trance, gazeth around,
 Bewilder'd with the monstrous agony
 He hath endur'd, and wildly staring sighs;
 So stood aghast the sinner when he rose.
 
 Oh! how severe God's judgment, that deals out
 Such blows in stormy vengeance!  Who he was
 My teacher next inquir'd, and thus in few
 He answer'd: "Vanni Fucci am I call'd,
 Not long since rained down from Tuscany
 To this dire gullet.  Me the beastial life
 And not the human pleas'd, mule that I was,
 Who in Pistoia found my worthy den."
 
 I then to Virgil: "Bid him stir not hence,
 And ask what crime did thrust him hither: once
 A man I knew him choleric and bloody."
 
 The sinner heard and feign'd not, but towards me
 His mind directing and his face, wherein
 Was dismal shame depictur'd, thus he spake:
 "It grieves me more to have been caught by thee
 In this sad plight, which thou beholdest, than
 When I was taken from the other life.
 I have no power permitted to deny
 What thou inquirest.  I am doom'd thus low
 To dwell, for that the sacristy by me
 Was rifled of its goodly ornaments,
 And with the guilt another falsely charged.
 But that thou mayst not joy to see me thus,
 So as thou e'er shalt 'scape this darksome realm
 Open thine ears and hear what I forebode.
 Reft of the Neri first Pistoia pines,
 Then Florence changeth citizens and laws.
 From Valdimagra, drawn by wrathful Mars,
 A vapour rises, wrapt in turbid mists,
 And sharp and eager driveth on the storm
 With arrowy hurtling o'er Piceno's field,
 Whence suddenly the cloud shall burst, and strike
 Each helpless Bianco prostrate to the ground.
 This have I told, that grief may rend thy heart."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXV
 
 WHEN he had spoke, the sinner rais'd his hands
 Pointed in mockery, and cried: "Take them, God!
 I level them at thee!"  From that day forth
 The serpents were my friends; for round his neck
 One of then rolling twisted, as it said,
 "Be silent, tongue!"  Another to his arms
 Upgliding, tied them, riveting itself
 So close, it took from them the power to move.
 
 Pistoia!  Ah Pistoia! why dost doubt
 To turn thee into ashes, cumb'ring earth
 No longer, since in evil act so far
 Thou hast outdone thy seed?  I did not mark,
 Through all the gloomy circles of the' abyss,
 Spirit, that swell'd so proudly 'gainst his God,
 Not him, who headlong fell from Thebes.  He fled,
 Nor utter'd more; and after him there came
 A centaur full of fury, shouting, "Where
 Where is the caitiff?"  On Maremma's marsh
 Swarm not the serpent tribe, as on his haunch
 They swarm'd, to where the human face begins.
 Behind his head upon the shoulders lay,
 With open wings, a dragon breathing fire
 On whomsoe'er he met.  To me my guide:
 "Cacus is this, who underneath the rock
 Of Aventine spread oft a lake of blood.
 He, from his brethren parted, here must tread
 A different journey, for his fraudful theft
 Of the great herd, that near him stall'd; whence found
 His felon deeds their end, beneath the mace
 Of stout Alcides, that perchance laid on
 A hundred blows, and not the tenth was felt."
 
 While yet he spake, the centaur sped away:
 And under us three spirits came, of whom
 Nor I nor he was ware, till they exclaim'd;
 "Say who are ye?"  We then brake off discourse,
 Intent on these alone.  I knew them not;
 But, as it chanceth oft, befell, that one
 Had need to name another.  "Where," said he,
 "Doth Cianfa lurk?"  I, for a sign my guide
 Should stand attentive, plac'd against my lips
 The finger lifted.  If, O reader! now
 Thou be not apt to credit what I tell,
 No marvel; for myself do scarce allow
 The witness of mine eyes.  But as I looked
 Toward them, lo! a serpent with six feet
 Springs forth on one, and fastens full upon him:
 His midmost grasp'd the belly, a forefoot
 Seiz'd on each arm (while deep in either cheek
 He flesh'd his fangs); the hinder on the thighs
 Were spread, 'twixt which the tail inserted curl'd
 Upon the reins behind.  Ivy ne'er clasp'd
 A dodder'd oak, as round the other's limbs
 The hideous monster intertwin'd his own.
 Then, as they both had been of burning wax,
 Each melted into other, mingling hues,
 That which was either now was seen no more.
 Thus up the shrinking paper, ere it burns,
 A brown tint glides, not turning yet to black,
 And the clean white expires.  The other two
 Look'd on exclaiming: "Ah, how dost thou change,
 Agnello!  See!  Thou art nor double now,
 
 "Nor only one."  The two heads now became
 One, and two figures blended in one form
 Appear'd, where both were lost.  Of the four lengths
 Two arms were made: the belly and the chest
 The thighs and legs into such members chang'd,
 As never eye hath seen.  Of former shape
 All trace was vanish'd.  Two yet neither seem'd
 That image miscreate, and so pass'd on
 With tardy steps.  As underneath the scourge
 Of the fierce dog-star, that lays bare the fields,
 Shifting from brake to brake, the lizard seems
 A flash of lightning, if he thwart the road,
 So toward th' entrails of the other two
 Approaching seem'd, an adder all on fire,
 As the dark pepper-grain, livid and swart.
 In that part, whence our life is nourish'd first,
 One he transpierc'd; then down before him fell
 Stretch'd out.  The pierced spirit look'd on him
 But spake not; yea stood motionless and yawn'd,
 As if by sleep or fev'rous fit assail'd.
 He ey'd the serpent, and the serpent him.
 One from the wound, the other from the mouth
 Breath'd a thick smoke, whose vap'ry columns join'd.
 
 Lucan in mute attention now may hear,
 Nor thy disastrous fate, Sabellus! tell,
 Nor shine, Nasidius!  Ovid now be mute.
 What if in warbling fiction he record
 Cadmus and Arethusa, to a snake
 Him chang'd, and her into a fountain clear,
 I envy not; for never face to face
 Two natures thus transmuted did he sing,
 Wherein both shapes were ready to assume
 The other's substance.  They in mutual guise
 So answer'd, that the serpent split his train
 Divided to a fork, and the pierc'd spirit
 Drew close his steps together, legs and thighs
 Compacted, that no sign of juncture soon
 Was visible: the tail disparted took
 The figure which the spirit lost, its skin
 Soft'ning, his indurated to a rind.
 The shoulders next I mark'd, that ent'ring join'd
 The monster's arm-pits, whose two shorter feet
 So lengthen'd, as the other's dwindling shrunk.
 The feet behind then twisting up became
 That part that man conceals, which in the wretch
 Was cleft in twain.  While both the shadowy smoke
 With a new colour veils, and generates
 Th' excrescent pile on one, peeling it off
 From th' other body, lo! upon his feet
 One upright rose, and prone the other fell.
 Not yet their glaring and malignant lamps
 Were shifted, though each feature chang'd beneath.
 Of him who stood erect, the mounting face
 Retreated towards the temples, and what there
 Superfluous matter came, shot out in ears
 From the smooth cheeks, the rest, not backward dragg'd,
 Of its excess did shape the nose; and swell'd
 Into due size protuberant the lips.
 He, on the earth who lay, meanwhile extends
 His sharpen'd visage, and draws down the ears
 Into the head, as doth the slug his horns.
 His tongue continuous before and apt
 For utt'rance, severs; and the other's fork
 Closing unites.  That done the smoke was laid.
 The soul, transform'd into the brute, glides off,
 Hissing along the vale, and after him
 The other talking sputters; but soon turn'd
 His new-grown shoulders on him, and in few
 Thus to another spake: "Along this path
 Crawling, as I have done, speed Buoso now!"
 
 So saw I fluctuate in successive change
 Th' unsteady ballast of the seventh hold:
 And here if aught my tongue have swerv'd, events
 So strange may be its warrant.  O'er mine eyes
 Confusion hung, and on my thoughts amaze.
 
 Yet 'scap'd they not so covertly, but well
 I mark'd Sciancato: he alone it was
 Of the three first that came, who chang'd not: thou,
 The other's fate, Gaville, still dost rue.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXVI
 
 FLORENCE exult! for thou so mightily
 Hast thriven, that o'er land and sea thy wings
 Thou beatest, and thy name spreads over hell!
 Among the plund'rers such the three I found
 Thy citizens, whence shame to me thy son,
 And no proud honour to thyself redounds.
 
 But if our minds, when dreaming near the dawn,
 Are of the truth presageful, thou ere long
 Shalt feel what Prato, (not to say the rest)
 Would fain might come upon thee; and that chance
 Were in good time, if it befell thee now.
 Would so it were, since it must needs befall!
 For as time wears me, I shall grieve the more.
 
 We from the depth departed; and my guide
 Remounting scal'd the flinty steps, which late
 We downward trac'd, and drew me up the steep.
 Pursuing thus our solitary way
 Among the crags and splinters of the rock,
 Sped not our feet without the help of hands.
 
 Then sorrow seiz'd me, which e'en now revives,
 As my thought turns again to what I saw,
 And, more than I am wont, I rein and curb
 The powers of nature in me, lest they run
 Where Virtue guides not; that if aught of good
 My gentle star, or something better gave me,
 I envy not myself the precious boon.
 
 As in that season, when the sun least veils
 His face that lightens all, what time the fly
 Gives way to the shrill gnat, the peasant then
 Upon some cliff reclin'd, beneath him sees
 Fire-flies innumerous spangling o'er the vale,
 Vineyard or tilth, where his day-labour lies:
 With flames so numberless throughout its space
 Shone the eighth chasm, apparent, when the depth
 Was to my view expos'd. As he, whose wrongs
 The bears aveng'd, at its departure saw
 Elijah's chariot, when the steeds erect
 Rais'd their steep flight for heav'n; his eyes meanwhile,
 Straining pursu'd them, till the flame alone
 Upsoaring like a misty speck he kenn'd;
 E'en thus along the gulf moves every flame,
 A sinner so enfolded close in each,
 That none exhibits token of the theft.
 
 Upon the bridge I forward bent to look,
 And grasp'd a flinty mass, or else had fall'n,
 Though push'd not from the height.  The guide, who mark'd
 How I did gaze attentive, thus began:
 
 "Within these ardours are the spirits, each
 Swath'd in confining fire."--"Master, thy word,"
 I answer'd, "hath assur'd me; yet I deem'd
 Already of the truth, already wish'd
 To ask thee, who is in yon fire, that comes
 So parted at the summit, as it seem'd
 Ascending from that funeral pile, where lay
 The Theban brothers?"  He replied: "Within
 Ulysses there and Diomede endure
 Their penal tortures, thus to vengeance now
 Together hasting, as erewhile to wrath.
 These in the flame with ceaseless groans deplore
 The ambush of the horse, that open'd wide
 A portal for that goodly seed to pass,
 Which sow'd imperial Rome; nor less the guile
 Lament they, whence of her Achilles 'reft
 Deidamia yet in death complains.
 And there is rued the stratagem, that Troy
 Of her Palladium spoil'd."--"If they have power
 Of utt'rance from within these sparks," said I,
 "O master! think my prayer a thousand fold
 In repetition urg'd, that thou vouchsafe
 To pause, till here the horned flame arrive.
 See, how toward it with desire I bend."
 
 He thus: "Thy prayer is worthy of much praise,
 And I accept it therefore: but do thou
 Thy tongue refrain: to question them be mine,
 For I divine thy wish: and they perchance,
 For they were Greeks, might shun discourse with thee."
 
 When there the flame had come, where time and place
 Seem'd fitting to my guide, he thus began:
 "O ye, who dwell two spirits in one fire!
 If living I of you did merit aught,
 Whate'er the measure were of that desert,
 When in the world my lofty strain I pour'd,
 Move ye not on, till one of you unfold
 In what clime death o'ertook him self-destroy'd."
 
 Of the old flame forthwith the greater horn
 Began to roll, murmuring, as a fire
 That labours with the wind, then to and fro
 Wagging the top, as a tongue uttering sounds,
 Threw out its voice, and spake: "When I escap'd
 From Circe, who beyond a circling year
 Had held me near Caieta, by her charms,
 Ere thus Aeneas yet had nam'd the shore,
 Nor fondness for my son, nor reverence
 Of my old father, nor return of love,
 That should have crown'd Penelope with joy,
 Could overcome in me the zeal I had
 T' explore the world, and search the ways of life,
 Man's evil and his virtue.  Forth I sail'd
 Into the deep illimitable main,
 With but one bark, and the small faithful band
 That yet cleav'd to me.  As Iberia far,
 Far as Morocco either shore I saw,
 And the Sardinian and each isle beside
 Which round that ocean bathes.  Tardy with age
 Were I and my companions, when we came
 To the strait pass, where Hercules ordain'd
 The bound'ries not to be o'erstepp'd by man.
 The walls of Seville to my right I left,
 On the' other hand already Ceuta past.
 
 "O brothers!"  I began, "who to the west
 Through perils without number now have reach'd,
 To this the short remaining watch, that yet
 Our senses have to wake, refuse not proof
 Of the unpeopled world, following the track
 Of Phoebus. Call to mind from whence we sprang:
 Ye were not form'd to live the life of brutes
 But virtue to pursue and knowledge high.
 With these few words I sharpen'd for the voyage
 The mind of my associates, that I then
 Could scarcely have withheld them.  To the dawn
 Our poop we turn'd, and for the witless flight
 Made our oars wings, still gaining on the left.
 Each star of the' other pole night now beheld,
 And ours so low, that from the ocean-floor
 It rose not.  Five times re-illum'd, as oft
 Vanish'd the light from underneath the moon
 Since the deep way we enter'd, when from far
 Appear'd a mountain dim, loftiest methought
 Of all I e'er beheld.  Joy seiz'd us straight,
 But soon to mourning changed.  From the new land
 A whirlwind sprung, and at her foremost side
 Did strike the vessel.  Thrice it whirl'd her round
 With all the waves, the fourth time lifted up
 The poop, and sank the prow: so fate decreed:
 And over us the booming billow clos'd."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVII
 
 NOW upward rose the flame, and still'd its light
 To speak no more, and now pass'd on with leave
 From the mild poet gain'd, when following came
 Another, from whose top a sound confus'd,
 Forth issuing, drew our eyes that way to look.
 
 As the Sicilian bull, that rightfully
 His cries first echoed, who had shap'd its mould,
 Did so rebellow, with the voice of him
 Tormented, that the brazen monster seem'd
 Pierc'd through with pain; thus while no way they found
 Nor avenue immediate through the flame,
 Into its language turn'd the dismal words:
 But soon as they had won their passage forth,
 Up from the point, which vibrating obey'd
 Their motion at the tongue, these sounds we heard:
 "O thou! to whom I now direct my voice!
 That lately didst exclaim in Lombard phrase,
 
 "Depart thou, I solicit thee no more,
 Though somewhat tardy I perchance arrive
 Let it not irk thee here to pause awhile,
 And with me parley: lo! it irks not me
 And yet I burn.  If but e'en now thou fall
 into this blind world, from that pleasant land
 Of Latium, whence I draw my sum of guilt,
 Tell me if those, who in Romagna dwell,
 Have peace or war.  For of the mountains there
 Was I, betwixt Urbino and the height,
 Whence Tyber first unlocks his mighty flood."
 
 Leaning I listen'd yet with heedful ear,
 When, as he touch'd my side, the leader thus:
 "Speak thou: he is a Latian."  My reply
 Was ready, and I spake without delay:
 
 "O spirit! who art hidden here below!
 Never was thy Romagna without war
 In her proud tyrants' bosoms, nor is now:
 But open war there left I none.  The state,
 Ravenna hath maintain'd this many a year,
 Is steadfast.  There Polenta's eagle broods,
 And in his broad circumference of plume
 O'ershadows Cervia. The green talons grasp
 The land, that stood erewhile the proof so long,
 And pil'd in bloody heap the host of France.
 
 "The' old mastiff of Verruchio and the young,
 That tore Montagna in their wrath, still make,
 Where they are wont, an augre of their fangs.
 
 "Lamone's city and Santerno's range
 Under the lion of the snowy lair.
 Inconstant partisan! that changeth sides,
 Or ever summer yields to winter's frost.
 And she, whose flank is wash'd of Savio's wave,
 As 'twixt the level and the steep she lies,
 Lives so 'twixt tyrant power and liberty.
 
 "Now tell us, I entreat thee, who art thou?
 Be not more hard than others.  In the world,
 So may thy name still rear its forehead high."
 
 Then roar'd awhile the fire, its sharpen'd point
 On either side wav'd, and thus breath'd at last:
 "If I did think, my answer were to one,
 Who ever could return unto the world,
 This flame should rest unshaken.  But since ne'er,
 If true be told me, any from this depth
 Has found his upward way, I answer thee,
 Nor fear lest infamy record the words.
 
 "A man of arms at first, I cloth'd me then
 In good Saint Francis' girdle, hoping so
 T' have made amends.  And certainly my hope
 Had fail'd not, but that he, whom curses light on,
 The' high priest again seduc'd me into sin.
 And how and wherefore listen while I tell.
 Long as this spirit mov'd the bones and pulp
 My mother gave me, less my deeds bespake
 The nature of the lion than the fox.
 All ways of winding subtlety I knew,
 And with such art conducted, that the sound
 Reach'd the world's limit.  Soon as to that part
 Of life I found me come, when each behoves
 To lower sails and gather in the lines;
 That which before had pleased me then I rued,
 And to repentance and confession turn'd;
 Wretch that I was! and well it had bested me!
 The chief of the new Pharisees meantime,
 Waging his warfare near the Lateran,
 Not with the Saracens or Jews (his foes
 All Christians were, nor against Acre one
 Had fought, nor traffic'd in the Soldan's land),
 He his great charge nor sacred ministry
 In himself, rev'renc'd, nor in me that cord,
 Which us'd to mark with leanness whom it girded.
 As in Socrate, Constantine besought
 To cure his leprosy Sylvester's aid,
 So me to cure the fever of his pride
 This man besought: my counsel to that end
 He ask'd: and I was silent: for his words
 Seem'd drunken: but forthwith he thus resum'd:
 'From thy heart banish fear: of all offence
 I hitherto absolve thee.  In return,
 Teach me my purpose so to execute,
 That Penestrino cumber earth no more.
 Heav'n, as thou knowest, I have power to shut
 And open: and the keys are therefore twain,
 The which my predecessor meanly priz'd.'"
 
 Then, yielding to the forceful arguments,
 Of silence as more perilous I deem'd,
 And answer'd: "Father! since thou washest me
 Clear of that guilt wherein I now must fall,
 Large promise with performance scant, be sure,
 Shall make thee triumph in thy lofty seat."
 
 "When I was number'd with the dead, then came
 Saint Francis for me; but a cherub dark
 He met, who cried: 'Wrong me not; he is mine,
 And must below to join the wretched crew,
 For the deceitful counsel which he gave.
 E'er since I watch'd him, hov'ring at his hair,
 No power can the impenitent absolve;
 Nor to repent and will at once consist,
 By contradiction absolute forbid.'"
 Oh mis'ry! how I shook myself, when he
 Seiz'd me, and cried, "Thou haply thought'st me not
 A disputant in logic so exact."
 To Minos down he bore me, and the judge
 Twin'd eight times round his callous back the tail,
 Which biting with excess of rage, he spake:
 "This is a guilty soul, that in the fire
 Must vanish.  Hence perdition-doom'd I rove
 A prey to rankling sorrow in this garb."
 
 When he had thus fulfill'd his words, the flame
 In dolour parted, beating to and fro,
 And writhing its sharp horn.  We onward went,
 I and my leader, up along the rock,
 Far as another arch, that overhangs
 The foss, wherein the penalty is paid
 Of those, who load them with committed sin.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXVIII
 
 WHO, e'en in words unfetter'd, might at full
 Tell of the wounds and blood that now I saw,
 Though he repeated oft the tale? No tongue
 So vast a theme could equal, speech and thought
 Both impotent alike.  If in one band
 Collected, stood the people all, who e'er
 Pour'd on Apulia's happy soil their blood,
 Slain by the Trojans, and in that long war
 When of the rings the measur'd booty made
 A pile so high, as Rome's historian writes
 Who errs not, with the multitude, that felt
 The grinding force of Guiscard's Norman steel,
 And those the rest, whose bones are gather'd yet
 At Ceperano, there where treachery
 Branded th' Apulian name, or where beyond
 Thy walls, O Tagliacozzo, without arms
 The old Alardo conquer'd; and his limbs
 One were to show transpierc'd, another his
 Clean lopt away; a spectacle like this
 Were but a thing of nought, to the' hideous sight
 Of the ninth chasm.  A rundlet, that hath lost
 Its middle or side stave, gapes not so wide,
 As one I mark'd, torn from the chin throughout
 Down to the hinder passage: 'twixt the legs
 Dangling his entrails hung, the midriff lay
 Open to view, and wretched ventricle,
 That turns th' englutted aliment to dross.
 
 Whilst eagerly I fix on him my gaze,
 He ey'd me, with his hands laid his breast bare,
 And cried; "Now mark how I do rip me! lo!
 
 "How is Mohammed mangled! before me
 Walks Ali weeping, from the chin his face
 Cleft to the forelock; and the others all
 Whom here thou seest, while they liv'd, did sow
 Scandal and schism, and therefore thus are rent.
 A fiend is here behind, who with his sword
 Hacks us thus cruelly, slivering again
 Each of this ream, when we have compast round
 The dismal way, for first our gashes close
 Ere we repass before him.  But say who
 Art thou, that standest musing on the rock,
 Haply so lingering to delay the pain
 Sentenc'd upon thy crimes?"--"Him death not yet,"
 My guide rejoin'd, "hath overta'en, nor sin
 Conducts to torment; but, that he may make
 Full trial of your state, I who am dead
 Must through the depths of hell, from orb to orb,
 Conduct him.  Trust my words, for they are true."
 
 More than a hundred spirits, when that they heard,
 Stood in the foss to mark me, through amazed,
 Forgetful of their pangs.  "Thou, who perchance
 Shalt shortly view the sun, this warning thou
 Bear to Dolcino: bid him, if he wish not
 Here soon to follow me, that with good store
 Of food he arm him, lest impris'ning snows
 Yield him a victim to Novara's power,
 No easy conquest else."  With foot uprais'd
 For stepping, spake Mohammed, on the ground
 Then fix'd it to depart.  Another shade,
 Pierc'd in the throat, his nostrils mutilate
 E'en from beneath the eyebrows, and one ear
 Lopt off, who with the rest through wonder stood
 Gazing, before the rest advanc'd, and bar'd
 His wind-pipe, that without was all o'ersmear'd
 With crimson stain.  "O thou!" said he, "whom sin
 Condemns not, and whom erst (unless too near
 Resemblance do deceive me) I aloft
 Have seen on Latian ground, call thou to mind
 Piero of Medicina, if again
 Returning, thou behold'st the pleasant land
 That from Vercelli slopes to Mercabo;
 
 "And there instruct the twain, whom Fano boasts
 Her worthiest sons, Guido and Angelo,
 That if 't is giv'n us here to scan aright
 The future, they out of life's tenement
 Shall be cast forth, and whelm'd under the waves
 Near to Cattolica, through perfidy
 Of a fell tyrant.  'Twixt the Cyprian isle
 And Balearic, ne'er hath Neptune seen
 An injury so foul, by pirates done
 Or Argive crew of old.  That one-ey'd traitor
 (Whose realm there is a spirit here were fain
 His eye had still lack'd sight of) them shall bring
 To conf'rence with him, then so shape his end,
 That they shall need not 'gainst Focara's wind
 Offer up vow nor pray'r."  I answering thus:
 
 "Declare, as thou dost wish that I above
 May carry tidings of thee, who is he,
 In whom that sight doth wake such sad remembrance?"
 
 Forthwith he laid his hand on the cheek-bone
 Of one, his fellow-spirit, and his jaws
 Expanding, cried: "Lo! this is he I wot of;
 He speaks not for himself: the outcast this
 Who overwhelm'd the doubt in Caesar's mind,
 Affirming that delay to men prepar'd
 Was ever harmful."  Oh  how terrified
 Methought was Curio, from whose throat was cut
 The tongue, which spake that hardy word.  Then one
 Maim'd of each hand, uplifted in the gloom
 The bleeding stumps, that they with gory spots
 Sullied his face, and cried: "'Remember thee
 Of Mosca, too, I who, alas! exclaim'd,
 'The deed once done there is an end,' that prov'd
 A seed of sorrow to the Tuscan race."
 
 I added: "Ay, and death to thine own tribe."
 
 Whence heaping woe on woe he hurried off,
 As one grief stung to madness.  But I there
 Still linger'd to behold the troop, and saw
 Things, such as I may fear without more proof
 To tell of, but that conscience makes me firm,
 The boon companion, who her strong breast-plate
 Buckles on him, that feels no guilt within
 And bids him on and fear not.  Without doubt
 I saw, and yet it seems to pass before me,
 A headless trunk, that even as the rest
 Of the sad flock pac'd onward.  By the hair
 It bore the sever'd member, lantern-wise
 Pendent in hand, which look'd at us and said,
 
 "Woe's me!"  The spirit lighted thus himself,
 And two there were in one, and one in two.
 How that may be he knows who ordereth so.
 
 When at the bridge's foot direct he stood,
 His arm aloft he rear'd, thrusting the head
 Full in our view, that nearer we might hear
 The words, which thus it utter'd: "Now behold
 This grievous torment, thou, who breathing go'st
 To spy the dead; behold if any else
 Be terrible as this.  And that on earth
 Thou mayst bear tidings of me, know that I
 Am Bertrand, he of Born, who gave King John
 The counsel mischievous.  Father and son
 I set at mutual war.  For Absalom
 And David more did not Ahitophel,
 Spurring them on maliciously to strife.
 For parting those so closely knit, my brain
 Parted, alas!  I carry from its source,
 That in this trunk inhabits.  Thus the law
 Of retribution fiercely works in me."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIX
 
 SO were mine eyes inebriate with view
 Of the vast multitude, whom various wounds
 Disfigur'd, that they long'd to stay and weep.
 
 But Virgil rous'd me: "What yet gazest on?
 Wherefore doth fasten yet thy sight below
 Among the maim'd and miserable shades?
 Thou hast not shewn in any chasm beside
 This weakness.  Know, if thou wouldst number them
 That two and twenty miles the valley winds
 Its circuit, and already is the moon
 Beneath our feet: the time permitted now
 Is short, and more not seen remains to see."
 
 "If thou," I straight replied, "hadst weigh'd the cause
 For which I look'd, thou hadst perchance excus'd
 The tarrying still."  My leader part pursu'd
 His way, the while I follow'd, answering him,
 And adding thus: "Within that cave I deem,
 Whereon so fixedly I held my ken,
 There is a spirit dwells, one of my blood,
 Wailing the crime that costs him now so dear."
 
 Then spake my master: "Let thy soul no more
 Afflict itself for him.  Direct elsewhere
 Its thought, and leave him.  At the bridge's foot
 I mark'd how he did point with menacing look
 At thee, and heard him by the others nam'd
 Geri of Bello.  Thou so wholly then
 Wert busied with his spirit, who once rul'd
 The towers of Hautefort, that thou lookedst not
 That way, ere he was gone."--"O guide belov'd!
 His violent death yet unaveng'd," said I,
 "By any, who are partners in his shame,
 Made him contemptuous: therefore, as I think,
 He pass'd me speechless by; and doing so
 Hath made me more compassionate his fate."
 
 So we discours'd to where the rock first show'd
 The other valley, had more light been there,
 E'en to the lowest depth.  Soon as we came
 O'er the last cloister in the dismal rounds
 Of Malebolge, and the brotherhood
 Were to our view expos'd, then many a dart
 Of sore lament assail'd me, headed all
 With points of thrilling pity, that I clos'd
 Both ears against the volley with mine hands.
 
 As were the torment, if each lazar-house
 Of Valdichiana, in the sultry time
 'Twixt July and September, with the isle
 Sardinia and Maremma's pestilent fen,
 Had heap'd their maladies all in one foss
 Together; such was here the torment: dire
 The stench, as issuing steams from fester'd limbs.
 
 We on the utmost shore of the long rock
 Descended still to leftward.  Then my sight
 Was livelier to explore the depth, wherein
 The minister of the most mighty Lord,
 All-searching Justice, dooms to punishment
 The forgers noted on her dread record.
 
 More rueful was it not methinks to see
 The nation in Aegina droop, what time
 Each living thing, e'en to the little worm,
 All fell, so full of malice was the air
 (And afterward, as bards of yore have told,
 The ancient people were restor'd anew
 From seed of emmets) than was here to see
 The spirits, that languish'd through the murky vale
 Up-pil'd on many a stack.  Confus'd they lay,
 One o'er the belly, o'er the shoulders one
 Roll'd of another; sideling crawl'd a third
 Along the dismal pathway.  Step by step
 We journey'd on, in silence looking round
 And list'ning those diseas'd, who strove in vain
 To lift their forms.  Then two I mark'd, that sat
 Propp'd 'gainst each other, as two brazen pans
 Set to retain the heat.  From head to foot,
 A tetter bark'd them round. Nor saw I e'er
 Groom currying so fast, for whom his lord
 Impatient waited, or himself perchance
 Tir'd with long watching, as of these each one
 Plied quickly his keen nails, through furiousness
 Of ne'er abated pruriency.  The crust
 Came drawn from underneath in flakes, like scales
 Scrap'd from the bream or fish of broader mail.
 
 "O thou, who with thy fingers rendest off
 Thy coat of proof," thus spake my guide to one,
 "And sometimes makest tearing pincers of them,
 Tell me if any born of Latian land
 Be among these within: so may thy nails
 Serve thee for everlasting to this toil."
 
 "Both are of Latium," weeping he replied,
 "Whom tortur'd thus thou seest: but who art thou
 That hast inquir'd of us?"  To whom my guide:
 "One that descend with this man, who yet lives,
 From rock to rock, and show him hell's abyss."
 
 Then started they asunder, and each turn'd
 Trembling toward us, with the rest, whose ear
 Those words redounding struck.  To me my liege
 Address'd him: "Speak to them whate'er thou list."
 
 And I therewith began: "So may no time
 Filch your remembrance from the thoughts of men
 In th' upper world, but after many suns
 Survive it, as ye tell me, who ye are,
 And of what race ye come.  Your punishment,
 Unseemly and disgustful in its kind,
 Deter you not from opening thus much to me."
 
 "Arezzo was my dwelling," answer'd one,
 "And me Albero of Sienna brought
 To die by fire; but that, for which I died,
 Leads me not here.  True is in sport I told him,
 That I had learn'd to wing my flight in air.
 And he admiring much, as he was void
 Of wisdom, will'd me to declare to him
 The secret of mine art: and only hence,
 Because I made him not a Daedalus,
 Prevail'd on one suppos'd his sire to burn me.
 But Minos to this chasm last of the ten,
 For that I practis'd alchemy on earth,
 Has doom'd me.  Him no subterfuge eludes."
 
 Then to the bard I spake: "Was ever race
 Light as Sienna's?  Sure not France herself
 Can show a tribe so frivolous and vain."
 
 The other leprous spirit heard my words,
 And thus return'd: "Be Stricca from this charge
 Exempted, he who knew so temp'rately
 To lay out fortune's gifts; and Niccolo
 Who first the spice's costly luxury
 Discover'd in that garden, where such seed
 Roots deepest in the soil: and be that troop
 Exempted, with whom Caccia of Asciano
 Lavish'd his vineyards and wide-spreading woods,
 And his rare wisdom Abbagliato show'd
 A spectacle for all.  That thou mayst know
 Who seconds thee against the Siennese
 Thus gladly, bend this way thy sharpen'd sight,
 That well my face may answer to thy ken;
 So shalt thou see I am Capocchio's ghost,
 Who forg'd transmuted metals by the power
 Of alchemy; and if I scan thee right,
 Thus needs must well remember how I aped
 Creative nature by my subtle art."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXX
 
 WHAT time resentment burn'd in Juno's breast
 For Semele against the Theban blood,
 As more than once in dire mischance was rued,
 Such fatal frenzy seiz'd on Athamas,
 That he his spouse beholding with a babe
 Laden on either arm, "Spread out," he cried,
 "The meshes, that I take the lioness
 And the young lions at the pass:" then forth
 Stretch'd he his merciless talons, grasping one,
 One helpless innocent, Learchus nam'd,
 Whom swinging down he dash'd upon a rock,
 And with her other burden self-destroy'd
 The hapless mother plung'd: and when the pride
 Of all-presuming Troy fell from its height,
 By fortune overwhelm'd, and the old king
 With his realm perish'd, then did Hecuba,
 A wretch forlorn and captive, when she saw
 Polyxena first slaughter'd, and her son,
 Her Polydorus, on the wild sea-beach
 Next met the mourner's view, then reft of sense
 Did she run barking even as a dog;
 Such mighty power had grief to wrench her soul.
 Bet ne'er the Furies or of Thebes or Troy
 With such fell cruelty were seen, their goads
 Infixing in the limbs of man or beast,
 As now two pale and naked ghost I saw
 That gnarling wildly scamper'd, like the swine
 Excluded from his stye.  One reach'd Capocchio,
 And in the neck-joint sticking deep his fangs,
 Dragg'd him, that o'er the solid pavement rubb'd
 His belly stretch'd out prone.  The other shape,
 He of Arezzo, there left trembling, spake;
 "That sprite of air is Schicchi; in like mood
 Of random mischief vent he still his spite."
 
 To whom I answ'ring: "Oh! as thou dost hope,
 The other may not flesh its jaws on thee,
 Be patient to inform us, who it is,
 Ere it speed hence."--"That is the ancient soul
 Of wretched Myrrha," he replied, "who burn'd
 With most unholy flame for her own sire,
 
 "And a false shape assuming, so perform'd
 The deed of sin; e'en as the other there,
 That onward passes, dar'd to counterfeit
 Donati's features, to feign'd testament
 The seal affixing, that himself might gain,
 For his own share, the lady of the herd."
 
 When vanish'd the two furious shades, on whom
 Mine eye was held, I turn'd it back to view
 The other cursed spirits.  One I saw
 In fashion like a lute, had but the groin
 Been sever'd, where it meets the forked part.
 Swoln dropsy, disproportioning the limbs
 With ill-converted moisture, that the paunch
 Suits not the visage, open'd wide his lips
 Gasping as in the hectic man for drought,
 One towards the chin, the other upward curl'd.
 
 "O ye, who in this world of misery,
 Wherefore I know not, are exempt from pain,"
 Thus he began, "attentively regard
 Adamo's woe.  When living, full supply
 Ne'er lack'd me of what most I coveted;
 One drop of water now, alas!  I crave.
 The rills, that glitter down the grassy slopes
 Of Casentino, making fresh and soft
 The banks whereby they glide to Arno's stream,
 Stand ever in my view; and not in vain;
 For more the pictur'd semblance dries me up,
 Much more than the disease, which makes the flesh
 Desert these shrivel'd cheeks.  So from the place,
 Where I transgress'd, stern justice urging me,
 Takes means to quicken more my lab'ring sighs.
 There is Romena, where I falsified
 The metal with the Baptist's form imprest,
 For which on earth I left my body burnt.
 But if I here might see the sorrowing soul
 Of Guido, Alessandro, or their brother,
 For Branda's limpid spring I would not change
 The welcome sight.  One is e'en now within,
 If truly the mad spirits tell, that round
 Are wand'ring.  But wherein besteads me that?
 My limbs are fetter'd.  Were I but so light,
 That I each hundred years might move one inch,
 I had set forth already on this path,
 Seeking him out amidst the shapeless crew,
 Although eleven miles it wind, not more
 Than half of one across.  They brought me down
 Among this tribe; induc'd by them I stamp'd
 The florens with three carats of alloy."
 
 "Who are that abject pair," I next inquir'd,
 "That closely bounding thee upon thy right
 Lie smoking, like a band in winter steep'd
 In the chill stream?"--"When to this gulf I dropt,"
 He answer'd, "here I found them; since that hour
 They have not turn'd, nor ever shall, I ween,
 Till time hath run his course.  One is that dame
 The false accuser of the Hebrew youth;
 Sinon the other, that false Greek from Troy.
 Sharp fever drains the reeky moistness out,
 In such a cloud upsteam'd."  When that he heard,
 One, gall'd perchance to be so darkly nam'd,
 With clench'd hand smote him on the braced paunch,
 That like a drum resounded: but forthwith
 Adamo smote him on the face, the blow
 Returning with his arm, that seem'd as hard.
 
 "Though my o'erweighty limbs have ta'en from me
 The power to move," said he, "I have an arm
 At liberty for such employ."  To whom
 Was answer'd: "When thou wentest to the fire,
 Thou hadst it not so ready at command,
 Then readier when it coin'd th' impostor gold."
 
 And thus the dropsied: "Ay, now speak'st thou true.
 But there thou gav'st not such true testimony,
 When thou wast question'd of the truth, at Troy."
 
 "If I spake false, thou falsely stamp'dst the coin,"
 Said Sinon; "I am here but for one fault,
 And thou for more than any imp beside."
 
 "Remember," he replied, "O perjur'd one,
 The horse remember, that did teem with death,
 And all the world be witness to thy guilt."
 
 "To thine," return'd the Greek, "witness the thirst
 Whence thy tongue cracks, witness the fluid mound,
 Rear'd by thy belly up before thine eyes,
 A mass corrupt."  To whom the coiner thus:
 "Thy mouth gapes wide as ever to let pass
 Its evil saying.  Me if thirst assails,
 Yet I am stuff'd with moisture.  Thou art parch'd,
 Pains rack thy head, no urging would'st thou need
 To make thee lap Narcissus' mirror up."
 
 I was all fix'd to listen, when my guide
 Admonish'd: "Now beware: a little more.
 And I do quarrel with thee."  I perceiv'd
 How angrily he spake, and towards him turn'd
 With shame so poignant, as remember'd yet
 Confounds me.  As a man that dreams of harm
 Befall'n him, dreaming wishes it a dream,
 And that which is, desires as if it were not,
 Such then was I, who wanting power to speak
 Wish'd to excuse myself, and all the while
 Excus'd me, though unweeting that I did.
 
 "More grievous fault than thine has been, less shame,"
 My master cried, "might expiate.  Therefore cast
 All sorrow from thy soul; and if again
 Chance bring thee, where like conference is held,
 Think I am ever at thy side.  To hear
 Such wrangling is a joy for vulgar minds."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXI
 
 THE very tongue, whose keen reproof before
 Had wounded me, that either cheek was stain'd,
 Now minister'd my cure.  So have I heard,
 Achilles and his father's javelin caus'd
 Pain first, and then the boon of health restor'd.
 
 Turning our back upon the vale of woe,
 W cross'd th' encircled mound in silence.  There
 Was twilight dim, that far long the gloom
 Mine eye advanc'd not: but I heard a horn
 Sounded aloud. The peal it blew had made
 The thunder feeble.  Following its course
 The adverse way, my strained eyes were bent
 On that one spot.  So terrible a blast
 Orlando blew not, when that dismal rout
 O'erthrew the host of Charlemagne, and quench'd
 His saintly warfare.  Thitherward not long
 My head was rais'd, when many lofty towers
 Methought I spied.  "Master," said I, "what land
 Is this?"  He answer'd straight: "Too long a space
 Of intervening darkness has thine eye
 To traverse: thou hast therefore widely err'd
 In thy imagining.  Thither arriv'd
 Thou well shalt see, how distance can delude
 The sense.  A little therefore urge thee on."
 
 Then tenderly he caught me by the hand;
 "Yet know," said he, "ere farther we advance,
 That it less strange may seem, these are not towers,
 But giants.  In the pit they stand immers'd,
 Each from his navel downward, round the bank."
 
 As when a fog disperseth gradually,
 Our vision traces what the mist involves
 Condens'd in air; so piercing through the gross
 And gloomy atmosphere, as more and more
 We near'd toward the brink, mine error fled,
 And fear came o'er me.  As with circling round
 Of turrets, Montereggion crowns his walls,
 E'en thus the shore, encompassing th' abyss,
 Was turreted with giants, half their length
 Uprearing, horrible, whom Jove from heav'n
 Yet threatens, when his mutt'ring thunder rolls.
 
 Of one already I descried the face,
 Shoulders, and breast, and of the belly huge
 Great part, and both arms down along his ribs.
 
 All-teeming nature, when her plastic hand
 Left framing of these monsters, did display
 Past doubt her wisdom, taking from mad War
 Such slaves to do his bidding; and if she
 Repent her not of th' elephant and whale,
 Who ponders well confesses her therein
 Wiser and more discreet; for when brute force
 And evil will are back'd with subtlety,
 Resistance none avails.  His visage seem'd
 In length and bulk, as doth the pine, that tops
 Saint Peter's Roman fane; and th' other bones
 Of like proportion, so that from above
 The bank, which girdled him below, such height
 Arose his stature, that three Friezelanders
 Had striv'n in vain to reach but to his hair.
 Full thirty ample palms was he expos'd
 Downward from whence a man his garments loops.
 "Raphel bai ameth sabi almi,"
 So shouted his fierce lips, which sweeter hymns
 Became not; and my guide address'd him thus:
 
 "O senseless spirit! let thy horn for thee
 Interpret: therewith vent thy rage, if rage
 Or other passion wring thee.  Search thy neck,
 There shalt thou find the belt that binds it on.
 Wild spirit! lo, upon thy mighty breast
 Where hangs the baldrick!"  Then to me he spake:
 "He doth accuse himself.  Nimrod is this,
 Through whose ill counsel in the world no more
 One tongue prevails.  But pass we on, nor waste
 Our words; for so each language is to him,
 As his to others, understood by none."
 
 Then to the leftward turning sped we forth,
 And at a sling's throw found another shade
 Far fiercer and more huge.  I cannot say
 What master hand had girt him; but he held
 Behind the right arm fetter'd, and before
 The other with a chain, that fasten'd him
 From the neck down, and five times round his form
 Apparent met the wreathed links.  "This proud one
 Would of his strength against almighty Jove
 Make trial," said my guide; "whence he is thus
 Requited: Ephialtes him they call.
 
 "Great was his prowess, when the giants brought
 Fear on the gods: those arms, which then he piled,
 Now moves he never."  Forthwith I return'd:
 "Fain would I, if 't were possible, mine eyes
 Of Briareus immeasurable gain'd
 Experience next."  He answer'd: "Thou shalt see
 Not far from hence Antaeus, who both speaks
 And is unfetter'd, who shall place us there
 Where guilt is at its depth.  Far onward stands
 Whom thou wouldst fain behold, in chains, and made
 Like to this spirit, save that in his looks
 More fell he seems."  By violent earthquake rock'd
 Ne'er shook a tow'r, so reeling to its base,
 As Ephialtes.  More than ever then
 I dreaded death, nor than the terror more
 Had needed, if I had not seen the cords
 That held him fast.  We, straightway journeying on,
 Came to Antaeus, who five ells complete
 Without the head, forth issued from the cave.
 
 "O thou, who in the fortunate vale, that made
 Great Scipio heir of glory, when his sword
 Drove back the troop of Hannibal in flight,
 Who thence of old didst carry for thy spoil
 An hundred lions; and if thou hadst fought
 In the high conflict on thy brethren's side,
 Seems as men yet believ'd, that through thine arm
 The sons of earth had conquer'd, now vouchsafe
 To place us down beneath, where numbing cold
 Locks up Cocytus.  Force not that we crave
 Or Tityus' help or Typhon's.  Here is one
 Can give what in this realm ye covet.  Stoop
 Therefore, nor scornfully distort thy lip.
 He in the upper world can yet bestow
 Renown on thee, for he doth live, and looks
 For life yet longer, if before the time
 Grace call him not unto herself."  Thus spake
 The teacher.  He in haste forth stretch'd his hands,
 And caught my guide.  Alcides whilom felt
 That grapple straighten'd score.  Soon as my guide
 Had felt it, he bespake me thus: "This way
 That I may clasp thee;" then so caught me up,
 That we were both one burden.  As appears
 The tower of Carisenda, from beneath
 Where it doth lean, if chance a passing cloud
 So sail across, that opposite it hangs,
 Such then Antaeus seem'd, as at mine ease
 I mark'd him stooping.  I were fain at times
 T' have pass'd another way.  Yet in th' abyss,
 That Lucifer with Judas low ingulfs,
 Lightly he plac'd us; nor there leaning stay'd,
 But rose as in a bark the stately mast.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXII
 
 COULD I command rough rhimes and hoarse, to suit
 That hole of sorrow, o'er which ev'ry rock
 His firm abutment rears, then might the vein
 Of fancy rise full springing: but not mine
 Such measures, and with falt'ring awe I touch
 The mighty theme; for to describe the depth
 Of all the universe, is no emprize
 To jest with, and demands a tongue not us'd
 To infant babbling.  But let them assist
 My song, the tuneful maidens, by whose aid
 Amphion wall'd in Thebes, so with the truth
 My speech shall best accord.  Oh ill-starr'd folk,
 Beyond all others wretched! who abide
 In such a mansion, as scarce thought finds words
 To speak of, better had ye here on earth
 Been flocks or mountain goats.  As down we stood
 In the dark pit beneath the giants' feet,
 But lower far than they, and I did gaze
 Still on the lofty battlement, a voice
 Bespoke me thus: "Look how thou walkest.  Take
 Good heed, thy soles do tread not on the heads
 Of thy poor brethren."  Thereupon I turn'd,
 And saw before and underneath my feet
 A lake, whose frozen surface liker seem'd
 To glass than water.  Not so thick a veil
 In winter e'er hath Austrian Danube spread
 O'er his still course, nor Tanais far remote
 Under the chilling sky.  Roll'd o'er that mass
 Had Tabernich or Pietrapana fall'n,
 
 Not e'en its rim had creak'd. As peeps the frog
 Croaking above the wave, what time in dreams
 The village gleaner oft pursues her toil,
 So, to where modest shame appears, thus low
 Blue pinch'd and shrin'd in ice the spirits stood,
 Moving their teeth in shrill note like the stork.
 His face each downward held; their mouth the cold,
 Their eyes express'd the dolour of their heart.
 
 A space I look'd around, then at my feet
 Saw two so strictly join'd, that of their head
 The very hairs were mingled.  "Tell me ye,
 Whose bosoms thus together press," said I,
 "Who are ye?"  At that sound their necks they bent,
 And when their looks were lifted up to me,
 Straightway their eyes, before all moist within,
 Distill'd upon their lips, and the frost bound
 The tears betwixt those orbs and held them there.
 Plank unto plank hath never cramp clos'd up
 So stoutly.  Whence like two enraged goats
 They clash'd together; them such fury seiz'd.
 
 And one, from whom the cold both ears had reft,
 Exclaim'd, still looking downward: "Why on us
 Dost speculate so long?  If thou wouldst know
 Who are these two, the valley, whence his wave
 Bisenzio slopes, did for its master own
 Their sire Alberto, and next him themselves.
 They from one body issued; and throughout
 Caina thou mayst search, nor find a shade
 More worthy in congealment to be fix'd,
 Not him, whose breast and shadow Arthur's land
 At that one blow dissever'd, not Focaccia,
 No not this spirit, whose o'erjutting head
 Obstructs my onward view: he bore the name
 Of Mascheroni: Tuscan if thou be,
 Well knowest who he was: and to cut short
 All further question, in my form behold
 What once was Camiccione.  I await
 Carlino here my kinsman, whose deep guilt
 Shall wash out mine."  A thousand visages
 Then mark'd I, which the keen and eager cold
 Had shap'd into a doggish grin; whence creeps
 A shiv'ring horror o'er me, at the thought
 Of those frore shallows.  While we journey'd on
 Toward the middle, at whose point unites
 All heavy substance, and I trembling went
 Through that eternal chillness, I know not
 If will it were or destiny, or chance,
 But, passing 'midst the heads, my foot did strike
 With violent blow against the face of one.
 
 "Wherefore dost bruise me?" weeping, he exclaim'd,
 "Unless thy errand be some fresh revenge
 For Montaperto, wherefore troublest me?"
 
 I thus: "Instructor, now await me here,
 That I through him may rid me of my doubt.
 Thenceforth what haste thou wilt."  The teacher paus'd,
 And to that shade I spake, who bitterly
 Still curs'd me in his wrath.  "What art thou, speak,
 That railest thus on others?"  He replied:
 "Now who art thou, that smiting others' cheeks
 Through Antenora roamest, with such force
 As were past suff'rance, wert thou living still?"
 
 "And I am living, to thy joy perchance,"
 Was my reply, "if fame be dear to thee,
 That with the rest I may thy name enrol."
 
 "The contrary of what I covet most,"
 Said he, "thou tender'st: hence; nor vex me more.
 Ill knowest thou to flatter in this vale."
 
 Then seizing on his hinder scalp, I cried:
 "Name thee, or not a hair shall tarry here."
 
 "Rend all away," he answer'd, "yet for that
 I will not tell nor show thee who I am,
 Though at my head thou pluck a thousand times."
 
 Now I had grasp'd his tresses, and stript off
 More than one tuft, he barking, with his eyes
 Drawn in and downward, when another cried,
 "What ails thee, Bocca?  Sound not loud enough
 Thy chatt'ring teeth, but thou must bark outright?
 What devil wrings thee?"--"Now," said I, "be dumb,
 Accursed traitor! to thy shame of thee
 True tidings will I bear."--"Off," he replied,
 "Tell what thou list; but as thou escape from hence
 To speak of him whose tongue hath been so glib,
 Forget not: here he wails the Frenchman's gold.
 'Him of Duera,' thou canst say, 'I mark'd,
 Where the starv'd sinners pine.'  If thou be ask'd
 What other shade was with them, at thy side
 Is Beccaria, whose red gorge distain'd
 The biting axe of Florence.  Farther on,
 If I misdeem not, Soldanieri bides,
 With Ganellon, and Tribaldello, him
 Who op'd Faenza when the people slept."
 
 We now had left him, passing on our way,
 When I beheld two spirits by the ice
 Pent in one hollow, that the head of one
 Was cowl unto the other; and as bread
 Is raven'd up through hunger, th' uppermost
 Did so apply his fangs to th' other's brain,
 Where the spine joins it.  Not more furiously
 On Menalippus' temples Tydeus gnaw'd,
 Than on that skull and on its garbage he.
 
 "O thou who show'st so beastly sign of hate
 'Gainst him thou prey'st on, let me hear," said I
 "The cause, on such condition, that if right
 Warrant thy grievance, knowing who ye are,
 And what the colour of his sinning was,
 I may repay thee in the world above,
 If that, wherewith I speak be moist so long."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXIII
 
 HIS jaws uplifting from their fell repast,
 That sinner wip'd them on the hairs o' th' head,
 Which he behind had mangled, then began:
 "Thy will obeying, I call up afresh
 Sorrow past cure, which but to think of wrings
 My heart, or ere I tell on't. But if words,
 That I may utter, shall prove seed to bear
 Fruit of eternal infamy to him,
 The traitor whom I gnaw at, thou at once
 Shalt see me speak and weep.  Who thou mayst be
 I know not, nor how here below art come:
 But Florentine thou seemest of a truth,
 When I do hear thee.  Know I was on earth
 Count Ugolino, and th' Archbishop he
 Ruggieri.  Why I neighbour him so close,
 Now list.  That through effect of his ill thoughts
 In him my trust reposing, I was ta'en
 And after murder'd, need is not I tell.
 What therefore thou canst not have heard, that is,
 How cruel was the murder, shalt thou hear,
 And know if he have wrong'd me.  A small grate
 Within that mew, which for my sake the name
 Of famine bears, where others yet must pine,
 Already through its opening sev'ral moons
 Had shown me, when I slept the evil sleep,
 That from the future tore the curtain off.
 This one, methought, as master of the sport,
 Rode forth to chase the gaunt wolf and his whelps
 Unto the mountain, which forbids the sight
 Of Lucca to the Pisan.  With lean brachs
 Inquisitive and keen, before him rang'd
 Lanfranchi with Sismondi and Gualandi.
 After short course the father and the sons
 Seem'd tir'd and lagging, and methought I saw
 The sharp tusks gore their sides.  When I awoke
 Before the dawn, amid their sleep I heard
 My sons (for they were with me) weep and ask
 For bread.  Right cruel art thou, if no pang
 Thou feel at thinking what my heart foretold;
 And if not now, why use thy tears to flow?
 Now had they waken'd; and the hour drew near
 When they were wont to bring us food; the mind
 Of each misgave him through his dream, and I
 Heard, at its outlet underneath lock'd up
 The' horrible tower: whence uttering not a word
 I look'd upon the visage of my sons.
 I wept not: so all stone I felt within.
 They wept: and one, my little Anslem, cried:
 "Thou lookest so!  Father what ails thee?"  Yet
 I shed no tear, nor answer'd all that day
 Nor the next night, until another sun
 Came out upon the world.  When a faint beam
 Had to our doleful prison made its way,
 And in four countenances I descry'd
 The image of my own, on either hand
 Through agony I bit, and they who thought
 I did it through desire of feeding, rose
 O' th' sudden, and cried, 'Father, we should grieve
 Far less, if thou wouldst eat of us: thou gav'st
 These weeds of miserable flesh we wear,
 
 'And do thou strip them off from us again.'
 Then, not to make them sadder, I kept down
 My spirit in stillness.  That day and the next
 We all were silent.  Ah, obdurate earth!
 Why open'dst not upon us?  When we came
 To the fourth day, then Geddo at my feet
 Outstretch'd did fling him, crying, 'Hast no help
 For me, my father!'  There he died, and e'en
 Plainly as thou seest me, saw I the three
 Fall one by one 'twixt the fifth day and sixth:
 
 "Whence I betook me now grown blind to grope
 Over them all, and for three days aloud
 Call'd on them who were dead.  Then fasting got
 The mastery of grief."  Thus having spoke,
 
 Once more upon the wretched skull his teeth
 He fasten'd, like a mastiff's 'gainst the bone
 Firm and unyielding.  Oh thou Pisa! shame
 Of all the people, who their dwelling make
 In that fair region, where th' Italian voice
 Is heard, since that thy neighbours are so slack
 To punish, from their deep foundations rise
 Capraia and Gorgona, and dam up
 The mouth of Arno, that each soul in thee
 May perish in the waters!  What if fame
 Reported that thy castles were betray'd
 By Ugolino, yet no right hadst thou
 To stretch his children on the rack.  For them,
 Brigata, Ugaccione, and the pair
 Of gentle ones, of whom my song hath told,
 Their tender years, thou modern Thebes! did make
 Uncapable of guilt.  Onward we pass'd,
 Where others skarf'd in rugged folds of ice
 Not on their feet were turn'd, but each revers'd.
 
 There very weeping suffers not to weep;
 For at their eyes grief seeking passage finds
 Impediment, and rolling inward turns
 For increase of sharp anguish: the first tears
 Hang cluster'd, and like crystal vizors show,
 Under the socket brimming all the cup.
 
 Now though the cold had from my face dislodg'd
 Each feeling, as 't were callous, yet me seem'd
 Some breath of wind I felt.  "Whence cometh this,"
 Said I, "my master?  Is not here below
 All vapour quench'd?"--"'Thou shalt be speedily,"
 He answer'd, "where thine eye shall tell thee whence
 The cause descrying of this airy shower."
 
 Then cried out one in the chill crust who mourn'd:
 "O souls so cruel! that the farthest post
 Hath been assign'd you, from this face remove
 The harden'd veil, that I may vent the grief
 Impregnate at my heart, some little space
 Ere it congeal again!"  I thus replied:
 "Say who thou wast, if thou wouldst have mine aid;
 And if I extricate thee not, far down
 As to the lowest ice may I descend!"
 
 "The friar Alberigo," answered he,
 "Am I, who from the evil garden pluck'd
 Its fruitage, and am here repaid, the date
 More luscious for my fig."--"Hah!"  I exclaim'd,
 "Art thou too dead!"--"How in the world aloft
 It fareth with my body," answer'd he,
 "I am right ignorant.  Such privilege
 Hath Ptolomea, that ofttimes the soul
 Drops hither, ere by Atropos divorc'd.
 And that thou mayst wipe out more willingly
 The glazed tear-drops that o'erlay mine eyes,
 Know that the soul, that moment she betrays,
 As I did, yields her body to a fiend
 Who after moves and governs it at will,
 Till all its time be rounded; headlong she
 Falls to this cistern.  And perchance above
 Doth yet appear the body of a ghost,
 Who here behind me winters.  Him thou know'st,
 If thou but newly art arriv'd below.
 The years are many that have pass'd away,
 Since to this fastness Branca Doria came."
 
 "Now," answer'd I, "methinks thou mockest me,
 For Branca Doria never yet hath died,
 But doth all natural functions of a man,
 Eats, drinks, and sleeps, and putteth raiment on."
 
 He thus: "Not yet unto that upper foss
 By th' evil talons guarded, where the pitch
 Tenacious boils, had Michael Zanche reach'd,
 When this one left a demon in his stead
 In his own body, and of one his kin,
 Who with him treachery wrought.  But now put forth
 Thy hand, and ope mine eyes."  I op'd them not.
 Ill manners were best courtesy to him.
 
 Ah Genoese! men perverse in every way,
 With every foulness stain'd, why from the earth
 Are ye not cancel'd?  Such an one of yours
 I with Romagna's darkest spirit found,
 As for his doings even now in soul
 Is in Cocytus plung'd, and yet doth seem
 In body still alive upon the earth.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXIV
 
 "THE banners of Hell's Monarch do come forth
 Towards us; therefore look," so spake my guide,
 "If thou discern him."  As, when breathes a cloud
 Heavy and dense, or when the shades of night
 Fall on our hemisphere, seems view'd from far
 A windmill, which the blast stirs briskly round,
 Such was the fabric then methought I saw,
 
 To shield me from the wind, forthwith I drew
 Behind my guide: no covert else was there.
 
 Now came I (and with fear I bid my strain
 Record the marvel) where the souls were all
 Whelm'd underneath, transparent, as through glass
 Pellucid the frail stem.  Some prone were laid,
 Others stood upright, this upon the soles,
 That on his head, a third with face to feet
 Arch'd like a bow.  When to the point we came,
 Whereat my guide was pleas'd that I should see
 The creature eminent in beauty once,
 He from before me stepp'd and made me pause.
 
 "Lo!"  he exclaim'd, "lo Dis! and lo the place,
 Where thou hast need to arm thy heart with strength."
 
 How frozen and how faint I then became,
 Ask me not, reader! for I write it not,
 Since words would fail to tell thee of my state.
 I was not dead nor living.  Think thyself
 If quick conception work in thee at all,
 How I did feel.  That emperor, who sways
 The realm of sorrow, at mid breast from th' ice
 Stood forth; and I in stature am more like
 A giant, than the giants are in his arms.
 Mark now how great that whole must be, which suits
 With such a part.  If he were beautiful
 As he is hideous now, and yet did dare
 To scowl upon his Maker, well from him
 May all our mis'ry flow.  Oh what a sight!
 How passing strange it seem'd, when I did spy
 Upon his head three faces: one in front
 Of hue vermilion, th' other two with this
 Midway each shoulder join'd and at the crest;
 The right 'twixt wan and yellow seem'd: the left
 To look on, such as come from whence old Nile
 Stoops to the lowlands.  Under each shot forth
 Two mighty wings, enormous as became
 A bird so vast.  Sails never such I saw
 Outstretch'd on the wide sea.  No plumes had they,
 But were in texture like a bat, and these
 He flapp'd i' th' air, that from him issued still
 Three winds, wherewith Cocytus to its depth
 Was frozen.  At six eyes he wept: the tears
 Adown three chins distill'd with bloody foam.
 At every mouth his teeth a sinner champ'd
 Bruis'd as with pond'rous engine, so that three
 Were in this guise tormented.  But far more
 Than from that gnawing, was the foremost pang'd
 By the fierce rending, whence ofttimes the back
 Was stript of all its skin.  "That upper spirit,
 Who hath worse punishment," so spake my guide,
 "Is Judas, he that hath his head within
 And plies the feet without.  Of th' other two,
 Whose heads are under, from the murky jaw
 Who hangs, is Brutus: lo! how he doth writhe
 And speaks not!  Th' other Cassius, that appears
 So large of limb.  But night now re-ascends,
 And it is time for parting.  All is seen."
 
 I clipp'd him round the neck, for so he bade;
 And noting time and place, he, when the wings
 Enough were op'd, caught fast the shaggy sides,
 And down from pile to pile descending stepp'd
 Between the thick fell and the jagged ice.
 
 Soon as he reach'd the point, whereat the thigh
 Upon the swelling of the haunches turns,
 My leader there with pain and struggling hard
 Turn'd round his head, where his feet stood before,
 And grappled at the fell, as one who mounts,
 That into hell methought we turn'd again.
 
 "Expect that by such stairs as these," thus spake
 The teacher, panting like a man forespent,
 "We must depart from evil so extreme."
 Then at a rocky opening issued forth,
 And plac'd me on a brink to sit, next join'd
 With wary step my side.  I rais'd mine eyes,
 Believing that I Lucifer should see
 Where he was lately left, but saw him now
 With legs held upward.  Let the grosser sort,
 Who see not what the point was I had pass'd,
 Bethink them if sore toil oppress'd me then.
 
 "Arise," my master cried, "upon thy feet.
 The way is long, and much uncouth the road;
 And now within one hour and half of noon
 The sun returns."  It was no palace-hall
 Lofty and luminous wherein we stood,
 But natural dungeon where ill footing was
 And scant supply of light.  "Ere from th' abyss
 I sep'rate," thus when risen I began,
 "My guide! vouchsafe few words to set me free
 From error's thralldom.  Where is now the ice?
 How standeth he in posture thus revers'd?
 And how from eve to morn in space so brief
 Hath the sun made his transit?"  He in few
 Thus answering spake: "Thou deemest thou art still
 On th' other side the centre, where I grasp'd
 Th' abhorred worm, that boreth through the world.
 Thou wast on th' other side, so long as I
 Descended; when I turn'd, thou didst o'erpass
 That point, to which from ev'ry part is dragg'd
 All heavy substance.  Thou art now arriv'd
 Under the hemisphere opposed to that,
 Which the great continent doth overspread,
 And underneath whose canopy expir'd
 The Man, that was born sinless, and so liv'd.
 Thy feet are planted on the smallest sphere,
 Whose other aspect is Judecca.  Morn
 Here rises, when there evening sets: and he,
 Whose shaggy pile was scal'd, yet standeth fix'd,
 As at the first.  On this part he fell down
 From heav'n; and th' earth, here prominent before,
 Through fear of him did veil her with the sea,
 And to our hemisphere retir'd.  Perchance
 To shun him was the vacant space left here
 By what of firm land on this side appears,
 That sprang aloof."  There is a place beneath,
 From Belzebub as distant, as extends
 The vaulted tomb, discover'd not by sight,
 But by the sound of brooklet, that descends
 This way along the hollow of a rock,
 Which, as it winds with no precipitous course,
 The wave hath eaten.  By that hidden way
 My guide and I did enter, to return
 To the fair world: and heedless of repose
 We climbed, he first, I following his steps,
 Till on our view the beautiful lights of heav'n
 Dawn'd through a circular opening in the cave:
 Thus issuing we again beheld the stars.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Judith Smith and Natalie Salter
 
 
 
 
 
 THE DIVINE COMEDY:  PURGATORY
 
 BY DANTE ALIGHIERI
 
 
 Complete
 
 
 
 Translated By
 
 The Rev. H. F. Cary
 
 
 
 PURGATORY
 
 Cantos 1 - 33
 
 
 
 CANTO I
 
 O'er better waves to speed her rapid course
 The light bark of my genius lifts the sail,
 Well pleas'd to leave so cruel sea behind;
 And of that second region will I sing,
 In which the human spirit from sinful blot
 Is purg'd, and for ascent to Heaven prepares.
 
 Here, O ye hallow'd Nine! for in your train
 I follow, here the deadened strain revive;
 Nor let Calliope refuse to sound
 A somewhat higher song, of that loud tone,
 Which when the wretched birds of chattering note
 Had heard, they of forgiveness lost all hope.
 
 Sweet hue of eastern sapphire, that was spread
 O'er the serene aspect of the pure air,
 High up as the first circle, to mine eyes
 Unwonted joy renew'd, soon as I 'scap'd
 Forth from the atmosphere of deadly gloom,
 That had mine eyes and bosom fill'd with grief.
 The radiant planet, that to love invites,
 Made all the orient laugh, and veil'd beneath
 The Pisces' light, that in his escort came.
 
 To the right hand I turn'd, and fix'd my mind
 On the' other pole attentive, where I saw
 Four stars ne'er seen before save by the ken
 Of our first parents.  Heaven of their rays
 Seem'd joyous.  O thou northern site, bereft
 Indeed, and widow'd, since of these depriv'd!
 
 As from this view I had desisted, straight
 Turning a little tow'rds the other pole,
 There from whence now the wain had disappear'd,
 I saw an old man standing by my side
 Alone, so worthy of rev'rence in his look,
 That ne'er from son to father more was ow'd.
 Low down his beard and mix'd with hoary white
 Descended, like his locks, which parting fell
 Upon his breast in double fold.  The beams
 Of those four luminaries on his face
 So brightly shone, and with such radiance clear
 Deck'd it, that I beheld him as the sun.
 
 "Say who are ye, that stemming the blind stream,
 Forth from th' eternal prison-house have fled?"
 He spoke and moved those venerable plumes.
 "Who hath conducted, or with lantern sure
 Lights you emerging from the depth of night,
 That makes the infernal valley ever black?
 Are the firm statutes of the dread abyss
 Broken, or in high heaven new laws ordain'd,
 That thus, condemn'd, ye to my caves approach?"
 
 My guide, then laying hold on me, by words
 And intimations given with hand and head,
 Made my bent knees and eye submissive pay
 Due reverence; then thus to him replied.
 
 "Not of myself I come; a Dame from heaven
 Descending, had besought me in my charge
 To bring.  But since thy will implies, that more
 Our true condition I unfold at large,
 Mine is not to deny thee thy request.
 This mortal ne'er hath seen the farthest gloom.
 But erring by his folly had approach'd
 So near, that little space was left to turn.
 Then, as before I told, I was dispatch'd
 To work his rescue, and no way remain'd
 Save this which I have ta'en.  I have display'd
 Before him all the regions of the bad;
 And purpose now those spirits to display,
 That under thy command are purg'd from sin.
 How I have brought him would be long to say.
 From high descends the virtue, by whose aid
 I to thy sight and hearing him have led.
 Now may our coming please thee.  In the search
 Of liberty he journeys: that how dear
 They know, who for her sake have life refus'd.
 Thou knowest, to whom death for her was sweet
 In Utica, where thou didst leave those weeds,
 That in the last great day will shine so bright.
 For us the' eternal edicts are unmov'd:
 He breathes, and I am free of Minos' power,
 Abiding in that circle where the eyes
 Of thy chaste Marcia beam, who still in look
 Prays thee, O hallow'd spirit! to own her shine.
 Then by her love we' implore thee, let us pass
 Through thy sev'n regions; for which best thanks
 I for thy favour will to her return,
 If mention there below thou not disdain."
 
 "Marcia so pleasing in my sight was found,"
 He then to him rejoin'd, "while I was there,
 That all she ask'd me I was fain to grant.
 Now that beyond the' accursed stream she dwells,
 She may no longer move me, by that law,
 Which was ordain'd me, when I issued thence.
 Not so, if Dame from heaven, as thou sayst,
 Moves and directs thee; then no flattery needs.
 Enough for me that in her name thou ask.
 Go therefore now: and with a slender reed
 See that thou duly gird him, and his face
 Lave, till all sordid stain thou wipe from thence.
 For not with eye, by any cloud obscur'd,
 Would it be seemly before him to come,
 Who stands the foremost minister in heaven.
 This islet all around, there far beneath,
 Where the wave beats it, on the oozy bed
 Produces store of reeds. No other plant,
 Cover'd with leaves, or harden'd in its stalk,
 There lives, not bending to the water's sway.
 After, this way return not; but the sun
 Will show you, that now rises, where to take
 The mountain in its easiest ascent."
 
 He disappear'd; and I myself uprais'd
 Speechless, and to my guide retiring close,
 Toward him turn'd mine eyes.  He thus began;
 "My son! observant thou my steps pursue.
 We must retreat to rearward, for that way
 The champain to its low extreme declines."
 
 The dawn had chas'd the matin hour of prime,
 Which deaf before it, so that from afar
 I spy'd the trembling of the ocean stream.
 
 We travers'd the deserted plain, as one
 Who, wander'd from his track, thinks every step
 Trodden in vain till he regain the path.
 
 When we had come, where yet the tender dew
 Strove with the sun, and in a place, where fresh
 The wind breath'd o'er it, while it slowly dried;
 Both hands extended on the watery grass
 My master plac'd, in graceful act and kind.
 Whence I of his intent before appriz'd,
 Stretch'd out to him my cheeks suffus'd with tears.
 There to my visage he anew restor'd
 That hue, which the dun shades of hell conceal'd.
 
 Then on the solitary shore arriv'd,
 That never sailing on its waters saw
 Man, that could after measure back his course,
 He girt me in such manner as had pleas'd
 Him who instructed, and O, strange to tell!
 As he selected every humble plant,
 Wherever one was pluck'd, another there
 Resembling, straightway in its place arose.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO II
 
 Now had the sun to that horizon reach'd,
 That covers, with the most exalted point
 Of its meridian circle, Salem's walls,
 And night, that opposite to him her orb
 Sounds, from the stream of Ganges issued forth,
 Holding the scales, that from her hands are dropp'd
 When she reigns highest: so that where I was,
 Aurora's white and vermeil-tinctur'd cheek
 To orange turn'd as she in age increas'd.
 
 Meanwhile we linger'd by the water's brink,
 Like men, who, musing on their road, in thought
 Journey, while motionless the body rests.
 When lo! as near upon the hour of dawn,
 Through the thick vapours Mars with fiery beam
 Glares down in west, over the ocean floor;
 So seem'd, what once again I hope to view,
 A light so swiftly coming through the sea,
 No winged course might equal its career.
 From which when for a space I had withdrawn
 Thine eyes, to make inquiry of my guide,
 Again I look'd and saw it grown in size
 And brightness: thou on either side appear'd
 Something, but what I knew not of bright hue,
 And by degrees from underneath it came
 Another.  My preceptor silent yet
 Stood, while the brightness, that we first discern'd,
 Open'd the form of wings: then when he knew
 The pilot, cried aloud, "Down, down; bend low
 Thy knees; behold God's angel: fold thy hands:
 Now shalt thou see true Ministers indeed.
 
 "Lo how all human means he sets at naught!
 So that nor oar he needs, nor other sail
 Except his wings, between such distant shores.
 Lo how straight up to heaven he holds them rear'd,
 Winnowing the air with those eternal plumes,
 That not like mortal hairs fall off or change!"
 
 As more and more toward us came, more bright
 Appear'd the bird of God, nor could the eye
 Endure his splendor near: I mine bent down.
 He drove ashore in a small bark so swift
 And light, that in its course no wave it drank.
 The heav'nly steersman at the prow was seen,
 Visibly written blessed in his looks.
 
 Within a hundred spirits and more there sat.
 "In Exitu Israel de Aegypto;"
 All with one voice together sang, with what
 In the remainder of that hymn is writ.
 Then soon as with the sign of holy cross
 He bless'd them, they at once leap'd out on land,
 The swiftly as he came return'd. The crew,
 There left, appear'd astounded with the place,
 Gazing around as one who sees new sights.
 
 From every side the sun darted his beams,
 And with his arrowy radiance from mid heav'n
 Had chas'd the Capricorn, when that strange tribe
 Lifting their eyes towards us: "If ye know,
 Declare what path will Lead us to the mount."
 
 Them Virgil answer'd.  "Ye suppose perchance
 Us well acquainted with this place: but here,
 We, as yourselves, are strangers.  Not long erst
 We came, before you but a little space,
 By other road so rough and hard, that now
 The' ascent will seem to us as play."  The spirits,
 Who from my breathing had perceiv'd I liv'd,
 Grew pale with wonder.  As the multitude
 Flock round a herald, sent with olive branch,
 To hear what news he brings, and in their haste
 Tread one another down, e'en so at sight
 Of me those happy spirits were fix'd, each one
 Forgetful of its errand, to depart,
 Where cleans'd from sin, it might be made all fair.
 
 Then one I saw darting before the rest
 With such fond ardour to embrace me, I
 To do the like was mov'd.  O shadows vain
 Except in outward semblance! thrice my hands
 I clasp'd behind it, they as oft return'd
 Empty into my breast again.  Surprise
 I needs must think was painted in my looks,
 For that the shadow smil'd and backward drew.
 To follow it I hasten'd, but with voice
 Of sweetness it enjoin'd me to desist.
 Then who it was I knew, and pray'd of it,
 To talk with me, it would a little pause.
 It answered: "Thee as in my mortal frame
 I lov'd, so loos'd forth it I love thee still,
 And therefore pause; but why walkest thou here?"
 
 "Not without purpose once more to return,
 Thou find'st me, my Casella, where I am
 Journeying this way;" I said, "but how of thee
 Hath so much time been lost?"  He answer'd straight:
 "No outrage hath been done to me, if he
 Who when and whom he chooses takes, me oft
 This passage hath denied, since of just will
 His will he makes.  These three months past indeed,
 He, whose chose to enter, with free leave
 Hath taken; whence I wand'ring by the shore
 Where Tyber's wave grows salt, of him gain'd kind
 Admittance, at that river's mouth, tow'rd which
 His wings are pointed, for there always throng
 All such as not to Archeron descend."
 
 Then I: "If new laws have not quite destroy'd
 Memory and use of that sweet song of love,
 That while all my cares had power to 'swage;
 Please thee with it a little to console
 My spirit, that incumber'd with its frame,
 Travelling so far, of pain is overcome."
 
 "Love that discourses in my thoughts."  He then
 Began in such soft accents, that within
 The sweetness thrills me yet.  My gentle guide
 And all who came with him, so well were pleas'd,
 That seem'd naught else might in their thoughts have room.
 
 Fast fix'd in mute attention to his notes
 We stood, when lo! that old man venerable
 Exclaiming, "How is this, ye tardy spirits?
 What negligence detains you loit'ring here?
 Run to the mountain to cast off those scales,
 That from your eyes the sight of God conceal."
 
 As a wild flock of pigeons, to their food
 Collected, blade or tares, without their pride
 Accustom'd, and in still and quiet sort,
 If aught alarm them, suddenly desert
 Their meal, assail'd by more important care;
 So I that new-come troop beheld, the song
 Deserting, hasten to the mountain's side,
 As one who goes yet where he tends knows not.
 
 Nor with less hurried step did we depart.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO III
 
 Them sudden flight had scatter'd over the plain,
 Turn'd tow'rds the mountain, whither reason's voice
 Drives us; I to my faithful company
 Adhering, left it not.  For how of him
 Depriv'd, might I have sped, or who beside
 Would o'er the mountainous tract have led my steps
 He with the bitter pang of self-remorse
 Seem'd smitten.  O clear conscience and upright
 How doth a little fling wound thee sore!
 
 Soon as his feet desisted (slack'ning pace),
 From haste, that mars all decency of act,
 My mind, that in itself before was wrapt,
 Its thoughts expanded, as with joy restor'd:
 And full against the steep ascent I set
 My face, where highest to heav'n its top o'erflows.
 
 The sun, that flar'd behind, with ruddy beam
 Before my form was broken; for in me
 His rays resistance met.  I turn'd aside
 With fear of being left, when I beheld
 Only before myself the ground obscur'd.
 When thus my solace, turning him around,
 Bespake me kindly: "Why distrustest thou?
 Believ'st not I am with thee, thy sure guide?
 It now is evening there, where buried lies
 The body, in which I cast a shade, remov'd
 To Naples from Brundusium's wall.  Nor thou
 Marvel, if before me no shadow fall,
 More than that in the sky element
 One ray obstructs not other.  To endure
 Torments of heat and cold extreme, like frames
 That virtue hath dispos'd, which how it works
 Wills not to us should be reveal'd.  Insane
 Who hopes, our reason may that space explore,
 Which holds three persons in one substance knit.
 Seek not the wherefore, race of human kind;
 Could ye have seen the whole, no need had been
 For Mary to bring forth.  Moreover ye
 Have seen such men desiring fruitlessly;
 To whose desires repose would have been giv'n,
 That now but serve them for eternal grief.
 I speak of Plato, and the Stagyrite,
 And others many more."  And then he bent
 Downwards his forehead, and in troubled mood
 Broke off his speech.  Meanwhile we had arriv'd
 Far as the mountain's foot, and there the rock
 Found of so steep ascent, that nimblest steps
 To climb it had been vain.  The most remote
 Most wild untrodden path, in all the tract
 'Twixt Lerice and Turbia were to this
 A ladder easy' and open of access.
 
 "Who knows on which hand now the steep declines?"
 My master said and paus'd, "so that he may
 Ascend, who journeys without aid of wine?"
 And while with looks directed to the ground
 The meaning of the pathway he explor'd,
 And I gaz'd upward round the stony height,
 Of spirits, that toward us mov'd their steps,
 Yet moving seem'd not, they so slow approach'd.
 
 I thus my guide address'd: "Upraise thine eyes,
 Lo that way some, of whom thou may'st obtain
 Counsel, if of thyself thou find'st it not!"
 
 Straightway he look'd, and with free speech replied:
 "Let us tend thither: they but softly come.
 And thou be firm in hope, my son belov'd."
 
 Now was that people distant far in space
 A thousand paces behind ours, as much
 As at a throw the nervous arm could fling,
 When all drew backward on the messy crags
 Of the steep bank, and firmly stood unmov'd
 As one who walks in doubt might stand to look.
 
 "O spirits perfect!  O already chosen!"
 Virgil to them began, "by that blest peace,
 Which, as I deem, is for you all prepar'd,
 Instruct us where the mountain low declines,
 So that attempt to mount it be not vain.
 For who knows most, him loss of time most grieves."
 
 As sheep, that step from forth their fold, by one,
 Or pairs, or three at once; meanwhile the rest
 Stand fearfully, bending the eye and nose
 To ground, and what the foremost does, that do
 The others, gath'ring round her, if she stops,
 Simple and quiet, nor the cause discern;
 So saw I moving to advance the first,
 Who of that fortunate crew were at the head,
 Of modest mien and graceful in their gait.
 When they before me had beheld the light
 From my right side fall broken on the ground,
 So that the shadow reach'd the cave, they stopp'd
 And somewhat back retir'd: the same did all,
 Who follow'd, though unweeting of the cause.
 
 "Unask'd of you, yet freely I confess,
 This is a human body which ye see.
 That the sun's light is broken on the ground,
 Marvel not: but believe, that not without
 Virtue deriv'd from Heaven, we to climb
 Over this wall aspire."  So them bespake
 My master; and that virtuous tribe rejoin'd;
 "Turn, and before you there the entrance lies,"
 Making a signal to us with bent hands.
 
 Then of them one began.  "Whoe'er thou art,
 Who journey'st thus this way, thy visage turn,
 Think if me elsewhere thou hast ever seen."
 
 I tow'rds him turn'd, and with fix'd eye beheld.
 Comely, and fair, and gentle of aspect,
 He seem'd, but on one brow a gash was mark'd.
 
 When humbly I disclaim'd to have beheld
 Him ever: "Now behold!"  he said, and show'd
 High on his breast a wound: then smiling spake.
 
 "I am Manfredi, grandson to the Queen
 Costanza: whence I pray thee, when return'd,
 To my fair daughter go, the parent glad
 Of Aragonia and Sicilia's pride;
 And of the truth inform her, if of me
 Aught else be told.  When by two mortal blows
 My frame was shatter'd, I betook myself
 Weeping to him, who of free will forgives.
 My sins were horrible; but so wide arms
 Hath goodness infinite, that it receives
 All who turn to it.  Had this text divine
 Been of Cosenza's shepherd better scann'd,
 Who then by Clement on my hunt was set,
 Yet at the bridge's head my bones had lain,
 Near Benevento, by the heavy mole
 Protected; but the rain now drenches them,
 And the wind drives, out of the kingdom's bounds,
 Far as the stream of Verde, where, with lights
 Extinguish'd, he remov'd them from their bed.
 Yet by their curse we are not so destroy'd,
 But that the eternal love may turn, while hope
 Retains her verdant blossoms.  True it is,
 That such one as in contumacy dies
 Against the holy church, though he repent,
 Must wander thirty-fold for all the time
 In his presumption past; if such decree
 Be not by prayers of good men shorter made
 Look therefore if thou canst advance my bliss;
 Revealing to my good Costanza, how
 Thou hast beheld me, and beside the terms
 Laid on me of that interdict; for here
 By means of those below much profit comes."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO IV
 
 When by sensations of delight or pain,
 That any of our faculties hath seiz'd,
 Entire the soul collects herself, it seems
 She is intent upon that power alone,
 And thus the error is disprov'd which holds
 The soul not singly lighted in the breast.
 And therefore when as aught is heard or seen,
 That firmly keeps the soul toward it turn'd,
 Time passes, and a man perceives it not.
 For that, whereby he hearken, is one power,
 Another that, which the whole spirit hash;
 This is as it were bound, while that is free.
 
 This found I true by proof, hearing that spirit
 And wond'ring; for full fifty steps aloft
 The sun had measur'd unobserv'd of me,
 When we arriv'd where all with one accord
 The spirits shouted, "Here is what ye ask."
 
 A larger aperture ofttimes is stopp'd
 With forked stake of thorn by villager,
 When the ripe grape imbrowns, than was the path,
 By which my guide, and I behind him close,
 Ascended solitary, when that troop
 Departing left us.  On Sanleo's road
 Who journeys, or to Noli low descends,
 Or mounts Bismantua's height, must use his feet;
 But here a man had need to fly, I mean
 With the swift wing and plumes of high desire,
 Conducted by his aid, who gave me hope,
 And with light furnish'd to direct my way.
 
 We through the broken rock ascended, close
 Pent on each side, while underneath the ground
 Ask'd help of hands and feet.  When we arriv'd
 Near on the highest ridge of the steep bank,
 Where the plain level open'd I exclaim'd,
 "O master! say which way can we proceed?"
 
 He answer'd, "Let no step of thine recede.
 Behind me gain the mountain, till to us
 Some practis'd guide appear."  That eminence
 Was lofty that no eye might reach its point,
 And the side proudly rising, more than line
 From the mid quadrant to the centre drawn.
 I wearied thus began: "Parent belov'd!
 Turn, and behold how I remain alone,
 If thou stay not."--" My son!"  He straight reply'd,
 "Thus far put forth thy strength;" and to a track
 Pointed, that, on this side projecting, round
 Circles the hill.  His words so spurr'd me on,
 That I behind him clamb'ring, forc'd myself,
 Till my feet press'd the circuit plain beneath.
 There both together seated, turn'd we round
 To eastward, whence was our ascent: and oft
 Many beside have with delight look'd back.
 
 First on the nether shores I turn'd my eyes,
 Then rais'd them to the sun, and wond'ring mark'd
 That from the left it smote us.  Soon perceiv'd
 That Poet sage now at the car of light
 Amaz'd I stood, where 'twixt us and the north
 Its course it enter'd.  Whence he thus to me:
 "Were Leda's offspring now in company
 Of that broad mirror, that high up and low
 Imparts his light beneath, thou might'st behold
 The ruddy zodiac nearer to the bears
 Wheel, if its ancient course it not forsook.
 How that may be if thou would'st think; within
 Pond'ring, imagine Sion with this mount
 Plac'd on the earth, so that to both be one
 Horizon, and two hemispheres apart,
 Where lies the path that Phaeton ill knew
 To guide his erring chariot: thou wilt see
 How of necessity by this on one
 He passes, while by that on the' other side,
 If with clear view shine intellect attend."
 
 "Of truth, kind teacher!"  I exclaim'd, "so clear
 Aught saw I never, as I now discern
 Where seem'd my ken to fail, that the mid orb
 Of the supernal motion (which in terms
 Of art is called the Equator, and remains
 Ever between the sun and winter) for the cause
 Thou hast assign'd, from hence toward the north
 Departs, when those who in the Hebrew land
 Inhabit, see it tow'rds the warmer part.
 But if it please thee, I would gladly know,
 How far we have to journey: for the hill
 Mounts higher, than this sight of mine can mount."
 
 He thus to me: "Such is this steep ascent,
 That it is ever difficult at first,
 But, more a man proceeds, less evil grows.
 When pleasant it shall seem to thee, so much
 That upward going shall be easy to thee.
 As in a vessel to go down the tide,
 Then of this path thou wilt have reach'd the end.
 There hope to rest thee from thy toil.  No more
 I answer, and thus far for certain know."
 As he his words had spoken, near to us
 A voice there sounded: "Yet ye first perchance
 May to repose you by constraint be led."
 At sound thereof each turn'd, and on the left
 A huge stone we beheld, of which nor I
 Nor he before was ware.  Thither we drew,
 find there were some, who in the shady place
 Behind the rock were standing, as a man
 Thru' idleness might stand.  Among them one,
 Who seem'd to me much wearied, sat him down,
 And with his arms did fold his knees about,
 Holding his face between them downward bent.
 
 "Sweet Sir!"  I cry'd, "behold that man, who shows
 Himself more idle, than if laziness
 Were sister to him."  Straight he turn'd to us,
 And, o'er the thigh lifting his face, observ'd,
 Then in these accents spake: "Up then, proceed
 Thou valiant one."  Straight who it was I knew;
 Nor could the pain I felt (for want of breath
 Still somewhat urg'd me) hinder my approach.
 And when I came to him, he scarce his head
 Uplifted, saying "Well hast thou discern'd,
 How from the left the sun his chariot leads."
 
 His lazy acts and broken words my lips
 To laughter somewhat mov'd; when I began:
 "Belacqua, now for thee I grieve no more.
 But tell, why thou art seated upright there?
 Waitest thou escort to conduct thee hence?
 Or blame I only shine accustom'd ways?"
 Then he: "My brother, of what use to mount,
 When to my suffering would not let me pass
 The bird of God, who at the portal sits?
 Behooves so long that heav'n first bear me round
 Without its limits, as in life it bore,
 Because I to the end repentant Sighs
 Delay'd, if prayer do not aid me first,
 That riseth up from heart which lives in grace.
 What other kind avails, not heard in heaven?"'
 
 Before me now the Poet up the mount
 Ascending, cried: "Haste thee, for see the sun
 Has touch'd the point meridian, and the night
 Now covers with her foot Marocco's shore."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO V
 
 Now had I left those spirits, and pursued
 The steps of my Conductor, when beheld
 Pointing the finger at me one exclaim'd:
 "See how it seems as if the light not shone
 From the left hand of him beneath, and he,
 As living, seems to be led on."  Mine eyes
 I at that sound reverting, saw them gaze
 Through wonder first at me, and then at me
 And the light broken underneath, by turns.
 "Why are thy thoughts thus riveted?"  my guide
 Exclaim'd, "that thou hast slack'd thy pace? or how
 Imports it thee, what thing is whisper'd here?
 Come after me, and to their babblings leave
 The crowd. Be as a tower, that, firmly set,
 Shakes not its top for any blast that blows!
 He, in whose bosom thought on thought shoots out,
 Still of his aim is wide, in that the one
 Sicklies and wastes to nought the other's strength."
 
 What other could I answer save "I come?"
 I said it, somewhat with that colour ting'd
 Which ofttimes pardon meriteth for man.
 
 Meanwhile traverse along the hill there came,
 A little way before us, some who sang
 The "Miserere" in responsive Strains.
 When they perceiv'd that through my body I
 Gave way not for the rays to pass, their song
 Straight to a long and hoarse exclaim they chang'd;
 And two of them, in guise of messengers,
 Ran on to meet us, and inquiring ask'd:
 "Of your condition we would gladly learn."
 
 To them my guide.  "Ye may return, and bear
 Tidings to them who sent you, that his frame
 Is real flesh.  If, as I deem, to view
 His shade they paus'd, enough is answer'd them.
 Him let them honour, they may prize him well."
 
 Ne'er saw I fiery vapours with such speed
 Cut through the serene air at fall of night,
 Nor August's clouds athwart the setting sun,
 That upward these did not in shorter space
 Return; and, there arriving, with the rest
 Wheel back on us, as with loose rein a troop.
 
 "Many," exclaim'd the bard, "are these, who throng
 Around us: to petition thee they come.
 Go therefore on, and listen as thou go'st."
 
 "O spirit! who go'st on to blessedness
 With the same limbs, that clad thee at thy birth."
 Shouting they came, "a little rest thy step.
 Look if thou any one amongst our tribe
 Hast e'er beheld, that tidings of him there
 Thou mayst report.  Ah, wherefore go'st thou on?
 Ah wherefore tarriest thou not?  We all
 By violence died, and to our latest hour
 Were sinners, but then warn'd by light from heav'n,
 So that, repenting and forgiving, we
 Did issue out of life at peace with God,
 Who with desire to see him fills our heart."
 
 Then I: "The visages of all I scan
 Yet none of ye remember.  But if aught,
 That I can do, may please you, gentle spirits!
 Speak; and I will perform it, by that peace,
 Which on the steps of guide so excellent
 Following from world to world intent I seek."
 
 In answer he began: "None here distrusts
 Thy kindness, though not promis'd with an oath;
 So as the will fail not for want of power.
 Whence I, who sole before the others speak,
 Entreat thee, if thou ever see that land,
 Which lies between Romagna and the realm
 Of Charles, that of thy courtesy thou pray
 Those who inhabit Fano, that for me
 Their adorations duly be put up,
 By which I may purge off my grievous sins.
 From thence I came.  But the deep passages,
 Whence issued out the blood wherein I dwelt,
 Upon my bosom in Antenor's land
 Were made, where to be more secure I thought.
 The author of the deed was Este's prince,
 Who, more than right could warrant, with his wrath
 Pursued me.  Had I towards Mira fled,
 When overta'en at Oriaco, still
 Might I have breath'd. But to the marsh I sped,
 And in the mire and rushes tangled there
 Fell, and beheld my life-blood float the plain."
 
 Then said another: "Ah! so may the wish,
 That takes thee o'er the mountain, be fulfill'd,
 As thou shalt graciously give aid to mine.
 Of Montefeltro I; Buonconte I:
 Giovanna nor none else have care for me,
 Sorrowing with these I therefore go."  I thus:
 "From Campaldino's field what force or chance
 Drew thee, that ne'er thy sepulture was known?"
 
 "Oh!"  answer'd he, "at Casentino's foot
 A stream there courseth, nam'd Archiano, sprung
 In Apennine above the Hermit's seat.
 E'en where its name is cancel'd, there came I,
 Pierc'd in the heart, fleeing away on foot,
 And bloodying the plain.  Here sight and speech
 Fail'd me, and finishing with Mary's name
 I fell, and tenantless my flesh remain'd.
 I will report the truth; which thou again
 Tell to the living.  Me God's angel took,
 Whilst he of hell exclaim'd: "O thou from heav'n!
 Say wherefore hast thou robb'd me?  Thou of him
 Th' eternal portion bear'st with thee away
 For one poor tear that he deprives me of.
 But of the other, other rule I make."
 
 "Thou knowest how in the atmosphere collects
 That vapour dank, returning into water,
 Soon as it mounts where cold condenses it.
 That evil will, which in his intellect
 Still follows evil, came, and rais'd the wind
 And smoky mist, by virtue of the power
 Given by his nature.  Thence the valley, soon
 As day was spent, he cover'd o'er with cloud
 From Pratomagno to the mountain range,
 And stretch'd the sky above, so that the air
 Impregnate chang'd to water.  Fell the rain,
 And to the fosses came all that the land
 Contain'd not; and, as mightiest streams are wont,
 To the great river with such headlong sweep
 Rush'd, that nought stay'd its course.  My stiffen'd frame
 Laid at his mouth the fell Archiano found,
 And dash'd it into Arno, from my breast
 Loos'ning the cross, that of myself I made
 When overcome with pain.  He hurl'd me on,
 Along the banks and bottom of his course;
 Then in his muddy spoils encircling wrapt."
 
 "Ah! when thou to the world shalt be return'd,
 And rested after thy long road," so spake
 Next the third spirit; "then remember me.
 I once was Pia.  Sienna gave me life,
 Maremma took it from me.  That he knows,
 Who me with jewell'd ring had first espous'd."
 
 
 CANTO VI
 
 When from their game of dice men separate,
 He, who hath lost, remains in sadness fix'd,
 Revolving in his mind, what luckless throws
 He cast: but meanwhile all the company
 Go with the other; one before him runs,
 And one behind his mantle twitches, one
 Fast by his side bids him remember him.
 He stops not; and each one, to whom his hand
 Is stretch'd, well knows he bids him stand aside;
 And thus he from the press defends himself.
 E'en such was I in that close-crowding throng;
 And turning so my face around to all,
 And promising, I 'scap'd from it with pains.
 
 Here of Arezzo him I saw, who fell
 By Ghino's cruel arm; and him beside,
 Who in his chase was swallow'd by the stream.
 Here Frederic Novello, with his hand
 Stretch'd forth, entreated; and of Pisa he,
 Who put the good Marzuco to such proof
 Of constancy.  Count Orso I beheld;
 And from its frame a soul dismiss'd for spite
 And envy, as it said, but for no crime:
 I speak of Peter de la Brosse; and here,
 While she yet lives, that Lady of Brabant
 Let her beware; lest for so false a deed
 She herd with worse than these. When I was freed
 From all those spirits, who pray'd for others' prayers
 To hasten on their state of blessedness;
 Straight I began: "O thou, my luminary!
 It seems expressly in thy text denied,
 That heaven's supreme decree can never bend
 To supplication; yet with this design
 Do these entreat.  Can then their hope be vain,
 Or is thy saying not to me reveal'd?"
 
 He thus to me: "Both what I write is plain,
 And these deceiv'd not in their hope, if well
 Thy mind consider, that the sacred height
 Of judgment doth not stoop, because love's flame
 In a short moment all fulfils, which he
 Who sojourns here, in right should satisfy.
 Besides, when I this point concluded thus,
 By praying no defect could be supplied;
 Because the pray'r had none access to God.
 Yet in this deep suspicion rest thou not
 Contented unless she assure thee so,
 Who betwixt truth and mind infuses light.
 I know not if thou take me right; I mean
 Beatrice.  Her thou shalt behold above,
 Upon this mountain's crown, fair seat of joy."
 
 Then I: "Sir! let us mend our speed; for now
 I tire not as before; and lo! the hill
 Stretches its shadow far."  He answer'd thus:
 "Our progress with this day shall be as much
 As we may now dispatch; but otherwise
 Than thou supposest is the truth.  For there
 Thou canst not be, ere thou once more behold
 Him back returning, who behind the steep
 Is now so hidden, that as erst his beam
 Thou dost not break.  But lo! a spirit there
 Stands solitary, and toward us looks:
 It will instruct us in the speediest way."
 
 We soon approach'd it.  O thou Lombard spirit!
 How didst thou stand, in high abstracted mood,
 Scarce moving with slow dignity thine eyes!
 It spoke not aught, but let us onward pass,
 Eyeing us as a lion on his watch.
 But Virgil with entreaty mild advanc'd,
 Requesting it to show the best ascent.
 It answer to his question none return'd,
 But of our country and our kind of life
 Demanded.  When my courteous guide began,
 "Mantua," the solitary shadow quick
 Rose towards us from the place in which it stood,
 And cry'd, "Mantuan! I am thy countryman
 Sordello."  Each the other then embrac'd.
 
 Ah slavish Italy! thou inn of grief,
 Vessel without a pilot in loud storm,
 Lady no longer of fair provinces,
 But brothel-house impure! this gentle spirit,
 Ev'n from the Pleasant sound of his dear land
 Was prompt to greet a fellow citizen
 With such glad cheer; while now thy living ones
 In thee abide not without war; and one
 Malicious gnaws another, ay of those
 Whom the same wall and the same moat contains,
 Seek, wretched one! around thy sea-coasts wide;
 Then homeward to thy bosom turn, and mark
 If any part of the sweet peace enjoy.
 What boots it, that thy reins Justinian's hand
 Befitted, if thy saddle be unpress'd?
 Nought doth he now but aggravate thy shame.
 Ah people! thou obedient still shouldst live,
 And in the saddle let thy Caesar sit,
 If well thou marked'st that which God commands.
 
 Look how that beast to felness hath relaps'd
 From having lost correction of the spur,
 Since to the bridle thou hast set thine hand,
 O German Albert! who abandon'st her,
 That is grown savage and unmanageable,
 When thou should'st clasp her flanks with forked heels.
 Just judgment from the stars fall on thy blood!
 And be it strange and manifest to all!
 Such as may strike thy successor with dread!
 For that thy sire and thou have suffer'd thus,
 Through greediness of yonder realms detain'd,
 The garden of the empire to run waste.
 Come see the Capulets and Montagues,
 The Philippeschi and Monaldi! man
 Who car'st for nought! those sunk in grief, and these
 With dire suspicion rack'd. Come, cruel one!
 Come and behold the' oppression of the nobles,
 And mark their injuries: and thou mayst see.
 What safety Santafiore can supply.
 Come and behold thy Rome, who calls on thee,
 Desolate widow! day and night with moans:
 "My Caesar, why dost thou desert my side?"
 Come and behold what love among thy people:
 And if no pity touches thee for us,
 Come and blush for thine own report.  For me,
 If it be lawful, O Almighty Power,
 Who wast in earth for our sakes crucified!
 Are thy just eyes turn'd elsewhere? or is this
 A preparation in the wond'rous depth
 Of thy sage counsel made, for some good end,
 Entirely from our reach of thought cut off?
 So are the' Italian cities all o'erthrong'd
 With tyrants, and a great Marcellus made
 Of every petty factious villager.
 
 My Florence! thou mayst well remain unmov'd
 At this digression, which affects not thee:
 Thanks to thy people, who so wisely speed.
 Many have justice in their heart, that long
 Waiteth for counsel to direct the bow,
 Or ere it dart unto its aim: but shine
 Have it on their lip's edge.  Many refuse
 To bear the common burdens: readier thine
 Answer uneall'd, and cry, "Behold I stoop!"
 
 Make thyself glad, for thou hast reason now,
 Thou wealthy! thou at peace! thou wisdom-fraught!
 Facts best witness if I speak the truth.
 Athens and Lacedaemon, who of old
 Enacted laws, for civil arts renown'd,
 Made little progress in improving life
 Tow'rds thee, who usest such nice subtlety,
 That to the middle of November scarce
 Reaches the thread thou in October weav'st.
 How many times, within thy memory,
 Customs, and laws, and coins, and offices
 Have been by thee renew'd, and people chang'd!
 
 If thou remember'st well and can'st see clear,
 Thou wilt perceive thyself like a sick wretch,
 Who finds no rest upon her down, but oft
 Shifting her side, short respite seeks from pain.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO VII
 
 After their courteous greetings joyfully
 Sev'n times exchang'd, Sordello backward drew
 Exclaiming, "Who are ye?"  "Before this mount
 By spirits worthy of ascent to God
 Was sought, my bones had by Octavius' care
 Been buried.  I am Virgil, for no sin
 Depriv'd of heav'n, except for lack of faith."
 
 So answer'd him in few my gentle guide.
 
 As one, who aught before him suddenly
 Beholding, whence his wonder riseth, cries
 "It is yet is not," wav'ring in belief;
 Such he appear'd; then downward bent his eyes,
 And drawing near with reverential step,
 Caught him, where of mean estate might clasp
 His lord.  "Glory of Latium!" he exclaim'd,
 "In whom our tongue its utmost power display'd!
 Boast of my honor'd birth-place! what desert
 Of mine, what favour rather undeserv'd,
 Shows thee to me?  If I to hear that voice
 Am worthy, say if from below thou com'st
 And from what cloister's pale?"--"Through every orb
 Of that sad region," he reply'd, "thus far
 Am I arriv'd, by heav'nly influence led
 And with such aid I come.  There is a place
 There underneath, not made by torments sad,
 But by dun shades alone; where mourning's voice
 Sounds not of anguish sharp, but breathes in sighs.
 
 "There I with little innocents abide,
 Who by death's fangs were bitten, ere exempt
 From human taint.  There I with those abide,
 Who the three holy virtues put not on,
 But understood the rest, and without blame
 Follow'd them all.  But if thou know'st and canst,
 Direct us, how we soonest may arrive,
 Where Purgatory its true beginning takes."
 
 He answer'd thus: "We have no certain place
 Assign'd us: upwards I may go or round,
 Far as I can, I join thee for thy guide.
 But thou beholdest now how day declines:
 And upwards to proceed by night, our power
 Excels: therefore it may be well to choose
 A place of pleasant sojourn.  To the right
 Some spirits sit apart retir'd.  If thou
 Consentest, I to these will lead thy steps:
 And thou wilt know them, not without delight."
 
 "How chances this?"  was answer'd; "who so wish'd
 To ascend by night, would he be thence debarr'd
 By other, or through his own weakness fail?"
 
 The good Sordello then, along the ground
 Trailing his finger, spoke: "Only this line
 Thou shalt not overpass, soon as the sun
 Hath disappear'd; not that aught else impedes
 Thy going upwards, save the shades of night.
 These with the wont of power perplex the will.
 With them thou haply mightst return beneath,
 Or to and fro around the mountain's side
 Wander, while day is in the horizon shut."
 
 My master straight, as wond'ring at his speech,
 Exclaim'd: "Then lead us quickly, where thou sayst,
 That, while we stay, we may enjoy delight."
 
 A little space we were remov'd from thence,
 When I perceiv'd the mountain hollow'd out.
 Ev'n as large valleys hollow'd out on earth,
 
 "That way," the' escorting spirit cried, "we go,
 Where in a bosom the high bank recedes:
 And thou await renewal of the day."
 
 Betwixt the steep and plain a crooked path
 Led us traverse into the ridge's side,
 Where more than half the sloping edge expires.
 Refulgent gold, and silver thrice refin'd,
 And scarlet grain and ceruse, Indian wood
 Of lucid dye serene, fresh emeralds
 But newly broken, by the herbs and flowers
 Plac'd in that fair recess, in color all
 Had been surpass'd, as great surpasses less.
 Nor nature only there lavish'd her hues,
 But of the sweetness of a thousand smells
 A rare and undistinguish'd fragrance made.
 
 "Salve Regina," on the grass and flowers
 Here chanting I beheld those spirits sit
 Who not beyond the valley could be seen.
 
 "Before the west'ring sun sink to his bed,"
 Began the Mantuan, who our steps had turn'd,
 
 "'Mid those desires not that I lead ye on.
 For from this eminence ye shall discern
 Better the acts and visages of all,
 Than in the nether vale among them mix'd.
 He, who sits high above the rest, and seems
 To have neglected that he should have done,
 And to the others' song moves not his lip,
 The Emperor Rodolph call, who might have heal'd
 The wounds whereof fair Italy hath died,
 So that by others she revives but slowly,
 He, who with kindly visage comforts him,
 Sway'd in that country, where the water springs,
 That Moldaw's river to the Elbe, and Elbe
 Rolls to the ocean: Ottocar his name:
 Who in his swaddling clothes was of more worth
 Than Winceslaus his son, a bearded man,
 Pamper'd with rank luxuriousness and ease.
 And that one with the nose depress, who close
 In counsel seems with him of gentle look,
 Flying expir'd, with'ring the lily's flower.
 Look there how he doth knock against his breast!
 The other ye behold, who for his cheek
 Makes of one hand a couch, with frequent sighs.
 They are the father and the father-in-law
 Of Gallia's bane: his vicious life they know
 And foul; thence comes the grief that rends them thus.
 
 "He, so robust of limb, who measure keeps
 In song, with him of feature prominent,
 With ev'ry virtue bore his girdle brac'd.
 And if that stripling who behinds him sits,
 King after him had liv'd, his virtue then
 From vessel to like vessel had been pour'd;
 Which may not of the other heirs be said.
 By James and Frederick his realms are held;
 Neither the better heritage obtains.
 Rarely into the branches of the tree
 Doth human worth mount up; and so ordains
 He who bestows it, that as his free gift
 It may be call'd.  To Charles my words apply
 No less than to his brother in the song;
 Which Pouille and Provence now with grief confess.
 So much that plant degenerates from its seed,
 As more than Beatrice and Margaret
 Costanza still boasts of her valorous spouse.
 
 "Behold the king of simple life and plain,
 Harry of England, sitting there alone:
 He through his branches better issue spreads.
 
 "That one, who on the ground beneath the rest
 Sits lowest, yet his gaze directs aloft,
 Us William, that brave Marquis, for whose cause
 The deed of Alexandria and his war
 Makes Conferrat and Canavese weep."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO VIII
 
 Now was the hour that wakens fond desire
 In men at sea, and melts their thoughtful heart,
 Who in the morn have bid sweet friends farewell,
 And pilgrim newly on his road with love
 Thrills, if he hear the vesper bell from far,
 That seems to mourn for the expiring day:
 When I, no longer taking heed to hear
 Began, with wonder, from those spirits to mark
 One risen from its seat, which with its hand
 Audience implor'd. Both palms it join'd and rais'd,
 Fixing its steadfast gaze towards the east,
 As telling God, "I care for naught beside."
 
 "Te Lucis Ante," so devoutly then
 Came from its lip, and in so soft a strain,
 That all my sense in ravishment was lost.
 And the rest after, softly and devout,
 Follow'd through all the hymn, with upward gaze
 Directed to the bright supernal wheels.
 
 Here, reader! for the truth makes thine eyes keen:
 For of so subtle texture is this veil,
 That thou with ease mayst pass it through unmark'd.
 
 I saw that gentle band silently next
 Look up, as if in expectation held,
 Pale and in lowly guise; and from on high
 I saw forth issuing descend beneath
 Two angels with two flame-illumin'd swords,
 Broken and mutilated at their points.
 Green as the tender leaves but newly born,
 Their vesture was, the which by wings as green
 Beaten, they drew behind them, fann'd in air.
 A little over us one took his stand,
 The other lighted on the' Opposing hill,
 So that the troop were in the midst contain'd.
 
 Well I descried the whiteness on their heads;
 But in their visages the dazzled eye
 Was lost, as faculty that by too much
 Is overpower'd.  "From Mary's bosom both
 Are come," exclaim'd Sordello, "as a guard
 Over the vale, ganst him, who hither tends,
 The serpent."  Whence, not knowing by which path
 He came, I turn'd me round, and closely press'd,
 All frozen, to my leader's trusted side.
 
 Sordello paus'd not: "To the valley now
 (For it is time) let us descend; and hold
 Converse with those great shadows: haply much
 Their sight may please ye."  Only three steps down
 Methinks I measur'd, ere I was beneath,
 And noted one who look'd as with desire
 To know me.  Time was now that air arrow dim;
 Yet not so dim, that 'twixt his eyes and mine
 It clear'd not up what was conceal'd before.
 Mutually tow'rds each other we advanc'd.
 Nino, thou courteous judge! what joy I felt,
 When I perceiv'd thou wert not with the bad!
 
 No salutation kind on either part
 Was left unsaid.  He then inquir'd: "How long
 Since thou arrived'st at the mountain's foot,
 Over the distant waves?"--"O!" answer'd I,
 "Through the sad seats of woe this morn I came,
 And still in my first life, thus journeying on,
 The other strive to gain."  Soon as they heard
 My words, he and Sordello backward drew,
 As suddenly amaz'd.  To Virgil one,
 The other to a spirit turn'd, who near
 Was seated, crying: "Conrad! up with speed:
 Come, see what of his grace high God hath will'd."
 Then turning round to me: "By that rare mark
 Of honour which thou ow'st to him, who hides
 So deeply his first cause, it hath no ford,
 When thou shalt be beyond the vast of waves.
 Tell my Giovanna, that for me she call
 There, where reply to innocence is made.
 Her mother, I believe, loves me no more;
 Since she has chang'd the white and wimpled folds,
 Which she is doom'd once more with grief to wish.
 By her it easily may be perceiv'd,
 How long in women lasts the flame of love,
 If sight and touch do not relume it oft.
 For her so fair a burial will not make
 The viper which calls Milan to the field,
 As had been made by shrill Gallura's bird."
 
 He spoke, and in his visage took the stamp
 Of that right seal, which with due temperature
 Glows in the bosom.  My insatiate eyes
 Meanwhile to heav'n had travel'd, even there
 Where the bright stars are slowest, as a wheel
 Nearest the axle; when my guide inquir'd:
 "What there aloft, my son, has caught thy gaze?"
 
 I answer'd: "The three torches, with which here
 The pole is all on fire."  He then to me:
 "The four resplendent stars, thou saw'st this morn
 Are there beneath, and these ris'n in their stead."
 
 While yet he spoke.  Sordello to himself
 Drew him, and cry'd: "Lo there our enemy!"
 And with his hand pointed that way to look.
 
 Along the side, where barrier none arose
 Around the little vale, a serpent lay,
 Such haply as gave Eve the bitter food.
 Between the grass and flowers, the evil snake
 Came on, reverting oft his lifted head;
 And, as a beast that smoothes its polish'd coat,
 Licking his hack.  I saw not, nor can tell,
 How those celestial falcons from their seat
 Mov'd, but in motion each one well descried,
 Hearing the air cut by their verdant plumes.
 The serpent fled; and to their stations back
 The angels up return'd with equal flight.
 
 The Spirit (who to Nino, when he call'd,
 Had come), from viewing me with fixed ken,
 Through all that conflict, loosen'd not his sight.
 
 "So may the lamp, which leads thee up on high,
 Find, in thy destin'd lot, of wax so much,
 As may suffice thee to the enamel's height."
 It thus began: "If any certain news
 Of Valdimagra and the neighbour part
 Thou know'st, tell me, who once was mighty there
 They call'd me Conrad Malaspina, not
 That old one, but from him I sprang.  The love
 I bore my people is now here refin'd."
 
 "In your dominions," I answer'd, "ne'er was I.
 But through all Europe where do those men dwell,
 To whom their glory is not manifest?
 The fame, that honours your illustrious house,
 Proclaims the nobles and proclaims the land;
 So that he knows it who was never there.
 I swear to you, so may my upward route
 Prosper! your honour'd nation not impairs
 The value of her coffer and her sword.
 Nature and use give her such privilege,
 That while the world is twisted from his course
 By a bad head, she only walks aright,
 And has the evil way in scorn."  He then:
 "Now pass thee on: sev'n times the tired sun
 Revisits not the couch, which with four feet
 The forked Aries covers, ere that kind
 Opinion shall be nail'd into thy brain
 With stronger nails than other's speech can drive,
 If the sure course of judgment be not stay'd."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO IX
 
 Now the fair consort of Tithonus old,
 Arisen from her mate's beloved arms,
 Look'd palely o'er the eastern cliff: her brow,
 Lucent with jewels, glitter'd, set in sign
 Of that chill animal, who with his train
 Smites fearful nations: and where then we were,
 Two steps of her ascent the night had past,
 And now the third was closing up its wing,
 When I, who had so much of Adam with me,
 Sank down upon the grass, o'ercome with sleep,
 There where all five were seated.  In that hour,
 When near the dawn the swallow her sad lay,
 Rememb'ring haply ancient grief, renews,
 And with our minds more wand'rers from the flesh,
 And less by thought restrain'd are, as 't were, full
 Of holy divination in their dreams,
 Then in a vision did I seem to view
 A golden-feather'd eagle in the sky,
 With open wings, and hov'ring for descent,
 And I was in that place, methought, from whence
 Young Ganymede, from his associates 'reft,
 Was snatch'd aloft to the high consistory.
 "Perhaps," thought I within me, "here alone
 He strikes his quarry, and elsewhere disdains
 To pounce upon the prey."  Therewith, it seem'd,
 A little wheeling in his airy tour
 Terrible as the lightning rush'd he down,
 And snatch'd me upward even to the fire.
 
 There both, I thought, the eagle and myself
 Did burn; and so intense th' imagin'd flames,
 That needs my sleep was broken off.  As erst
 Achilles shook himself, and round him roll'd
 His waken'd eyeballs wond'ring where he was,
 Whenas his mother had from Chiron fled
 To Scyros, with him sleeping in her arms;
 E'en thus I shook me, soon as from my face
 The slumber parted, turning deadly pale,
 Like one ice-struck with dread.  Solo at my side
 My comfort stood: and the bright sun was now
 More than two hours aloft: and to the sea
 My looks were turn'd.  "Fear not," my master cried,
 "Assur'd we are at happy point.  Thy strength
 Shrink not, but rise dilated.  Thou art come
 To Purgatory now.  Lo! there the cliff
 That circling bounds it!  Lo! the entrance there,
 Where it doth seem disparted! re the dawn
 Usher'd the daylight, when thy wearied soul
 Slept in thee, o'er the flowery vale beneath
 A lady came, and thus bespake me: "I
 Am Lucia.  Suffer me to take this man,
 Who slumbers.  Easier so his way shall speed."
 Sordello and the other gentle shapes
 Tarrying, she bare thee up: and, as day shone,
 This summit reach'd: and I pursued her steps.
 Here did she place thee.  First her lovely eyes
 That open entrance show'd me; then at once
 She vanish'd with thy sleep.  Like one, whose doubts
 Are chas'd by certainty, and terror turn'd
 To comfort on discovery of the truth,
 Such was the change in me: and as my guide
 Beheld me fearless, up along the cliff
 He mov'd, and I behind him, towards the height.
 
 Reader! thou markest how my theme doth rise,
 Nor wonder therefore, if more artfully
 I prop the structure! nearer now we drew,
 Arriv'd' whence in that part, where first a breach
 As of a wall appear'd, I could descry
 A portal, and three steps beneath, that led
 For inlet there, of different colour each,
 And one who watch'd, but spake not yet a word.
 As more and more mine eye did stretch its view,
 I mark'd him seated on the highest step,
 In visage such, as past my power to bear.
 
 Grasp'd in his hand a naked sword, glanc'd back
 The rays so toward me, that I oft in vain
 My sight directed.  "Speak from whence ye stand:"
 He cried: "What would ye?  Where is your escort?
 Take heed your coming upward harm ye not."
 
 "A heavenly dame, not skilless of these things,"
 Replied the' instructor, "told us, even now,
 "Pass that way: here the gate is." --"And may she
 Befriending prosper your ascent," resum'd
 The courteous keeper of the gate: "Come then
 Before our steps."  We straightway thither came.
 
 The lowest stair was marble white so smooth
 And polish'd, that therein my mirror'd form
 Distinct I saw.  The next of hue more dark
 Than sablest grain, a rough and singed block,
 Crack'd lengthwise and across.  The third, that lay
 Massy above, seem'd porphyry, that flam'd
 Red as the life-blood spouting from a vein.
 On this God's angel either foot sustain'd,
 Upon the threshold seated, which appear'd
 A rock of diamond.  Up the trinal steps
 My leader cheerily drew me.  "Ask," said he,
 
 "With humble heart, that he unbar the bolt."
 
 Piously at his holy feet devolv'd
 I cast me, praying him for pity's sake
 That he would open to me: but first fell
 Thrice on my bosom prostrate.  Seven times
 The letter, that denotes the inward stain,
 He on my forehead with the blunted point
 Of his drawn sword inscrib'd.  And "Look," he cried,
 "When enter'd, that thou wash these scars away."
 
 Ashes, or earth ta'en dry out of the ground,
 Were of one colour with the robe he wore.
 From underneath that vestment forth he drew
 Two keys of metal twain: the one was gold,
 Its fellow silver.  With the pallid first,
 And next the burnish'd, he so ply'd the gate,
 As to content me well.  "Whenever one
 Faileth of these, that in the keyhole straight
 It turn not, to this alley then expect
 Access in vain."  Such were the words he spake.
 "One is more precious: but the other needs
 Skill and sagacity, large share of each,
 Ere its good task to disengage the knot
 Be worthily perform'd.  From Peter these
 I hold, of him instructed, that I err
 Rather in opening than in keeping fast;
 So but the suppliant at my feet implore."
 
 Then of that hallow'd gate he thrust the door,
 Exclaiming, "Enter, but this warning hear:
 He forth again departs who looks behind."
 
 As in the hinges of that sacred ward
 The swivels turn'd, sonorous metal strong,
 Harsh was the grating; nor so surlily
 Roar'd the Tarpeian, when by force bereft
 Of good Metellus, thenceforth from his loss
 To leanness doom'd.  Attentively I turn'd,
 List'ning the thunder, that first issued forth;
 And "We praise thee, O God," methought I heard
 In accents blended with sweet melody.
 The strains came o'er mine ear, e'en as the sound
 Of choral voices, that in solemn chant
 With organ mingle, and, now high and clear,
 Come swelling, now float indistinct away.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO X
 
 When we had passed the threshold of the gate
 (Which the soul's ill affection doth disuse,
 Making the crooked seem the straighter path),
 I heard its closing sound.  Had mine eyes turn'd,
 For that offence what plea might have avail'd?
 
 We mounted up the riven rock, that wound
 On either side alternate, as the wave
 Flies and advances.  "Here some little art
 Behooves us," said my leader, "that our steps
 Observe the varying flexure of the path."
 
 Thus we so slowly sped, that with cleft orb
 The moon once more o'erhangs her wat'ry couch,
 Ere we that strait have threaded.  But when free
 We came and open, where the mount above
 One solid mass retires, I spent, with toil,
 And both, uncertain of the way, we stood,
 Upon a plain more lonesome, than the roads
 That traverse desert wilds.  From whence the brink
 Borders upon vacuity, to foot
 Of the steep bank, that rises still, the space
 Had measur'd thrice the stature of a man:
 And, distant as mine eye could wing its flight,
 To leftward now and now to right dispatch'd,
 That cornice equal in extent appear'd.
 
 Not yet our feet had on that summit mov'd,
 When I discover'd that the bank around,
 Whose proud uprising all ascent denied,
 Was marble white, and so exactly wrought
 With quaintest sculpture, that not there alone
 Had Polycletus, but e'en nature's self
 Been sham'd.  The angel who came down to earth
 With tidings of the peace so many years
 Wept for in vain, that op'd the heavenly gates
 From their long interdict, before us seem'd,
 In a sweet act, so sculptur'd to the life,
 He look'd no silent image. One had sworn
 He had said, "Hail!" for she was imag'd there,
 By whom the key did open to God's love,
 And in her act as sensibly impress
 That word, "Behold the handmaid of the Lord,"
 As figure seal'd on wax.  "Fix not thy mind
 On one place only," said the guide belov'd,
 Who had me near him on that part where lies
 The heart of man.  My sight forthwith I turn'd
 And mark'd, behind the virgin mother's form,
 Upon that side, where he, that mov'd me, stood,
 Another story graven on the rock.
 
 I passed athwart the bard, and drew me near,
 That it might stand more aptly for my view.
 There in the self-same marble were engrav'd
 The cart and kine, drawing the sacred ark,
 That from unbidden office awes mankind.
 Before it came much people; and the whole
 Parted in seven quires.  One sense cried, "Nay,"
 Another, "Yes, they sing."  Like doubt arose
 Betwixt the eye and smell, from the curl'd fume
 Of incense breathing up the well-wrought toil.
 Preceding the blest vessel, onward came
 With light dance leaping, girt in humble guise,
 Sweet Israel's harper: in that hap he seem'd
 Less and yet more than kingly.  Opposite,
 At a great palace, from the lattice forth
 Look'd Michol, like a lady full of scorn
 And sorrow.  To behold the tablet next,
 Which at the hack of Michol whitely shone,
 I mov'd me.  There was storied on the rock
 The' exalted glory of the Roman prince,
 Whose mighty worth mov'd Gregory to earn
 His mighty conquest, Trajan th' Emperor.
 A widow at his bridle stood, attir'd
 In tears and mourning.  Round about them troop'd
 Full throng of knights, and overhead in gold
 The eagles floated, struggling with the wind.
 
 The wretch appear'd amid all these to say:
 "Grant vengeance, sire! for, woe beshrew this heart
 My son is murder'd."  He replying seem'd;
 
 "Wait now till I return." And she, as one
 Made hasty by her grief; "O sire, if thou
 Dost not return?"--"Where I am, who then is,
 May right thee."--"What to thee is other's good,
 If thou neglect thy own?"--"Now comfort thee,"
 At length he answers.  "It beseemeth well
 My duty be perform'd, ere I move hence:
 So justice wills; and pity bids me stay."
 
 He, whose ken nothing new surveys, produc'd
 That visible speaking, new to us and strange
 The like not found on earth.  Fondly I gaz'd
 Upon those patterns of meek humbleness,
 Shapes yet more precious for their artist's sake,
 When "Lo," the poet whisper'd, "where this way
 (But slack their pace), a multitude advance.
 These to the lofty steps shall guide us on."
 
 Mine eyes, though bent on view of novel sights
 Their lov'd allurement, were not slow to turn.
 
 Reader! would not that amaz'd thou miss
 Of thy good purpose, hearing how just God
 Decrees our debts be cancel'd.  Ponder not
 The form of suff'ring.  Think on what succeeds,
 Think that at worst beyond the mighty doom
 It cannot pass.  "Instructor," I began,
 "What I see hither tending, bears no trace
 Of human semblance, nor of aught beside
 That my foil'd sight can guess."  He answering thus:
 "So courb'd to earth, beneath their heavy teems
 Of torment stoop they, that mine eye at first
 Struggled as thine.  But look intently thither,
 An disentangle with thy lab'ring view,
 What underneath those stones approacheth: now,
 E'en now, mayst thou discern the pangs of each."
 
 Christians and proud! poor and wretched ones!
 That feeble in the mind's eye, lean your trust
 Upon unstaid perverseness! now ye not
 That we are worms, yet made at last to form
 The winged insect, imp'd with angel plumes
 That to heaven's justice unobstructed soars?
 Why buoy ye up aloft your unfleg'd souls?
 Abortive then and shapeless ye remain,
 Like the untimely embryon of a worm!
 
 As, to support incumbent floor or roof,
 For corbel is a figure sometimes seen,
 That crumples up its knees unto its breast,
 With the feign'd posture stirring ruth unfeign'd
 In the beholder's fancy; so I saw
 These fashion'd, when I noted well their guise.
 
 Each, as his back was laden, came indeed
 Or more or less contract; but it appear'd
 As he, who show'd most patience in his look,
 Wailing exclaim'd: "I can endure no more."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XI
 
 "O thou Almighty Father, who dost make
 The heavens thy dwelling, not in bounds confin'd,
 But that with love intenser there thou view'st
 Thy primal effluence, hallow'd be thy name:
 Join each created being to extol
 Thy might, for worthy humblest thanks and praise
 Is thy blest Spirit.  May thy kingdom's peace
 Come unto us; for we, unless it come,
 With all our striving thither tend in vain.
 As of their will the angels unto thee
 Tender meet sacrifice, circling thy throne
 With loud hosannas, so of theirs be done
 By saintly men on earth.  Grant us this day
 Our daily manna, without which he roams
 Through this rough desert retrograde, who most
 Toils to advance his steps.  As we to each
 Pardon the evil done us, pardon thou
 Benign, and of our merit take no count.
 'Gainst the old adversary prove thou not
 Our virtue easily subdu'd; but free
 From his incitements and defeat his wiles.
 This last petition, dearest Lord! is made
 Not for ourselves, since that were needless now,
 But for their sakes who after us remain."
 
 Thus for themselves and us good speed imploring,
 Those spirits went beneath a weight like that
 We sometimes feel in dreams, all, sore beset,
 But with unequal anguish, wearied all,
 Round the first circuit, purging as they go,
 The world's gross darkness off: In our behalf
 If there vows still be offer'd, what can here
 For them be vow'd and done by such, whose wills
 Have root of goodness in them?  Well beseems
 That we should help them wash away the stains
 They carried hence, that so made pure and light,
 They may spring upward to the starry spheres.
 
 "Ah! so may mercy-temper'd justice rid
 Your burdens speedily, that ye have power
 To stretch your wing, which e'en to your desire
 Shall lift you, as ye show us on which hand
 Toward the ladder leads the shortest way.
 And if there be more passages than one,
 Instruct us of that easiest to ascend;
 For this man who comes with me, and bears yet
 The charge of fleshly raiment Adam left him,
 Despite his better will but slowly mounts."
 From whom the answer came unto these words,
 Which my guide spake, appear'd not; but 'twas said:
 
 "Along the bank to rightward come with us,
 And ye shall find a pass that mocks not toil
 Of living man to climb: and were it not
 That I am hinder'd by the rock, wherewith
 This arrogant neck is tam'd, whence needs I stoop
 My visage to the ground, him, who yet lives,
 Whose name thou speak'st not him I fain would view.
 To mark if e'er I knew himnd to crave
 His pity for the fardel that I bear.
 I was of Latiun,  of a Tuscan horn
 A mighty one: Aldobranlesco's name
 My sire's, I know not if ye e'er have heard.
 My old blood and forefathers' gallant deeds
 Made me so haughty, that I clean forgot
 The common mother, and to such excess,
 Wax'd in my scorn of all men, that I fell,
 Fell therefore; by what fate Sienna's sons,
 Each child in Campagnatico, can tell.
 I am Omberto; not me only pride
 Hath injur'd, but my kindred all involv'd
 In mischief with her.  Here my lot ordains
 Under this weight to groan, till I appease
 God's angry justice, since I did it not
 Amongst the living, here amongst the dead."
 
 List'ning I bent my visage down: and one
 (Not he who spake) twisted beneath the weight
 That urg'd him, saw me, knew me straight, and call'd,
 Holding his eyes With difficulty fix'd
 Intent upon me, stooping as I went
 Companion of their way.  "O!"  I exclaim'd,
 
 "Art thou not Oderigi, art not thou
 Agobbio's glory, glory of that art
 Which they of Paris call the limmer's skill?"
 
 "Brother!" said he, "with tints that gayer smile,
 Bolognian Franco's pencil lines the leaves.
 His all the honour now; mine borrow'd light.
 In truth I had not been thus courteous to him,
 The whilst I liv'd, through eagerness of zeal
 For that pre-eminence my heart was bent on.
 Here of such pride the forfeiture is paid.
 Nor were I even here; if, able still
 To sin, I had not turn'd me unto God.
 O powers of man! how vain your glory, nipp'd
 E'en in its height of verdure, if an age
 Less bright succeed not! imbue thought
 To lord it over painting's field; and now
 The cry is Giotto's, and his name eclips'd.
 Thus hath one Guido from the other snatch'd
 The letter'd prize: and he perhaps is born,
 Who shall drive either from their nest.  The noise
 Of worldly fame is but a blast of wind,
 That blows from divers points, and shifts its name
 Shifting the point it blows from.  Shalt thou more
 Live in the mouths of mankind, if thy flesh
 Part shrivel'd from thee, than if thou hadst died,
 Before the coral and the pap were left,
 Or ere some thousand years have passed? and that
 Is, to eternity compar'd, a space,
 Briefer than is the twinkling of an eye
 To the heaven's slowest orb.  He there who treads
 So leisurely before me, far and wide
 Through Tuscany resounded once; and now
 Is in Sienna scarce with whispers nam'd:
 There was he sov'reign, when destruction caught
 The madd'ning rage of Florence, in that day
 Proud as she now is loathsome.  Your renown
 Is as the herb, whose hue doth come and go,
 And his might withers it, by whom it sprang
 Crude from the lap of earth."  I thus to him:
 "True are thy sayings: to my heart they breathe
 The kindly spirit of meekness, and allay
 What tumours rankle there.  But who is he
 Of whom thou spak'st but now?"--"This," he replied,
 "Is Provenzano.  He is here, because
 He reach'd, with grasp presumptuous, at the sway
 Of all Sienna.  Thus he still hath gone,
 Thus goeth never-resting, since he died.
 Such is th' acquittance render'd back of him,
 Who, beyond measure, dar'd on earth."  I then:
 "If soul that to the verge of life delays
 Repentance, linger in that lower space,
 Nor hither mount, unless good prayers befriend,
 How chanc'd admittance was vouchsaf'd to him?"
 
 "When at his glory's topmost height," said he,
 "Respect of dignity all cast aside,
 Freely He fix'd him on Sienna's plain,
 A suitor to  redeem his suff'ring friend,
 Who languish'd in the prison-house of Charles,
 Nor for his sake refus'd through every vein
 To tremble.  More I will not say; and dark,
 I know, my words are, but thy neighbours soon
 Shall help thee to a comment on the text.
 This is the work, that from these limits freed him."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XII
 
 With equal pace as oxen in the yoke,
 I with that laden spirit journey'd on
 Long as the mild instructor suffer'd me;
 But when he bade me quit him, and proceed
 (For "here," said he, "behooves with sail and oars
 Each man, as best he may, push on his bark"),
 Upright, as one dispos'd for speed, I rais'd
 My body, still in thought submissive bow'd.
 
 I now my leader's track not loth pursued;
 And each had shown how light we far'd along
 When thus he warn'd me: "Bend thine eyesight down:
 For thou to ease the way shall find it good
 To ruminate the bed beneath thy feet."
 
 As in memorial of the buried, drawn
 Upon earth-level tombs, the sculptur'd form
 Of what was once, appears (at sight whereof
 Tears often stream forth by remembrance wak'd,
 Whose sacred stings the piteous only feel),
 So saw I there, but with more curious skill
 Of portraiture o'erwrought, whate'er of space
 From forth the mountain stretches.  On one part
 Him I beheld, above all creatures erst
 Created noblest, light'ning fall from heaven:
 On th' other side with bolt celestial pierc'd
 Briareus: cumb'ring earth he lay through dint
 Of mortal ice-stroke.  The Thymbraean god
 With Mars, I saw, and Pallas, round their sire,
 Arm'd still, and gazing on the giant's limbs
 Strewn o'er th' ethereal field.  Nimrod I saw:
 At foot of the stupendous work he stood,
 As if bewilder'd, looking on the crowd
 Leagued in his proud attempt on Sennaar's plain.
 
 O Niobe! in what a trance of woe
 Thee I beheld, upon that highway drawn,
 Sev'n sons on either side thee slain!  Saul!
 How ghastly didst thou look! on thine own sword
 Expiring in Gilboa, from that hour
 Ne'er visited with rain from heav'n or dew!
 
 O fond Arachne! thee I also saw
 Half spider now in anguish crawling up
 Th' unfinish'd web thou weaved'st to thy bane!
 
 O Rehoboam! here thy shape doth seem
 Louring no more defiance! but fear-smote
 With none to chase him in his chariot whirl'd.
 
 Was shown beside upon the solid floor
 How dear Alcmaeon forc'd his mother rate
 That ornament in evil hour receiv'd:
 How in the temple on Sennacherib fell
 His sons, and how a corpse they left him there.
 Was shown the scath and cruel mangling made
 By Tomyris on Cyrus, when she cried:
 "Blood thou didst thirst for, take thy fill of blood!"
 Was shown how routed in the battle fled
 Th' Assyrians, Holofernes slain, and e'en
 The relics of the carnage.  Troy I mark'd
 In ashes and in caverns.  Oh! how fall'n,
 How abject, Ilion, was thy semblance there!
 
 What master of the pencil or the style
 Had trac'd the shades and lines, that might have made
 The subtlest workman wonder?  Dead the dead,
 The living seem'd alive; with clearer view
 His eye beheld not who beheld the truth,
 Than mine what I did tread on, while I went
 Low bending.  Now swell out; and with stiff necks
 Pass on, ye sons of Eve! veil not your looks,
 Lest they descry the evil of your path!
 
 I noted not (so busied was my thought)
 How much we now had circled of the mount,
 And of his course yet more the sun had spent,
 When he, who with still wakeful caution went,
 Admonish'd: "Raise thou up thy head: for know
 Time is not now for slow suspense.  Behold
 That way an angel hasting towards us!  Lo!
 Where duly the sixth handmaid doth return
 From service on the day.  Wear thou in look
 And gesture seemly grace of reverent awe,
 That gladly he may forward us aloft.
 Consider that this day ne'er dawns again."
 
 Time's loss he had so often warn'd me 'gainst,
 I could not miss the scope at which he aim'd.
 
 The goodly shape approach'd us, snowy white
 In vesture, and with visage casting streams
 Of tremulous lustre like the matin star.
 His arms he open'd, then his wings; and spake:
 "Onward: the steps, behold! are near; and now
 Th' ascent is without difficulty gain'd."
 
 A scanty few are they, who when they hear
 Such tidings, hasten.  O ye race of men
 Though born to soar, why suffer ye a wind
 So slight to baffle ye?  He led us on
 Where the rock parted; here against my front
 Did beat his wings, then promis'd I should fare
 In safety on my way.  As to ascend
 That steep, upon whose brow the chapel stands
 (O'er Rubaconte, looking lordly down
 On the well-guided city,) up the right
 Th' impetuous rise is broken by the steps
 Carv'd in that old and simple age, when still
 The registry and label rested safe;
 Thus is th' acclivity reliev'd, which here
 Precipitous from the other circuit falls:
 But on each hand the tall cliff presses close.
 
 As ent'ring there we turn'd, voices, in strain
 Ineffable, sang: "Blessed are the poor
 In spirit."  Ah how far unlike to these
 The straits of hell; here songs to usher us,
 There shrieks of woe!  We climb the holy stairs:
 And lighter to myself by far I seem'd
 Than on the plain before, whence thus I spake:
 "Say, master, of what heavy thing have I
 Been lighten'd, that scarce aught the sense of toil
 Affects me journeying?"  He in few replied:
 "When sin's broad characters, that yet remain
 Upon thy temples, though well nigh effac'd,
 Shall be, as one is, all clean razed out,
 Then shall thy feet by heartiness of will
 Be so o'ercome, they not alone shall feel
 No sense of labour, but delight much more
 Shall wait them urg'd along their upward way."
 
 Then like to one, upon whose head is plac'd
 Somewhat he deems not of but from the becks
 Of others as they pass him by; his hand
 Lends therefore help to' assure him, searches, finds,
 And well performs such office as the eye
 Wants power to execute: so stretching forth
 The fingers of my right hand, did I find
 Six only of the letters, which his sword
 Who bare the keys had trac'd upon my brow.
 The leader, as he mark'd mine action, smil'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIII
 
 We reach'd the summit of the scale, and stood
 Upon the second buttress of that mount
 Which healeth him who climbs.  A cornice there,
 Like to the former, girdles round the hill;
 Save that its arch with sweep less ample bends.
 
 Shadow nor image there is seen; all smooth
 The rampart and the path, reflecting nought
 But the rock's sullen hue.  "If here we wait
 For some to question," said the bard, "I fear
 Our choice may haply meet too long delay."
 
 Then fixedly upon the sun his eyes
 He fastn'd, made his right the central point
 From whence to move, and turn'd the left aside.
 "O pleasant light, my confidence and hope,
 Conduct us thou," he cried, "on this new way,
 Where now I venture, leading to the bourn
 We seek.  The universal world to thee
 Owes warmth and lustre.  If no other cause
 Forbid, thy beams should ever be our guide."
 
 Far, as is measur'd for a mile on earth,
 In brief space had we journey'd; such prompt will
 Impell'd; and towards us flying, now were heard
 Spirits invisible, who courteously
 Unto love's table bade the welcome guest.
 The voice, that firstlew by, call'd forth aloud,
 "They have no wine;" so on behind us past,
 Those sounds reiterating, nor yet lost
 In the faint distance, when another came
 Crying, "I am Orestes," and alike
 Wing'd its fleet way.  "Oh father!"  I exclaim'd,
 "What tongues are these?"  and as I question'd, lo!
 A third exclaiming, "Love ye those have wrong'd you."
 
 "This circuit," said my teacher, "knots the scourge
 For envy, and the cords are therefore drawn
 By charity's correcting hand.  The curb
 Is of a harsher sound, as thou shalt hear
 (If I deem rightly), ere thou reach the pass,
 Where pardon sets them free.  But fix thine eyes
 Intently through the air, and thou shalt see
 A multitude before thee seated, each
 Along the shelving grot."  Then more than erst
 I op'd my eyes, before me view'd, and saw
 Shadows with garments dark as was the rock;
 And when we pass'd a little forth, I heard
 A crying, "Blessed Mary! pray for us,
 Michael and Peter! all ye saintly host!"
 
 I do not think there walks on earth this day
 Man so remorseless, that he hath not yearn'd
 With pity at the sight that next I saw.
 Mine eyes a load of sorrow teemed, when now
 I stood so near them, that their semblances
 Came clearly to my view.  Of sackcloth vile
 Their cov'ring seem'd; and on his shoulder one
 Did stay another, leaning, and all lean'd
 Against the cliff.  E'en thus the blind and poor,
 Near the confessionals, to crave an alms,
 Stand, each his head upon his fellow's sunk,
 
 So most to stir compassion, not by sound
 Of words alone, but that, which moves not less,
 The sight of mis'ry.  And as never beam
 Of noonday visiteth the eyeless man,
 E'en so was heav'n a niggard unto these
 Of his fair light; for, through the orbs of all,
 A thread of wire, impiercing, knits them up,
 As for the taming of a haggard hawk.
 
 It were a wrong, methought, to pass and look
 On others, yet myself the while unseen.
 To my sage counsel therefore did I turn.
 He knew the meaning of the mute appeal,
 Nor waited for my questioning, but said:
 "Speak; and be brief, be subtle in thy words."
 
 On that part of the cornice, whence no rim
 Engarlands its steep fall, did Virgil come;
 On the' other side me were the spirits, their cheeks
 Bathing devout with penitential tears,
 That through the dread impalement forc'd a way.
 
 I turn'd me to them, and "O shades!" said I,
 
 "Assur'd that to your eyes unveil'd shall shine
 The lofty light, sole object of your wish,
 So may heaven's grace clear whatsoe'er of foam
 Floats turbid on the conscience, that thenceforth
 The stream of mind roll limpid from its source,
 As ye declare (for so shall ye impart
 A boon I dearly prize) if any soul
 Of Latium dwell among ye; and perchance
 That soul may profit, if I learn so much."
 
 "My brother, we are each one citizens
 Of one true city.  Any thou wouldst say,
 Who lived a stranger in Italia's land."
 
 So heard I answering, as appeal'd, a voice
 That onward came some space from whence I stood.
 
 A spirit I noted, in whose look was mark'd
 Expectance.  Ask ye how?  The chin was rais'd
 As in one reft of sight.  "Spirit," said I,
 "Who for thy rise are tutoring (if thou be
 That which didst answer to me,) or by place
 Or name, disclose thyself, that I may know thee."
 
 "I was," it answer'd, "of Sienna: here
 I cleanse away with these the evil life,
 Soliciting with tears that He, who is,
 Vouchsafe him to us.  Though Sapia nam'd
 In sapience I excell'd not, gladder far
 Of others' hurt, than of the good befell me.
 That thou mayst own I now deceive thee not,
 Hear, if my folly were not as I speak it.
 When now my years slop'd waning down the arch,
 It so bechanc'd, my fellow citizens
 Near Colle met their enemies in the field,
 And I pray'd God to grant what He had will'd.
 There were they vanquish'd, and betook themselves
 Unto the bitter passages of flight.
 I mark'd the hunt, and waxing out of bounds
 In gladness, lifted up my shameless brow,
 And like the merlin cheated by a gleam,
 Cried, "It is over.  Heav'n! fear thee not."
 Upon my verge of life I wish'd for peace
 With God; nor repentance had supplied
 What I did lack of duty, were it not
 The hermit Piero, touch'd with charity,
 In his devout orisons thought on me.
 "But who art thou that question'st of our state,
 Who go'st to my belief, with lids unclos'd,
 And breathest in thy talk?"--"Mine eyes," said I,
 "May yet be here ta'en from me; but not long;
 For they have not offended grievously
 With envious glances.  But the woe beneath
 Urges my soul with more exceeding dread.
 That nether load already weighs me down."
 
 She thus: "Who then amongst us here aloft
 Hath brought thee, if thou weenest to return?"
 
 "He," answer'd I, "who standeth mute beside me.
 I live: of me ask therefore, chosen spirit,
 If thou desire I yonder yet should move
 For thee my mortal feet."--"Oh!" she replied,
 "This is so strange a thing, it is great sign
 That God doth love thee.  Therefore with thy prayer
 Sometime assist me: and by that I crave,
 Which most thou covetest, that if thy feet
 E'er tread on Tuscan soil, thou save my fame
 Amongst my kindred.  Them shalt thou behold
 With that vain multitude, who set their hope
 On Telamone's haven, there to fail
 Confounded, more shall when the fancied stream
 They sought of Dian call'd: but they who lead
 Their navies, more than ruin'd hopes shall mourn."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIV
 
 "Say who is he around our mountain winds,
 Or ever death has prun'd his wing for flight,
 That opes his eyes and covers them at will?"
 
 "I know not who he is, but know thus much
 He comes not singly.  Do thou ask of him,
 For thou art nearer to him, and take heed
 Accost him gently, so that he may speak."
 
 Thus on the right two Spirits bending each
 Toward the other, talk'd of me, then both
 Addressing me, their faces backward lean'd,
 And thus the one began: "O soul, who yet
 Pent in the body, tendest towards the sky!
 For charity, we pray thee' comfort us,
 Recounting whence thou com'st, and who thou art:
 For thou dost make us at the favour shown thee
 Marvel, as at a thing that ne'er hath been."
 
 "There stretches through the midst of Tuscany,"
 I straight began: "a brooklet, whose well-head
 Springs up in Falterona, with his race
 Not satisfied, when he some hundred miles
 Hath measur'd.  From his banks bring, I this frame.
 To tell you who I am were words misspent:
 For yet my name scarce sounds on rumour's lip."
 
 "If well I do incorp'rate with my thought
 The meaning of thy speech," said he, who first
 Addrest me, "thou dost speak of Arno's wave."
 
 To whom the other: "Why hath he conceal'd
 The title of that river, as a man
 Doth of some horrible thing?"  The spirit, who
 Thereof was question'd, did acquit him thus:
 "I know not: but 'tis fitting well the name
 Should perish of that vale; for from the source
 Where teems so plenteously the Alpine steep
 Maim'd of Pelorus, (that doth scarcely pass
 Beyond that limit,) even to the point
 Whereunto ocean is restor'd, what heaven
 Drains from th' exhaustless store for all earth's streams,
 Throughout the space is virtue worried down,
 As 'twere a snake, by all, for mortal foe,
 Or through disastrous influence on the place,
 Or else distortion of misguided wills,
 That custom goads to evil: whence in those,
 The dwellers in that miserable vale,
 Nature is so transform'd, it seems as they
 Had shar'd of Circe's feeding.  'Midst brute swine,
 Worthier of acorns than of other food
 Created for man's use, he shapeth first
 His obscure way; then, sloping onward, finds
 Curs, snarlers more in spite than power, from whom
 He turns with scorn aside: still journeying down,
 By how much more the curst and luckless foss
 Swells out to largeness, e'en so much it finds
 Dogs turning into wolves.  Descending still
 Through yet more hollow eddies, next he meets
 A race of foxes, so replete with craft,
 They do not fear that skill can master it.
 Nor will I cease because my words are heard
 By other ears than thine.  It shall be well
 For this man, if he keep in memory
 What from no erring Spirit I reveal.
 Lo! behold thy grandson, that becomes
 A hunter of those wolves, upon the shore
 Of the fierce stream, and cows them all with dread:
 Their flesh yet living sets he up to sale,
 Then like an aged beast to slaughter dooms.
 Many of life he reaves, himself of worth
 And goodly estimation.  Smear'd with gore
 Mark how he issues from the rueful wood,
 Leaving such havoc, that in thousand years
 It spreads not to prime lustihood again."
 
 As one, who tidings hears of woe to come,
 Changes his looks perturb'd, from whate'er part
 The peril grasp him, so beheld I change
 That spirit, who had turn'd to listen, struck
 With sadness, soon as he had caught the word.
 
 His visage and the other's speech did raise
 Desire in me to know the names of both,
 whereof with meek entreaty I inquir'd.
 
 The shade, who late addrest me, thus resum'd:
 "Thy wish imports that I vouchsafe to do
 For thy sake what thou wilt not do for mine.
 But since God's will is that so largely shine
 His grace in thee, I will be liberal too.
 Guido of Duca know then that I am.
 Envy so parch'd my blood, that had I seen
 A fellow man made joyous, thou hadst mark'd
 A livid paleness overspread my cheek.
 Such harvest reap I of the seed I sow'd.
 O man, why place thy heart where there doth need
 Exclusion of participants in good?
 This is Rinieri's spirit, this the boast
 And honour of the house of Calboli,
 Where of his worth no heritage remains.
 Nor his the only blood, that hath been stript
 ('twixt Po, the mount, the Reno, and the shore,)
 Of all that truth or fancy asks for bliss;
 But in those limits such a growth has sprung
 Of rank and venom'd roots, as long would mock
 Slow culture's toil.  Where is good Liziohere
 Manardi, Traversalo, and Carpigna?
 O bastard slips of old Romagna's line!
 When in Bologna the low artisan,
 And in Faenza yon Bernardin sprouts,
 A gentle cyon from ignoble stem.
 Wonder not, Tuscan, if thou see me weep,
 When I recall to mind those once lov'd names,
 Guido of Prata, and of Azzo him
 That dwelt with you; Tignoso and his troop,
 With Traversaro's house and Anastagio's,
 (Each race disherited) and beside these,
 The ladies and the knights, the toils and ease,
 That witch'd us into love and courtesy;
 Where now such malice reigns in recreant hearts.
 O Brettinoro! wherefore tarriest still,
 Since forth of thee thy family hath gone,
 And many, hating evil, join'd their steps?
 Well doeth he, that bids his lineage cease,
 Bagnacavallo; Castracaro ill,
 And Conio worse, who care to propagate
 A race of Counties from such blood as theirs.
 Well shall ye also do, Pagani, then
 When from amongst you tries your demon child.
 Not so, howe'er, that henceforth there remain
 True proof of what ye were.  O Hugolin!
 Thou sprung of Fantolini's line! thy name
 Is safe, since none is look'd for after thee
 To cloud its lustre, warping from thy stock.
 But, Tuscan, go thy ways; for now I take
 Far more delight in weeping than in words.
 Such pity for your sakes hath wrung my heart."
 
 We knew those gentle spirits at parting heard
 Our steps.  Their silence therefore of our way
 Assur'd us.  Soon as we had quitted them,
 Advancing onward, lo! a voice that seem'd
 Like vollied light'ning, when it rives the air,
 Met us, and shouted, "Whosoever finds
 Will slay me," then fled from us, as the bolt
 Lanc'd sudden from a downward-rushing cloud.
 When it had giv'n short truce unto our hearing,
 Behold the other with a crash as loud
 As the quick-following thunder: "Mark in me
 Aglauros turn'd to rock."  I at the sound
 Retreating drew more closely to my guide.
 
 Now in mute stillness rested all the air:
 And thus he spake: "There was the galling bit.
 But your old enemy so baits his hook,
 He drags you eager to him.  Hence nor curb
 Avails you, nor reclaiming call.  Heav'n calls
 And round about you wheeling courts your gaze
 With everlasting beauties.  Yet your eye
 Turns with fond doting still upon the earth.
 Therefore He smites you who discerneth all."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XV
 
 As much as 'twixt the third hour's close and dawn,
 Appeareth of heav'n's sphere, that ever whirls
 As restless as an infant in his play,
 So much appear'd remaining to the sun
 Of his slope journey towards the western goal.
 
 Evening was there, and here the noon of night;
 and full upon our forehead smote the beams.
 For  round the mountain, circling, so our path
 Had led us, that toward the sun-set now
 Direct we journey'd: when I felt a weight
 Of more exceeding splendour, than before,
 Press on my front.  The cause unknown, amaze
 Possess'd me, and both hands against my brow
 Lifting, I interpos'd them, as a screen,
 That of its gorgeous superflux of light
 Clipp'd the diminish'd orb. As when the ray,
 Striking On water or the surface clear
 Of mirror, leaps unto the opposite part,
 Ascending at a glance, e'en as it fell,
 (And so much differs from the stone, that falls
 Through equal space, as practice skill hath shown);
 Thus with refracted light before me seemed
 The ground there smitten; whence in sudden haste
 My sight recoil'd.  "What is this, sire belov'd!
 'Gainst which I strive to shield the sight in vain?"
 Cried I, "and which towards us moving seems?"
 
 "Marvel not, if the family of heav'n,"
 He answer'd, "yet with dazzling radiance dim
 Thy sense it is a messenger who comes,
 Inviting man's ascent.  Such sights ere long,
 Not grievous, shall impart to thee delight,
 As thy perception is by nature wrought
 Up to their pitch."  The blessed angel, soon
 As we had reach'd him, hail'd us with glad voice:
 "Here enter on a ladder far less steep
 Than ye have yet encounter'd."  We forthwith
 Ascending, heard behind us chanted sweet,
 "Blessed the merciful," and "happy thou!
 That conquer'st."  Lonely each, my guide and I
 Pursued our upward way; and as we went,
 Some profit from his words I hop'd to win,
 And thus of him inquiring, fram'd my speech:
 
 "What meant Romagna's spirit, when he spake
 Of bliss exclusive with no partner shar'd?"
 
 He straight replied: "No wonder, since he knows,
 What sorrow waits on his own worst defect,
 If he chide others, that they less may mourn.
 Because ye point your wishes at a mark,
 Where, by communion of possessors, part
 Is lessen'd, envy bloweth up the sighs of men.
 No fear of that might touch ye, if the love
 Of higher sphere exalted your desire.
 For there, by how much more they call it ours,
 So much propriety of each in good
 Increases more, and heighten'd charity
 Wraps that fair cloister in a brighter flame."
 
 "Now lack I satisfaction more," said I,
 "Than if thou hadst been silent at the first,
 And doubt more gathers on my lab'ring thought.
 How can it chance, that good distributed,
 The many, that possess it, makes more rich,
 Than if 't were shar'd by few?"  He answering thus:
 "Thy mind, reverting still to things of earth,
 Strikes darkness from true light.  The highest good
 Unlimited, ineffable, doth so speed
 To love, as beam to lucid body darts,
 Giving as much of ardour as it finds.
 The sempiternal effluence streams abroad
 Spreading, wherever charity extends.
 So that the more aspirants to that bliss
 Are multiplied, more good is there to love,
 And more is lov'd; as mirrors, that reflect,
 Each unto other, propagated light.
 If these my words avail not to allay
 Thy thirsting, Beatrice thou shalt see,
 Who of this want, and of all else thou hast,
 Shall rid thee to the full.  Provide but thou
 That from thy temples may be soon eras'd,
 E'en as the two already, those five scars,
 That when they pain thee worst, then kindliest heal,"
 
 "Thou," I had said, "content'st me," when I saw
 The other round was gain'd, and wond'ring eyes
 Did keep me mute.  There suddenly I seem'd
 By an ecstatic vision wrapt away;
 And in a temple saw, methought, a crowd
 Of many persons; and at th' entrance stood
 A dame, whose sweet demeanour did express
 A mother's love, who said, "Child! why hast thou
 Dealt with us thus?  Behold thy sire and I
 Sorrowing have sought thee;" and so held her peace,
 And straight the vision fled.  A female next
 Appear'd before me, down whose visage cours'd
 Those waters, that grief forces out from one
 By deep resentment stung, who seem'd to say:
 "If thou, Pisistratus, be lord indeed
 Over this city, nam'd with such debate
 Of adverse gods, and whence each science sparkles,
 Avenge thee of those arms, whose bold embrace
 Hath clasp'd our daughter; "and to fuel, meseem'd,
 Benign and meek, with visage undisturb'd,
 Her sovran spake: "How shall we those requite,
 Who wish us evil, if we thus condemn
 The man that loves us?"  After that I saw
 A multitude, in fury burning, slay
 With stones a stripling youth, and shout amain
 "Destroy, destroy:" and him I saw, who bow'd
 Heavy with death unto the ground, yet made
 His eyes, unfolded upward, gates to heav'n,
 
 Praying forgiveness of th' Almighty Sire,
 Amidst that cruel conflict, on his foes,
 With looks, that With compassion to their aim.
 
 Soon as my spirit, from her airy flight
 Returning, sought again the things, whose truth
 Depends not on her shaping, I observ'd
 How she had rov'd to no unreal scenes
 
 Meanwhile the leader, who might see I mov'd,
 As one, who struggles to shake off his sleep,
 Exclaim'd: "What ails thee, that thou canst not hold
 Thy footing firm, but more than half a league
 Hast travel'd with clos'd eyes and tott'ring gait,
 Like to a man by wine or sleep o'ercharg'd?"
 
 "Beloved father! so thou deign," said I,
 "To listen, I will tell thee what appear'd
 Before me, when so fail'd my sinking steps."
 
 He thus: "Not if thy Countenance were mask'd
 With hundred vizards, could a thought of thine
 How small soe'er, elude me.  What thou saw'st
 Was shown, that freely thou mightst ope thy heart
 To the waters of peace, that flow diffus'd
 From their eternal fountain.  I not ask'd,
 What ails theeor such cause as he doth, who
 Looks only with that eye which sees no more,
 When spiritless the body lies; but ask'd,
 To give fresh vigour to thy foot.  Such goads
 The slow and loit'ring need; that they be found
 Not wanting, when their hour of watch returns."
 
 So on we journey'd through the evening sky
 Gazing intent, far onward, as our eyes
 With level view could stretch against the bright
 Vespertine ray: and lo! by slow degrees
 Gath'ring, a fog made tow'rds us, dark as night.
 There was no room for 'scaping; and that mist
 Bereft us, both of sight and the pure air.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVI
 
 Hell's dunnest gloom, or night unlustrous, dark,
 Of every planes 'reft, and pall'd in clouds,
 Did never spread before the sight a veil
 In thickness like that fog, nor to the sense
 So palpable and gross.  Ent'ring its shade,
 Mine eye endured not with unclosed lids;
 Which marking, near me drew the faithful guide,
 Offering me his shoulder for a stay.
 
 As the blind man behind his leader walks,
 Lest he should err, or stumble unawares
 On what might harm him, or perhaps destroy,
 I journey'd through that bitter air and foul,
 Still list'ning to my escort's warning voice,
 "Look that from me thou part not."  Straight I heard
 Voices, and each one seem'd to pray for peace,
 And for compassion, to the Lamb of God
 That taketh sins away.  Their prelude still
 Was "Agnus Dei," and through all the choir,
 One voice, one measure ran, that perfect seem'd
 The concord of their song.  "Are these I hear
 Spirits, O master?"  I exclaim'd; and he:
 "Thou aim'st aright: these loose the bonds of wrath."
 
 "Now who art thou, that through our smoke dost cleave?
 And speak'st of us, as thou thyself e'en yet
 Dividest time by calends?"  So one voice
 Bespake me; whence my master said: "Reply;
 And ask, if upward hence the passage lead."
 
 "O being! who dost make thee pure, to stand
 Beautiful once more in thy Maker's sight!
 Along with me: and thou shalt hear and wonder."
 Thus I, whereto the spirit answering spake:
 
 "Long as 't is lawful for me, shall my steps
 Follow on thine; and since the cloudy smoke
 Forbids the seeing, hearing in its stead
 Shall keep us join'd."  I then forthwith began
 "Yet in my mortal swathing, I ascend
 To higher regions, and am hither come
 Through the fearful agony of hell.
 And, if so largely God hath doled his grace,
 That, clean beside all modern precedent,
 He wills me to behold his kingly state,
 From me conceal not who thou wast, ere death
 Had loos'd thee; but instruct me: and instruct
 If rightly to the pass I tend; thy words
 The way directing as a safe escort."
 
 "I was of Lombardy, and Marco call'd:
 Not inexperienc'd of the world, that worth
 I still affected, from which all have turn'd
 The nerveless bow aside.  Thy course tends right
 Unto the summit:" and, replying thus,
 He added, "I beseech thee pray for me,
 When thou shalt come aloft."  And I to him:
 "Accept my faith for pledge I will perform
 What thou requirest.  Yet one doubt remains,
 That wrings me sorely, if I solve it not,
 Singly before it urg'd me, doubled now
 By thine opinion, when I couple that
 With one elsewhere declar'd, each strength'ning other.
 The world indeed is even so forlorn
 Of all good as thou speak'st it and so swarms
 With every evil.  Yet, beseech thee, point
 The cause out to me, that myself may see,
 And unto others show it: for in heaven
 One places it, and one on earth below."
 
 Then heaving forth a deep and audible sigh,
 "Brother!" he thus began, "the world is blind;
 And thou in truth com'st from it.  Ye, who live,
 Do so each cause refer to heav'n above,
 E'en as its motion of necessity
 Drew with it all that moves.  If this were so,
 Free choice in you were none; nor justice would
 There should be joy for virtue, woe for ill.
 Your movements have their primal bent from heaven;
 Not all; yet said I all; what then ensues?
 Light have ye still to follow evil or good,
 And of the will free power, which, if it stand
 Firm and unwearied in Heav'n's first assay,
 Conquers at last, so it be cherish'd well,
 Triumphant over all.  To mightier force,
 To better nature subject, ye abide
 Free, not constrain'd by that, which forms in you
 The reasoning mind uninfluenc'd of the stars.
 If then the present race of mankind err,
 Seek in yourselves the cause, and find it there.
 Herein thou shalt confess me no false spy.
 
 "Forth from his plastic hand, who charm'd beholds
 Her image ere she yet exist, the soul
 Comes like a babe, that wantons sportively
 Weeping and laughing in its wayward moods,
 As artless and as ignorant of aught,
 Save that her Maker being one who dwells
 With gladness ever, willingly she turns
 To whate'er yields her joy.  Of some slight good
 The flavour soon she tastes; and, snar'd by that,
 With fondness she pursues it, if no guide
 Recall, no rein direct her wand'ring course.
 Hence it behov'd, the law should be a curb;
 A sovereign hence behov'd, whose piercing view
 Might mark at least the fortress and main tower
 Of the true city.  Laws indeed there are:
 But who is he observes them?  None; not he,
 Who goes before, the shepherd of the flock,
 Who chews the cud but doth not cleave the hoof.
 Therefore the multitude, who see their guide
 Strike at the very good they covet most,
 Feed there and look no further.  Thus the cause
 Is not corrupted nature in yourselves,
 But ill-conducting, that hath turn'd the world
 To evil.  Rome, that turn'd it unto good,
 Was wont to boast two suns, whose several beams
 Cast light on either way, the world's and God's.
 One since hath quench'd the other; and the sword
 Is grafted on the crook; and so conjoin'd
 Each must perforce decline to worse, unaw'd
 By fear of other.  If thou doubt me, mark
 The blade: each herb is judg'd of by its seed.
 That land, through which Adice and the Po
 Their waters roll, was once the residence
 Of courtesy and velour, ere the day,
 That frown'd on Frederick; now secure may pass
 Those limits, whosoe'er hath left, for shame,
 To talk with good men, or come near their haunts.
 Three aged ones are still found there, in whom
 The old time chides the new: these deem it long
 Ere God restore them to a better world:
 The good Gherardo, of Palazzo he
 Conrad, and Guido of Castello, nam'd
 In Gallic phrase more fitly the plain Lombard.
 On this at last conclude.  The church of Rome,
 Mixing two governments that ill assort,
 Hath miss'd her footing, fall'n into the mire,
 And there herself and burden much defil'd."
 
 "O Marco!" I replied, shine arguments
 Convince me: and the cause I now discern
 Why of the heritage no portion came
 To Levi's offspring.  But resolve me this
 Who that Gherardo is, that as thou sayst
 Is left a sample of the perish'd race,
 And for rebuke to this untoward age?"
 
 "Either thy words," said he, "deceive; or else
 Are meant to try me; that thou, speaking Tuscan,
 Appear'st not to have heard of good Gherado;
 The sole addition that, by which I know him;
 Unless I borrow'd from his daughter Gaia
 Another name to grace him.  God be with you.
 I bear you company no more.  Behold
 The dawn with white ray glimm'ring through the mist.
 I must away--the angel comes--ere he
 Appear."  He said, and would not hear me more.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVII
 
 Call to remembrance, reader, if thou e'er
 Hast, on a mountain top, been ta'en by cloud,
 Through which thou saw'st no better, than the mole
 Doth through opacous membrane; then, whene'er
 The wat'ry vapours dense began to melt
 Into thin air, how faintly the sun's sphere
 Seem'd wading through them; so thy nimble thought
 May image, how at first I re-beheld
 The sun, that bedward now his couch o'erhung.
 
 Thus with my leader's feet still equaling pace
 From forth that cloud I came, when now expir'd
 The parting beams from off the nether shores.
 
 O quick and forgetive power! that sometimes dost
 So rob us of ourselves, we take no mark
 Though round about us thousand trumpets clang!
 What moves thee, if the senses stir not?  Light
 Kindled in heav'n, spontaneous, self-inform'd,
 Or likelier gliding down with swift illapse
 By will divine.  Portray'd before me came
 The traces of her dire impiety,
 Whose form was chang'd into the bird, that most
 Delights itself in song: and here my mind
 Was inwardly so wrapt, it gave no place
 To aught that ask'd admittance from without.
 
 Next shower'd into my fantasy a shape
 As of one crucified, whose visage spake
 Fell rancour, malice deep, wherein he died;
 And round him Ahasuerus the great king,
 Esther his bride, and Mordecai the just,
 Blameless in word and deed.  As of itself
 That unsubstantial coinage of the brain
 Burst, like a bubble, Which the water fails
 That fed it; in my vision straight uprose
 A damsel weeping loud, and cried, "O queen!
 O mother! wherefore has intemperate ire
 Driv'n thee to loath thy being?  Not to lose
 Lavinia, desp'rate thou hast slain thyself.
 Now hast thou lost me.  I am she, whose tears
 Mourn, ere I fall, a mother's timeless end."
 
 E'en as a sleep breaks off, if suddenly
 New radiance strike upon the closed lids,
 The broken slumber quivering ere it dies;
 Thus from before me sunk that imagery
 Vanishing, soon as on my face there struck
 The light, outshining far our earthly beam.
 As round I turn'd me to survey what place
 I had arriv'd at, "Here ye mount," exclaim'd
 A voice, that other purpose left me none,
 Save will so eager to behold who spake,
 I could not choose but gaze.  As 'fore the sun,
 That weighs our vision down, and veils his form
 In light transcendent, thus my virtue fail'd
 Unequal.  "This is Spirit from above,
 Who marshals us our upward way, unsought;
 And in his own light shrouds him.  As a man
 Doth for himself, so now is done for us.
 For whoso waits imploring, yet sees need
 Of his prompt aidance, sets himself prepar'd
 For blunt denial, ere the suit be made.
 Refuse we not to lend a ready foot
 At such inviting: haste we to ascend,
 Before it darken: for we may not then,
 Till morn again return."  So spake my guide;
 And to one ladder both address'd our steps;
 And the first stair approaching, I perceiv'd
 Near me as 'twere the waving of a wing,
 That fann'd my face and whisper'd: "Blessed they
 The peacemakers: they know not evil wrath."
 
 Now to such height above our heads were rais'd
 The last beams, follow'd close by hooded night,
 That many a star on all sides through the gloom
 Shone out.  "Why partest from me, O my strength?"
 So with myself I commun'd; for I felt
 My o'ertoil'd sinews slacken.  We had reach'd
 The summit, and were fix'd like to a bark
 Arriv'd at land.  And waiting a short space,
 If aught should meet mine ear in that new round,
 Then to my guide I turn'd, and said: "Lov'd sire!
 Declare what guilt is on this circle purg'd.
 If our feet rest, no need thy speech should pause."
 
 He thus to me: "The love of good, whate'er
 Wanted of just proportion, here fulfils.
 Here plies afresh the oar, that loiter'd ill.
 But that thou mayst yet clearlier understand,
 Give ear unto my words, and thou shalt cull
 Some fruit may please thee well, from this delay.
 
 "Creator, nor created being, ne'er,
 My son," he thus began, "was without love,
 Or natural, or the free spirit's growth.
 Thou hast not that to learn.  The natural still
 Is without error; but the other swerves,
 If on ill object bent, or through excess
 Of vigour, or defect.  While e'er it seeks
 The primal blessings, or with measure due
 Th' inferior, no delight, that flows from it,
 Partakes of ill.  But let it warp to evil,
 Or with more ardour than behooves, or less.
 Pursue the good, the thing created then
 Works 'gainst its Maker.  Hence thou must infer
 That love is germin of each virtue in ye,
 And of each act no less, that merits pain.
 Now since it may not be, but love intend
 The welfare mainly of the thing it loves,
 All from self-hatred are secure; and since
 No being can be thought t' exist apart
 And independent of the first, a bar
 Of equal force restrains from hating that.
 
 "Grant the distinction just; and it remains
 The' evil must be another's, which is lov'd.
 Three ways such love is gender'd in your clay.
 There is who hopes (his neighbour's worth deprest,)
 Preeminence himself, and coverts hence
 For his own greatness that another fall.
 There is who so much fears the loss of power,
 Fame, favour, glory (should his fellow mount
 Above him), and so sickens at the thought,
 He loves their opposite: and there is he,
 Whom wrong or insult seems to gall and shame
 That he doth thirst for vengeance, and such needs
 Must doat on other's evil.  Here beneath
 This threefold love is mourn'd.  Of th' other sort
 Be now instructed, that which follows good
 But with disorder'd and irregular course.
 
 "All indistinctly apprehend a bliss
 On which the soul may rest, the hearts of all
 Yearn after it, and to that wished bourn
 All therefore strive to tend.  If ye behold
 Or seek it with a love remiss and lax,
 This cornice after just repenting lays
 Its penal torment on ye.  Other good
 There is, where man finds not his happiness:
 It is not true fruition, not that blest
 Essence, of every good the branch and root.
 The love too lavishly bestow'd on this,
 Along three circles over us, is mourn'd.
 Account of that division tripartite
 Expect not, fitter for thine own research."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVIII
 
 The teacher ended, and his high discourse
 Concluding, earnest in my looks inquir'd
 If I appear'd content; and I, whom still
 Unsated thirst to hear him urg'd, was mute,
 Mute outwardly, yet inwardly I said:
 "Perchance my too much questioning offends"
 But he, true father, mark'd the secret wish
 By diffidence restrain'd, and speaking, gave
 Me boldness thus to speak: 'Master, my Sight
 Gathers so lively virtue from thy beams,
 That all, thy words convey, distinct is seen.
 Wherefore I pray thee, father, whom this heart
 Holds dearest! thou wouldst deign by proof t' unfold
 That love, from which as from their source thou bring'st
 All good deeds and their opposite.'"  He then:
 "To what I now disclose be thy clear ken
 Directed, and thou plainly shalt behold
 How much those blind have err'd, who make themselves
 The guides of men.  The soul, created apt
 To love, moves versatile which way soe'er
 Aught pleasing prompts her, soon as she is wak'd
 By pleasure into act.  Of substance true
 Your apprehension forms its counterfeit,
 And in you the ideal shape presenting
 Attracts the soul's regard.  If she, thus drawn,
 incline toward it, love is that inclining,
 And a new nature knit by pleasure in ye.
 Then as the fire points up, and mounting seeks
 His birth-place and his lasting seat, e'en thus
 Enters the captive soul into desire,
 Which is a spiritual motion, that ne'er rests
 Before enjoyment of the thing it loves.
 Enough to show thee, how the truth from those
 Is hidden, who aver all love a thing
 Praise-worthy in itself: although perhaps
 Its substance seem still good.  Yet if the wax
 Be good, it follows not th' impression must."
 "What love is," I return'd, "thy words, O guide!
 And my own docile mind, reveal.  Yet thence
 New doubts have sprung.  For from without if love
 Be offer'd to us, and the spirit knows
 No other footing, tend she right or wrong,
 Is no desert of hers."  He answering thus:
 "What reason here discovers I have power
 To show thee: that which lies beyond, expect
 From Beatrice, faith not reason's task.
 Spirit, substantial form, with matter join'd
 Not in confusion mix'd, hath in itself
 Specific virtue of that union born,
 Which is not felt except it work, nor prov'd
 But through effect, as vegetable life
 By the green leaf.  From whence his intellect
 Deduced its primal notices of things,
 Man therefore knows not, or his appetites
 Their first affections; such in you, as zeal
 In bees to gather honey; at the first,
 Volition, meriting nor blame nor praise.
 But o'er each lower faculty supreme,
 That as she list are summon'd to her bar,
 Ye have that virtue in you, whose just voice
 Uttereth counsel, and whose word should keep
 The threshold of assent.  Here is the source,
 Whence cause of merit in you is deriv'd,
 E'en as the affections good or ill she takes,
 Or severs, winnow'd as the chaff.  Those men
 Who reas'ning went to depth profoundest, mark'd
 That innate freedom, and were thence induc'd
 To leave their moral teaching to the world.
 Grant then, that from necessity arise
 All love that glows within you; to dismiss
 Or harbour it, the pow'r is in yourselves.
 Remember, Beatrice, in her style,
 Denominates free choice by eminence
 The noble virtue, if in talk with thee
 She touch upon that theme."  The moon, well nigh
 To midnight hour belated, made the stars
 Appear to wink and fade; and her broad disk
 Seem'd like a crag on fire, as up the vault
 That course she journey'd, which the sun then warms,
 When they of Rome behold him at his set.
 Betwixt Sardinia and the Corsic isle.
 And now the weight, that hung upon my thought,
 Was lighten'd by the aid of that clear spirit,
 Who raiseth Andes above Mantua's name.
 I therefore, when my questions had obtain'd
 Solution plain and ample, stood as one
 Musing in dreary slumber; but not long
 Slumber'd; for suddenly a multitude,
 
 The steep already turning, from behind,
 Rush'd on.  With fury and like random rout,
 As echoing on their shores at midnight heard
 Ismenus and Asopus, for his Thebes
 If Bacchus' help were needed; so came these
 Tumultuous, curving each his rapid step,
 By eagerness impell'd of holy love.
 
 Soon they o'ertook us; with such swiftness mov'd
 The mighty crowd.  Two spirits at their head
 Cried weeping; "Blessed Mary sought with haste
 The hilly region.  Caesar to subdue
 Ilerda, darted in Marseilles his sting,
 And flew to Spain."--"Oh tarry not: away;"
 The others shouted; "let not time be lost
 Through slackness of affection.  Hearty zeal
 To serve reanimates celestial grace."
 
 "O ye, in whom intenser fervency
 Haply supplies, where lukewarm erst ye fail'd,
 Slow or neglectful, to absolve your part
 Of good and virtuous, this man, who yet lives,
 (Credit my tale, though strange) desires t' ascend,
 So morning rise to light us.  Therefore say
 Which hand leads nearest to the rifted rock?"
 
 So spake my guide, to whom a shade return'd:
 "Come after us, and thou shalt find the cleft.
 We may not linger: such resistless will
 Speeds our unwearied course.  Vouchsafe us then
 Thy pardon, if our duty seem to thee
 Discourteous rudeness.  In Verona I
 Was abbot of San Zeno, when the hand
 Of Barbarossa grasp'd Imperial sway,
 That name, ne'er utter'd without tears in Milan.
 And there is he, hath one foot in his grave,
 Who for that monastery ere long shall weep,
 Ruing his power misus'd: for that his son,
 Of body ill compact, and worse in mind,
 And born in evil, he hath set in place
 Of its true pastor."  Whether more he spake,
 Or here was mute, I know not: he had sped
 E'en now so far beyond us.  Yet thus much
 I heard, and in rememb'rance treasur'd it.
 
 He then, who never fail'd me at my need,
 Cried, "Hither turn.  Lo! two with sharp remorse
 Chiding their sin!"  In rear of all the troop
 These shouted: "First they died, to whom the sea
 Open'd, or ever Jordan saw his heirs:
 And they, who with Aeneas to the end
 Endur'd not suffering, for their portion chose
 Life without glory."  Soon as they had fled
 Past reach of sight, new thought within me rose
 By others follow'd fast, and each unlike
 Its fellow: till led on from thought to thought,
 And pleasur'd with the fleeting train, mine eye
 Was clos'd, and meditation chang'd to dream.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIX
 
 It was the hour, when of diurnal heat
 No reliques chafe the cold beams of the moon,
 O'erpower'd by earth, or planetary sway
 Of Saturn; and the geomancer sees
 His Greater Fortune up the east ascend,
 Where gray dawn checkers first the shadowy cone;
 When 'fore me in my dream a woman's shape
 There came, with lips that stammer'd, eyes aslant,
 Distorted feet, hands maim'd, and colour pale.
 
 I look'd upon her; and as sunshine cheers
 Limbs numb'd by nightly cold, e'en thus my look
 Unloos'd her tongue, next in brief space her form
 Decrepit rais'd erect, and faded face
 With love's own hue illum'd. Recov'ring speech
 She forthwith warbling such a strain began,
 That I, how loth soe'er, could scarce have held
 Attention from the song.  "I," thus she sang,
 "I am the Siren, she, whom mariners
 On the wide sea are wilder'd when they hear:
 Such fulness of delight the list'ner feels.
 I from his course Ulysses by my lay
 Enchanted drew.  Whoe'er frequents me once
 Parts seldom; so I charm him, and his heart
 Contented knows no void."  Or ere her mouth
 Was clos'd, to shame her at her side appear'd
 A dame of semblance holy.  With stern voice
 She utter'd; "Say, O Virgil, who is this?"
 Which hearing, he approach'd, with eyes still bent
 Toward that goodly presence: th' other seiz'd her,
 And, her robes tearing, open'd her before,
 And show'd the belly to me, whence a smell,
 Exhaling loathsome, wak'd me.  Round I turn'd
 Mine eyes, and thus the teacher: "At the least
 Three times my voice hath call'd thee.  Rise, begone.
 Let us the opening find where thou mayst pass."
 
 I straightway rose.  Now day, pour'd down from high,
 Fill'd all the circuits of the sacred mount;
 And, as we journey'd, on our shoulder smote
 The early ray.  I follow'd, stooping low
 My forehead, as a man, o'ercharg'd with thought,
 Who bends him to the likeness of an arch,
 That midway spans the flood; when thus I heard,
 "Come, enter here," in tone so soft and mild,
 As never met the ear on mortal strand.
 
 With swan-like wings dispread and pointing up,
 Who thus had spoken marshal'd us along,
 Where each side of the solid masonry
 The sloping, walls retir'd; then mov'd his plumes,
 And fanning us, affirm'd that those, who mourn,
 Are blessed, for that comfort shall be theirs.
 
 "What aileth thee, that still thou look'st to earth?"
 Began my leader; while th' angelic shape
 A little over us his station took.
 
 "New vision," I replied, "hath rais'd in me
 Surmisings strange and anxious doubts, whereon
 My soul intent allows no other thought
 Or room or entrance."--"Hast thou seen," said he,
 "That old enchantress, her, whose wiles alone
 The spirits o'er us weep for?  Hast thou seen
 How man may free him of her bonds?  Enough.
 Let thy heels spurn the earth, and thy rais'd ken
 Fix on the lure, which heav'n's eternal King
 Whirls in the rolling spheres."  As on his feet
 The falcon first looks down, then to the sky
 Turns, and forth stretches eager for the food,
 That woos him thither; so the call I heard,
 So onward, far as the dividing rock
 Gave way, I journey'd, till the plain was reach'd.
 
 On the fifth circle when I stood at large,
 A race appear'd before me, on the ground
 All downward lying prone and weeping sore.
 "My soul hath cleaved to the dust," I heard
 With sighs so deep, they well nigh choak'd the words.
 "O ye elect of God, whose penal woes
 Both hope and justice mitigate, direct
 Tow'rds the steep rising our uncertain way."
 
 "If ye approach secure from this our doom,
 Prostration--and would urge your course with speed,
 See that ye still to rightward keep the brink."
 
 So them the bard besought; and such the words,
 Beyond us some short space, in answer came.
 
 I noted what remain'd yet hidden from them:
 Thence to my liege's eyes mine eyes I bent,
 And he, forthwith interpreting their suit,
 Beckon'd his glad assent. Free then to act,
 As pleas'd me, I drew near, and took my stand
 O`er that shade, whose words I late had mark'd.
 And, "Spirit!"  I said, "in whom repentant tears
 Mature that blessed hour, when thou with God
 Shalt find acceptance, for a while suspend
 For me that mightier care.  Say who thou wast,
 Why thus ye grovel on your bellies prone,
 And if in aught ye wish my service there,
 Whence living I am come."  He answering spake
 "The cause why Heav'n our back toward his cope
 Reverses, shalt thou know: but me know first
 The successor of Peter, and the name
 And title of my lineage from that stream,
 That' twixt Chiaveri and Siestri draws
 His limpid waters through the lowly glen.
 A month and little more by proof I learnt,
 With what a weight that robe of sov'reignty
 Upon his shoulder rests, who from the mire
 Would guard it: that each other fardel seems
 But feathers in the balance.  Late, alas!
 Was my conversion: but when I became
 Rome's pastor, I discern'd at once the dream
 And cozenage of life, saw that the heart
 Rested not there, and yet no prouder height
 Lur'd on the climber: wherefore, of that life
 No more enamour'd, in my bosom love
 Of purer being kindled.  For till then
 I was a soul in misery, alienate
 From God, and covetous of all earthly things;
 Now, as thou seest, here punish'd for my doting.
 Such cleansing from the taint of avarice
 Do spirits converted need.  This mount inflicts
 No direr penalty.  E'en as our eyes
 Fasten'd below, nor e'er to loftier clime
 Were lifted, thus hath justice level'd us
 Here on the earth.  As avarice quench'd our love
 Of good, without which is no working, thus
 Here justice holds us prison'd, hand and foot
 Chain'd down and bound, while heaven's just Lord shall please.
 So long to tarry motionless outstretch'd."
 
 My knees I stoop'd, and would have spoke; but he,
 Ere my beginning, by his ear perceiv'd
 I did him reverence; and "What cause," said he,
 "Hath bow'd thee thus!"--"Compunction," I rejoin'd.
 "And inward awe of your high dignity."
 
 "Up," he exclaim'd, "brother! upon thy feet
 Arise: err not: thy fellow servant I,
 (Thine and all others') of one Sovran Power.
 If thou hast ever mark'd those holy sounds
 Of gospel truth, 'nor shall be given ill marriage,'
 Thou mayst discern the reasons of my speech.
 Go thy ways now; and linger here no more.
 Thy tarrying is a let unto the tears,
 With which I hasten that whereof thou spak'st.
 I have on earth a kinswoman; her name
 Alagia, worthy in herself, so ill
 Example of our house corrupt her not:
 And she is all remaineth of me there."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XX
 
 Ill strives the will, 'gainst will more wise that strives
 His pleasure therefore to mine own preferr'd,
 I drew the sponge yet thirsty from the wave.
 
 Onward I mov'd: he also onward mov'd,
 Who led me, coasting still, wherever place
 Along the rock was vacant, as a man
 Walks near the battlements on narrow wall.
 For those on th' other part, who drop by drop
 Wring out their all-infecting malady,
 Too closely press the verge.  Accurst be thou!
 Inveterate wolf! whose gorge ingluts more prey,
 Than every beast beside, yet is not fill'd!
 So bottomless thy maw!--Ye spheres of heaven!
 To whom there are, as seems, who attribute
 All change in mortal state, when is the day
 Of his appearing, for whom fate reserves
 To chase her hence?--With wary steps and slow
 We pass'd; and I attentive to the shades,
 Whom piteously I heard lament and wail;
 
 And, 'midst the wailing, one before us heard
 Cry out "O blessed Virgin!"  as a dame
 In the sharp pangs of childbed; and "How poor
 Thou wast," it added, "witness that low roof
 Where thou didst lay thy sacred burden down.
 O good Fabricius! thou didst virtue choose
 With poverty, before great wealth with vice."
 
 The words so pleas'd me, that desire to know
 The spirit, from whose lip they seem'd to come,
 Did draw me onward.  Yet it spake the gift
 Of Nicholas, which on the maidens he
 Bounteous bestow'd, to save their youthful prime
 Unblemish'd.  "Spirit! who dost speak of deeds
 So worthy, tell me who thou was," I said,
 "And why thou dost with single voice renew
 Memorial of such praise. That boon vouchsaf'd
 Haply shall meet reward; if I return
 To finish the Short pilgrimage of life,
 Still speeding to its close on restless wing."
 
 "I," answer'd he, "will tell thee, not for hell,
 Which thence I look for; but that in thyself
 Grace so exceeding shines, before thy time
 Of mortal dissolution.  I was root
 Of that ill plant, whose shade such poison sheds
 O'er all the Christian land, that seldom thence
 Good fruit is gather'd.  Vengeance soon should come,
 Had Ghent and Douay, Lille and Bruges power;
 And vengeance I of heav'n's great Judge implore.
 Hugh Capet was I high: from me descend
 The Philips and the Louis, of whom France
 Newly is govern'd; born of one, who ply'd
 The slaughterer's trade at Paris.  When the race
 Of ancient kings had vanish'd (all save one
 Wrapt up in sable weeds) within my gripe
 I found the reins of empire, and such powers
 Of new acquirement, with full store of friends,
 That soon the widow'd circlet of the crown
 Was girt upon the temples of my son,
 He, from whose bones th' anointed race begins.
 Till the great dower of Provence had remov'd
 The stains, that yet obscur'd our lowly blood,
 Its sway indeed was narrow, but howe'er
 It wrought no evil: there, with force and lies,
 Began its rapine; after, for amends,
 Poitou it seiz'd, Navarre and Gascony.
 To Italy came Charles, and for amends
 Young Conradine an innocent victim slew,
 And sent th' angelic teacher back to heav'n,
 Still for amends.  I see the time at hand,
 That forth from France invites another Charles
 To make himself and kindred better known.
 Unarm'd he issues, saving with that lance,
 Which the arch-traitor tilted with; and that
 He carries with so home a thrust, as rives
 The bowels of poor Florence.  No increase
 Of territory hence, but sin and shame
 Shall be his guerdon, and so much the more
 As he more lightly deems of such foul wrong.
 I see the other, who a prisoner late
 Had steps on shore, exposing to the mart
 His daughter, whom he bargains for, as do
 The Corsairs for their slaves.  O avarice!
 What canst thou more, who hast subdued our blood
 So wholly to thyself, they feel no care
 Of their own flesh?  To hide with direr guilt
 Past ill and future, lo! the flower-de-luce
 Enters Alagna! in his Vicar Christ
 Himself a captive, and his mockery
 Acted again!  Lo! to his holy lip
 The vinegar and gall once more applied!
 And he 'twixt living robbers doom'd to bleed!
 Lo! the new Pilate, of whose cruelty
 Such violence cannot fill the measure up,
 With no degree to sanction, pushes on
 Into the temple his yet eager sails!
 
 "O sovran Master! when shall I rejoice
 To see the vengeance, which thy wrath well-pleas'd
 In secret silence broods?--While daylight lasts,
 So long what thou didst hear of her, sole spouse
 Of the Great Spirit, and on which thou turn'dst
 To me for comment, is the general theme
 Of all our prayers: but when it darkens, then
 A different strain we utter, then record
 Pygmalion, whom his gluttonous thirst of gold
 Made traitor, robber, parricide: the woes
 Of Midas, which his greedy wish ensued,
 Mark'd for derision to all future times:
 And the fond Achan, how he stole the prey,
 That yet he seems by Joshua's ire pursued.
 Sapphira with her husband next, we blame;
 And praise the forefeet, that with furious ramp
 Spurn'd Heliodorus.  All the mountain round
 Rings with the infamy of Thracia's king,
 Who slew his Phrygian charge: and last a shout
 Ascends: "Declare, O Crassus! for thou know'st,
 The flavour of thy gold."  The voice of each
 Now high now low, as each his impulse prompts,
 Is led through many a pitch, acute or grave.
 Therefore, not singly, I erewhile rehears'd
 That blessedness we tell of in the day:
 But near me none beside his accent rais'd."
 
 From him we now had parted, and essay'd
 With utmost efforts to surmount the way,
 When I did feel, as nodding to its fall,
 The mountain tremble; whence an icy chill
 Seiz'd on me, as on one to death convey'd.
 So shook not Delos, when Latona there
 Couch'd to bring forth the twin-born eyes of heaven.
 
 Forthwith from every side a shout arose
 So vehement, that suddenly my guide
 Drew near, and cried: "Doubt not, while I conduct thee."
 "Glory!" all shouted (such the sounds mine ear
 Gather'd from those, who near me swell'd the sounds)
 "Glory in the highest be to God."  We stood
 Immovably suspended, like to those,
 The shepherds, who first heard in Bethlehem's field
 That song: till ceas'd the trembling, and the song
 Was ended: then our hallow'd path resum'd,
 Eying the prostrate shadows, who renew'd
 Their custom'd mourning.  Never in my breast
 Did ignorance so struggle with desire
 Of knowledge, if my memory do not err,
 As in that moment; nor through haste dar'd I
 To question, nor myself could aught discern,
 So on I far'd in thoughtfulness and dread.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXI
 
 The natural thirst, ne'er quench'd but from the well,
 Whereof the woman of Samaria crav'd,
 Excited: haste along the cumber'd path,
 After my guide, impell'd; and pity mov'd
 My bosom for the 'vengeful deed, though just.
 When lo! even as Luke relates, that Christ
 Appear'd unto the two upon their way,
 New-risen from his vaulted grave; to us
 A shade appear'd, and after us approach'd,
 Contemplating the crowd beneath its feet.
 We were not ware of it; so first it spake,
 Saying, "God give you peace, my brethren!" then
 Sudden we turn'd: and Virgil such salute,
 As fitted that kind greeting, gave, and cried:
 "Peace in the blessed council be thy lot
 Awarded by that righteous court, which me
 To everlasting banishment exiles!"
 
 "How!" he exclaim'd, nor from his speed meanwhile
 Desisting, "If that ye be spirits, whom God
 Vouchsafes not room above, who up the height
 Has been thus far your guide?"  To whom the bard:
 "If thou observe the tokens, which this man
 Trac'd by the finger of the angel bears,
 'Tis plain that in the kingdom of the just
 He needs must share.  But sithence she, whose wheel
 Spins day and night, for him not yet had drawn
 That yarn, which, on the fatal distaff pil'd,
 Clotho apportions to each wight that breathes,
 His soul, that sister is to mine and thine,
 Not of herself could mount, for not like ours
 Her ken: whence I, from forth the ample gulf
 Of hell was ta'en, to lead him, and will lead
 Far as my lore avails.  But, if thou know,
 Instruct us for what cause, the mount erewhile
 Thus shook and trembled: wherefore all at once
 Seem'd shouting, even from his wave-wash'd foot."
 
 That questioning so tallied with my wish,
 The thirst did feel abatement of its edge
 E'en from expectance.  He forthwith replied,
 "In its devotion nought irregular
 This mount can witness, or by punctual rule
 Unsanction'd; here from every change exempt.
 Other than that, which heaven in itself
 Doth of itself receive, no influence
 Can reach us.  Tempest none, shower, hail or snow,
 Hoar frost or dewy moistness, higher falls
 Than that brief scale of threefold steps: thick clouds
 Nor scudding rack are ever seen: swift glance
 Ne'er lightens, nor Thaumantian Iris gleams,
 That yonder often shift on each side heav'n.
 Vapour adust doth never mount above
 The highest of the trinal stairs, whereon
 Peter's vicegerent stands.  Lower perchance,
 With various motion rock'd, trembles the soil:
 But here, through wind in earth's deep hollow pent,
 I know not how, yet never trembled: then
 Trembles, when any spirit feels itself
 So purified, that it may rise, or move
 For rising, and such loud acclaim ensues.
 Purification by the will alone
 Is prov'd, that free to change society
 Seizes the soul rejoicing in her will.
 Desire of bliss is present from the first;
 But strong propension hinders, to that wish
 By the just ordinance of heav'n oppos'd;
 Propension now as eager to fulfil
 Th' allotted torment, as erewhile to sin.
 And I who in this punishment had lain
 Five hundred years and more, but now have felt
 Free wish for happier clime.  Therefore thou felt'st
 The mountain tremble, and the spirits devout
 Heard'st, over all his limits, utter praise
 To that liege Lord, whom I entreat their joy
 To hasten."  Thus he spake: and since the draught
 Is grateful ever as the thirst is keen,
 No words may speak my fullness of content.
 
 "Now," said the instructor sage, "I see the net
 That takes ye here, and how the toils are loos'd,
 Why rocks the mountain and why ye rejoice.
 Vouchsafe, that from thy lips I next may learn,
 Who on the earth thou wast, and wherefore here
 So many an age wert prostrate."--"In that time,
 When the good Titus, with Heav'n's King to help,
 Aveng'd those piteous gashes, whence the blood
 By Judas sold did issue, with the name
 Most lasting and most honour'd there was I
 Abundantly renown'd," the shade reply'd,
 "Not yet with faith endued.  So passing sweet
 My vocal Spirit, from Tolosa, Rome
 To herself drew me, where I merited
 A myrtle garland to inwreathe my brow.
 Statius they name me still.  Of Thebes I sang,
 And next of great Achilles: but i' th' way
 Fell with the second burthen.  Of my flame
 Those sparkles were the seeds, which I deriv'd
 From the bright fountain of celestial fire
 That feeds unnumber'd lamps, the song I mean
 Which sounds Aeneas' wand'rings: that the breast
 I hung at, that the nurse, from whom my veins
 Drank inspiration: whose authority
 Was ever sacred with me.  To have liv'd
 Coeval with the Mantuan, I would bide
 The revolution of another sun
 Beyond my stated years in banishment."
 
 The Mantuan, when he heard him, turn'd to me,
 And holding silence: by his countenance
 Enjoin'd me silence but the power which wills,
 Bears not supreme control: laughter and tears
 Follow so closely on the passion prompts them,
 They wait not for the motions of the will
 In natures most sincere.  I did but smile,
 As one who winks; and thereupon the shade
 Broke off, and peer'd into mine eyes, where best
 Our looks interpret. "So to good event
 Mayst thou conduct such great emprize," he cried,
 "Say, why across thy visage beam'd, but now,
 The lightning of a smile!"  On either part
 Now am I straiten'd; one conjures me speak,
 Th' other to silence binds me: whence a sigh
 I utter, and the sigh is heard.  "Speak on;"
 The teacher cried; "and do not fear to speak,
 But tell him what so earnestly he asks."
 Whereon I thus: "Perchance, O ancient spirit!
 Thou marvel'st at my smiling. There is room
 For yet more wonder.  He who guides my ken
 On high, he is that Mantuan, led by whom
 Thou didst presume of men and gods to sing.
 If other cause thou deem'dst for which I smil'd,
 Leave it as not the true one; and believe
 Those words, thou spak'st of him, indeed the cause."
 
 Now down he bent t' embrace my teacher's feet;
 But he forbade him: "Brother! do it not:
 Thou art a shadow, and behold'st a shade."
 He rising answer'd thus: "Now hast thou prov'd
 The force and ardour of the love I bear thee,
 When I forget we are but things of air,
 And as a substance treat an empty shade."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXII
 
 Now we had left the angel, who had turn'd
 To the sixth circle our ascending step,
 One gash from off my forehead raz'd: while they,
 Whose wishes tend to justice, shouted forth:
 "Blessed!"  and ended with, "I thirst:" and I,
 More nimble than along the other straits,
 So journey'd, that, without the sense of toil,
 I follow'd upward the swift-footed shades;
 When Virgil thus began: "Let its pure flame
 From virtue flow, and love can never fail
 To warm another's bosom' so the light
 Shine manifestly forth.  Hence from that hour,
 When 'mongst us in the purlieus of the deep,
 Came down the spirit of Aquinum's hard,
 Who told of thine affection, my good will
 Hath been for thee of quality as strong
 As ever link'd itself to one not seen.
 Therefore these stairs will now seem short to me.
 But tell me: and if too secure I loose
 The rein with a friend's license, as a friend
 Forgive me, and speak now as with a friend:
 How chanc'd it covetous desire could find
 Place in that bosom, 'midst such ample store
 Of wisdom, as thy zeal had treasur'd there?"
 
 First somewhat mov'd to laughter by his words,
 Statius replied: "Each syllable of thine
 Is a dear pledge of love.  Things oft appear
 That minister false matters to our doubts,
 When their true causes are remov'd from sight.
 Thy question doth assure me, thou believ'st
 I was on earth a covetous man, perhaps
 Because thou found'st me in that circle plac'd.
 Know then I was too wide of avarice:
 And e'en for that excess, thousands of moons
 Have wax'd and wan'd upon my sufferings.
 And were it not that I with heedful care
 Noted where thou exclaim'st as if in ire
 With human nature, 'Why, thou cursed thirst
 Of gold! dost not with juster measure guide
 The appetite of mortals?'  I had met
 The fierce encounter of the voluble rock.
 Then was I ware that with too ample wing
 The hands may haste to lavishment, and turn'd,
 As from my other evil, so from this
 In penitence.  How many from their grave
 Shall with shorn locks arise, who living, aye
 And at life's last extreme, of this offence,
 Through ignorance, did not repent.  And know,
 The fault which lies direct from any sin
 In level opposition, here With that
 Wastes its green rankness on one common heap.
 Therefore if I have been with those, who wail
 Their avarice, to cleanse me, through reverse
 Of their transgression, such hath been my lot."
 
 To whom the sovran of the pastoral song:
 "While thou didst sing that cruel warfare wag'd
 By the twin sorrow of Jocasta's womb,
 From thy discourse with Clio there, it seems
 As faith had not been shine: without the which
 Good deeds suffice not.  And if so, what sun
 Rose on thee, or what candle pierc'd the dark
 That thou didst after see to hoist the sail,
 And follow, where the fisherman had led?"
 
 He answering thus: "By thee conducted first,
 I enter'd the Parnassian grots, and quaff'd
 Of the clear spring; illumin'd first by thee
 Open'd mine eyes to God.  Thou didst, as one,
 Who, journeying through the darkness, hears a light
 Behind, that profits not himself, but makes
 His followers wise, when thou exclaimedst, 'Lo!
 A renovated world!  Justice return'd!
 Times of primeval innocence restor'd!
 And a new race descended from above!'
 Poet and Christian both to thee I owed.
 That thou mayst mark more clearly what I trace,
 My hand shall stretch forth to inform the lines
 With livelier colouring.  Soon o'er all the world,
 By messengers from heav'n, the true belief
 Teem'd now prolific, and that word of thine
 Accordant, to the new instructors chim'd.
 Induc'd by which agreement, I was wont
 Resort to them; and soon their sanctity
 So won upon me, that, Domitian's rage
 Pursuing them, I mix'd my tears with theirs,
 And, while on earth I stay'd, still succour'd them;
 And their most righteous customs made me scorn
 All sects besides.  Before I led the Greeks
 In tuneful fiction, to the streams of Thebes,
 I was baptiz'd; but secretly, through fear,
 Remain'd a Christian, and conform'd long time
 To Pagan rites.  Five centuries and more,
 T for that lukewarmness was fain to pace
 Round the fourth circle.  Thou then, who hast rais'd
 The covering, which did hide such blessing from me,
 Whilst much of this ascent is yet to climb,
 Say, if thou know, where our old Terence bides,
 Caecilius, Plautus, Varro: if condemn'd
 They dwell, and in what province of the deep."
 "These," said my guide, "with Persius and myself,
 And others many more, are with that Greek,
 Of mortals, the most cherish'd by the Nine,
 In the first ward of darkness.  There ofttimes
 We of that mount hold converse, on whose top
 For aye our nurses live.  We have the bard
 Of Pella, and the Teian, Agatho,
 Simonides, and many a Grecian else
 Ingarlanded with laurel.  Of thy train
 Antigone is there, Deiphile,
 Argia, and as sorrowful as erst
 Ismene, and who show'd Langia's wave:
 Deidamia with her sisters there,
 And blind Tiresias' daughter, and the bride
 Sea-born of Peleus."  Either poet now
 Was silent, and no longer by th' ascent
 Or the steep walls obstructed, round them cast
 Inquiring eyes.  Four handmaids of the day
 Had finish'd now their office, and the fifth
 Was at the chariot-beam, directing still
 Its balmy point aloof, when thus my guide:
 "Methinks, it well behooves us to the brink
 Bend the right shoulder' circuiting the mount,
 As we have ever us'd."  So custom there
 Was usher to the road, the which we chose
 Less doubtful, as that worthy shade complied.
 
 They on before me went; I sole pursued,
 List'ning their speech, that to my thoughts convey'd
 Mysterious lessons of sweet poesy.
 But soon they ceas'd; for midway of the road
 A tree we found, with goodly fruitage hung,
 And pleasant to the smell: and as a fir
 Upward from bough to bough less ample spreads,
 So downward this less ample spread, that none.
 Methinks, aloft may climb.  Upon the side,
 That clos'd our path, a liquid crystal fell
 From the steep rock, and through the sprays above
 Stream'd showering.  With associate step the bards
 Drew near the plant; and from amidst the leaves
 A voice was heard: "Ye shall be chary of me;"
 And after added: "Mary took more thought
 For joy and honour of the nuptial feast,
 Than for herself who answers now for you.
 The women of old Rome were satisfied
 With water for their beverage.  Daniel fed
 On pulse, and wisdom gain'd.  The primal age
 Was beautiful as gold; and hunger then
 Made acorns tasteful, thirst each rivulet
 Run nectar.  Honey and locusts were the food,
 Whereon the Baptist in the wilderness
 Fed, and that eminence of glory reach'd
 And greatness, which the' Evangelist records."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIII
 
 On the green leaf mine eyes were fix'd, like his
 Who throws away his days in idle chase
 Of the diminutive, when thus I heard
 The more than father warn me: "Son! our time
 Asks thriftier using.  Linger not: away."
 
 Thereat my face and steps at once I turn'd
 Toward the sages, by whose converse cheer'd
 I journey'd on, and felt no toil: and lo!
 A sound of weeping and a song: "My lips,
 O Lord!" and these so mingled, it gave birth
 To pleasure and to pain.  "O Sire, belov'd!
 Say what is this I hear?"  Thus I inquir'd.
 
 "Spirits," said he, "who as they go, perchance,
 Their debt of duty pay."  As on their road
 The thoughtful pilgrims, overtaking some
 Not known unto them, turn to them, and look,
 But stay not; thus, approaching from behind
 With speedier motion, eyed us, as they pass'd,
 A crowd of spirits, silent and devout.
 The eyes of each were dark and hollow: pale
 Their visage, and so lean withal, the bones
 Stood staring thro' the skin.  I do not think
 Thus dry and meagre Erisicthon show'd,
 When pinc'ed by sharp-set famine to the quick.
 
 "Lo!" to myself I mus'd, "the race, who lost
 Jerusalem, when Mary with dire beak
 Prey'd on her child."  The sockets seem'd as rings,
 From which the gems were drops.  Who reads the name
 Of man upon his forehead, there the M
 Had trac'd most plainly.  Who would deem, that scent
 Of water and an apple, could have prov'd
 Powerful to generate such pining want,
 Not knowing how it wrought?  While now I stood
 Wond'ring what thus could waste them (for the cause
 Of their gaunt hollowness and scaly rind
 Appear'd not) lo! a spirit turn'd his eyes
 In their deep-sunken cell, and fasten'd then
 On me, then cried with vehemence aloud:
 "What grace is this vouchsaf'd me?"  By his looks
 I ne'er had recogniz'd him: but the voice
 Brought to my knowledge what his cheer conceal'd.
 Remembrance of his alter'd lineaments
 Was kindled from that spark; and I agniz'd
 The visage of Forese.  "Ah! respect
 This wan and leprous wither'd skin," thus he
 Suppliant implor'd, "this macerated flesh.
 Speak to me truly of thyself.  And who
 Are those twain spirits, that escort thee there?
 Be it not said thou Scorn'st to talk with me."
 
 "That face of thine," I answer'd him, "which dead
 I once bewail'd, disposes me not less
 For weeping, when I see It thus transform'd.
 Say then, by Heav'n, what blasts ye thus?  The whilst
 I wonder, ask not Speech from me: unapt
 Is he to speak, whom other will employs."
 
 He thus: "The water and tee plant we pass'd,
 Virtue possesses, by th' eternal will
 Infus'd, the which so pines me.  Every spirit,
 Whose song bewails his gluttony indulg'd
 Too grossly, here in hunger and in thirst
 Is purified.  The odour, which the fruit,
 And spray, that showers upon the verdure, breathe,
 Inflames us with desire to feed and drink.
 Nor once alone encompassing our route
 We come to add fresh fuel to the pain:
 Pain, said Iolace rather: for that will
 To the tree leads us, by which Christ was led
 To call Elias, joyful when he paid
 Our ransom from his vein."  I answering thus:
 "Forese! from that day, in which the world
 For better life thou changedst, not five years
 Have circled.  If the power of sinning more
 Were first concluded in thee, ere thou knew'st
 That kindly grief, which re-espouses us
 To God, how hither art thou come so soon?
 I thought to find thee lower, there, where time
 Is recompense for time."  He straight replied:
 "To drink up the sweet wormwood of affliction
 I have been brought thus early by the tears
 Stream'd down my Nella's cheeks.  Her prayers devout,
 Her sighs have drawn me from the coast, where oft
 Expectance lingers, and have set me free
 From th' other circles.  In the sight of God
 So much the dearer is my widow priz'd,
 She whom I lov'd so fondly, as she ranks
 More singly eminent for virtuous deeds.
 The tract most barb'rous of Sardinia's isle,
 Hath dames more chaste and modester by far
 Than that wherein I left her.  O sweet brother!
 What wouldst thou have me say?  A time to come
 Stands full within my view, to which this hour
 Shall not be counted of an ancient date,
 When from the pulpit shall be loudly warn'd
 Th' unblushing dames of Florence, lest they bare
 Unkerchief'd bosoms to the common gaze.
 What savage women hath the world e'er seen,
 What Saracens, for whom there needed scourge
 Of spiritual or other discipline,
 To force them walk with cov'ring on their limbs!
 But did they see, the shameless ones, that Heav'n
 Wafts on swift wing toward them, while I speak,
 Their mouths were op'd for howling: they shall taste
 Of Borrow (unless foresight cheat me here)
 Or ere the cheek of him be cloth'd with down
 Who is now rock'd with lullaby asleep.
 Ah! now, my brother, hide thyself no more,
 Thou seest how not I alone but all
 Gaze, where thou veil'st the intercepted sun."
 
 Whence I replied: "If thou recall to mind
 What we were once together, even yet
 Remembrance of those days may grieve thee sore.
 That I forsook that life, was due to him
 Who there precedes me, some few evenings past,
 When she was round, who shines with sister lamp
 To his, that glisters yonder," and I show'd
 The sun.  "Tis he, who through profoundest night
 Of he true dead has brought me, with this flesh
 As true, that follows.  From that gloom the aid
 Of his sure comfort drew me on to climb,
 And climbing wind along this mountain-steep,
 Which rectifies in you whate'er the world
 Made crooked and deprav'd I have his word,
 That he will bear me company as far
 As till I come where Beatrice dwells:
 But there must leave me.  Virgil is that spirit,
 Who thus hath promis'd,"  and I pointed to him;
 "The other is that shade, for whom so late
 Your realm, as he arose, exulting shook
 Through every pendent cliff and rocky bound."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIV
 
 Our journey was not slacken'd by our talk,
 Nor yet our talk by journeying.  Still we spake,
 And urg'd our travel stoutly, like a ship
 When the wind sits astern.  The shadowy forms,
 
 That seem'd things dead and dead again, drew in
 At their deep-delved orbs rare wonder of me,
 Perceiving I had life; and I my words
 Continued, and thus spake; "He journeys up
 Perhaps more tardily then else he would,
 For others' sake.  But tell me, if thou know'st,
 Where is Piccarda?  Tell me, if I see
 Any of mark, among this multitude,
 Who eye me thus."--"My sister (she for whom,
 'Twixt beautiful and good I cannot say
 Which name was fitter ) wears e'en now her crown,
 And triumphs in Olympus."  Saying this,
 He added: "Since spare diet hath so worn
 Our semblance out, 't is lawful here to name
 Each one.  This," and his finger then he rais'd,
 "Is Buonaggiuna,--Buonaggiuna, he
 Of Lucca: and that face beyond him, pierc'd
 Unto a leaner fineness than the rest,
 Had keeping of the church: he was of Tours,
 And purges by wan abstinence away
 Bolsena's eels and cups of muscadel."
 
 He show'd me many others, one by one,
 And all, as they were nam'd, seem'd well content;
 For no dark gesture I discern'd in any.
 I saw through hunger Ubaldino grind
 His teeth on emptiness; and Boniface,
 That wav'd the crozier o'er a num'rous flock.
 I saw the Marquis, who tad time erewhile
 To swill at Forli with less drought, yet so
 Was one ne'er sated.  I howe'er, like him,
 That gazing 'midst a crowd, singles out one,
 So singled him of Lucca; for methought
 Was none amongst them took such note of me.
 Somewhat I heard him whisper of Gentucca:
 The sound was indistinct, and murmur'd there,
 Where justice, that so strips them, fix'd her sting.
 
 "Spirit!" said I, "it seems as thou wouldst fain
 Speak with me.  Let me hear thee.  Mutual wish
 To converse prompts, which let us both indulge."
 
 He, answ'ring, straight began: "Woman is born,
 Whose brow no wimple shades yet, that shall make
 My city please thee, blame it as they may.
 Go then with this forewarning.  If aught false
 My whisper too implied, th' event shall tell
 But say, if of a  truth I see the man
 Of that new lay th' inventor, which begins
 With 'Ladies, ye that con the lore of love'."
 
 To whom I thus: "Count of me but as one
 Who am the scribe of love; that, when he breathes,
 Take up my pen, and, as he dictates, write."
 
 "Brother!" said he, "the hind'rance which once held
 The notary with Guittone and myself,
 Short of that new and sweeter style I hear,
 Is now disclos'd.  I see how ye your plumes
 Stretch, as th' inditer guides them; which, no question,
 Ours did not.  He that seeks a grace beyond,
 Sees not the distance parts one style from other."
 And, as contented, here he held his peace.
 
 Like as the bird, that winter near the Nile,
 In squared regiment direct their course,
 Then stretch themselves in file for speedier flight;
 Thus all the tribe of spirits, as they turn'd
 Their visage, faster deaf, nimble alike
 Through leanness and desire.  And as a man,
 Tir'd With the motion of a trotting steed,
 Slacks pace, and stays behind his company,
 Till his o'erbreathed lungs keep temperate time;
 E'en so Forese let that holy crew
 Proceed, behind them lingering at my side,
 And saying: "When shall I again behold thee?"
 
 "How long my life may last," said I, "I know not;
 This know, how soon soever I return,
 My wishes will before me have arriv'd.
 Sithence the place, where I am set to live,
 Is, day by day, more scoop'd of all its good,
 And dismal ruin seems to threaten it."
 
 "Go now," he cried: "lo! he, whose guilt is most,
 Passes before my vision, dragg'd at heels
 Of an infuriate beast.  Toward the vale,
 Where guilt hath no redemption, on it speeds,
 Each step increasing swiftness on the last;
 Until a blow it strikes, that leaveth him
 A corse most vilely shatter'd.  No long space
 Those wheels have yet to roll"  (therewith his eyes
 Look'd up to heav'n) "ere thou shalt plainly see
 That which my words may not more plainly tell.
 I quit thee: time is precious here: I lose
 Too much, thus measuring my pace with shine."
 
 As from a troop of well-rank'd chivalry
 One knight, more enterprising than the rest,
 Pricks forth at gallop, eager to display
 His prowess in the first encounter prov'd
 So parted he from us with lengthen'd strides,
 And left me on the way with those twain spirits,
 Who were such mighty marshals of the world.
 
 When he beyond us had so fled mine eyes
 No nearer reach'd him, than my thought his words,
 The branches of another fruit, thick hung,
 And blooming fresh, appear'd.  E'en as our steps
 Turn'd thither, not far off it rose to view.
 Beneath it were a multitude, that rais'd
 Their hands, and shouted forth I know not What
 Unto the boughs; like greedy and fond brats,
 That beg, and answer none obtain from him,
 Of whom they beg; but more to draw them on,
 He at arm's length the object of their wish
 Above them holds aloft, and hides it not.
 
 At length, as undeceiv'd they went their way:
 And we approach the tree, who vows and tears
 Sue to in vain, the mighty tree.  "Pass on,
 And come not near.  Stands higher up the wood,
 Whereof Eve tasted, and from it was ta'en
 'this plant." Such sounds from midst the thickets came.
 Whence I, with either bard, close to the side
 That rose, pass'd forth beyond.  "Remember," next
 We heard, "those noblest creatures of the clouds,
 How they their twofold bosoms overgorg'd
 Oppos'd in fight to Theseus: call to mind
 The Hebrews, how effeminate they stoop'd
 To ease their thirst; whence Gideon's ranks were thinn'd,
 As he to Midian march'd adown the hills."
 
 Thus near one border coasting, still we heard
 The sins of gluttony, with woe erewhile
 Reguerdon'd.  Then along the lonely path,
 Once more at large, full thousand paces on
 We travel'd, each contemplative and mute.
 
 "Why pensive journey thus ye three alone?"
 Thus suddenly a voice exclaim'd: whereat
 I shook, as doth a scar'd and paltry beast;
 Then rais'd my head to look from whence it came.
 
 Was ne'er, in furnace, glass, or metal seen
 So bright and glowing red, as was the shape
 I now beheld.  "If ye desire to mount,"
 He cried, "here must ye turn.  This way he goes,
 Who goes in quest of peace."  His countenance
 Had dazzled me; and to my guides I fac'd
 Backward, like one who walks, as sound directs.
 
 As when, to harbinger the dawn, springs up
 On freshen'd wing the air of May, and breathes
 Of fragrance, all impregn'd with herb and flowers,
 E'en such a wind I felt upon my front
 Blow gently, and the moving of a wing
 Perceiv'd, that moving shed ambrosial smell;
 And then a voice: "Blessed are they, whom grace
 Doth so illume, that appetite in them
 Exhaleth no inordinate desire,
 Still hung'ring as the rule of temperance wills."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXV
 
 It was an hour, when he who climbs, had need
 To walk uncrippled: for the sun had now
 To Taurus the meridian circle left,
 And to the Scorpion left the night.  As one
 That makes no pause, but presses on his road,
 Whate'er betide him, if some urgent need
 Impel: so enter'd we upon our way,
 One before other; for, but singly, none
 That steep and narrow scale admits to climb.
 
 E'en as the young stork lifteth up his wing
 Through wish to fly, yet ventures not to quit
 The nest, and drops it; so in me desire
 Of questioning my guide arose, and fell,
 Arriving even to the act, that marks
 A man prepar'd for speech.  Him all our haste
 Restrain'd not, but thus spake the sire belov'd:
 Fear not to speed the shaft, that on thy lip
 Stands trembling for its flight.  Encourag'd thus
 I straight began: "How there can leanness come,
 Where is no want of nourishment to feed?"
 
 "If thou," he answer'd, "hadst remember'd thee,
 How Meleager with the wasting brand
 Wasted alike, by equal fires consum'd,
 This would not trouble thee: and hadst thou thought,
 How in the mirror your reflected form
 With mimic motion vibrates, what now seems
 Hard, had appear'd no harder than the pulp
 Of summer fruit mature.  But that thy will
 In certainty may find its full repose,
 Lo Statius here! on him I call, and pray
 That he would now be healer of thy wound."
 
 "If in thy presence I unfold to him
 The secrets of heaven's vengeance, let me plead
 Thine own injunction, to exculpate me."
 So Statius answer'd, and forthwith began:
 "Attend my words, O son, and in thy mind
 Receive them: so shall they be light to clear
 The doubt thou offer'st. Blood, concocted well,
 Which by the thirsty veins is ne'er imbib'd,
 And rests as food superfluous, to be ta'en
 From the replenish'd table, in the heart
 Derives effectual virtue, that informs
 The several human limbs, as being that,
 Which passes through the veins itself to make them.
 Yet more concocted it descends, where shame
 Forbids to mention: and from thence distils
 In natural vessel on another's blood.
 Then each unite together, one dispos'd
 T' endure, to act the other, through meet frame
 Of its recipient mould: that being reach'd,
 It 'gins to work, coagulating first;
 Then vivifies what its own substance caus'd
 To bear.  With animation now indued,
 The active virtue (differing from a plant
 No further, than that this is on the way
 And at its limit that) continues yet
 To operate, that now it moves, and feels,
 As sea sponge clinging to the rock: and there
 Assumes th' organic powers its seed convey'd.
 'This is the period, son! at which the virtue,
 That from the generating heart proceeds,
 Is pliant and expansive; for each limb
 Is in the heart by forgeful nature plann'd.
 How babe of animal becomes, remains
 For thy consid'ring.  At this point, more wise,
 Than thou hast err'd, making the soul disjoin'd
 From passive intellect, because he saw
 No organ for the latter's use assign'd.
 
 "Open thy bosom to the truth that comes.
 Know soon as in the embryo, to the brain,
 Articulation is complete, then turns
 The primal Mover with a smile of joy
 On such great work of nature, and imbreathes
 New spirit replete with virtue, that what here
 Active it finds, to its own substance draws,
 And forms an individual soul, that lives,
 And feels, and bends reflective on itself.
 And that thou less mayst marvel at the word,
 Mark the sun's heat, how that to wine doth change,
 Mix'd with the moisture filter'd through the vine.
 
 "When Lachesis hath spun the thread, the soul
 Takes with her both the human and divine,
 Memory, intelligence, and will, in act
 Far keener than before, the other powers
 Inactive all and mute.  No pause allow'd,
 In wond'rous sort self-moving, to one strand
 Of those, where the departed roam, she falls,
 Here learns her destin'd path.  Soon as the place
 Receives her, round the plastic virtue beams,
 Distinct as in the living limbs before:
 And as the air, when saturate with showers,
 The casual beam refracting, decks itself
 With many a hue; so here the ambient air
 Weareth that form, which influence of the soul
 Imprints on it; and like the flame, that where
 The fire moves, thither follows, so henceforth
 The new form on the spirit follows still:
 Hence hath it semblance, and is shadow call'd,
 With each sense even to the sight endued:
 Hence speech is ours, hence laughter, tears, and sighs
 Which thou mayst oft have witness'd on the mount
 Th' obedient shadow fails not to present
 Whatever varying passion moves within us.
 And this the cause of what thou marvel'st at."
 
 Now the last flexure of our way we reach'd,
 And to the right hand turning, other care
 Awaits us.  Here the rocky precipice
 Hurls forth redundant flames, and from the rim
 A blast upblown, with forcible rebuff
 Driveth them back, sequester'd from its bound.
 
 Behoov'd us, one by one, along the side,
 That border'd on the void, to pass; and I
 Fear'd on one hand the fire, on th' other fear'd
 Headlong to fall: when thus th' instructor warn'd:
 "Strict rein must in this place direct the eyes.
 A little swerving and the way is lost."
 
 Then from the bosom of the burning mass,
 "O God of mercy!" heard I sung; and felt
 No less desire to turn.  And when I saw
 Spirits along the flame proceeding, I
 Between their footsteps and mine own was fain
 To share by turns my view.  At the hymn's close
 They shouted loud, "I do not know a man;"
 Then in low voice again took up the strain,
 Which once more ended, "To the wood," they cried,
 "Ran Dian, and drave forth Callisto, stung
 With Cytherea's poison:" then return'd
 Unto their song; then marry a pair extoll'd,
 Who liv'd in virtue chastely, and the bands
 Of wedded love.  Nor from that task, I ween,
 Surcease they; whilesoe'er the scorching fire
 Enclasps them.  Of such skill appliance needs
 To medicine the wound, that healeth last.
 
 
 CANTO XXVI
 
 While singly thus along the rim we walk'd,
 Oft the good master warn'd me: "Look thou well.
 Avail it that I caution thee."  The sun
 Now all the western clime irradiate chang'd
 From azure tinct to white; and, as I pass'd,
 My passing shadow made the umber'd flame
 Burn ruddier.  At so strange a sight I mark'd
 That many a spirit marvel'd on his way.
 
 This bred occasion first to speak of me,
 "He seems," said they, "no insubstantial frame:"
 Then to obtain what certainty they might,
 Stretch'd towards me, careful not to overpass
 The burning pale.  "O thou, who followest
 The others, haply not more slow than they,
 But mov'd by rev'rence, answer me, who burn
 In thirst and fire: nor I alone, but these
 All for thine answer do more thirst, than doth
 Indian or Aethiop for the cooling stream.
 Tell us, how is it that thou mak'st thyself
 A wall against the sun, as thou not yet
 Into th' inextricable toils of death
 Hadst enter'd?"  Thus spake one, and I had straight
 Declar'd me, if attention had not turn'd
 To new appearance.  Meeting these, there came,
 Midway the burning path, a crowd, on whom
 Earnestly gazing, from each part I view
 The shadows all press forward, sev'rally
 Each snatch a hasty kiss, and then away.
 E'en so the emmets, 'mid their dusky troops,
 Peer closely one at other, to spy out
 Their mutual road perchance, and how they thrive.
 
 That friendly greeting parted, ere dispatch
 Of the first onward step, from either tribe
 Loud clamour rises: those, who newly come,
 Shout "Sodom and Gomorrah!" these, "The cow
 Pasiphae enter'd, that the beast she woo'd
 Might rush unto her luxury."  Then as cranes,
 That part towards the Riphaean mountains fly,
 Part towards the Lybic sands, these to avoid
 The ice, and those the sun; so hasteth off
 One crowd, advances th' other; and resume
 Their first song weeping, and their several shout.
 
 Again drew near my side the very same,
 Who had erewhile besought me, and their looks
 Mark'd eagerness to listen.  I, who twice
 Their will had noted, spake: "O spirits secure,
 Whene'er the time may be, of peaceful end!
 My limbs, nor crude, nor in mature old age,
 Have I left yonder: here they bear me, fed
 With blood, and sinew-strung.  That I no more
 May live in blindness, hence I tend aloft.
 There is a dame on high, who wind for us
 This grace, by which my mortal through your realm
 I bear.  But may your utmost wish soon meet
 Such full fruition, that the orb of heaven,
 Fullest of love, and of most ample space,
 Receive you, as ye tell (upon my page
 Henceforth to stand recorded) who ye are,
 And what this multitude, that at your backs
 Have past behind us."  As one, mountain-bred,
 Rugged and clownish, if some city's walls
 He chance to enter, round him stares agape,
 Confounded and struck dumb; e'en such appear'd
 Each spirit.  But when rid of that amaze,
 (Not long the inmate of a noble heart)
 He, who before had question'd, thus resum'd:
 "O blessed, who, for death preparing, tak'st
 Experience of our limits, in thy bark!
 Their crime, who not with us proceed, was that,
 For which, as he did triumph, Caesar heard
 The snout of 'queen,' to taunt him.  Hence their cry
 Of 'Sodom,' as they parted, to rebuke
 Themselves, and aid the burning by their shame.
 Our sinning was Hermaphrodite: but we,
 Because the law of human kind we broke,
 Following like beasts our vile concupiscence,
 Hence parting from them, to our own disgrace
 Record the name of her, by whom the beast
 In bestial tire was acted.  Now our deeds
 Thou know'st, and how we sinn'd.  If thou by name
 Wouldst haply know us, time permits not now
 To tell so much, nor can I.  Of myself
 Learn what thou wishest.  Guinicelli I,
 Who having truly sorrow'd ere my last,
 Already cleanse me."  With such pious joy,
 As the two sons upon their mother gaz'd
 From sad Lycurgus rescu'd, such my joy
 (Save that I more represt it) when I heard
 From his own lips the name of him pronounc'd,
 Who was a father to me, and to those
 My betters, who have ever us'd the sweet
 And pleasant rhymes of love.  So nought I heard
 Nor spake, but long time thoughtfully I went,
 Gazing on him; and, only for the fire,
 Approach'd not nearer.  When my eyes were fed
 By looking on him, with such solemn pledge,
 As forces credence, I devoted me
 Unto his service wholly.  In reply
 He thus bespake me: "What from thee I hear
 Is grav'd so deeply on my mind, the waves
 Of Lethe shall not wash it off, nor make
 A whit less lively.  But as now thy oath
 Has seal'd the truth, declare what cause impels
 That love, which both thy looks and speech bewray."
 
 "Those dulcet lays," I answer'd, "which, as long
 As of our tongue the beauty does not fade,
 Shall make us love the very ink that trac'd them."
 
 "Brother!"  he cried, and pointed at a shade
 Before him, "there is one, whose mother speech
 Doth owe to him a fairer ornament.
 He in love ditties and the tales of prose
 Without a rival stands, and lets the fools
 Talk on, who think the songster of Limoges
 O'ertops him.  Rumour and the popular voice
 They look to more than truth, and so confirm
 Opinion, ere by art or reason taught.
 Thus many of the elder time cried up
 Guittone, giving him the prize, till truth
 By strength of numbers vanquish'd.  If thou own
 So ample privilege, as to have gain'd
 Free entrance to the cloister, whereof Christ
 Is Abbot of the college, say to him
 One paternoster for me, far as needs
 For dwellers in this world, where power to sin
 No longer tempts us."  Haply to make way
 For one, that follow'd next, when that was said,
 He vanish'd through the fire, as through the wave
 A fish, that glances diving to the deep.
 
 I, to the spirit he had shown me, drew
 A little onward, and besought his name,
 For which my heart, I said, kept gracious room.
 He frankly thus began: "Thy courtesy
 So wins on me, I have nor power nor will
 To hide me.  I am Arnault; and with songs,
 Sorely lamenting for my folly past,
 Thorough this ford of fire I wade, and see
 The day, I hope for, smiling in my view.
 I pray ye by the worth that guides ye up
 Unto the summit of the scale, in time
 Remember ye my suff'rings."  With such words
 He disappear'd in the refining flame.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXVII
 
 Now was the sun so station'd, as when first
 His early radiance quivers on the heights,
 Where stream'd his Maker's blood, while Libra hangs
 Above Hesperian Ebro, and new fires
 Meridian flash on Ganges' yellow tide.
 
 So day was sinking, when the' angel of God
 Appear'd before us.  Joy was in his mien.
 Forth of the flame he stood upon the brink,
 And with a voice, whose lively clearness far
 Surpass'd our human, "Blessed are the pure
 In heart," he Sang: then near him as we came,
 "Go ye not further, holy spirits!"  he cried,
 "Ere the fire pierce you: enter in; and list
 Attentive to the song ye hear from thence."
 
 I, when I heard his saying, was as one
 Laid in the grave.  My hands together clasp'd,
 And upward stretching, on the fire I look'd,
 And busy fancy conjur'd up the forms
 Erewhile beheld alive consum'd in flames.
 
 Th' escorting spirits turn'd with gentle looks
 Toward me, and the Mantuan spake: "My son,
 Here torment thou mayst feel, but canst not death.
 Remember thee, remember thee, if I
 Safe e'en on Geryon brought thee: now I come
 More near to God, wilt thou not trust me now?
 Of this be sure: though in its womb that flame
 A thousand years contain'd thee, from thy head
 No hair should perish.  If thou doubt my truth,
 Approach, and with thy hands thy vesture's hem
 Stretch forth, and for thyself confirm belief.
 Lay now all fear, O lay all fear aside.
 Turn hither, and come onward undismay'd."
 I still, though conscience urg'd' no step advanc'd.
 
 When still he saw me fix'd and obstinate,
 Somewhat disturb'd he cried: "Mark now, my son,
 From Beatrice thou art by this wall
 Divided."  As at Thisbe's name the eye
 Of Pyramus was open'd (when life ebb'd
 Fast from his veins), and took one parting glance,
 While vermeil dyed the mulberry; thus I turn'd
 To my sage guide, relenting, when I heard
 The name, that springs forever in my breast.
 
 He shook his forehead; and, "How long," he said,
 "Linger we now?"  then smil'd, as one would smile
 Upon a child, that eyes the fruit and yields.
 Into the fire before me then he walk'd;
 And Statius, who erewhile no little space
 Had parted us, he pray'd to come behind.
 
 I would have cast me into molten glass
 To cool me, when I enter'd; so intense
 Rag'd the conflagrant mass.  The sire belov'd,
 To comfort me, as he proceeded, still
 Of Beatrice talk'd.  "Her eyes," saith he,
 "E'en now I seem to view."  From the other side
 A voice, that sang, did guide us, and the voice
 Following, with heedful ear, we issued forth,
 There where the path led upward.  "Come," we heard,
 "Come, blessed of my Father."  Such the sounds,
 That hail'd us from within a light, which shone
 So radiant, I could not endure the view.
 "The sun," it added, "hastes: and evening comes.
 Delay not: ere the western sky is hung
 With blackness, strive ye for the pass."  Our way
 Upright within the rock arose, and fac'd
 Such part of heav'n, that from before my steps
 The beams were shrouded of the sinking sun.
 
 Nor many stairs were overpass, when now
 By fading of the shadow we perceiv'd
 The sun behind us couch'd: and ere one face
 Of darkness o'er its measureless expanse
 Involv'd th' horizon, and the night her lot
 Held individual, each of us had made
 A stair his pallet: not that will, but power,
 Had fail'd us, by the nature of that mount
 Forbidden further travel.  As the goats,
 That late have skipp'd and wanton'd rapidly
 Upon the craggy cliffs, ere they had ta'en
 Their supper on the herb, now silent lie
 And ruminate beneath the umbrage brown,
 While noonday rages; and the goatherd leans
 Upon his staff, and leaning watches them:
 And as the swain, that lodges out all night
 In quiet by his flock, lest beast of prey
 Disperse them; even so all three abode,
 I as a goat and as the shepherds they,
 Close pent on either side by shelving rock.
 
 A little glimpse of sky was seen above;
 Yet by that little I beheld the stars
 In magnitude and rustle shining forth
 With more than wonted glory.  As I lay,
 Gazing on them, and in that fit of musing,
 Sleep overcame me, sleep, that bringeth oft
 Tidings of future hap.  About the hour,
 As I believe, when Venus from the east
 First lighten'd on the mountain, she whose orb
 Seems always glowing with the fire of love,
 A lady young and beautiful, I dream'd,
 Was passing o'er a lea; and, as she came,
 Methought I saw her ever and anon
 Bending to cull the flowers; and thus she sang:
 "Know ye, whoever of my name would ask,
 That I am Leah: for my brow to weave
 A garland, these fair hands unwearied ply.
 To please me at the crystal mirror, here
 I deck me.  But my sister Rachel, she
 Before her glass abides the livelong day,
 Her radiant eyes beholding, charm'd no less,
 Than I with this delightful task.  Her joy
 In contemplation, as in labour mine."
 
 And now as glimm'ring dawn appear'd, that breaks
 More welcome to the pilgrim still, as he
 Sojourns less distant on his homeward way,
 Darkness from all sides fled, and with it fled
 My slumber; whence I rose and saw my guide
 Already risen.  "That delicious fruit,
 Which through so many a branch the zealous care
 Of mortals roams in quest of, shall this day
 Appease thy hunger."  Such the words I heard
 From Virgil's lip; and never greeting heard
 So pleasant as the sounds.  Within me straight
 Desire so grew upon desire to mount,
 Thenceforward at each step I felt the wings
 Increasing for my flight.  When we had run
 O'er all the ladder to its topmost round,
 As there we stood, on me the Mantuan fix'd
 His eyes, and thus he spake: "Both fires, my son,
 The temporal and eternal, thou hast seen,
 And art arriv'd, where of itself my ken
 No further reaches.  I with skill and art
 Thus far have drawn thee.  Now thy pleasure take
 For guide.  Thou hast o'ercome the steeper way,
 O'ercome the straighter.  Lo! the sun, that darts
 His beam upon thy forehead! lo! the herb,
 The arboreta and flowers, which of itself
 This land pours forth profuse!  Will those bright eyes
 With gladness come, which, weeping, made me haste
 To succour thee, thou mayst or seat thee down,
 Or wander where thou wilt.  Expect no more
 Sanction of warning voice or sign from me,
 Free of thy own arbitrement to choose,
 Discreet, judicious.  To distrust thy sense
 Were henceforth error.  I invest thee then
 With crown and mitre, sovereign o'er thyself."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXVIII
 
 Through that celestial forest, whose thick shade
 With lively greenness the new-springing day
 Attemper'd, eager now to roam, and search
 Its limits round, forthwith I left the bank,
 Along the champain leisurely my way
 Pursuing, o'er the ground, that on all sides
 Delicious odour breath'd.  A pleasant air,
 That intermitted never, never veer'd,
 Smote on my temples, gently, as a wind
 Of softest influence: at which the sprays,
 Obedient all, lean'd trembling to that part
 Where first the holy mountain casts his shade,
 Yet were not so disorder'd, but that still
 Upon their top the feather'd quiristers
 Applied their wonted art, and with full joy
 Welcom'd those hours of prime, and warbled shrill
 Amid the leaves, that to their jocund lays
 inept tenor; even as from branch to branch,
 Along the piney forests on the shore
 Of Chiassi, rolls the gath'ring melody,
 When Eolus hath from his cavern loos'd
 The dripping south.  Already had my steps,
 Though slow, so far into that ancient wood
 Transported me, I could not ken the place
 Where I had enter'd, when behold! my path
 Was bounded by a rill, which to the left
 With little rippling waters bent the grass,
 That issued from its brink.  On earth no wave
 How clean soe'er, that would not seem to have
 Some mixture in itself, compar'd with this,
 Transpicuous, clear; yet darkly on it roll'd,
 Darkly beneath perpetual gloom, which ne'er
 Admits or sun or moon light there to shine.
 
 My feet advanc'd not; but my wond'ring eyes
 Pass'd onward, o'er the streamlet, to survey
 The tender May-bloom, flush'd through many a hue,
 In prodigal variety: and there,
 As object, rising suddenly to view,
 That from our bosom every thought beside
 With the rare marvel chases, I beheld
 A lady all alone, who, singing, went,
 And culling flower from flower, wherewith her way
 Was all o'er painted.  "Lady beautiful!
 Thou, who (if looks, that use to speak the heart,
 Are worthy of our trust), with love's own beam
 Dost warm thee," thus to her my speech I fram'd:
 "Ah! please thee hither towards the streamlet bend
 Thy steps so near, that I may list thy song.
 Beholding thee and this fair place, methinks,
 I call to mind where wander'd and how look'd
 Proserpine, in that season, when her child
 The mother lost, and she the bloomy spring."
 
 As when a lady, turning in the dance,
 Doth foot it featly, and advances scarce
 One step before the other to the ground;
 Over the yellow and vermilion flowers
 Thus turn'd she at my suit, most maiden-like,
 Valing her sober eyes, and came so near,
 That I distinctly caught the dulcet sound.
 Arriving where the limped waters now
 Lav'd the green sward, her eyes she deign'd to raise,
 That shot such splendour on me, as I ween
 Ne'er glanced from Cytherea's, when her son
 Had sped his keenest weapon to her heart.
 Upon the opposite bank she stood and smil'd
 through her graceful fingers shifted still
 The intermingling dyes, which without seed
 That lofty land unbosoms.  By the stream
 Three paces only were we sunder'd: yet
 The Hellespont, where Xerxes pass'd it o'er,
 (A curb for ever to the pride of man)
 Was by Leander not more hateful held
 For floating, with inhospitable wave
 'Twixt Sestus and Abydos, than by me
 That flood, because it gave no passage thence.
 
 "Strangers ye come, and haply in this place,
 That cradled human nature in its birth,
 Wond'ring, ye not without suspicion view
 My smiles: but that sweet strain of psalmody,
 'Thou, Lord! hast made me glad,' will give ye light,
 Which may uncloud your minds.  And thou, who stand'st
 The foremost, and didst make thy suit to me,
 Say if aught else thou wish to hear: for I
 Came prompt to answer every doubt of thine."
 
 She spake; and I replied: "I know not how
 To reconcile this wave and rustling sound
 Of forest leaves, with what I late have heard
 Of opposite report."  She answering thus:
 "I will unfold the cause, whence that proceeds,
 Which makes thee wonder; and so purge the cloud
 That hath enwraps thee.  The First Good, whose joy
 Is only in himself, created man
 For happiness, and gave this goodly place,
 His pledge and earnest of eternal peace.
 Favour'd thus highly, through his own defect
 He fell, and here made short sojourn; he fell,
 And, for the bitterness of sorrow, chang'd
 Laughter unblam'd and ever-new delight.
 That vapours none, exhal'd from earth beneath,
 Or from the waters (which, wherever heat
 Attracts them, follow), might ascend thus far
 To vex man's peaceful state, this mountain rose
 So high toward the heav'n, nor fears the rage
 Of elements contending, from that part
 Exempted, where the gate his limit bars.
 Because the circumambient air throughout
 With its first impulse circles still, unless
 Aught interpose to cheek or thwart its course;
 Upon the summit, which on every side
 To visitation of th' impassive air
 Is open, doth that motion strike, and makes
 Beneath its sway th' umbrageous wood resound:
 And in the shaken plant such power resides,
 That it impregnates with its efficacy
 The voyaging breeze, upon whose subtle plume
 That wafted flies abroad; and th' other land
 Receiving (as 't is worthy in itself,
 Or in the clime, that warms it), doth conceive,
 And from its womb produces many a tree
 Of various virtue.  This when thou hast heard,
 The marvel ceases, if in yonder earth
 Some plant without apparent seed be found
 To fix its fibrous stem.  And further learn,
 That with prolific foison of all seeds,
 This holy plain is fill'd, and in itself
 Bears fruit that ne'er was pluck'd on other soil.
 
 "The water, thou behold'st, springs not from vein,
 As stream, that intermittently repairs
 And spends his pulse of life, but issues forth
 From fountain, solid, undecaying, sure;
 And by the will omnific, full supply
 Feeds whatsoe'er On either side it pours;
 On this devolv'd with power to take away
 Remembrance of offence, on that to bring
 Remembrance back of every good deed done.
 From whence its name of Lethe on this part;
 On th' other Eunoe: both of which must first
 Be tasted ere it work; the last exceeding
 All flavours else.  Albeit thy thirst may now
 Be well contented, if I here break off,
 No more revealing: yet a corollary
 I freely give beside: nor deem my words
 Less grateful to thee, if they somewhat pass
 The stretch of promise.  They, whose verse of yore
 The golden age recorded and its bliss,
 On the Parnassian mountain, of this place
 Perhaps had dream'd.  Here was man guiltless, here
 Perpetual spring and every fruit, and this
 The far-fam'd nectar."  Turning to the bards,
 When she had ceas'd, I noted in their looks
 A smile at her conclusion; then my face
 Again directed to the lovely dame.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIX
 
 Singing, as if enamour'd, she resum'd
 And clos'd the song, with "Blessed they whose sins
 Are cover'd."  Like the wood-nymphs then, that tripp'd
 Singly across the sylvan shadows, one
 Eager to view and one to 'scape the sun,
 So mov'd she on, against the current, up
 The verdant rivage.  I, her mincing step
 Observing, with as tardy step pursued.
 
 Between us not an hundred paces trod,
 The bank, on each side bending equally,
 Gave me to face the orient.  Nor our way
 Far onward brought us, when to me at once
 She turn'd, and cried: "My brother! look and hearken."
 And lo! a sudden lustre ran across
 Through the great forest on all parts, so bright
 I doubted whether lightning were abroad;
 But that expiring ever in the spleen,
 That doth unfold it, and this during still
 And waxing still in splendor, made me question
 What it might be: and a sweet melody
 Ran through the luminous air.  Then did I chide
 With warrantable zeal the hardihood
 Of our first parent, for that there were earth
 Stood in obedience to the heav'ns, she only,
 Woman, the creature of an hour, endur'd not
 Restraint of any veil: which had she borne
 Devoutly, joys, ineffable as these,
 Had from the first, and long time since, been mine.
 
 While through that wilderness of primy sweets
 That never fade, suspense I walk'd, and yet
 Expectant of beatitude more high,
 Before us, like a blazing fire, the air
 Under the green boughs glow'd; and, for a song,
 Distinct the sound of melody was heard.
 
 O ye thrice holy virgins! for your sakes
 If e'er I suffer'd hunger, cold and watching,
 Occasion calls on me to crave your bounty.
 Now through my breast let Helicon his stream
 Pour copious; and Urania with her choir
 Arise to aid me: while the verse unfolds
 Things that do almost mock the grasp of thought.
 
 Onward a space, what seem'd seven trees of gold,
 The intervening distance to mine eye
 Falsely presented; but when I was come
 So near them, that no lineament was lost
 Of those, with which a doubtful object, seen
 Remotely, plays on the misdeeming sense,
 Then did the faculty, that ministers
 Discourse to reason, these for tapers of gold
 Distinguish, and it th' singing trace the sound
 "Hosanna."  Above, their beauteous garniture
 Flam'd with more ample lustre, than the moon
 Through cloudless sky at midnight in her full.
 
 I turn'd me full of wonder to my guide;
 And he did answer with a countenance
 Charg'd with no less amazement: whence my view
 Reverted to those lofty things, which came
 So slowly moving towards us, that the bride
 Would have outstript them on her bridal day.
 
 The lady called aloud: "Why thus yet burns
 Affection in thee for these living, lights,
 And dost not look on that which follows them?"
 
 I straightway mark'd a tribe behind them walk,
 As if attendant on their leaders, cloth'd
 With raiment of such whiteness, as on earth
 Was never.  On my left, the wat'ry gleam
 Borrow'd, and gave me back, when there I look'd.
 As in a mirror, my left side portray'd.
 
 When I had chosen on the river's edge
 Such station, that the distance of the stream
 Alone did separate me; there I stay'd
 My steps for clearer prospect, and beheld
 The flames go onward, leaving, as they went,
 The air behind them painted as with trail
 Of liveliest pencils! so distinct were mark'd
 All those sev'n listed colours, whence the sun
 Maketh his bow, and Cynthia her zone.
 These streaming gonfalons did flow beyond
 My vision; and ten paces, as I guess,
 Parted the outermost.  Beneath a sky
 So beautiful, came foul and-twenty elders,
 By two and two, with flower-de-luces crown'd.
 
 All sang one song: "Blessed be thou among
 The daughters of Adam! and thy loveliness
 Blessed for ever!"  After that the flowers,
 And the fresh herblets, on the opposite brink,
 Were free from that elected race; as light
 In heav'n doth second light, came after them
 Four animals, each crown'd with verdurous leaf.
 With six wings each was plum'd, the plumage full
 Of eyes, and th' eyes of Argus would be such,
 Were they endued with life.  Reader, more rhymes
 Will not waste in shadowing forth their form:
 For other need no straitens, that in this
 I may not give my bounty room.  But read
 Ezekiel; for he paints them, from the north
 How he beheld them come by Chebar's flood,
 In whirlwind, cloud and fire; and even such
 As thou shalt find them character'd by him,
 Here were they; save as to the pennons; there,
 From him departing, John accords with me.
 
 The space, surrounded by the four, enclos'd
 A car triumphal: on two wheels it came
 Drawn at a Gryphon's neck; and he above
 Stretch'd either wing uplifted, 'tween the midst
 And the three listed hues, on each side three;
 So that the wings did cleave or injure none;
 And out of sight they rose.  The members, far
 As he was bird, were golden; white the rest
 With vermeil intervein'd.  So beautiful
 A car in Rome ne'er grac'd Augustus pomp,
 Or Africanus': e'en the sun's itself
 Were poor to this, that chariot of the sun
 Erroneous, which in blazing ruin fell
 At Tellus' pray'r devout, by the just doom
 Mysterious of all-seeing Jove.  Three nymphs
 at the right wheel, came circling in smooth dance;
 The one so ruddy, that her form had scarce
 Been known within a furnace of clear flame:
 The next did look, as if the flesh and bones
 Were emerald: snow new-fallen seem'd the third.
 
 Now seem'd the white to lead, the ruddy now;
 And from her song who led, the others took
 Their treasure, swift or slow.  At th' other wheel,
 A band quaternion, each in purple clad,
 Advanc'd with festal step, as of them one
 The rest conducted, one, upon whose front
 Three eyes were seen.  In rear of all this group,
 Two old men I beheld, dissimilar
 In raiment, but in port and gesture like,
 Solid and mainly grave; of whom the one
 Did show himself some favour'd counsellor
 Of the great Coan, him, whom nature made
 To serve the costliest creature of her tribe.
 His fellow mark'd an opposite intent,
 Bearing a sword, whose glitterance and keen edge,
 E'en as I view'd it with the flood between,
 Appall'd me.  Next four others I beheld,
 Of humble seeming: and, behind them all,
 One single old man, sleeping, as he came,
 With a shrewd visage.  And these seven, each
 Like the first troop were habited, but wore
 No braid of lilies on their temples wreath'd.
 Rather with roses and each vermeil flower,
 A sight, but little distant, might have sworn,
 That they were all on fire above their brow.
 
 Whenas the car was o'er against me, straight.
 Was heard a thund'ring, at whose voice it seem'd
 The chosen multitude were stay'd; for there,
 With the first ensigns, made they solemn halt.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXX
 
 Soon as the polar light, which never knows
 Setting nor rising, nor the shadowy veil
 Of other cloud than sin, fair ornament
 Of the first heav'n, to duty each one there
 Safely convoying, as that lower doth
 The steersman to his port, stood firmly fix'd;
 Forthwith the saintly tribe, who in the van
 Between the Gryphon and its radiance came,
 Did turn them to the car, as to their rest:
 And one, as if commission'd from above,
 In holy chant thrice shorted forth aloud:
 "Come, spouse, from Libanus!" and all the rest
 Took up the song--At the last audit so
 The blest shall rise, from forth his cavern each
 Uplifting lightly his new-vested flesh,
 As, on the sacred litter, at the voice
 Authoritative of that elder, sprang
 A hundred ministers and messengers
 Of life eternal.  "Blessed thou! who com'st!"
 And, "O," they cried, "from full hands scatter ye
 Unwith'ring lilies;" and, so saying, cast
 Flowers over head and round them on all sides.
 
 I have beheld, ere now, at break of day,
 The eastern clime all roseate, and the sky
 Oppos'd, one deep and beautiful serene,
 And the sun's face so shaded, and with mists
 Attemper'd at lids rising, that the eye
 Long while endur'd the sight: thus in a cloud
 Of flowers, that from those hands angelic rose,
 And down, within and outside of the car,
 Fell showering, in white veil with olive wreath'd,
 A virgin in my view appear'd, beneath
 Green mantle, rob'd in hue of living flame:
 
 And o'er my Spirit, that in former days
 Within her presence had abode so long,
 No shudd'ring terror crept.  Mine eyes no more
 Had knowledge of her; yet there mov'd from her
 A hidden virtue, at whose touch awak'd,
 The power of ancient love was strong within me.
 
 No sooner on my vision streaming, smote
 The heav'nly influence, which years past, and e'en
 In childhood, thrill'd me, than towards Virgil I
 Turn'd me to leftward, panting, like a babe,
 That flees for refuge to his mother's breast,
 If aught have terrified or work'd him woe:
 And would have cried: "There is no dram of blood,
 That doth not quiver in me.  The old flame
 Throws out clear tokens of reviving fire:"
 But Virgil had bereav'd us of himself,
 Virgil, my best-lov'd father; Virgil, he
 To whom I gave me up for safety: nor,
 All, our prime mother lost, avail'd to save
 My undew'd cheeks from blur of soiling tears.
 
 "Dante, weep not, that Virgil leaves thee: nay,
 Weep thou not yet: behooves thee feel the edge
 Of other sword, and thou shalt weep for that."
 
 As to the prow or stern, some admiral
 Paces the deck, inspiriting his crew,
 When 'mid the sail-yards all hands ply aloof;
 Thus on the left side of the car I saw,
 (Turning me at the sound of mine own name,
 Which here I am compell'd to register)
 The virgin station'd, who before appeared
 Veil'd in that festive shower angelical.
 
 Towards me, across the stream, she bent her eyes;
 Though from her brow the veil descending, bound
 With foliage of Minerva, suffer'd not
 That I beheld her clearly; then with act
 Full royal, still insulting o'er her thrall,
 Added, as one, who speaking keepeth back
 The bitterest saying, to conclude the speech:
 "Observe me well.  I am, in sooth, I am
 Beatrice.  What! and hast thou deign'd at last
 Approach the mountainnewest not, O man!
 Thy happiness is whole?"  Down fell mine eyes
 On the clear fount, but there, myself espying,
 Recoil'd, and sought the greensward: such a weight
 Of shame was on my forehead.  With a mien
 Of that stern majesty, which doth surround
 mother's presence to her awe-struck child,
 She look'd; a flavour of such bitterness
 Was mingled in her pity.  There her words
 Brake off, and suddenly the angels sang:
 "In thee, O gracious Lord, my hope hath been:"
 But went no farther than, "Thou Lord, hast set
 My feet in ample room."  As snow, that lies
 Amidst the living rafters on the back
 Of Italy congeal'd when drifted high
 And closely pil'd by rough Sclavonian blasts,
 Breathe but the land whereon no shadow falls,
 And straightway melting it distils away,
 Like a fire-wasted taper: thus was I,
 Without a sigh or tear, or ever these
 Did sing, that with the chiming of heav'n's sphere,
 Still in their warbling chime: but when the strain
 Of dulcet symphony, express'd for me
 Their soft compassion, more than could the words
 "Virgin, why so consum'st him?"  then the ice,
 Congeal'd about my bosom, turn'd itself
 To spirit and water, and with anguish forth
 Gush'd through the lips and eyelids from the heart.
 
 Upon the chariot's right edge still she stood,
 Immovable, and thus address'd her words
 To those bright semblances with pity touch'd:
 "Ye in th' eternal day your vigils keep,
 So that nor night nor slumber, with close stealth,
 Conveys from you a single step in all
 The goings on of life: thence with more heed
 I shape mine answer, for his ear intended,
 Who there stands weeping, that the sorrow now
 May equal the transgression.  Not alone
 Through operation of the mighty orbs,
 That mark each seed to some predestin'd aim,
 As with aspect or fortunate or ill
 The constellations meet, but through benign
 Largess of heav'nly graces, which rain down
 From such a height, as mocks our vision, this man
 Was in the freshness of his being, such,
 So gifted virtually, that in him
 All better habits wond'rously had thriv'd.
 The more of kindly strength is in the soil,
 So much doth evil seed and lack of culture
 Mar it the more, and make it run to wildness.
 These looks sometime upheld him; for I show'd
 My youthful eyes, and led him by their light
 In upright walking.  Soon as I had reach'd
 The threshold of my second age, and chang'd
 My mortal for immortal, then he left me,
 And gave himself to others.  When from flesh
 To spirit I had risen, and increase
 Of beauty and of virtue circled me,
 I was less dear to him, and valued less.
 His steps were turn'd into deceitful ways,
 Following false images of good, that make
 No promise perfect.  Nor avail'd me aught
 To sue for inspirations, with the which,
 I, both in dreams of night, and otherwise,
 Did call him back; of them so little reck'd him,
 Such depth he fell, that all device was short
 Of his preserving, save that he should view
 The children of perdition.  To this end
 I visited the purlieus of the dead:
 And one, who hath conducted him thus high,
 Receiv'd my supplications urg'd with weeping.
 It were a breaking of God's high decree,
 If Lethe should be past, and such food tasted
 Without the cost of some repentant tear."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXI
 
 "O Thou!"  her words she thus without delay
 Resuming, turn'd their point on me, to whom
 They but with lateral edge seem'd harsh before,
 "Say thou, who stand'st beyond the holy stream,
 If this be true.  A charge so grievous needs
 Thine own avowal."  On my faculty
 Such strange amazement hung, the voice expir'd
 Imperfect, ere its organs gave it birth.
 
 A little space refraining, then she spake:
 "What dost thou muse on?  Answer me.  The wave
 On thy remembrances of evil yet
 Hath done no injury."  A mingled sense
 Of fear and of confusion, from my lips
 Did such a "Yea" produce, as needed help
 Of vision to interpret.  As when breaks
 In act to be discharg'd, a cross-bow bent
 Beyond its pitch, both nerve and bow o'erstretch'd,
 The flagging weapon feebly hits the mark;
 Thus, tears and sighs forth gushing, did I burst
 Beneath the heavy load, and thus my voice
 Was slacken'd on its way.  She straight began:
 "When my desire invited thee to love
 The good, which sets a bound to our aspirings,
 What bar of thwarting foss or linked chain
 Did meet thee, that thou so should'st quit the hope
 Of further progress, or what bait of ease
 Or promise of allurement led thee on
 Elsewhere, that thou elsewhere should'st rather wait?"
 
 A bitter sigh I drew, then scarce found voice
 To answer, hardly to these sounds my lips
 Gave utterance, wailing: "Thy fair looks withdrawn,
 Things present, with deceitful pleasures, turn'd
 My steps aside."  She answering spake: "Hadst thou
 Been silent, or denied what thou avow'st,
 Thou hadst not hid thy sin the more: such eye
 Observes it.  But whene'er the sinner's cheek
 Breaks forth into the precious-streaming tears
 Of self-accusing, in our court the wheel
 Of justice doth run counter to the edge.
 Howe'er that thou may'st profit by thy shame
 For errors past, and that henceforth more strength
 May arm thee, when thou hear'st the Siren-voice,
 Lay thou aside the motive to this grief,
 And lend attentive ear, while I unfold
 How opposite a way my buried flesh
 Should have impell'd thee.  Never didst thou spy
 In art or nature aught so passing sweet,
 As were the limbs, that in their beauteous frame
 Enclos'd me, and are scatter'd now in dust.
 If sweetest thing thus fail'd thee with my death,
 What, afterward, of mortal should thy wish
 Have tempted?  When thou first hadst felt the dart
 Of perishable things, in my departing
 For better realms, thy wing thou should'st have prun'd
 To follow me, and never stoop'd again
 To 'bide a second blow for a slight girl,
 Or other gaud as transient and as vain.
 The new and inexperienc'd bird awaits,
 Twice it may be, or thrice, the fowler's aim;
 But in the sight of one, whose plumes are full,
 In vain the net is spread, the arrow wing'd."
 
 I stood, as children silent and asham'd
 Stand, list'ning, with their eyes upon the earth,
 Acknowledging their fault and self-condemn'd.
 And she resum'd: "If, but to hear thus pains thee,
 Raise thou thy beard, and lo! what sight shall do!"
 
 With less reluctance yields a sturdy holm,
 Rent from its fibers by a blast, that blows
 From off the pole, or from Iarbas' land,
 Than I at her behest my visage rais'd:
 And thus the face denoting by the beard,
 I mark'd the secret sting her words convey'd.
 
 No sooner lifted I mine aspect up,
 Than downward sunk that vision I beheld
 Of goodly creatures vanish; and mine eyes
 Yet unassur'd and wavering, bent their light
 On Beatrice.  Towards the animal,
 Who joins two natures in one form, she turn'd,
 And, even under shadow of her veil,
 And parted by the verdant rill, that flow'd
 Between, in loveliness appear'd as much
 Her former self surpassing, as on earth
 All others she surpass'd.  Remorseful goads
 Shot sudden through me.  Each thing else, the more
 Its love had late beguil'd me, now the more
 I Was loathsome.  On my heart so keenly smote
 The bitter consciousness, that on the ground
 O'erpower'd I fell: and what my state was then,
 She knows who was the cause.  When now my strength
 Flow'd back, returning outward from the heart,
 The lady, whom alone I first had seen,
 I found above me.  "Loose me not," she cried:
 "Loose not thy hold;" and lo! had dragg'd me high
 As to my neck into the stream, while she,
 Still as she drew me after, swept along,
 Swift as a shuttle, bounding o'er the wave.
 
 The blessed shore approaching then was heard
 So sweetly, "Tu asperges me," that I
 May not remember, much less tell the sound.
 The beauteous dame, her arms expanding, clasp'd
 My temples, and immerg'd me, where 't was fit
 The wave should drench me: and thence raising up,
 Within the fourfold dance of lovely nymphs
 Presented me so lav'd, and with their arm
 They each did cover me.  "Here are we nymphs,
 And in the heav'n are stars.  Or ever earth
 Was visited of Beatrice, we
 Appointed for her handmaids, tended on her.
 We to her eyes will lead thee; but the light
 Of gladness that is in them, well to scan,
 Those yonder three, of deeper ken than ours,
 Thy sight shall quicken."  Thus began their song;
 And then they led me to the Gryphon's breast,
 While, turn'd toward us, Beatrice stood.
 "Spare not thy vision.  We have stationed thee
 Before the emeralds, whence love erewhile
 Hath drawn his weapons on thee."  As they spake,
 A thousand fervent wishes riveted
 Mine eyes upon her beaming eyes, that stood
 Still fix'd toward the Gryphon motionless.
 As the sun strikes a mirror, even thus
 Within those orbs the twofold being, shone,
 For ever varying, in one figure now
 Reflected, now in other.  Reader! muse
 How wond'rous in my sight it seem'd to mark
 A thing, albeit steadfast in itself,
 Yet in its imag'd semblance mutable.
 
 Full of amaze, and joyous, while my soul
 Fed on the viand, whereof still desire
 Grows with satiety, the other three
 With gesture, that declar'd a loftier line,
 Advanc'd: to their own carol on they came
 Dancing in festive ring angelical.
 
 "Turn, Beatrice!" was their song: "O turn
 Thy saintly sight on this thy faithful one,
 Who to behold thee many a wearisome pace
 Hath measur'd.  Gracious at our pray'r vouchsafe
 Unveil to him thy cheeks: that he may mark
 Thy second beauty, now conceal'd."  O splendour!
 O sacred light eternal! who is he
 So pale with musing in Pierian shades,
 Or with that fount so lavishly imbued,
 Whose spirit should not fail him in th' essay
 To represent thee such as thou didst seem,
 When under cope of the still-chiming heaven
 Thou gav'st to open air thy charms reveal'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXII
 
 Mine eyes with such an eager coveting,
 Were bent to rid them of their ten years' thirst,
 No other sense was waking: and e'en they
 Were fenc'd on either side from heed of aught;
 So tangled in its custom'd toils that smile
 Of saintly brightness drew me to itself,
 When forcibly toward the left my sight
 The sacred virgins turn'd; for from their lips
 I heard the warning sounds: "Too fix'd a gaze!"
 
 Awhile my vision labor'd; as when late
 Upon the' o'erstrained eyes the sun hath smote:
 But soon to lesser object, as the view
 Was now recover'd (lesser in respect
 To that excess of sensible, whence late
 I had perforce been sunder'd) on their right
 I mark'd that glorious army wheel, and turn,
 Against the sun and sev'nfold lights, their front.
 As when, their bucklers for protection rais'd,
 A well-rang'd troop, with portly banners curl'd,
 Wheel circling, ere the whole can change their ground:
 E'en thus the goodly regiment of heav'n
 Proceeding, all did pass us, ere the car
 Had slop'd his beam.  Attendant at the wheels
 The damsels turn'd; and on the Gryphon mov'd
 The sacred burden, with a pace so smooth,
 No feather on him trembled.  The fair dame
 Who through the wave had drawn me, companied
 By Statius and myself, pursued the wheel,
 Whose orbit, rolling, mark'd a lesser arch.
 
 Through the high wood, now void (the more her blame,
 Who by the serpent was beguil'd) I past
 With step in cadence to the harmony
 Angelic.  Onward had we mov'd, as far
 Perchance as arrow at three several flights
 Full wing'd had sped, when from her station down
 Descended Beatrice.  With one voice
 All murmur'd  "Adam," circling next a plant
 Despoil'd of flowers and leaf on every bough.
 Its tresses, spreading more as more they rose,
 Were such, as 'midst their forest wilds for height
 The Indians might have gaz'd at.  "Blessed thou!
 Gryphon, whose beak hath never pluck'd that tree
 Pleasant to taste: for hence the appetite
 Was warp'd to evil."  Round the stately trunk
 Thus shouted forth the rest, to whom return'd
 The animal twice-gender'd: "Yea: for so
 The generation of the just are sav'd."
 And turning to the chariot-pole, to foot
 He drew it of the widow'd branch, and bound
 There left unto the stock whereon it grew.
 
 As when large floods of radiance from above
 Stream, with that radiance mingled, which ascends
 Next after setting of the scaly sign,
 Our plants then burgeon, and each wears anew
 His wonted colours, ere the sun have yok'd
 Beneath another star his flamy steeds;
 Thus putting forth a hue, more faint than rose,
 And deeper than the violet, was renew'd
 The plant, erewhile in all its branches bare.
 
 Unearthly was the hymn, which then arose.
 I understood it not, nor to the end
 Endur'd the harmony.  Had I the skill
 To pencil forth, how clos'd th' unpitying eyes
 Slumb'ring, when Syrinx warbled, (eyes that paid
 So dearly for their watching,) then like painter,
 That with a model paints, I might design
 The manner of my falling into sleep.
 But feign who will the slumber cunningly;
 I pass it by to when I wak'd, and tell
 How suddenly a flash of splendour rent
 The curtain of my sleep, and one cries out:
 "Arise, what dost thou?"  As the chosen three,
 On Tabor's mount, admitted to behold
 The blossoming of that fair tree, whose fruit
 Is coveted of angels, and doth make
 Perpetual feast in heaven, to themselves
 Returning at the word, whence deeper sleeps
 Were broken, that they their tribe diminish'd saw,
 Both Moses and Elias gone, and chang'd
 The stole their master wore: thus to myself
 Returning, over me beheld I stand
 The piteous one, who cross the stream had brought
 My steps.  "And where," all doubting, I exclaim'd,
 "Is Beatrice?"--"See her," she replied,
 "Beneath the fresh leaf seated on its root.
 Behold th' associate choir that circles her.
 The others, with a melody more sweet
 And more profound, journeying to higher realms,
 Upon the Gryphon tend."  If there her words
 Were clos'd, I know not; but mine eyes had now
 Ta'en view of her, by whom all other thoughts
 Were barr'd admittance.  On the very ground
 Alone she sat, as she had there been left
 A guard upon the wain, which I beheld
 Bound to the twyform beast.  The seven nymphs
 Did make themselves a cloister round about her,
 And in their hands upheld those lights secure
 From blast septentrion and the gusty south.
 
 "A little while thou shalt be forester here:
 And citizen shalt be forever with me,
 Of that true Rome, wherein Christ dwells a Roman
 To profit the misguided world, keep now
 Thine eyes upon the car; and what thou seest,
 Take heed thou write, returning to that place."
 
 Thus Beatrice: at whose feet inclin'd
 Devout, at her behest, my thought and eyes,
 I, as she bade, directed.  Never fire,
 With so swift motion, forth a stormy cloud
 Leap'd downward from the welkin's farthest bound,
 As I beheld the bird of Jove descending
 Pounce on the tree, and, as he rush'd, the rind,
 Disparting crush beneath him, buds much more
 And leaflets.  On the car with all his might
 He struck, whence, staggering like a ship, it reel'd,
 At random driv'n, to starboard now, o'ercome,
 And now to larboard, by the vaulting waves.
 
 Next springing up into the chariot's womb
 A fox I saw, with hunger seeming pin'd
 Of all good food.  But, for his ugly sins
 The saintly maid rebuking him, away
 Scamp'ring he turn'd, fast as his hide-bound corpse
 Would bear him.  Next, from whence before he came,
 I saw the eagle dart into the hull
 O' th' car, and leave it with his feathers lin'd;
 And then a voice, like that which issues forth
 From heart with sorrow riv'd, did issue forth
 From heav'n, and, "O poor bark of mine!" it cried,
 "How badly art thou freighted!"  Then, it seem'd,
 That the earth open'd between either wheel,
 And I beheld a dragon issue thence,
 That through the chariot fix'd his forked train;
 And like a wasp that draggeth back the sting,
 So drawing forth his baleful train, he dragg'd
 Part of the bottom forth, and went his way
 Exulting.  What remain'd, as lively turf
 With green herb, so did clothe itself with plumes,
 Which haply had with purpose chaste and kind
 Been offer'd; and therewith were cloth'd the wheels,
 Both one and other, and the beam, so quickly
 A sigh were not breath'd sooner.  Thus transform'd,
 The holy structure, through its several parts,
 Did put forth heads, three on the beam, and one
 On every side; the first like oxen horn'd,
 But with a single horn upon their front
 The four.  Like monster sight hath never seen.
 O'er it methought there sat, secure as rock
 On mountain's lofty top, a shameless whore,
 Whose ken rov'd loosely round her.  At her side,
 As 't were that none might bear her off, I saw
 A giant stand; and ever, and anon
 They mingled kisses.  But, her lustful eyes
 Chancing on me to wander, that fell minion
 Scourg'd her from head to foot all o'er; then full
 Of jealousy, and fierce with rage, unloos'd
 The monster, and dragg'd on, so far across
 The forest, that from me its shades alone
 Shielded the harlot and the new-form'd brute.
 
 
 CANTO XXXIII
 
 "The heathen, Lord! are come!" responsive thus,
 The trinal now, and now the virgin band
 Quaternion, their sweet psalmody began,
 Weeping; and Beatrice listen'd, sad
 And sighing, to the song', in such a mood,
 That Mary, as she stood beside the cross,
 Was scarce more chang'd.  But when they gave her place
 To speak, then, risen upright on her feet,
 She, with a colour glowing bright as fire,
 Did answer: "Yet a little while, and ye
 Shall see me not; and, my beloved sisters,
 Again a little while, and ye shall see me."
 
 Before her then she marshall'd all the seven,
 And, beck'ning only motion'd me, the dame,
 And that remaining sage, to follow her.
 
 So on she pass'd; and had not set, I ween,
 Her tenth step to the ground, when with mine eyes
 Her eyes encounter'd; and, with visage mild,
 "So mend thy pace," she cried, "that if my words
 Address thee, thou mayst still be aptly plac'd
 To hear them."  Soon as duly to her side
 I now had hasten'd: "Brother!" she began,
 "Why mak'st thou no attempt at questioning,
 As thus we walk together?"  Like to those
 Who, speaking with too reverent an awe
 Before their betters, draw not forth the voice
 Alive unto their lips, befell me shell
 That I in sounds imperfect thus began:
 "Lady! what I have need of, that thou know'st,
 And what will suit my need."  She answering thus:
 "Of fearfulness and shame, I will, that thou
 Henceforth do rid thee: that thou speak no more,
 As one who dreams.  Thus far be taught of me:
 The vessel, which thou saw'st the serpent break,
 Was and is not: let him, who hath the blame,
 Hope not to scare God's vengeance with a sop.
 Without an heir for ever shall not be
 That eagle, he, who left the chariot plum'd,
 Which monster made it first and next a prey.
 Plainly I view, and therefore speak, the stars
 E'en now approaching, whose conjunction, free
 From all impediment and bar, brings on
 A season, in the which, one sent from God,
 (Five hundred, five, and ten, do mark him out)
 That foul one, and th' accomplice of her guilt,
 The giant, both shall slay.  And if perchance
 My saying, dark as Themis or as Sphinx,
 Fail to persuade thee, (since like them it foils
 The intellect with blindness) yet ere long
 Events shall be the Naiads, that will solve
 This knotty riddle, and no damage light
 On flock or field.  Take heed; and as these words
 By me are utter'd, teach them even so
 To those who live that life, which is a race
 To death: and when thou writ'st them, keep in mind
 Not to conceal how thou hast seen the plant,
 That twice hath now been spoil'd.  This whoso robs,
 This whoso plucks, with blasphemy of deed
 Sins against God, who for his use alone
 Creating hallow'd it.  For taste of this,
 In pain and in desire, five thousand years
 And upward, the first soul did yearn for him,
 Who punish'd in himself the fatal gust.
 
 "Thy reason slumbers, if it deem this height
 And summit thus inverted of the plant,
 Without due cause: and were not vainer thoughts,
 As Elsa's numbing waters, to thy soul,
 And their fond pleasures had not dyed it dark
 As Pyramus the mulberry, thou hadst seen,
 In such momentous circumstance alone,
 God's equal justice morally implied
 In the forbidden tree.  But since I mark thee
 In understanding harden'd into stone,
 And, to that hardness, spotted too and stain'd,
 So that thine eye is dazzled at my word,
 I will, that, if not written, yet at least
 Painted thou take it in thee, for the cause,
 That one brings home his staff inwreath'd with palm."
 
 I thus: "As wax by seal, that changeth not
 Its impress, now is stamp'd my brain by thee.
 But wherefore soars thy wish'd-for speech so high
 Beyond my sight, that loses it the more,
 The more it strains to reach it?"--"To the end
 That thou mayst know," she answer'd straight, "the school,
 That thou hast follow'd; and how far behind,
 When following my discourse, its learning halts:
 And mayst behold your art, from the divine
 As distant, as the disagreement is
 'Twixt earth and heaven's most high and rapturous orb."
 
 "I not remember," I replied, "that e'er
 I was estrang'd from thee, nor for such fault
 Doth conscience chide me."  Smiling she return'd:
 "If thou canst, not remember, call to mind
 How lately thou hast drunk of Lethe's wave;
 And, sure as smoke doth indicate a flame,
 In that forgetfulness itself conclude
 Blame from thy alienated will incurr'd.
 From henceforth verily my words shall be
 As naked as will suit them to appear
 In thy unpractis'd view."  More sparkling now,
 And with retarded course the sun possess'd
 The circle of mid-day, that varies still
 As th' aspect varies of each several clime,
 When, as one, sent in vaward of a troop
 For escort, pauses, if perchance he spy
 Vestige of somewhat strange and rare: so paus'd
 The sev'nfold band, arriving at the verge
 Of a dun umbrage hoar, such as is seen,
 Beneath green leaves and gloomy branches, oft
 To overbrow a bleak and alpine cliff.
 And, where they stood, before them, as it seem'd,
 Tigris and Euphrates both beheld,
 Forth from one fountain issue; and, like friends,
 Linger at parting. "O enlight'ning beam!
 O glory of our kind! beseech thee say
 What water this, which from one source deriv'd
 Itself removes to distance from itself?"
 
 To such entreaty answer thus was made:
 "Entreat Matilda, that she teach thee this."
 
 And here, as one, who clears himself of blame
 Imputed, the fair dame return'd: "Of me
 He this and more hath learnt; and I am safe
 That Lethe's water hath not hid it from him."
 
 And Beatrice: "Some more pressing care
 That oft the memory 'reeves, perchance hath made
 His mind's eye dark.  But lo! where Eunoe cows!
 Lead thither; and, as thou art wont, revive
 His fainting virtue."  As a courteous spirit,
 That proffers no excuses, but as soon
 As he hath token of another's will,
 Makes it his own; when she had ta'en me, thus
 The lovely maiden mov'd her on, and call'd
 To Statius with an air most lady-like:
 "Come thou with him."  Were further space allow'd,
 Then, Reader, might I sing, though but in part,
 That beverage, with whose sweetness I had ne'er
 Been sated.  But, since all the leaves are full,
 Appointed for this second strain, mine art
 With warning bridle checks me.  I return'd
 From the most holy wave, regenerate,
 If 'en as new plants renew'd with foliage new,
 Pure and made apt for mounting to the stars.
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Divine Comedy of Dante:  Purgatory

 
 
 
 Produced by Judith Smith and Natalie Salter
 
 
 
 
 
 THE VISION
 
 OF
 
 HELL, PURGATORY, AND PARADISE
 
 BY
 
 DANTE ALIGHIERI
 
 
 
 
 
 
 PARADISE
 
 Complete
 
 
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 THE REV. H. F. CARY, M.A.
 
 
 
 
 PARADISE
 
 Canto 1 - 33
 
 
 
 CANTO I
 
 His glory, by whose might all things are mov'd,
 Pierces the universe, and in one part
 Sheds more resplendence, elsewhere less.  In heav'n,
 That largeliest of his light partakes, was I,
 Witness of things, which to relate again
 Surpasseth power of him who comes from thence;
 For that, so near approaching its desire
 Our intellect is to such depth absorb'd,
 That memory cannot follow.  Nathless all,
 That in my thoughts I of that sacred realm
 Could store, shall now be matter of my song.
 
 Benign Apollo! this last labour aid,
 And make me such a vessel of thy worth,
 As thy own laurel claims of me belov'd.
 Thus far hath one of steep Parnassus' brows
 Suffic'd me; henceforth there is need of both
 For my remaining enterprise Do thou
 Enter into my bosom, and there breathe
 So, as when Marsyas by thy hand was dragg'd
 Forth from his limbs unsheath'd.  O power divine!
 If thou to me of shine impart so much,
 That of that happy realm the shadow'd form
 Trac'd in my thoughts I may set forth to view,
 Thou shalt behold me of thy favour'd tree
 Come to the foot, and crown myself with leaves;
 For to that honour thou, and my high theme
 Will fit me.  If but seldom, mighty Sire!
 To grace his triumph gathers thence a wreath
 Caesar or bard (more shame for human wills
 Deprav'd) joy to the Delphic god must spring
 From the Pierian foliage, when one breast
 Is with such thirst inspir'd.  From a small spark
 Great flame hath risen: after me perchance
 Others with better voice may pray, and gain
 From the Cirrhaean city answer kind.
 
 Through diver passages, the world's bright lamp
 Rises to mortals, but through that which joins
 Four circles with the threefold cross, in best
 Course, and in happiest constellation set
 He comes, and to the worldly wax best gives
 Its temper and impression.  Morning there,
 Here eve was by almost such passage made;
 And whiteness had o'erspread that hemisphere,
 Blackness the other part; when to the left
 I saw Beatrice turn'd, and on the sun
 Gazing, as never eagle fix'd his ken.
 As from the first a second beam is wont
 To issue, and reflected upwards rise,
 E'en as a pilgrim bent on his return,
 So of her act, that through the eyesight pass'd
 Into my fancy, mine was form'd; and straight,
 Beyond our mortal wont, I fix'd mine eyes
 Upon the sun.  Much is allowed us there,
 That here exceeds our pow'r; thanks to the place
 Made for the dwelling of the human kind
 
 I suffer'd it not long, and yet so long
 That I beheld it bick'ring sparks around,
 As iron that comes boiling from the fire.
 And suddenly upon the day appear'd
 A day new-ris'n, as he, who hath the power,
 Had with another sun bedeck'd the sky.
 
 Her eyes fast fix'd on the eternal wheels,
 Beatrice stood unmov'd; and I with ken
 Fix'd upon her, from upward gaze remov'd
 At her aspect, such inwardly became
 As Glaucus, when he tasted of the herb,
 That made him peer among the ocean gods;
 Words may not tell of that transhuman change:
 And therefore let the example serve, though weak,
 For those whom grace hath better proof in store
 
 If I were only what thou didst create,
 Then newly, Love! by whom the heav'n is rul'd,
 Thou know'st, who by thy light didst bear me up.
 Whenas the wheel which thou dost ever guide,
 Desired Spirit! with its harmony
 Temper'd of thee and measur'd, charm'd mine ear,
 Then seem'd to me so much of heav'n to blaze
 With the sun's flame, that rain or flood ne'er made
 A lake so broad.  The newness of the sound,
 And that great light, inflam'd me with desire,
 Keener than e'er was felt, to know their cause.
 
 Whence she who saw me, clearly as myself,
 To calm my troubled mind, before I ask'd,
 Open'd her lips, and gracious thus began:
 "With false imagination thou thyself
 Mak'st dull, so that thou seest not the thing,
 Which thou hadst seen, had that been shaken off.
 Thou art not on the earth as thou believ'st;
 For light'ning scap'd from its own proper place
 Ne'er ran, as thou hast hither now return'd."
 
 Although divested of my first-rais'd doubt,
 By those brief words, accompanied with smiles,
 Yet in new doubt was I entangled more,
 And said: "Already satisfied, I rest
 From admiration deep, but now admire
 How I above those lighter bodies rise."
 
 Whence, after utt'rance of a piteous sigh,
 She tow'rds me bent her eyes, with such a look,
 As on her frenzied child a mother casts;
 Then thus began: "Among themselves all things
 Have order; and from hence the form, which makes
 The universe resemble God.  In this
 The higher creatures see the printed steps
 Of that eternal worth, which is the end
 Whither the line is drawn.  All natures lean,
 In this their order, diversely, some more,
 Some less approaching to their primal source.
 Thus they to different havens are mov'd on
 Through the vast sea of being, and each one
 With instinct giv'n, that bears it in its course;
 This to the lunar sphere directs the fire,
 This prompts the hearts of mortal animals,
 This the brute earth together knits, and binds.
 Nor only creatures, void of intellect,
 Are aim'd at by this bow; but even those,
 That have intelligence and love, are pierc'd.
 That Providence, who so well orders all,
 With her own light makes ever calm the heaven,
 In which the substance, that hath greatest speed,
 Is turn'd: and thither now, as to our seat
 Predestin'd, we are carried by the force
 Of that strong cord, that never looses dart,
 But at fair aim and glad.  Yet is it true,
 That as ofttimes but ill accords the form
 To the design of art, through sluggishness
 Of unreplying matter, so this course
 Is sometimes quitted by the creature, who
 Hath power, directed thus, to bend elsewhere;
 As from a cloud the fire is seen to fall,
 From its original impulse warp'd, to earth,
 By vicious fondness.  Thou no more admire
 Thy soaring, (if I rightly deem,) than lapse
 Of torrent downwards from a mountain's height.
 There would in thee for wonder be more cause,
 If, free of hind'rance, thou hadst fix'd thyself
 Below, like fire unmoving on the earth."
 
 So said, she turn'd toward the heav'n her face.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO II
 
 All ye, who in small bark have following sail'd,
 Eager to listen, on the advent'rous track
 Of my proud keel, that singing cuts its way,
 Backward return with speed, and your own shores
 Revisit, nor put out to open sea,
 Where losing me, perchance ye may remain
 Bewilder'd in deep maze.  The way I pass
 Ne'er yet was run: Minerva breathes the gale,
 Apollo guides me, and another Nine
 To my rapt sight the arctic beams reveal.
 Ye other few, who have outstretch'd the neck.
 Timely for food of angels, on which here
 They live, yet never know satiety,
 Through the deep brine ye fearless may put out
 Your vessel, marking, well the furrow broad
 Before you in the wave, that on both sides
 Equal returns.  Those, glorious, who pass'd o'er
 To Colchos, wonder'd not as ye will do,
 When they saw Jason following the plough.
 
 The increate perpetual thirst, that draws
 Toward the realm of God's own form, bore us
 Swift almost as the heaven ye behold.
 
 Beatrice upward gaz'd, and I on her,
 And in such space as on the notch a dart
 Is plac'd, then loosen'd flies, I saw myself
 Arriv'd, where wond'rous thing engag'd my sight.
 Whence she, to whom no work of mine was hid,
 Turning to me, with aspect glad as fair,
 Bespake me: "Gratefully direct thy mind
 To God, through whom to this first star we come."
 
 Me seem'd as if a cloud had cover'd us,
 Translucent, solid, firm, and polish'd bright,
 Like adamant, which the sun's beam had smit
 Within itself the ever-during pearl
 Receiv'd us, as the wave a ray of light
 Receives, and rests unbroken.  If I then
 Was of corporeal frame, and it transcend
 Our weaker thought, how one dimension thus
 Another could endure, which needs must be
 If body enter body, how much more
 Must the desire inflame us to behold
 That essence, which discovers by what means
 God and our nature join'd!  There will be seen
 That which we hold through faith, not shown by proof,
 But in itself intelligibly plain,
 E'en as the truth that man at first believes.
 
 I answered: "Lady! I with thoughts devout,
 Such as I best can frame, give thanks to Him,
 Who hath remov'd me from the mortal world.
 But tell, I pray thee, whence the gloomy spots
 Upon this body, which below on earth
 Give rise to talk of Cain in fabling quaint?"
 
 She somewhat smil'd, then spake: "If mortals err
 In their opinion, when the key of sense
 Unlocks not, surely wonder's weapon keen
 Ought not to pierce thee; since thou find'st, the wings
 Of reason to pursue the senses' flight
 Are short.  But what thy own thought is, declare."
 
 Then I: "What various here above appears,
 Is caus'd, I deem, by bodies dense or rare."
 
 She then resum'd: "Thou certainly wilt see
 In falsehood thy belief o'erwhelm'd, if well
 Thou listen to the arguments, which I
 Shall bring to face it.  The eighth sphere displays
 Numberless lights, the which in kind and size
 May be remark'd of different aspects;
 If rare or dense of that were cause alone,
 One single virtue then would be in all,
 Alike distributed, or more, or less.
 Different virtues needs must be the fruits
 Of formal principles, and these, save one,
 Will by thy reasoning be destroy'd.  Beside,
 If rarity were of that dusk the cause,
 Which thou inquirest, either in some part
 That planet must throughout be void, nor fed
 With its own matter; or, as bodies share
 Their fat and leanness, in like manner this
 Must in its volume change the leaves.  The first,
 If it were true, had through the sun's eclipse
 Been manifested, by transparency
 Of light, as through aught rare beside effus'd.
 But this is not.  Therefore remains to see
 The other cause: and if the other fall,
 Erroneous so must prove what seem'd to thee.
 If not from side to side this rarity
 Pass through, there needs must be a limit, whence
 Its contrary no further lets it pass.
 And hence the beam, that from without proceeds,
 Must be pour'd back, as colour comes, through glass
 Reflected, which behind it lead conceals.
 Now wilt thou say, that there of murkier hue
 Than in the other part the ray is shown,
 By being thence refracted farther back.
 From this perplexity will free thee soon
 Experience, if thereof thou trial make,
 The fountain whence your arts derive their streame.
 Three mirrors shalt thou take, and two remove
 From thee alike, and more remote the third.
 Betwixt the former pair, shall meet thine eyes;
 Then turn'd toward them, cause behind thy back
 A light to stand, that on the three shall shine,
 And thus reflected come to thee from all.
 Though that beheld most distant do not stretch
 A space so ample, yet in brightness thou
 Will own it equaling the rest.  But now,
 As under snow the ground, if the warm ray
 Smites it, remains dismantled of the hue
 And cold, that cover'd it before, so thee,
 Dismantled in thy mind, I will inform
 With light so lively, that the tremulous beam
 Shall quiver where it falls.  Within the heaven,
 Where peace divine inhabits, circles round
 A body, in whose virtue dies the being
 Of all that it contains.  The following heaven,
 That hath so many lights, this being divides,
 Through  different essences, from it distinct,
 And yet contain'd within it.  The other orbs
 Their separate distinctions variously
 Dispose, for their own seed and produce apt.
 Thus do these organs of the world proceed,
 As thou beholdest now, from step to step,
 Their influences from above deriving,
 And thence transmitting downwards.  Mark me well,
 How through this passage to the truth I ford,
 The truth thou lov'st, that thou henceforth alone,
 May'st know to keep the shallows, safe, untold.
 
 "The virtue and motion of the sacred orbs,
 As mallet by the workman's hand, must needs
 By blessed movers be inspir'd.  This heaven,
 Made beauteous by so many luminaries,
 From the deep spirit, that moves its circling sphere,
 Its image takes an impress as a seal:
 And as the soul, that dwells within your dust,
 Through members different, yet together form'd,
 In different pow'rs resolves itself; e'en so
 The intellectual efficacy unfolds
 Its goodness multiplied throughout the stars;
 On its own unity revolving still.
 Different virtue compact different
 Makes with the precious body it enlivens,
 With which it knits, as life in you is knit.
 From its original nature full of joy,
 The virtue mingled through the body shines,
 As joy through pupil of the living eye.
 From hence proceeds, that which from light to light
 Seems different, and not from dense or rare.
 This is the formal cause, that generates
 Proportion'd to its power, the dusk or clear."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO III
 
 That sun, which erst with love my bosom warm'd
 Had of fair truth unveil'd the sweet aspect,
 By proof of right, and of the false reproof;
 And I, to own myself convinc'd and free
 Of doubt, as much as needed, rais'd my head
 Erect for speech.  But soon a sight appear'd,
 Which, so intent to mark it, held me fix'd,
 That of confession I no longer thought.
 
 As through translucent and smooth glass, or wave
 Clear and unmov'd, and flowing not so deep
 As that its bed is dark, the shape returns
 So faint of our impictur'd lineaments,
 That on white forehead set a pearl as strong
 Comes to the eye: such saw I many a face,
 All stretch'd to speak, from whence I straight conceiv'd
 Delusion opposite to that, which rais'd
 Between the man and fountain, amorous flame.
 
 Sudden, as I perceiv'd them, deeming these
 Reflected semblances to see of whom
 They were, I turn'd mine eyes, and nothing saw;
 Then turn'd them back, directed on the light
 Of my sweet guide, who smiling shot forth beams
 From her celestial eyes.  "Wonder not thou,"
 She cry'd, "at this my smiling, when I see
 Thy childish judgment; since not yet on truth
 It rests the foot, but, as it still is wont,
 Makes thee fall back in unsound vacancy.
 True substances are these, which thou behold'st,
 Hither through failure of their vow exil'd.
 But speak thou with them; listen, and believe,
 That the true light, which fills them with desire,
 Permits not from its beams their feet to stray."
 
 Straight to the shadow which for converse seem'd
 Most earnest, I addressed me, and began,
 As one by over-eagerness perplex'd:
 "O spirit, born for joy! who in the rays
 Of life eternal, of that sweetness know'st
 The flavour, which, not tasted, passes far
 All apprehension, me it well would please,
 If thou wouldst tell me of thy name, and this
 Your station here." Whence she, with kindness prompt,
 And eyes glist'ning with smiles: "Our charity,
 To any wish by justice introduc'd,
 Bars not the door, no more than she above,
 Who would have all her court be like herself.
 I was a virgin sister in the earth;
 And if thy mind observe me well, this form,
 With such addition grac'd of loveliness,
 Will not conceal me long, but thou wilt know
 Piccarda, in the tardiest sphere thus plac'd,
 Here 'mid these other blessed also blest.
 Our hearts, whose high affections burn alone
 With pleasure, from the Holy Spirit conceiv'd,
 Admitted to his order dwell in joy.
 And this condition, which appears so low,
 Is for this cause assign'd us, that our vows
 Were in some part neglected and made void."
 
 Whence I to her replied: "Something divine
 Beams in your countenance, wond'rous fair,
 From former knowledge quite transmuting you.
 Therefore to recollect was I so slow.
 But what thou sayst hath to my memory
 Given now such aid, that to retrace your forms
 Is easier.  Yet inform me, ye, who here
 Are happy, long ye for a higher place
 More to behold, and more in love to dwell?"
 
 She with those other spirits gently smil'd,
 Then answer'd with such gladness, that she seem'd
 With love's first flame to glow: "Brother! our will
 Is in composure settled by the power
 Of charity, who makes us will alone
 What we possess, and nought beyond desire;
 If we should wish to be exalted more,
 Then must our wishes jar with the high will
 Of him, who sets us here, which in these orbs
 Thou wilt confess not possible, if here
 To be in charity must needs befall,
 And if her nature well thou contemplate.
 Rather it is inherent in this state
 Of blessedness, to keep ourselves within
 The divine will, by which our wills with his
 Are one.  So that as we from step to step
 Are plac'd throughout this kingdom, pleases all,
 E'en as our King, who in us plants his will;
 And in his will is our tranquillity;
 It is the mighty ocean, whither tends
 Whatever it creates and nature makes."
 
 Then saw I clearly how each spot in heav'n
 Is Paradise, though with like gracious dew
 The supreme virtue show'r not over all.
 
 But as it chances, if one sort of food
 Hath satiated, and of another still
 The appetite remains, that this is ask'd,
 And thanks for that return'd; e'en so did I
 In word and motion, bent from her to learn
 What web it was, through which she had not drawn
 The shuttle to its point.  She thus began:
 "Exalted worth and perfectness of life
 The Lady higher up enshrine in heaven,
 By whose pure laws upon your nether earth
 The robe and veil they wear, to that intent,
 That e'en till death they may keep watch or sleep
 With their great bridegroom, who accepts each vow,
 Which to his gracious pleasure love conforms.
 from the world, to follow her, when young
 Escap'd; and, in her vesture mantling me,
 Made promise of the way her sect enjoins.
 Thereafter men, for ill than good more apt,
 Forth snatch'd me from the pleasant cloister's pale.
 God knows how after that my life was fram'd.
 This other splendid shape, which thou beholdst
 At my right side, burning with all the light
 Of this our orb, what of myself I tell
 May to herself apply.  From her, like me
 A sister, with like violence were torn
 The saintly folds, that shaded her fair brows.
 E'en when she to the world again was brought
 In spite of her own will and better wont,
 Yet not for that the bosom's inward veil
 Did she renounce.  This is the luminary
 Of mighty Constance, who from that loud blast,
 Which blew the second over Suabia's realm,
 That power produc'd, which was the third and last."
 
 She ceas'd from further talk, and then began
 "Ave Maria" singing, and with that song
 Vanish'd, as heavy substance through deep wave.
 
 Mine eye, that far as it was capable,
 Pursued her, when in dimness she was lost,
 Turn'd to the mark where greater want impell'd,
 And bent on Beatrice all its gaze.
 But she as light'ning beam'd upon my looks:
 So that the sight sustain'd it not at first.
 Whence I to question her became less prompt.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO IV
 
 Between two kinds of food, both equally
 Remote and tempting, first a man might die
 Of hunger, ere he one could freely choose.
 E'en so would stand a lamb between the maw
 Of two fierce wolves, in dread of both alike:
 E'en so between two deer a dog would stand,
 Wherefore, if I was silent, fault nor praise
 I to myself impute, by equal doubts
 Held in suspense, since of necessity
 It happen'd.  Silent was I, yet desire
 Was painted in my looks; and thus I spake
 My wish more earnestly than language could.
 
 As Daniel, when the haughty king he freed
 From ire, that spurr'd him on to deeds unjust
 And violent; so look'd Beatrice then.
 
 "Well I discern," she thus her words address'd,
 "How contrary desires each way constrain thee,
 So that thy anxious thought is in itself
 Bound up and stifled, nor breathes freely forth.
 Thou arguest; if the good intent remain;
 What reason that another's violence
 Should stint the measure of my fair desert?
 
 "Cause too thou findst for doubt, in that it seems,
 That spirits to the stars, as Plato deem'd,
 Return.  These are the questions which thy will
 Urge equally; and therefore I the first
 Of that will treat which hath the more of gall.
 Of seraphim he who is most ensky'd,
 Moses and Samuel, and either John,
 Choose which thou wilt, nor even Mary's self,
 Have not in any other heav'n their seats,
 Than have those spirits which so late thou saw'st;
 Nor more or fewer years exist; but all
 Make the first circle beauteous, diversely
 Partaking of sweet life, as more or less
 Afflation of eternal bliss pervades them.
 Here were they shown thee, not that fate assigns
 This for their sphere, but for a sign to thee
 Of that celestial furthest from the height.
 Thus needs, that ye may apprehend, we speak:
 Since from things sensible alone ye learn
 That, which digested rightly after turns
 To intellectual.  For no other cause
 The scripture, condescending graciously
 To your perception, hands and feet to God
 Attributes, nor so means: and holy church
 Doth represent with human countenance
 Gabriel, and Michael, and him who made
 Tobias whole.  Unlike what here thou seest,
 The judgment of Timaeus, who affirms
 Each soul restor'd to its particular star,
 Believing it to have been taken thence,
 When nature gave it to inform her mold:
 Since to appearance his intention is
 E'en what his words declare: or else to shun
 Derision, haply thus he hath disguis'd
 His true opinion.  If his meaning be,
 That to the influencing of these orbs revert
 The honour and the blame in human acts,
 Perchance he doth not wholly miss the truth.
 This principle, not understood aright,
 Erewhile perverted well nigh all the world;
 So that it fell to fabled names of Jove,
 And Mercury, and Mars.  That other doubt,
 Which moves thee, is less harmful; for it brings
 No peril of removing thee from me.
 
 "That, to the eye of man, our justice seems
 Unjust, is argument for faith, and not
 For heretic declension.  To the end
 This truth may stand more clearly in your view,
 I will content thee even to thy wish
 
 "If violence be, when that which suffers, nought
 Consents to that which forceth, not for this
 These spirits stood exculpate.  For the will,
 That will not, still survives unquench'd, and doth
 As nature doth in fire, tho' violence
 Wrest it a thousand times; for, if it yield
 Or more or less, so far it follows force.
 And thus did these, whom they had power to seek
 The hallow'd place again.  In them, had will
 Been perfect, such as once upon the bars
 Held Laurence firm, or wrought in Scaevola
 To his own hand remorseless, to the path,
 Whence they were drawn, their steps had hasten'd back,
 When liberty return'd: but in too few
 Resolve so steadfast dwells.  And by these words
 If duly weigh'd, that argument is void,
 Which oft might have perplex'd thee still.  But now
 Another question thwarts thee, which to solve
 Might try thy patience without better aid.
 I have, no doubt, instill'd into thy mind,
 That blessed spirit may not lie; since near
 The source of primal truth it dwells for aye:
 And thou might'st after of Piccarda learn
 That Constance held affection to the veil;
 So that she seems to contradict me here.
 Not seldom, brother, it hath chanc'd for men
 To do what they had gladly left undone,
 Yet to shun peril they have done amiss:
 E'en as Alcmaeon, at his father's suit
 Slew his own mother, so made pitiless
 Not to lose pity.  On this point bethink thee,
 That force and will are blended in such wise
 As not to make the' offence excusable.
 Absolute will agrees not to the wrong,
 That inasmuch as there is fear of woe
 From non-compliance, it agrees.  Of will
 Thus absolute Piccarda spake, and I
 Of th' other; so that both have truly said."
 
 Such was the flow of that pure rill, that well'd
 From forth the fountain of all truth; and such
 The rest, that to my wond'ring thoughts I found.
 
 "O thou of primal love the prime delight!
 Goddess!"  I straight reply'd, "whose lively words
 Still shed new heat and vigour through my soul!
 Affection fails me to requite thy grace
 With equal sum of gratitude: be his
 To recompense, who sees and can reward thee.
 Well I discern, that by that truth alone
 Enlighten'd, beyond which no truth may roam,
 Our mind can satisfy her thirst to know:
 Therein she resteth, e'en as in his lair
 The wild beast, soon as she hath reach'd that bound,
 And she hath power to reach it; else desire
 Were given to no end.  And thence doth doubt
 Spring, like a shoot, around the stock of truth;
 And it is nature which from height to height
 On to the summit prompts us.  This invites,
 This doth assure me, lady, rev'rently
 To ask thee of other truth, that yet
 Is dark to me.  I fain would know, if man
 By other works well done may so supply
 The failure of his vows, that in your scale
 They lack not weight."  I spake; and on me straight
 Beatrice look'd with eyes that shot forth sparks
 Of love celestial in such copious stream,
 That, virtue sinking in me overpower'd,
 I turn'd, and downward bent confus'd my sight.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO V
 
 "If beyond earthly wont, the flame of love
 Illume me, so that I o'ercome thy power
 Of vision, marvel not: but learn the cause
 In that perfection of the sight, which soon
 As apprehending, hasteneth on to reach
 The good it apprehends.  I well discern,
 How in thine intellect already shines
 The light eternal, which to view alone
 Ne'er fails to kindle love; and if aught else
 Your love seduces, 't is but that it shows
 Some ill-mark'd vestige of that primal beam.
 
 "This would'st thou know, if failure of the vow
 By other service may be so supplied,
 As from self-question to assure the soul."
 
 Thus she her words, not heedless of my wish,
 Began; and thus, as one who breaks not off
 Discourse, continued in her saintly strain.
 "Supreme of gifts, which God creating gave
 Of his free bounty, sign most evident
 Of goodness, and in his account most priz'd,
 Was liberty of will, the boon wherewith
 All intellectual creatures, and them sole
 He hath endow'd.  Hence now thou mayst infer
 Of what high worth the vow, which so is fram'd
 That when man offers, God well-pleas'd accepts;
 For in the compact between God and him,
 This treasure, such as I describe it to thee,
 He makes the victim, and of his own act.
 What compensation therefore may he find?
 If that, whereof thou hast oblation made,
 By using well thou think'st to consecrate,
 Thou would'st of theft do charitable deed.
 Thus I resolve thee of the greater point.
 
 "But forasmuch as holy church, herein
 Dispensing, seems to contradict the truth
 I have discover'd to thee, yet behooves
 Thou rest a little longer at the board,
 Ere the crude aliment, which thou hast taken,
 Digested fitly to nutrition turn.
 Open thy mind to what I now unfold,
 And give it inward keeping.  Knowledge comes
 Of learning well retain'd, unfruitful else.
 
 "This sacrifice in essence of two things
 Consisteth; one is that, whereof 't is made,
 The covenant the other.  For the last,
 It ne'er is cancell'd if not kept: and hence
 I spake erewhile so strictly of its force.
 For this it was enjoin'd the Israelites,
 Though leave were giv'n them, as thou know'st, to change
 The offering, still to offer.  Th' other part,
 The matter and the substance of the vow,
 May well be such, to that without offence
 It may for other substance be exchang'd.
 But at his own discretion none may shift
 The burden on his shoulders, unreleas'd
 By either key, the yellow and the white.
 Nor deem of any change, as less than vain,
 If the last bond be not within the new
 Included, as the quatre in the six.
 No satisfaction therefore can be paid
 For what so precious in the balance weighs,
 That all in counterpoise must kick the beam.
 Take then no vow at random: ta'en, with faith
 Preserve it; yet not bent, as Jephthah once,
 Blindly to execute a rash resolve,
 Whom better it had suited to exclaim,
 'I have done ill,' than to redeem his pledge
 By doing worse or, not unlike to him
 In folly, that great leader of the Greeks:
 Whence, on the alter, Iphigenia mourn'd
 Her virgin beauty, and hath since made mourn
 Both wise and simple, even all, who hear
 Of so fell sacrifice.  Be ye more staid,
 O Christians, not, like feather, by each wind
 Removable: nor think to cleanse ourselves
 In every water.  Either testament,
 The old and new, is yours: and for your guide
 The shepherd of the church let this suffice
 To save you.  When by evil lust entic'd,
 Remember ye be men, not senseless beasts;
 Nor let the Jew, who dwelleth in your streets,
 Hold you in mock'ry.  Be not, as the lamb,
 That, fickle wanton, leaves its mother's milk,
 To dally with itself in idle play."
 
 Such were the words that Beatrice spake:
 These ended, to that region, where the world
 Is liveliest, full of fond desire she turn'd.
 
 Though mainly prompt new question to propose,
 Her silence and chang'd look did keep me dumb.
 And as the arrow, ere the cord is still,
 Leapeth unto its mark; so on we sped
 Into the second realm.  There I beheld
 The dame, so joyous enter, that the orb
 Grew brighter at her smiles; and, if the star
 Were mov'd to gladness, what then was my cheer,
 Whom nature hath made apt for every change!
 
 As in a quiet and clear lake the fish,
 If aught approach them from without, do draw
 Towards it, deeming it their food; so drew
 Full more than thousand splendours towards us,
 And in each one was heard: "Lo! one arriv'd
 To multiply our loves!" and as each came
 The shadow, streaming forth effulgence new,
 Witness'd augmented joy.  Here, reader! think,
 If thou didst miss the sequel of my tale,
 To know the rest how sorely thou wouldst crave;
 And thou shalt see what vehement desire
 Possess'd me, as soon as these had met my view,
 To know their state.  "O born in happy hour!
 Thou to whom grace vouchsafes, or ere thy close
 Of fleshly warfare, to behold the thrones
 Of that eternal triumph, know to us
 The light communicated, which through heaven
 Expatiates without bound.  Therefore, if aught
 Thou of our beams wouldst borrow for thine aid,
 Spare not; and of our radiance take thy fill."
 
 Thus of those piteous spirits one bespake me;
 And Beatrice next: "Say on; and trust
 As unto gods!"--"How in the light supreme
 Thou harbour'st, and from thence the virtue bring'st,
 That, sparkling in thine eyes, denotes thy joy,
 I mark; but, who thou art, am still to seek;
 Or wherefore, worthy spirit! for thy lot
 This sphere assign'd, that oft from mortal ken
 Is veil'd by others' beams."  I said, and turn'd
 Toward the lustre, that with greeting, kind
 Erewhile had hail'd me.  Forthwith brighter far
 Than erst, it wax'd: and, as himself the sun
 Hides through excess of light, when his warm gaze
 Hath on the mantle of thick vapours prey'd;
 Within its proper ray the saintly shape
 Was, through increase of gladness, thus conceal'd;
 And, shrouded so in splendour answer'd me,
 E'en as the tenour of my song declares.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO VI
 
 "After that Constantine the eagle turn'd
 Against the motions of the heav'n, that roll'd
 Consenting with its course, when he of yore,
 Lavinia's spouse, was leader of the flight,
 A hundred years twice told and more, his seat
 At Europe's extreme point, the bird of Jove
 Held, near the mountains, whence he issued first.
 There, under shadow of his sacred plumes
 Swaying the world, till through successive hands
 To mine he came devolv'd.  Caesar I was,
 And am Justinian; destin'd by the will
 Of that prime love, whose influence I feel,
 From vain excess to clear th' encumber'd laws.
 Or ere that work engag'd me, I did hold
 Christ's nature merely human, with such faith
 Contented.  But the blessed Agapete,
 Who was chief shepherd, he with warning voice
 To the true faith recall'd me.  I believ'd
 His words: and what he taught, now plainly see,
 As thou in every contradiction seest
 The true and false oppos'd.  Soon as my feet
 Were to the church reclaim'd, to my great task,
 By inspiration of God's grace impell'd,
 I gave me wholly, and consign'd mine arms
 To Belisarius, with whom heaven's right hand
 Was link'd in such conjointment, 't was a sign
 That I should rest.  To thy first question thus
 I shape mine answer, which were ended here,
 But that its tendency doth prompt perforce
 To some addition; that thou well, mayst mark
 What reason on each side they have to plead,
 By whom that holiest banner is withstood,
 Both who pretend its power and who oppose.
 
 "Beginning from that hour, when Pallas died
 To give it rule, behold the valorous deeds
 Have made it worthy reverence.  Not unknown
 To thee, how for three hundred years and more
 It dwelt in Alba, up to those fell lists
 Where for its sake were met the rival three;
 Nor aught unknown to thee, which it achiev'd
 Down to the Sabines' wrong to Lucrece' woe,
 With its sev'n kings conqu'ring the nation round;
 Nor all it wrought, by Roman worthies home
 'Gainst Brennus and th' Epirot prince, and hosts
 Of single chiefs, or states in league combin'd
 Of social warfare; hence Torquatus stern,
 And Quintius nam'd of his neglected locks,
 The Decii, and the Fabii hence acquir'd
 Their fame, which I with duteous zeal embalm.
 By it the pride of Arab hordes was quell'd,
 When they led on by Hannibal o'erpass'd
 The Alpine rocks, whence glide thy currents, Po!
 Beneath its guidance, in their prime of days
 Scipio and Pompey triumph'd; and that hill,
 Under whose summit thou didst see the light,
 Rued its stern bearing.  After, near the hour,
 When heav'n was minded that o'er all the world
 His own deep calm should brood, to Caesar's hand
 Did Rome consign it; and what then it wrought
 From Var unto the Rhine, saw Isere's flood,
 Saw Loire and Seine, and every vale, that fills
 The torrent Rhone.  What after that it wrought,
 When from Ravenna it came forth, and leap'd
 The Rubicon, was of so bold a flight,
 That tongue nor pen may follow it.  Tow'rds Spain
 It wheel'd its bands, then tow'rd Dyrrachium smote,
 And on Pharsalia with so fierce a plunge,
 E'en the warm Nile was conscious to the pang;
 Its native shores Antandros, and the streams
 Of Simois revisited, and there
 Where Hector lies; then ill for Ptolemy
 His pennons shook again; lightning thence fell
 On Juba; and the next upon your west,
 At sound of the Pompeian trump, return'd.
 
 "What following and in its next bearer's gripe
 It wrought, is now by Cassius and Brutus
 Bark'd off in hell, and by Perugia's sons
 And Modena's was mourn'd.  Hence weepeth still
 Sad Cleopatra, who, pursued by it,
 Took from the adder black and sudden death.
 With him it ran e'en to the Red Sea coast;
 With him compos'd the world to such a peace,
 That of his temple Janus barr'd the door.
 
 "But all the mighty standard yet had wrought,
 And was appointed to perform thereafter,
 Throughout the mortal kingdom which it sway'd,
 Falls in appearance dwindled and obscur'd,
 If one with steady eye and perfect thought
 On the third Caesar look; for to his hands,
 The living Justice, in whose breath I move,
 Committed glory, e'en into his hands,
 To execute the vengeance of its wrath.
 
 "Hear now and wonder at what next I tell.
 After with Titus it was sent to wreak
 Vengeance for vengeance of the ancient sin,
 And, when the Lombard tooth, with fangs impure,
 Did gore the bosom of the holy church,
 Under its wings victorious, Charlemagne
 Sped to her rescue.  Judge then for thyself
 Of those, whom I erewhile accus'd to thee,
 What they are, and how grievous their offending,
 Who are the cause of all your ills.  The one
 Against the universal ensign rears
 The yellow lilies, and with partial aim
 That to himself the other arrogates:
 So that 't is hard to see which more offends.
 Be yours, ye Ghibellines, to veil your arts
 Beneath another standard: ill is this
 Follow'd of him, who severs it and justice:
 And let not with his Guelphs the new-crown'd Charles
 Assail it, but those talons hold in dread,
 Which from a lion of more lofty port
 Have rent the easing.  Many a time ere now
 The sons have for the sire's transgression wail'd;
 Nor let him trust the fond belief, that heav'n
 Will truck its armour for his lilied shield.
 
 "This little star is furnish'd with good spirits,
 Whose mortal lives were busied to that end,
 That honour and renown might wait on them:
 And, when desires thus err in their intention,
 True love must needs ascend with slacker beam.
 But it is part of our delight, to measure
 Our wages with the merit; and admire
 The close proportion.  Hence doth heav'nly justice
 Temper so evenly affection in us,
 It ne'er can warp to any wrongfulness.
 Of diverse voices is sweet music made:
 So in our life the different degrees
 Render sweet harmony among these wheels.
 
 "Within the pearl, that now encloseth us,
 Shines Romeo's light, whose goodly deed and fair
 Met ill acceptance.  But the Provencals,
 That were his foes, have little cause for mirth.
 Ill shapes that man his course, who makes his wrong
 Of other's worth.  Four daughters were there born
 To Raymond Berenger, and every one
 Became a queen; and this for him did Romeo,
 Though of mean state and from a foreign land.
 Yet envious tongues incited him to ask
 A reckoning of that just one, who return'd
 Twelve fold to him for ten.  Aged and poor
 He parted thence: and if the world did know
 The heart he had, begging his life by morsels,
 'T would deem the praise, it yields him, scantly dealt."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO VII
 
 "Hosanna Sanctus Deus Sabaoth
 Superillustrans claritate tua
 Felices ignes horum malahoth!"
 Thus chanting saw I turn that substance bright
 With fourfold lustre to its orb again,
 Revolving; and the rest unto their dance
 With it mov'd also; and like swiftest sparks,
 In sudden distance from my sight were veil'd.
 
 Me doubt possess'd, and "Speak," it whisper'd me,
 "Speak, speak unto thy lady, that she quench
 Thy thirst with drops of sweetness."  Yet blank awe,
 Which lords it o'er me, even at the sound
 Of Beatrice's name, did bow me down
 As one in slumber held.  Not long that mood
 Beatrice suffer'd: she, with such a smile,
 As might have made one blest amid the flames,
 Beaming upon me, thus her words began:
 "Thou in thy thought art pond'ring (as I deem),
 And what I deem is truth how just revenge
 Could be with justice punish'd: from which doubt
 I soon will free thee; so thou mark my words;
 For they of weighty matter shall possess thee.
 
 "That man, who was unborn, himself condemn'd,
 And, in himself, all, who since him have liv'd,
 His offspring: whence, below, the human kind
 Lay sick in grievous error many an age;
 Until it pleas'd the Word of God to come
 Amongst them down, to his own person joining
 The nature, from its Maker far estrang'd,
 By the mere act of his eternal love.
 Contemplate here the wonder I unfold.
 The nature with its Maker thus conjoin'd,
 Created first was blameless, pure and good;
 But through itself alone was driven forth
 From Paradise, because it had eschew'd
 The way of truth and life, to evil turn'd.
 Ne'er then was penalty so just as that
 Inflicted by the cross, if thou regard
 The nature in assumption doom'd: ne'er wrong
 So great, in reference to him, who took
 Such nature on him, and endur'd the doom.
 God therefore and the Jews one sentence pleased:
 So different effects flow'd from one act,
 And heav'n was open'd, though the earth did quake.
 Count it not hard henceforth, when thou dost hear
 That a just vengeance was by righteous court
 Justly reveng'd.  But yet I see thy mind
 By thought on thought arising sore perplex'd,
 And with how vehement desire it asks
 Solution of the maze.  What I have heard,
 Is plain, thou sayst: but wherefore God this way
 For our redemption chose, eludes my search.
 
 "Brother! no eye of man not perfected,
 Nor fully ripen'd in the flame of love,
 May fathom this decree.  It is a mark,
 In sooth, much aim'd at, and but little kenn'd:
 And I will therefore show thee why such way
 Was worthiest.  The celestial love, that spume
 All envying in its bounty, in itself
 With such effulgence blazeth, as sends forth
 All beauteous things eternal.  What distils
 Immediate thence, no end of being knows,
 Bearing its seal immutably impress'd.
 Whatever thence immediate falls, is free,
 Free wholly, uncontrollable by power
 Of each thing new: by such conformity
 More grateful to its author, whose bright beams,
 Though all partake their shining, yet in those
 Are liveliest, which resemble him the most.
 These tokens of pre-eminence on man
 Largely bestow'd, if any of them fail,
 He needs must forfeit his nobility,
 No longer stainless.  Sin alone is that,
 Which doth disfranchise him, and make unlike
 To the chief good; for that its light in him
 Is darken'd.  And to dignity thus lost
 Is no return; unless, where guilt makes void,
 He for ill pleasure pay with equal pain.
 Your nature, which entirely in its seed
 Trangress'd, from these distinctions fell, no less
 Than from its state in Paradise; nor means
 Found of recovery (search all methods out
 As strickly as thou may) save one of these,
 The only fords were left through which to wade,
 Either that God had of his courtesy
 Releas'd him merely, or else man himself
 For his own folly by himself aton'd.
 
 "Fix now thine eye, intently as thou canst,
 On th' everlasting counsel, and explore,
 Instructed by my words, the dread abyss.
 
 "Man in himself had ever lack'd the means
 Of satisfaction, for he could not stoop
 Obeying, in humility so low,
 As high he, disobeying, thought to soar:
 And for this reason he had vainly tried
 Out of his own sufficiency to pay
 The rigid satisfaction.  Then behooved
 That God should by his own ways lead him back
 Unto the life, from whence he fell, restor'd:
 By both his ways, I mean, or one alone.
 But since the deed is ever priz'd the more,
 The more the doer's good intent appears,
 Goodness celestial, whose broad signature
 Is on the universe, of all its ways
 To raise ye up, was fain to leave out none,
 Nor aught so vast or so magnificent,
 Either for him who gave or who receiv'd
 Between the last night and the primal day,
 Was or can be.  For God more bounty show'd.
 Giving himself to make man capable
 Of his return to life, than had the terms
 Been mere and unconditional release.
 And for his justice, every method else
 Were all too scant, had not the Son of God
 Humbled himself to put on mortal flesh.
 
 "Now, to fulfil each wish of thine, remains
 I somewhat further to thy view unfold.
 That thou mayst see as clearly as myself.
 
 "I see, thou sayst, the air, the fire I see,
 The earth and water, and all things of them
 Compounded, to corruption turn, and soon
 Dissolve.  Yet these were also things create,
 Because, if what were told me, had been true
 They from corruption had been therefore free.
 
 "The angels, O my brother! and this clime
 Wherein thou art, impassible and pure,
 I call created, as indeed they are
 In their whole being.  But the elements,
 Which thou hast nam'd, and what of them is made,
 Are by created virtue' inform'd: create
 Their substance, and create the' informing virtue
 In these bright stars, that round them circling move
 The soul of every brute and of each plant,
 The ray and motion of the sacred lights,
 With complex potency attract and turn.
 But this our life the' eternal good inspires
 Immediate, and enamours of itself;
 So that our wishes rest for ever here.
 
 "And hence thou mayst by inference conclude
 Our resurrection certain, if thy mind
 Consider how the human flesh was fram'd,
 When both our parents at the first were made."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO VIII
 
 The world was in its day of peril dark
 Wont to believe the dotage of fond love
 From the fair Cyprian deity, who rolls
 In her third epicycle, shed on men
 By stream of potent radiance: therefore they
 Of elder time, in their old error blind,
 Not her alone with sacrifice ador'd
 And invocation, but like honours paid
 To Cupid and Dione, deem'd of them
 Her mother, and her son, him whom they feign'd
 To sit in Dido's bosom: and from her,
 Whom I have sung preluding, borrow'd they
 The appellation of that star, which views,
 Now obvious and now averse, the sun.
 
 I was not ware that I was wafted up
 Into  its orb; but the new loveliness
 That grac'd my lady, gave me ample proof
 That we had entered there.  And as in flame
 A sparkle is distinct, or voice in voice
 Discern'd, when one its even tenour keeps,
 The other comes and goes; so in that light
 I other luminaries saw, that cours'd
 In circling motion, rapid more or less,
 As their eternal phases each impels.
 
 Never was blast from vapour charged with cold,
 Whether invisible to eye or no,
 Descended with such speed, it had not seem'd
 To linger in dull tardiness, compar'd
 To those celestial lights, that tow'rds us came,
 Leaving the circuit of their joyous ring,
 Conducted by the lofty seraphim.
 And after them, who in the van appear'd,
 Such an hosanna sounded, as hath left
 Desire, ne'er since extinct in me, to hear
 Renew'd the strain.  Then parting from the rest
 One near us drew, and sole began: "We all
 Are ready at thy pleasure, well dispos'd
 To do thee gentle service.  We are they,
 To whom thou in the world erewhile didst Sing
 'O ye! whose intellectual ministry
 Moves the third heaven!' and in one orb we roll,
 One motion, one impulse, with those who rule
 Princedoms in heaven; yet are of love so full,
 That to please thee 't will be as sweet to rest."
 
 After mine eyes had with meek reverence
 Sought the celestial guide, and were by her
 Assur'd, they turn'd again unto the light
 Who had so largely promis'd, and with voice
 That bare the lively pressure of my zeal,
 "Tell who ye are," I cried.  Forthwith it grew
 In size and splendour, through augmented joy;
 And thus it answer'd: "A short date below
 The world possess'd me.  Had the time been more,
 Much evil, that will come, had never chanc'd.
 My gladness hides thee from me, which doth shine
 Around, and shroud me, as an animal
 In its own silk enswath'd.  Thou lov'dst me well,
 And had'st good cause; for had my sojourning
 Been longer on the earth, the love I bare thee
 Had put forth more than blossoms.  The left bank,
 That Rhone, when he hath mix'd with Sorga, laves.
 
 "In me its lord expected, and that horn
 Of fair Ausonia, with its boroughs old,
 Bari, and Croton, and Gaeta pil'd,
 From where the Trento disembogues his waves,
 With Verde mingled, to the salt sea-flood.
 Already on my temples beam'd the crown,
 Which gave me sov'reignty over the land
 By Danube wash'd, whenas he strays beyond
 The limits of his German shores.  The realm,
 Where, on the gulf by stormy Eurus lash'd,
 Betwixt Pelorus and Pachynian heights,
 The beautiful Trinacria lies in gloom
 (Not through Typhaeus, but the vap'ry cloud
 Bituminous upsteam'd), THAT too did look
 To have its scepter wielded by a race
 Of monarchs, sprung through me from Charles and Rodolph;
 had not ill lording which doth spirit up
 The people ever, in Palermo rais'd
 The shout of 'death,' re-echo'd loud and long.
 Had but my brother's foresight kenn'd as much,
 He had been warier that the greedy want
 Of Catalonia might not work his bale.
 And truly need there is, that he forecast,
 Or other for him, lest more freight be laid
 On his already over-laden bark.
 Nature in him, from bounty fall'n to thrift,
 Would ask the  guard of braver arms, than such
 As only care to have their coffers fill'd."
 
 "My liege, it doth enhance the joy thy words
 Infuse into me, mighty as it is,
 To think my gladness manifest to thee,
 As to myself, who own it, when thou lookst
 Into the source and limit of all good,
 There, where thou markest that which thou dost speak,
 Thence priz'd of me the more.  Glad thou hast made me.
 Now make intelligent, clearing the doubt
 Thy speech hath raised in me; for much I muse,
 How bitter can spring up, when sweet is sown."
 
 I thus inquiring; he forthwith replied:
 "If I have power to show one truth, soon that
 Shall face thee, which thy questioning declares
 Behind thee now conceal'd.  The Good, that guides
 And blessed makes this realm, which thou dost mount,
 Ordains its providence to be the virtue
 In these great bodies: nor th' all perfect Mind
 Upholds their nature merely, but in them
 Their energy to save: for nought, that lies
 Within the range of that unerring bow,
 But is as level with the destin'd aim,
 As ever mark to arrow's point oppos'd.
 Were it not thus, these heavens, thou dost visit,
 Would their effect so work, it would not be
 Art, but destruction; and this may not chance,
 If th' intellectual powers, that move these stars,
 Fail not, or who, first faulty made them fail.
 Wilt thou this truth more clearly evidenc'd?"
 
 To whom I thus: "It is enough: no fear,
 I see, lest nature in her part should tire."
 
 He straight rejoin'd: "Say, were it worse for man,
 If he liv'd not in fellowship on earth?"
 
 "Yea," answer'd I; "nor here a reason needs."
 
 "And may that be, if different estates
 Grow not of different duties in your life?
 Consult your teacher, and he tells you 'no."'
 
 Thus did he come, deducing to this point,
 And then concluded: "For this cause behooves,
 The roots, from whence your operations come,
 Must differ.  Therefore one is Solon born;
 Another, Xerxes; and Melchisidec
 A third; and he a fourth, whose airy voyage
 Cost him his son.  In her circuitous course,
 Nature, that is the seal to mortal wax,
 Doth well her art, but no distinctions owns
 'Twixt one or other household.  Hence befalls
 That Esau is so wide of Jacob: hence
 Quirinus of so base a father springs,
 He dates from Mars his lineage.  Were it not
 That providence celestial overrul'd,
 Nature, in generation, must the path
 Trac'd by the generator, still pursue
 Unswervingly.  Thus place I in thy sight
 That, which was late behind thee.  But, in sign
 Of more affection for thee, 't is my will
 Thou wear this corollary.  Nature ever
 Finding discordant fortune, like all seed
 Out of its proper climate, thrives but ill.
 And were the world below content to mark
 And work on the foundation nature lays,
 It would not lack supply of excellence.
 But ye perversely to religion strain
 Him, who was born to gird on him the sword,
 And of the fluent phrasemen make your king;
 Therefore your steps have wander'd from the paths."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO IX
 
 After solution of my doubt, thy Charles,
 O fair Clemenza, of the treachery spake
 That must befall his seed: but, "Tell it not,"
 Said he, "and let the destin'd years come round."
 Nor may I tell thee more, save that the meed
 Of sorrow well-deserv'd shall quit your wrongs.
 
 And now the visage of that saintly light
 Was to the sun, that fills it, turn'd again,
 As to the good, whose plenitude of bliss
 Sufficeth all.  O ye misguided souls!
 Infatuate, who from such a good estrange
 Your hearts, and bend your gaze on vanity,
 Alas for you!--And lo! toward me, next,
 Another of those splendent forms approach'd,
 That, by its outward bright'ning, testified
 The will it had to pleasure me.  The eyes
 Of Beatrice, resting, as before,
 Firmly upon me, manifested forth
 Approval of my wish.  "And O," I cried,
 "Blest spirit! quickly be my will perform'd;
 And prove thou to me, that my inmost thoughts
 I can reflect on thee."  Thereat the light,
 That yet was new to me, from the recess,
 Where it before was singing, thus began,
 As one who joys in kindness: "In that part
 Of the deprav'd Italian land, which lies
 Between Rialto, and the fountain-springs
 Of Brenta and of Piava, there doth rise,
 But to no lofty eminence, a hill,
 From whence erewhile a firebrand did descend,
 That sorely sheet the region.  From one root
 I and it sprang; my name on earth Cunizza:
 And here I glitter, for that by its light
 This star o'ercame me.  Yet I naught repine,
 Nor grudge myself the cause of this my lot,
 Which haply vulgar hearts can scarce conceive.
 
 "This jewel, that is next me in our heaven,
 Lustrous and costly, great renown hath left,
 And not to perish, ere these hundred years
 Five times absolve their round.  Consider thou,
 If to excel be worthy man's endeavour,
 When such life may attend the first.  Yet they
 Care not for this, the crowd that now are girt
 By Adice and Tagliamento, still
 Impenitent, tho' scourg'd.  The hour is near,
 When for their stubbornness at Padua's marsh
 The water shall be chang'd, that laves Vicena
 And where Cagnano meets with Sile, one
 Lords it, and bears his head aloft, for whom
 The web is now a-warping.  Feltro too
 Shall sorrow for its godless shepherd's fault,
 Of so deep stain, that never, for the like,
 Was Malta's bar unclos'd.  Too large should be
 The skillet, that would hold Ferrara's blood,
 And wearied he, who ounce by ounce would weight it,
 The which this priest, in show of party-zeal,
 Courteous will give; nor will the gift ill suit
 The country's custom.  We descry above,
 Mirrors, ye call them thrones, from which to us
 Reflected shine the judgments of our God:
 Whence these our sayings we avouch for good."
 
 She ended, and appear'd on other thoughts
 Intent, re-ent'ring on the wheel she late
 Had left.  That other joyance meanwhile wax'd
 A thing to marvel at, in splendour glowing,
 Like choicest ruby stricken by the sun,
 For, in that upper clime, effulgence comes
 Of gladness, as here laughter: and below,
 As the mind saddens, murkier grows the shade.
 
 "God seeth all: and in him is thy sight,"
 Said I, "blest Spirit!  Therefore will of his
 Cannot to thee be dark.  Why then delays
 Thy voice to satisfy my wish untold,
 That voice which joins the inexpressive song,
 Pastime of heav'n, the which those ardours sing,
 That cowl them with six shadowing wings outspread?
 I would not wait thy asking, wert thou known
 To me, as thoroughly I to thee am known."
 
 He forthwith answ'ring, thus his words began:
 "The valley' of waters, widest next to that
 Which doth the earth engarland, shapes its course,
 Between discordant shores, against the sun
 Inward so far, it makes meridian there,
 Where was before th' horizon.  Of that vale
 Dwelt I upon the shore, 'twixt Ebro's stream
 And Macra's, that divides with passage brief
 Genoan bounds from Tuscan.  East and west
 Are nearly one to Begga and my land,
 Whose haven erst was with its own blood warm.
 Who knew my name were wont to call me Folco:
 And I did bear impression of this heav'n,
 That now bears mine: for not with fiercer flame
 Glow'd Belus' daughter, injuring alike
 Sichaeus and Creusa, than did I,
 Long as it suited the unripen'd down
 That fledg'd my cheek: nor she of Rhodope,
 That was beguiled of Demophoon;
 Nor Jove's son, when the charms of Iole
 Were shrin'd within his heart.  And yet there hides
 No sorrowful repentance here, but mirth,
 Not for the fault (that doth not come to mind),
 But for the virtue, whose o'erruling sway
 And providence have wrought thus quaintly.  Here
 The skill is look'd into, that fashioneth
 With such effectual working, and the good
 Discern'd, accruing to this upper world
 From that below.  But fully to content
 Thy wishes, all that in this sphere have birth,
 Demands my further parle.  Inquire thou wouldst,
 Who of this light is denizen, that here
 Beside me sparkles, as the sun-beam doth
 On the clear wave.  Know then, the soul of Rahab
 Is in that gladsome harbour, to our tribe
 United, and the foremost rank assign'd.
 He to that heav'n, at which the shadow ends
 Of your sublunar world, was taken up,
 First, in Christ's triumph, of all souls redeem'd:
 For well behoov'd, that, in some part of heav'n,
 She should remain a trophy, to declare
 The mighty contest won with either palm;
 For that she favour'd first the high exploit
 Of Joshua on the holy land, whereof
 The Pope recks little now.  Thy city, plant
 Of him, that on his Maker turn'd the back,
 And of whose envying so much woe hath sprung,
 Engenders and expands the cursed flower,
 That hath made wander both the sheep and lambs,
 Turning the shepherd to a wolf.  For this,
 The gospel and great teachers laid aside,
 The decretals, as their stuft margins show,
 Are the sole study.  Pope and Cardinals,
 Intent on these, ne'er journey but in thought
 To Nazareth, where Gabriel op'd his wings.
 Yet it may chance, erelong, the Vatican,
 And other most selected parts of Rome,
 That were the grave of Peter's soldiery,
 Shall be deliver'd from the adult'rous bond."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO X
 
 Looking into his first-born with the love,
 Which breathes from both eternal, the first Might
 Ineffable, whence eye or mind
 Can roam, hath in such order all dispos'd,
 As none may see and fail to enjoy.  Raise, then,
 O reader! to the lofty wheels, with me,
 Thy ken directed to the point, whereat
 One motion strikes on th' other.  There begin
 Thy wonder of the mighty Architect,
 Who loves his work so inwardly, his eye
 Doth ever watch it.  See, how thence oblique
 Brancheth the circle, where the planets roll
 To pour their wished influence on the world;
 Whose path not bending thus, in heav'n above
 Much virtue would be lost, and here on earth,
 All power well nigh extinct: or, from direct
 Were its departure distant more or less,
 I' th' universal order, great defect
 Must, both in heav'n and here beneath, ensue.
 
 Now rest thee, reader! on thy bench, and muse
 Anticipative of the feast to come;
 So shall delight make thee not feel thy toil.
 Lo! I have set before thee, for thyself
 Feed now: the matter I indite, henceforth
 Demands entire my thought.  Join'd with the part,
 Which late we told of, the great minister
 Of nature, that upon the world imprints
 The virtue of the heaven, and doles out
 Time for us with his beam, went circling on
 Along the spires, where each hour sooner comes;
 And I was with him, weetless of ascent,
 As one, who till arriv'd, weets not his coming.
 
 For Beatrice, she who passeth on
 So suddenly from good to better, time
 Counts not the act, oh then how great must needs
 Have been her brightness!  What she was i' th' sun
 (Where I had enter'd), not through change of hue,
 But light transparent--did I summon up
 Genius, art, practice--I might not so speak,
 It should be e'er imagin'd: yet believ'd
 It may be, and the sight be justly crav'd.
 And if our fantasy fail of such height,
 What marvel, since no eye above the sun
 Hath ever travel'd?  Such are they dwell here,
 Fourth family of the Omnipotent Sire,
 Who of his spirit and of his offspring shows;
 And holds them still enraptur'd with the view.
 And thus to me Beatrice: "Thank, oh thank,
 The Sun of angels, him, who by his grace
 To this perceptible hath lifted thee."
 
 Never was heart in such devotion bound,
 And with complacency so absolute
 Dispos'd to render up itself to God,
 As mine was at those words: and so entire
 The love for Him, that held me, it eclips'd
 Beatrice in oblivion.  Naught displeas'd
 Was she, but smil'd thereat so joyously,
 That of her laughing eyes the radiance brake
 And scatter'd my collected mind abroad.
 
 Then saw I a bright band, in liveliness
 Surpassing, who themselves did make the crown,
 And us their centre: yet more sweet in voice,
 Than in their visage beaming.  Cinctur'd thus,
 Sometime Latona's daughter we behold,
 When the impregnate air retains the thread,
 That weaves her zone.  In the celestial court,
 Whence I return, are many jewels found,
 So dear and beautiful, they cannot brook
 Transporting from that realm: and of these lights
 Such was the song.  Who doth not prune his wing
 To soar up thither, let him look from thence
 For tidings from the dumb.  When, singing thus,
 Those burning suns that circled round us thrice,
 As nearest stars around the fixed pole,
 Then seem'd they like to ladies, from the dance
 Not ceasing, but suspense, in silent pause,
 List'ning, till they have caught the strain anew:
 Suspended so they stood: and, from within,
 Thus heard I one, who spake: "Since with its beam
 The grace, whence true love lighteth first his flame,
 That after doth increase by loving, shines
 So multiplied in thee, it leads thee up
 Along this ladder, down whose hallow'd steps
 None e'er descend, and mount them not again,
 Who from his phial should refuse thee wine
 To slake thy thirst, no less constrained were,
 Than water flowing not unto the sea.
 Thou fain wouldst hear, what plants are these, that bloom
 In the bright garland, which, admiring, girds
 This fair dame round, who strengthens thee for heav'n.
 I then was of the lambs, that Dominic
 Leads, for his saintly flock, along the way,
 Where well they thrive, not sworn with vanity.
 He, nearest on my right hand, brother was,
 And master to me: Albert of Cologne
 Is this: and of Aquinum, Thomas I.
 If thou of all the rest wouldst be assur'd,
 Let thine eye, waiting on the words I speak,
 In circuit journey round the blessed wreath.
 That next resplendence issues from the smile
 Of Gratian, who to either forum lent
 Such help, as favour wins in Paradise.
 The other, nearest, who adorns our quire,
 Was Peter, he that with the widow gave
 To holy church his treasure.  The fifth light,
 Goodliest of all, is by such love inspired,
 That all your world craves tidings of its doom:
 Within, there is the lofty light, endow'd
 With sapience so profound, if truth be truth,
 That with a ken of such wide amplitude
 No second hath arisen.  Next behold
 That taper's radiance, to whose view was shown,
 Clearliest, the nature and the ministry
 Angelical, while yet in flesh it dwelt.
 In the other little light serenely smiles
 That pleader for the Christian temples, he
 Who did provide Augustin of his lore.
 Now, if thy mind's eye pass from light to light,
 Upon my praises following, of the eighth
 Thy thirst is next.  The saintly soul, that shows
 The world's deceitfulness, to all who hear him,
 Is, with the sight of all the good, that is,
 Blest there.  The limbs, whence it was driven, lie
 Down in Cieldauro, and from martyrdom
 And exile came it here.  Lo! further on,
 Where flames the arduous Spirit of Isidore,
 Of Bede, and Richard, more than man, erewhile,
 In deep discernment.  Lastly this, from whom
 Thy look on me reverteth, was the beam
 Of one, whose spirit, on high musings bent,
 Rebuk'd the ling'ring tardiness of death.
 It is the eternal light of Sigebert,
 Who 'scap'd not envy, when of truth he argued,
 Reading in the straw-litter'd street."  Forthwith,
 As clock, that calleth up the spouse of God
 To win her bridegroom's love at matin's hour,
 Each part of other fitly drawn and urg'd,
 Sends out a tinkling sound, of note so sweet,
 Affection springs in well-disposed breast;
 Thus saw I move the glorious wheel, thus heard
 Voice answ'ring voice, so musical and soft,
 It can be known but where day endless shines.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XI
 
 O fond anxiety of mortal men!
 How vain and inconclusive arguments
 Are those, which make thee beat thy wings below
 For statues one, and one for aphorisms
 Was hunting; this the priesthood follow'd, that
 By force or sophistry aspir'd to rule;
 To rob another, and another sought
 By civil business wealth; one moiling lay
 Tangled in net of sensual delight,
 And one to witless indolence resign'd;
 What time from all these empty things escap'd,
 With Beatrice, I thus gloriously
 Was rais'd aloft, and made the guest of heav'n.
 
 They of the circle to that point, each one.
 Where erst it was, had turn'd; and steady glow'd,
 As candle in his socket.  Then within
 The lustre, that erewhile bespake me, smiling
 With merer gladness, heard I thus begin:
 
 "E'en as his beam illumes me, so I look
 Into the eternal light, and clearly mark
 Thy thoughts, from whence they rise.  Thou art in doubt,
 And wouldst, that I should bolt my words afresh
 In such plain open phrase, as may be smooth
 To thy perception, where I told thee late
 That 'well they thrive;' and that 'no second such
 Hath risen,' which no small distinction needs.
 
 "The providence, that governeth the world,
 In depth of counsel by created ken
 Unfathomable, to the end that she,
 Who with loud cries was 'spous'd in precious blood,
 Might keep her footing towards her well-belov'd,
 Safe in herself and constant unto him,
 Hath two ordain'd, who should on either hand
 In chief escort her: one seraphic all
 In fervency; for wisdom upon earth,
 The other splendour of cherubic light.
 I but of one will tell: he tells of both,
 Who one commendeth which of them so'er
 Be taken: for their deeds were to one end.
 
 "Between Tupino, and the wave, that falls
 From blest Ubaldo's chosen hill, there hangs
 Rich slope of mountain high, whence heat and cold
 Are wafted through Perugia's eastern gate:
 And Norcera with Gualdo, in its rear
 Mourn for their heavy yoke.  Upon that side,
 Where it doth break its steepness most, arose
 A sun upon the world, as duly this
 From Ganges doth: therefore let none, who speak
 Of that place, say Ascesi; for its name
 Were lamely so deliver'd; but the East,
 To call things rightly, be it henceforth styl'd.
 He was not yet much distant from his rising,
 When his good influence 'gan to bless the earth.
 A dame to whom none openeth pleasure's gate
 More than to death, was, 'gainst his father's will,
 His stripling choice: and he did make her his,
 Before the Spiritual court, by nuptial bonds,
 And in his father's sight: from day to day,
 Then lov'd her more devoutly.  She, bereav'd
 Of her first husband, slighted and obscure,
 Thousand and hundred years and more, remain'd
 Without a single suitor, till he came.
 Nor aught avail'd, that, with Amyclas, she
 Was found unmov'd at rumour of his voice,
 Who shook the world: nor aught her constant boldness
 Whereby with Christ she mounted on the cross,
 When Mary stay'd beneath.  But not to deal
 Thus closely with thee longer, take at large
 The rovers' titles--Poverty and Francis.
 Their concord and glad looks, wonder and love,
 And sweet regard gave birth to holy thoughts,
 So much, that venerable Bernard first
 Did bare his feet, and, in pursuit of peace
 So heavenly, ran, yet deem'd his footing slow.
 O hidden riches!  O prolific good!
 Egidius bares him next, and next Sylvester,
 And follow both the bridegroom; so the bride
 Can please them.  Thenceforth goes he on his way,
 The father and the master, with his spouse,
 And with that family, whom now the cord
 Girt humbly: nor did abjectness of heart
 Weigh down his eyelids, for that he was son
 Of Pietro Bernardone, and by men
 In wond'rous sort despis'd.  But royally
 His hard intention he to Innocent
 Set forth, and from him first receiv'd the seal
 On his religion.  Then, when numerous flock'd
 The tribe of lowly ones, that trac'd HIS steps,
 Whose marvellous life deservedly were sung
 In heights empyreal, through Honorius' hand
 A second crown, to deck their Guardian's virtues,
 Was by the eternal Spirit inwreath'd: and when
 He had, through thirst of martyrdom, stood up
 In the proud Soldan's presence, and there preach'd
 Christ and his followers; but found the race
 Unripen'd for conversion: back once more
 He hasted (not to intermit his toil),
 And reap'd Ausonian lands.  On the hard rock,
 'Twixt Arno and the Tyber, he from Christ
 Took the last Signet, which his limbs two years
 Did carry.  Then the season come, that he,
 Who to such good had destin'd him, was pleas'd
 T' advance him to the meed, which he had earn'd
 By his self-humbling, to his brotherhood,
 As their just heritage, he gave in charge
 His dearest lady, and enjoin'd their love
 And faith to her: and, from her bosom, will'd
 His goodly spirit should move forth, returning
 To its appointed kingdom, nor would have
 His body laid upon another bier.
 
 "Think now of one, who were a fit colleague,
 To keep the bark of Peter in deep sea
 Helm'd to right point; and such our Patriarch was.
 Therefore who follow him, as he enjoins,
 Thou mayst be certain, take good lading in.
 But hunger of new viands tempts his flock,
 So that they needs into strange pastures wide
 Must spread them: and the more remote from him
 The stragglers wander, so much mole they come
 Home to the sheep-fold, destitute of milk.
 There are of them, in truth, who fear their harm,
 And to the shepherd cleave; but these so few,
 A little stuff may furnish out their cloaks.
 
 "Now, if my words be clear, if thou have ta'en
 Good heed, if that, which I have told, recall
 To mind, thy wish may be in part fulfill'd:
 For thou wilt see the point from whence they split,
 Nor miss of the reproof, which that implies,
 'That well they thrive not sworn with vanity."'
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XII
 
 Soon as its final word the blessed flame
 Had rais'd for utterance, straight the holy mill
 Began to wheel, nor yet had once revolv'd,
 Or ere another, circling, compass'd it,
 Motion to motion, song to song, conjoining,
 Song, that as much our muses doth excel,
 Our Sirens with their tuneful pipes, as ray
 Of primal splendour doth its faint reflex.
 
 As when, if Juno bid her handmaid forth,
 Two arches parallel, and trick'd alike,
 Span the thin cloud, the outer taking birth
 From that within (in manner of that voice
 Whom love did melt away, as sun the mist),
 And they who gaze, presageful call to mind
 The compact, made with Noah, of the world
 No more to be o'erflow'd; about us thus
 Of sempiternal roses, bending, wreath'd
 Those garlands twain, and to the innermost
 E'en thus th' external answered.  When the footing,
 And other great festivity, of song,
 And radiance, light with light accordant, each
 Jocund and blythe, had at their pleasure still'd
 (E'en as the eyes by quick volition mov'd,
 Are shut and rais'd together), from the heart
 Of one amongst the new lights mov'd a voice,
 That made me seem like needle to the star,
 In turning to its whereabout, and thus
 Began: "The love, that makes me beautiful,
 Prompts me to tell of th' other guide, for whom
 Such good of mine is spoken.  Where one is,
 The other worthily should also be;
 That as their warfare was alike, alike
 Should be their glory.  Slow, and full of doubt,
 And with thin ranks, after its banner mov'd
 The army of Christ (which it so clearly cost
 To reappoint), when its imperial Head,
 Who reigneth ever, for the drooping host
 Did make provision, thorough grace alone,
 And not through its deserving.  As thou heard'st,
 Two champions to the succour of his spouse
 He sent, who by their deeds and words might join
 Again his scatter'd people.  In that clime,
 Where springs the pleasant west-wind to unfold
 The fresh leaves, with which Europe sees herself
 New-garmented; nor from those billows far,
 Beyond whose chiding, after weary course,
 The sun doth sometimes hide him, safe abides
 The happy Callaroga, under guard
 Of the great shield, wherein the lion lies
 Subjected and supreme.  And there was born
 The loving million of the Christian faith,
 The hollow'd wrestler, gentle to his own,
 And to his enemies terrible.  So replete
 His soul with lively virtue, that when first
 Created, even in the mother's womb,
 It prophesied.  When, at the sacred font,
 The spousals were complete 'twixt faith and him,
 Where pledge of mutual safety was exchang'd,
 The dame, who was his surety, in her sleep
 Beheld the wondrous fruit, that was from him
 And from his heirs to issue.  And that such
 He might be construed, as indeed he was,
 She was inspir'd to name him of his owner,
 Whose he was wholly, and so call'd him Dominic.
 And I speak of him, as the labourer,
 Whom Christ in his own garden chose to be
 His help-mate.  Messenger he seem'd, and friend
 Fast-knit to Christ; and the first love he show'd,
 Was after the first counsel that Christ gave.
 Many a time his nurse, at entering found
 That he had ris'n in silence, and was prostrate,
 As who should say, "My errand was for this."
 O happy father!  Felix rightly nam'd!
 O favour'd mother! rightly nam'd Joanna!
 If that do mean, as men interpret it.
 Not for the world's sake, for which now they pore
 Upon Ostiense and Taddeo's page,
 But for the real manna, soon he grew
 Mighty in learning, and did set himself
 To go about the vineyard, that soon turns
 To wan and wither'd, if not tended well:
 And from the see (whose bounty to the just
 And needy is gone by, not through its fault,
 But his who fills it basely, he besought,
 No dispensation for commuted wrong,
 Nor the first vacant fortune, nor the tenth),
 That to God's paupers rightly appertain,
 But, 'gainst an erring and degenerate world,
 Licence to fight, in favour of that seed,
 From which the twice twelve cions gird thee round.
 Then, with sage doctrine and good will to help,
 Forth on his great apostleship he far'd,
 Like torrent bursting from a lofty vein;
 And, dashing 'gainst the stocks of heresy,
 Smote fiercest, where resistance was most stout.
 Thence many rivulets have since been turn'd,
 Over the garden Catholic to lead
 Their living waters, and have fed its plants.
 
 "If such one wheel of that two-yoked car,
 Wherein the holy church defended her,
 And rode triumphant through the civil broil.
 Thou canst not doubt its fellow's excellence,
 Which Thomas, ere my coming, hath declar'd
 So courteously unto thee.  But the track,
 Which its smooth fellies made, is now deserted:
 That mouldy mother is where late were lees.
 His family, that wont to trace his path,
 Turn backward, and invert their steps; erelong
 To rue the gathering in of their ill crop,
 When the rejected tares in vain shall ask
 Admittance to the barn.  I question not
 But he, who search'd our volume, leaf by leaf,
 Might still find page with this inscription on't,
 'I am as I was wont.'  Yet such were not
 From Acquasparta nor Casale, whence
 Of those, who come to meddle with the text,
 One stretches and another cramps its rule.
 Bonaventura's life in me behold,
 From Bagnororegio, one, who in discharge
 Of my great offices still laid aside
 All sinister aim.  Illuminato here,
 And Agostino join me: two they were,
 Among the first of those barefooted meek ones,
 Who sought God's friendship in the cord: with them
 Hugues of Saint Victor, Pietro Mangiadore,
 And he of Spain in his twelve volumes shining,
 Nathan the prophet, Metropolitan
 Chrysostom, and Anselmo, and, who deign'd
 To put his hand to the first art, Donatus.
 Raban is here: and at my side there shines
 Calabria's abbot, Joachim, endow'd
 With soul prophetic.  The bright courtesy
 Of friar Thomas, and his goodly lore,
 Have mov'd me to the blazon of a peer
 So worthy, and with me have mov'd this throng."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIII
 
 Let him, who would conceive what now I saw,
 Imagine (and retain the image firm,
 As mountain rock, the whilst he hears me speak),
 Of stars fifteen, from midst the ethereal host
 Selected, that, with lively ray serene,
 O'ercome the massiest air: thereto imagine
 The wain, that, in the bosom of our sky,
 Spins ever on its axle night and day,
 With the bright summit of that horn which swells
 Due from the pole, round which the first wheel rolls,
 T' have rang'd themselves in fashion of two signs
 In heav'n, such as Ariadne made,
 When death's chill seized her; and that one of them
 Did compass in the other's beam; and both
 In such sort whirl around, that each should tend
 With opposite motion and, conceiving thus,
 Of that true constellation, and the dance
 Twofold, that circled me, he shall attain
 As 't were the shadow; for things there as much
 Surpass our usage, as the swiftest heav'n
 Is swifter than the Chiana.  There was sung
 No Bacchus, and no Io Paean, but
 Three Persons in the Godhead, and in one
 Substance that nature and the human join'd.
 
 The song fulfill'd its measure; and to us
 Those saintly lights attended, happier made
 At each new minist'ring.  Then silence brake,
 Amid th' accordant sons of Deity,
 That luminary, in which the wondrous life
 Of the meek man of God was told to me;
 And thus it spake: "One ear o' th' harvest thresh'd,
 And its grain safely stor'd, sweet charity
 Invites me with the other to like toil.
 
 "Thou know'st, that in the bosom, whence the rib
 Was ta'en to fashion that fair cheek, whose taste
 All the world pays for, and in that, which pierc'd
 By the keen lance, both after and before
 Such satisfaction offer'd, as outweighs
 Each evil in the scale, whate'er of light
 To human nature is allow'd, must all
 Have by his virtue been infus'd, who form'd
 Both one and other: and thou thence admir'st
 In that I told thee, of beatitudes
 A second, there is none, to his enclos'd
 In the fifth radiance.  Open now thine eyes
 To what I answer thee; and thou shalt see
 Thy deeming and my saying meet in truth,
 As centre in the round.  That which dies not,
 And that which can die, are but each the beam
 Of that idea, which our Soverign Sire
 Engendereth loving; for that lively light,
 Which passeth from his brightness; not disjoin'd
 From him, nor from his love triune with them,
 Doth, through his bounty, congregate itself,
 Mirror'd, as 't were in new existences,
 Itself unalterable and ever one.
 
 "Descending hence unto the lowest powers,
 Its energy so sinks, at last it makes
 But brief contingencies: for so I name
 Things generated, which the heav'nly orbs
 Moving, with seed or without seed, produce.
 Their wax, and that which molds it, differ much:
 And thence with lustre, more or less, it shows
 Th' ideal stamp impress: so that one tree
 According to his kind, hath better fruit,
 And worse: and, at your birth, ye, mortal men,
 Are in your talents various.  Were the wax
 Molded with nice exactness, and the heav'n
 In its disposing influence supreme,
 The lustre of the seal should be complete:
 But nature renders it imperfect ever,
 Resembling thus the artist in her work,
 Whose faultering hand is faithless to his skill.
 Howe'er, if love itself dispose, and mark
 The primal virtue, kindling with bright view,
 There all perfection is vouchsafed; and such
 The clay was made, accomplish'd with each gift,
 That life can teem with; such the burden fill'd
 The virgin's bosom: so that I commend
 Thy judgment, that the human nature ne'er
 Was or can be, such as in them it was.
 
 "Did I advance no further than this point,
 'How then had he no peer?'  thou might'st reply.
 But, that what now appears not, may appear
 Right plainly, ponder, who he was, and what
 (When he was bidden 'Ask' ), the motive sway'd
 To his requesting.  I have spoken thus,
 That thou mayst see, he was a king, who ask'd
 For wisdom, to the end he might be king
 Sufficient: not the number to search out
 Of the celestial movers; or to know,
 If necessary with contingent e'er
 Have made necessity; or whether that
 Be granted, that first motion is; or if
 Of the mid circle can, by art, be made
 Triangle with each corner, blunt or sharp.
 
 "Whence, noting that, which I have said, and this,
 Thou kingly prudence and that ken mayst learn,
 At which the dart of my intention aims.
 And, marking clearly, that I told thee, 'Risen,'
 Thou shalt discern it only hath respect
 To kings, of whom are many, and the good
 Are rare.  With this distinction take my words;
 And they may well consist with that which thou
 Of the first human father dost believe,
 And of our well-beloved.  And let this
 Henceforth be led unto thy feet, to make
 Thee slow in motion, as a weary man,
 Both to the 'yea' and to the 'nay' thou seest not.
 For he among the fools is down full low,
 Whose affirmation, or denial, is
 Without distinction, in each case alike
 Since it befalls, that in most instances
 Current opinion leads to false: and then
 Affection bends the judgment to her ply.
 
 "Much more than vainly doth he loose from shore,
 Since he returns not such as he set forth,
 Who fishes for the truth and wanteth skill.
 And open proofs of this unto the world
 Have been afforded in Parmenides,
 Melissus, Bryso, and the crowd beside,
 Who journey'd on, and knew not whither: so did
 Sabellius, Arius, and the other fools,
 Who, like to scymitars, reflected back
 The scripture-image, by distortion marr'd.
 
 "Let not the people be too swift to judge,
 As one who reckons on the blades in field,
 Or ere the crop be ripe.  For I have seen
 The thorn frown rudely all the winter long
 And after bear the rose upon its top;
 And bark, that all the way across the sea
 Ran straight and speedy, perish at the last,
 E'en in the haven's mouth seeing one steal,
 Another brine, his offering to the priest,
 Let not Dame Birtha and Sir Martin thence
 Into heav'n's counsels deem that they can pry:
 For one of these may rise, the other fall."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIV
 
 From centre to the circle, and so back
 From circle to the centre, water moves
 In the round chalice, even as the blow
 Impels it, inwardly, or from without.
 Such was the image glanc'd into my mind,
 As the great spirit of Aquinum ceas'd;
 And Beatrice after him her words
 Resum'd alternate: "Need there is (tho' yet
 He tells it to you not in words, nor e'en
 In thought) that he should fathom to its depth
 Another mystery.  Tell him, if the light,
 Wherewith your substance blooms, shall stay with you
 Eternally, as now: and, if it doth,
 How, when ye shall regain your visible forms,
 The sight may without harm endure the change,
 That also tell."  As those, who in a ring
 Tread the light measure, in their fitful mirth
 Raise loud the voice, and spring with gladder bound;
 Thus, at the hearing of that pious suit,
 The saintly circles in their tourneying
 And wond'rous note attested new delight.
 
 Whoso laments, that we must doff this garb
 Of frail mortality, thenceforth to live
 Immortally above, he hath not seen
 The sweet refreshing, of that heav'nly shower.
 
 Him, who lives ever, and for ever reigns
 In mystic union of the Three in One,
 Unbounded, bounding all, each spirit thrice
 Sang, with such melody, as but to hear
 For highest merit were an ample meed.
 And from the lesser orb the goodliest light,
 With gentle voice and mild, such as perhaps
 The angel's once to Mary, thus replied:
 "Long as the joy of Paradise shall last,
 Our love shall shine around that raiment, bright,
 As fervent; fervent, as in vision blest;
 And that as far in blessedness exceeding,
 As it hath grave beyond its virtue great.
 Our shape, regarmented with glorious weeds
 Of saintly flesh, must, being thus entire,
 Show yet more gracious.  Therefore shall increase,
 Whate'er of light, gratuitous, imparts
 The Supreme Good; light, ministering aid,
 The better disclose his glory: whence
 The vision needs increasing, much increase
 The fervour, which it kindles; and that too
 The ray, that comes from it.  But as the greed
 Which gives out flame, yet it its whiteness shines
 More lively than that, and so preserves
 Its proper semblance; thus this circling sphere
 Of splendour, shall to view less radiant seem,
 Than shall our fleshly robe, which yonder earth
 Now covers.  Nor will such excess of light
 O'erpower us, in corporeal organs made
 Firm, and susceptible of all delight."
 
 So ready and so cordial an "Amen,"
 Followed from either choir, as plainly spoke
 Desire of their dead bodies; yet perchance
 Not for themselves, but for their kindred dear,
 Mothers and sires, and those whom best they lov'd,
 Ere they were made imperishable flame.
 
 And lo! forthwith there rose up round about
 A lustre over that already there,
 Of equal clearness, like the brightening up
 Of the horizon.  As at an evening hour
 Of twilight, new appearances through heav'n
 Peer with faint glimmer, doubtfully descried;
 So there new substances, methought began
 To rise in view; and round the other twain
 Enwheeling, sweep their ampler circuit wide.
 
 O gentle glitter of eternal beam!
 With what a such whiteness did it flow,
 O'erpowering vision in me!  But so fair,
 So passing lovely, Beatrice show'd,
 Mind cannot follow it, nor words express
 Her infinite sweetness.  Thence mine eyes regain'd
 Power to look up, and I beheld myself,
 Sole with my lady, to more lofty bliss
 Translated: for the star, with warmer smile
 Impurpled, well denoted our ascent.
 
 With all the heart, and with that tongue which speaks
 The same in all, an holocaust I made
 To God, befitting the new grace vouchsaf'd.
 And from my bosom had not yet upsteam'd
 The fuming of that incense, when I knew
 The rite accepted.  With such mighty sheen
 And mantling crimson, in two listed rays
 The splendours shot before me, that I cried,
 "God of Sabaoth! that does prank them thus!"
 
 As leads the galaxy from pole to pole,
 Distinguish'd into greater lights and less,
 Its pathway, which the wisest fail to spell;
 So thickly studded, in the depth of Mars,
 Those rays describ'd the venerable sign,
 That quadrants in the round conjoining frame.
 Here memory mocks the toil of genius.  Christ
 Beam'd on that cross; and pattern fails me now.
 But whoso takes his cross, and follows Christ
 Will pardon me for that I leave untold,
 When in the flecker'd dawning he shall spy
 The glitterance of Christ.  From horn to horn,
 And 'tween the summit and the base did move
 Lights, scintillating, as they met and pass'd.
 Thus oft are seen, with ever-changeful glance,
 Straight or athwart, now rapid and now slow,
 The atomies of bodies, long or short,
 To move along the sunbeam, whose slant line
 Checkers the shadow, interpos'd by art
 Against the noontide heat.  And as the chime
 Of minstrel music, dulcimer, and help
 With many strings, a pleasant dining makes
 To him, who heareth not distinct the note;
 So from the lights, which there appear'd to me,
 Gather'd along the cross a melody,
 That, indistinctly heard, with ravishment
 Possess'd me.  Yet I mark'd it was a hymn
 Of lofty praises; for there came to me
 "Arise and conquer," as to one who hears
 And comprehends not.  Me such ecstasy
 O'ercame, that never till that hour was thing
 That held me in so sweet imprisonment.
 
 Perhaps my saying over bold appears,
 Accounting less the pleasure of those eyes,
 Whereon to look fulfilleth all desire.
 But he, who is aware those living seals
 Of every beauty work with quicker force,
 The higher they are ris'n; and that there
 I had not turn'd me to them; he may well
 Excuse me that, whereof in my excuse
 I do accuse me, and may own my truth;
 That holy pleasure here not yet reveal'd,
 Which grows in transport as we mount aloof.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XV
 
 True love, that ever shows itself as clear
 In kindness, as loose appetite in wrong,
 Silenced that lyre harmonious, and still'd
 The sacred chords, that are by heav'n's right hand
 Unwound and tighten'd, flow to righteous prayers
 Should they not hearken, who, to give me will
 For praying, in accordance thus were mute?
 He hath in sooth good cause for endless grief,
 Who, for the love of thing that lasteth not,
 Despoils himself forever of that love.
 
 As oft along the still and pure serene,
 At nightfall, glides a sudden trail of fire,
 Attracting with involuntary heed
 The eye to follow it, erewhile at rest,
 And seems some star that shifted place in heav'n,
 Only that, whence it kindles, none is lost,
 And it is soon extinct; thus from the horn,
 That on the dexter of the cross extends,
 Down to its foot, one luminary ran
 From mid the cluster shone there; yet no gem
 Dropp'd from its foil; and through the beamy list
 Like flame in alabaster, glow'd its course.
 
 So forward stretch'd him (if of credence aught
 Our greater muse may claim) the pious ghost
 Of old Anchises, in the' Elysian bower,
 When he perceiv'd his son.  "O thou, my blood!
 O most exceeding grace divine! to whom,
 As now to thee, hath twice the heav'nly gate
 Been e'er unclos'd?" so spake the light; whence I
 Turn'd me toward him; then unto my dame
 My sight directed, and on either side
 Amazement waited me; for in her eyes
 Was lighted such a smile, I thought that mine
 Had div'd unto the bottom of my grace
 And of my bliss in Paradise.  Forthwith
 To hearing and to sight grateful alike,
 The spirit to his proem added things
 I understood not, so profound he spake;
 Yet not of choice but through necessity
 Mysterious; for his high conception scar'd
 Beyond the mark of mortals.  When the flight
 Of holy transport had so spent its rage,
 That nearer to the level of our thought
 The speech descended, the first sounds I heard
 Were, "Best he thou, Triunal Deity!
 That hast such favour in my seed vouchsaf'd!"
 Then follow'd: "No unpleasant thirst, tho' long,
 Which took me reading in the sacred book,
 Whose leaves or white or dusky never change,
 Thou hast allay'd, my son, within this light,
 From whence my voice thou hear'st; more thanks to her.
 Who for such lofty mounting has with plumes
 Begirt thee.  Thou dost deem thy thoughts to me
 From him transmitted, who is first of all,
 E'en as all numbers ray from unity;
 And therefore dost not ask me who I am,
 Or why to thee more joyous I appear,
 Than any other in this gladsome throng.
 The truth is as thou deem'st; for in this hue
 Both less and greater in that mirror look,
 In which thy thoughts, or ere thou think'st, are shown.
 But, that the love, which keeps me wakeful ever,
 Urging with sacred thirst of sweet desire,
 May be contended fully, let thy voice,
 Fearless, and frank and jocund, utter forth
 Thy will distinctly, utter forth the wish,
 Whereto my ready answer stands decreed."
 
 I turn'd me to Beatrice; and she heard
 Ere I had spoken, smiling, an assent,
 That to my will gave wings; and I began
 "To each among your tribe, what time ye kenn'd
 The nature, in whom naught unequal dwells,
 Wisdom and love were in one measure dealt;
 For that they are so equal in the sun,
 From whence ye drew your radiance and your heat,
 As makes all likeness scant.  But will and means,
 In mortals, for the cause ye well discern,
 With unlike wings are fledge.  A mortal I
 Experience inequality like this,
 And therefore give no thanks, but in the heart,
 For thy paternal greeting.  This howe'er
 I pray thee, living topaz! that ingemm'st
 This precious jewel, let me hear thy name."
 
 "I am thy root, O leaf! whom to expect
 Even, hath pleas'd me:" thus the prompt reply
 Prefacing, next it added; "he, of whom
 Thy kindred appellation comes, and who,
 These hundred years and more, on its first ledge
 Hath circuited the mountain, was my son
 And thy great grandsire.  Well befits, his long
 Endurance should be shorten'd by thy deeds.
 
 "Florence, within her ancient limit-mark,
 Which calls her still to matin prayers and noon,
 Was chaste and sober, and abode in peace.
 She had no armlets and no head-tires then,
 No purfled dames, no zone, that caught the eye
 More than the person did.  Time was not yet,
 When at his daughter's birth the sire grew pale.
 For fear the age and dowry should exceed
 On each side just proportion.  House was none
 Void of its family; nor yet had come
 Hardanapalus, to exhibit feats
 Of chamber prowess.  Montemalo yet
 O'er our suburban turret rose; as much
 To be surpass in fall, as in its rising.
 I saw Bellincione Berti walk abroad
 In leathern girdle and a clasp of bone;
 And, with no artful colouring on her cheeks,
 His lady leave the glass.  The sons I saw
 Of Nerli and of Vecchio well content
 With unrob'd jerkin; and their good dames handling
 The spindle and the flax; O happy they!
 Each sure of burial in her native land,
 And none left desolate a-bed for France!
 One wak'd to tend the cradle, hushing it
 With sounds that lull'd the parent's infancy:
 Another, with her maidens, drawing off
 The tresses from the distaff, lectur'd them
 Old tales of Troy and Fesole and Rome.
 A Salterello and Cianghella we
 Had held as strange a marvel, as ye would
 A Cincinnatus or Cornelia now.
 
 "In such compos'd and seemly fellowship,
 Such faithful and such fair equality,
 In so sweet household, Mary at my birth
 Bestow'd me, call'd on with loud cries; and there
 In your old baptistery, I was made
 Christian at once and Cacciaguida; as were
 My brethren, Eliseo and Moronto.
 
 "From Valdipado came to me my spouse,
 And hence thy surname grew.  I follow'd then
 The Emperor Conrad; and his knighthood he
 Did gird on me; in such good part he took
 My valiant service.  After him I went
 To testify against that evil law,
 Whose people, by the shepherd's fault, possess
 Your right, usurping.  There, by that foul crew
 Was I releas'd from the deceitful world,
 Whose base affection many a spirit soils,
 And from the martyrdom came to this peace."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVI
 
 O slight respect of man's nobility!
 I never shall account it marvelous,
 That our infirm affection here below
 Thou mov'st to boasting, when I could not choose,
 E'en in that region of unwarp'd desire,
 In heav'n itself, but make my vaunt in thee!
 Yet cloak thou art soon shorten'd, for that time,
 Unless thou be eked out from day to day,
 Goes round thee with his shears.  Resuming then
 With greeting such, as Rome, was first to bear,
 But since hath disaccustom'd I began;
 And Beatrice, that a little space
 Was sever'd, smil'd reminding me of her,
 Whose cough embolden'd (as the story holds)
 To first offence the doubting Guenever.
 
 "You are my sire," said I, "you give me heart
 Freely to speak my thought: above myself
 You raise me.  Through so many streams with joy
 My soul is fill'd, that gladness wells from it;
 So that it bears the mighty tide, and bursts not
 Say then, my honour'd stem! what ancestors
 Where those you sprang from, and what years were mark'd
 In your first childhood?  Tell me of the fold,
 That hath Saint John for guardian, what was then
 Its state, and who in it were highest seated?"
 
 As embers, at the breathing of the wind,
 Their flame enliven, so that light I saw
 Shine at my blandishments; and, as it grew
 More fair to look on, so with voice more sweet,
 Yet not in this our modern phrase, forthwith
 It answer'd: "From the day, when it was said
 'Hail Virgin!' to the throes, by which my mother,
 Who now is sainted, lighten'd her of me
 Whom she was heavy with, this fire had come,
 Five hundred fifty times and thrice, its beams
 To reilumine underneath the foot
 Of its own lion.  They, of whom I sprang,
 And I, had there our birth-place, where the last
 Partition of our city first is reach'd
 By him, that runs her annual game.  Thus much
 Suffice of my forefathers: who they were,
 And whence they hither came, more honourable
 It is to pass in silence than to tell.
 All those, who in that time were there from Mars
 Until the Baptist, fit to carry arms,
 Were but the fifth of them this day alive.
 But then the citizen's blood, that now is mix'd
 From Campi and Certaldo and Fighine,
 Ran purely through the last mechanic's veins.
 O how much better were it, that these people
 Were neighbours to you, and that at Galluzzo
 And at Trespiano, ye should have your bound'ry,
 Than to have them within, and bear the stench
 Of Aguglione's hind, and Signa's, him,
 That hath his eye already keen for bart'ring!
 Had not the people, which of all the world
 Degenerates most, been stepdame unto Caesar,
 But, as a mother, gracious to her son;
 Such one, as hath become a Florentine,
 And trades and traffics, had been turn'd adrift
 To Simifonte, where his grandsire ply'd
 The beggar's craft.  The Conti were possess'd
 Of Montemurlo still: the Cerchi still
 Were in Acone's parish; nor had haply
 From Valdigrieve past the Buondelmonte.
 The city's malady hath ever source
 In the confusion of its persons, as
 The body's, in variety of food:
 And the blind bull falls with a steeper plunge,
 Than the blind lamb; and oftentimes one sword
 Doth more and better execution,
 Than five.  Mark Luni, Urbisaglia mark,
 How they are gone, and after them how go
 Chiusi and Sinigaglia; and 't will seem
 No longer new or strange to thee to hear,
 That families fail, when cities have their end.
 All things, that appertain t' ye, like yourselves,
 Are mortal: but mortality in some
 Ye mark not, they endure so long, and you
 Pass by so suddenly.  And as the moon
 Doth, by the rolling of her heav'nly sphere,
 Hide and reveal the strand unceasingly;
 So fortune deals with Florence.  Hence admire not
 At what of them I tell thee, whose renown
 Time covers, the first Florentines.  I saw
 The Ughi, Catilini and Filippi,
 The Alberichi, Greci and Ormanni,
 Now in their wane, illustrious citizens:
 And great as ancient, of Sannella him,
 With him of Arca saw, and Soldanieri
 And Ardinghi, and Bostichi.  At the poop,
 That now is laden with new felony,
 So cumb'rous it may speedily sink the bark,
 The Ravignani sat, of whom is sprung
 The County Guido, and whoso hath since
 His title from the fam'd Bellincione ta'en.
 Fair governance was yet an art well priz'd
 By him of Pressa: Galigaio show'd
 The gilded hilt and pommel, in his house.
 The column, cloth'd with verrey, still was seen
 Unshaken: the Sacchetti still were great,
 Giouchi, Sifanti, Galli and Barucci,
 With them who blush to hear the bushel nam'd.
 Of the Calfucci still the branchy trunk
 Was in its strength: and to the curule chairs
 Sizii and Arigucci yet were drawn.
 How mighty them I saw, whom since their pride
 Hath undone! and in all her goodly deeds
 Florence was by the bullets of bright gold
 O'erflourish'd.  Such the sires of those, who now,
 As surely as your church is vacant, flock
 Into her consistory, and at leisure
 There stall them and grow fat.  The o'erweening brood,
 That plays the dragon after him that flees,
 But unto such, as turn and show the tooth,
 Ay or the purse, is gentle as a lamb,
 Was on its rise, but yet so slight esteem'd,
 That Ubertino of Donati grudg'd
 His father-in-law should yoke him to its tribe.
 Already Caponsacco had descended
 Into the mart from Fesole: and Giuda
 And Infangato were good citizens.
 A thing incredible I tell, tho' true:
 The gateway, named from those of Pera, led
 Into the narrow circuit of your walls.
 Each one, who bears the sightly quarterings
 Of the great Baron (he whose name and worth
 The festival of Thomas still revives)
 His knighthood and his privilege retain'd;
 Albeit one, who borders them With gold,
 This day is mingled with the common herd.
 In Borgo yet the Gualterotti dwelt,
 And Importuni: well for its repose
 Had it still lack'd of newer neighbourhood.
 The house, from whence your tears have had their spring,
 Through the just anger that hath murder'd ye
 And put a period to your gladsome days,
 Was honour'd, it, and those consorted with it.
 O Buondelmonte! what ill counseling
 Prevail'd on thee to break the plighted bond
 Many, who now are weeping, would rejoice,
 Had God to Ema giv'n thee, the first time
 Thou near our city cam'st.  But so was doom'd:
 On that maim'd stone set up to guard the bridge,
 At thy last peace, the victim, Florence! fell.
 With these and others like to them, I saw
 Florence in such assur'd tranquility,
 She had no cause at which to grieve: with these
 Saw her so glorious and so just, that ne'er
 The lily from the lance had hung reverse,
 Or through division been with vermeil dyed."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVII
 
 Such as the youth, who came to Clymene
 To certify himself of that reproach,
 Which had been fasten'd on him, (he whose end
 Still makes the fathers chary to their sons),
 E'en such was I; nor unobserv'd was such
 Of Beatrice, and that saintly lamp,
 Who had erewhile for me his station mov'd;
 When thus by lady: "Give thy wish free vent,
 That it may issue, bearing true report
 Of the mind's impress; not that aught thy words
 May to our knowledge add, but to the end,
 That thou mayst use thyself to own thy thirst
 And men may mingle for thee when they hear."
 
 "O plant! from whence I spring! rever'd and lov'd!
 Who soar'st so high a pitch, thou seest as clear,
 As earthly thought determines two obtuse
 In one triangle not contain'd, so clear
 Dost see contingencies, ere in themselves
 Existent, looking at the point whereto
 All times are present, I, the whilst I scal'd
 With Virgil the soul purifying mount,
 And visited the nether world of woe,
 Touching my future destiny have heard
 Words grievous, though I feel me on all sides
 Well squar'd to fortune's blows.  Therefore my will
 Were satisfied to know the lot awaits me,
 The arrow, seen beforehand, slacks its flight."
 
 So said I to the brightness, which erewhile
 To me had spoken, and my will declar'd,
 As Beatrice will'd, explicitly.
 Nor with oracular response obscure,
 Such, as or ere the Lamb of God was slain,
 Beguil'd the credulous nations; but, in terms
 Precise and unambiguous lore, replied
 The spirit of paternal love, enshrin'd,
 Yet in his smile apparent; and thus spake:
 "Contingency, unfolded not to view
 Upon the tablet of your mortal mold,
 Is all depictur'd in the' eternal sight;
 But hence deriveth not necessity,
 More then the tall ship, hurried down the flood,
 Doth from the vision, that reflects the scene.
 From thence, as to the ear sweet harmony
 From organ comes, so comes before mine eye
 The time prepar'd for thee.  Such as driv'n out
 From Athens, by his cruel stepdame's wiles,
 Hippolytus departed, such must thou
 Depart from Florence.  This they wish, and this
 Contrive, and will ere long effectuate, there,
 Where gainful merchandize is made of Christ,
 Throughout the livelong day.  The common cry,
 Will, as 't is ever wont, affix the blame
 Unto the party injur'd: but the truth
 Shall, in the vengeance it dispenseth, find
 A faithful witness.  Thou shall leave each thing
 Belov'd most dearly: this is the first shaft
 Shot from the bow of exile.  Thou shalt prove
 How salt the savour is of other's bread,
 How hard the passage to descend and climb
 By other's stairs, But that shall gall thee most
 Will be the worthless and vile company,
 With whom thou must be thrown into these straits.
 For all ungrateful, impious all and mad,
 Shall turn 'gainst thee: but in a little while
 Theirs and not thine shall be the crimson'd brow
 Their course shall so evince their brutishness
 T' have ta'en thy stand apart shall well become thee.
 
 "First refuge thou must find, first place of rest,
 In the great Lombard's courtesy, who bears
 Upon the ladder perch'd the sacred bird.
 He shall behold thee with such kind regard,
 That 'twixt ye two, the contrary to that
 Which falls 'twixt other men, the granting shall
 Forerun the asking.  With him shalt thou see
 That mortal, who was at his birth impress
 So strongly from this star, that of his deeds
 The nations shall take note.  His unripe age
 Yet holds him from observance; for these wheels
 Only nine years have compass him about.
 But, ere the Gascon practice on great Harry,
 Sparkles of virtue shall shoot forth in him,
 In equal scorn of labours and of gold.
 His bounty shall be spread abroad so widely,
 As not to let the tongues e'en of his foes
 Be idle in its praise.  Look thou to him
 And his beneficence: for he shall cause
 Reversal of their lot to many people,
 Rich men and beggars interchanging fortunes.
 And thou shalt bear this written in thy soul
 Of him, but tell it not;" and things he told
 Incredible to those who witness them;
 Then added: "So interpret thou, my son,
 What hath been told thee.--Lo! the ambushment
 That a few circling seasons hide for thee!
 Yet envy not thy neighbours: time extends
 Thy span beyond their treason's chastisement."
 
 Soon, as the saintly spirit, by his silence,
 Had shown the web, which I had streteh'd for him
 Upon the warp, was woven, I began,
 As one, who in perplexity desires
 Counsel of other, wise, benign and friendly:
 "My father! well I mark how time spurs on
 Toward me, ready to inflict the blow,
 Which falls most heavily on him, who most
 Abandoned himself.  Therefore 't is good
 I should forecast, that driven from the place
 Most dear to me, I may not lose myself
 All others by my song.  Down through the world
 Of infinite mourning, and along the mount
 From whose fair height my lady's eyes did lift me,
 And after through this heav'n from light to light,
 Have I learnt that, which if I tell again,
 It may with many woefully disrelish;
 And, if I am a timid friend to truth,
 I fear my life may perish among those,
 To whom these days shall be of ancient date."
 
 The brightness, where enclos'd the treasure smil'd,
 Which I had found there, first shone glisteningly,
 Like to a golden mirror in the sun;
 Next answer'd: "Conscience, dimm'd or by its own
 Or other's shame, will feel thy saying sharp.
 Thou, notwithstanding, all deceit remov'd,
 See the whole vision be made manifest.
 And let them wince who have their withers wrung.
 What though, when tasted first, thy voice shall prove
 Unwelcome, on digestion it will turn
 To vital nourishment.  The cry thou raisest,
 Shall, as the wind doth, smite the proudest summits;
 Which is of honour no light argument,
 For this there only have been shown to thee,
 Throughout these orbs, the mountain, and the deep,
 Spirits, whom fame hath note of.  For the mind
 Of him, who hears, is loth to acquiesce
 And fix its faith, unless the instance brought
 Be palpable, and proof apparent urge."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XVIII
 
 CANTO XVIII
 
 Now in his word, sole, ruminating, joy'd
 That blessed spirit; and I fed on mine,
 Tempting the sweet with bitter: she meanwhile,
 Who led me unto God, admonish'd: "Muse
 On other thoughts: bethink thee, that near Him
 I dwell, who recompenseth every wrong."
 
 At the sweet sounds of comfort straight I turn'd;
 And, in the saintly eyes what love was seen,
 I leave in silence here: nor through distrust
 Of my words only, but that to such bliss
 The mind remounts not without aid.  Thus much
 Yet may I speak; that, as I gaz'd on her,
 Affection found no room for other wish.
 While the everlasting pleasure, that did full
 On Beatrice shine, with second view
 From her fair countenance my gladden'd soul
 Contented; vanquishing me with a beam
 Of her soft smile, she spake: "Turn thee, and list.
 These eyes are not thy only Paradise."
 
 As here we sometimes in the looks may see
 Th' affection mark'd, when that its sway hath ta'en
 The spirit wholly; thus the hallow'd light,
 To whom I turn'd, flashing, bewray'd its will
 To talk yet further with me, and began:
 "On this fifth lodgment of the tree, whose life
 Is from its top, whose fruit is ever fair
 And leaf unwith'ring, blessed spirits abide,
 That were below, ere they arriv'd in heav'n,
 So mighty in renown, as every muse
 Might grace her triumph with them.  On the horns
 Look therefore of the cross: he, whom I name,
 Shall there enact, as doth in summer cloud
 Its nimble fire."  Along the cross I saw,
 At the repeated name of Joshua,
 A splendour gliding; nor, the word was said,
 Ere it was done: then, at the naming saw
 Of the great Maccabee, another move
 With whirling speed; and gladness was the scourge
 Unto that top.  The next for Charlemagne
 And for the peer Orlando, two my gaze
 Pursued, intently, as the eye pursues
 A falcon flying.  Last, along the cross,
 William, and Renard, and Duke Godfrey drew
 My ken, and Robert Guiscard.  And the soul,
 Who spake with me among the other lights
 Did move away, and mix; and with the choir
 Of heav'nly songsters prov'd his tuneful skill.
 
 To Beatrice on my right l bent,
 Looking for intimation or by word
 Or act, what next behoov'd; and did descry
 Such mere effulgence in her eyes, such joy,
 It past all former wont.  And, as by sense
 Of new delight, the man, who perseveres
 In good deeds doth perceive from day to day
 His virtue growing; I e'en thus perceiv'd
 Of my ascent, together with the heav'n
 The circuit widen'd, noting the increase
 Of beauty in that wonder.  Like the change
 In a brief moment on some maiden's cheek,
 Which from its fairness doth discharge the weight
 Of pudency, that stain'd it; such in her,
 And to mine eyes so sudden was the change,
 Through silvery whiteness of that temperate star,
 Whose sixth orb now enfolded us.  I saw,
 Within that Jovial cresset, the clear sparks
 Of love, that reign'd there, fashion to my view
 Our language.  And as birds, from river banks
 Arisen, now in round, now lengthen'd troop,
 Array them in their flight, greeting, as seems,
 Their new-found pastures; so, within the lights,
 The saintly creatures flying, sang, and made
 Now D. now I. now L. figur'd I' th' air.
 
 First, singing, to their notes they mov'd, then one
 Becoming of these signs, a little while
 Did rest them, and were mute.  O nymph divine
 Of Pegasean race! whose souls, which thou
 Inspir'st, mak'st glorious and long-liv'd, as they
 Cities and realms by thee! thou with thyself
 Inform me; that I may set forth the shapes,
 As fancy doth present them.  Be thy power
 Display'd in this brief song.  The characters,
 Vocal and consonant, were five-fold seven.
 In order each, as they appear'd, I mark'd.
 Diligite Justitiam, the first,
 Both verb and noun all blazon'd; and the extreme
 Qui judicatis terram.  In the M.
 Of the fifth word they held their station,
 Making the star seem silver streak'd with gold.
 And on the summit of the M. I saw
 Descending other lights, that rested there,
 Singing, methinks, their bliss and primal good.
 Then, as at shaking of a lighted brand,
 Sparkles innumerable on all sides
 Rise scatter'd, source of augury to th' unwise;
 Thus more than thousand twinkling lustres hence
 Seem'd reascending, and a higher pitch
 Some mounting, and some less; e'en as the sun,
 Which kindleth them, decreed.  And when each one
 Had settled in his place, the head and neck
 Then saw I of an eagle, lively
 Grav'd in that streaky fire.  Who painteth there,
 Hath none to guide him; of himself he guides;
 And every line and texture of the nest
 Doth own from him the virtue, fashions it.
 The other bright beatitude, that seem'd
 Erewhile, with lilied crowning, well content
 To over-canopy the M. mov'd forth,
 Following gently the impress of the bird.
 
  Sweet star! what glorious and thick-studded gems
 Declar'd to me our justice on the earth
 To be the effluence of that heav'n, which thou,
 Thyself a costly jewel, dost inlay!
 Therefore I pray the Sovran Mind, from whom
 Thy motion and thy virtue are begun,
 That he would look from whence the fog doth rise,
 To vitiate thy beam: so that once more
 He may put forth his hand 'gainst such, as drive
 Their traffic in that sanctuary, whose walls
 With miracles and martyrdoms were built.
 
 Ye host of heaven! whose glory I survey!
 O beg ye grace for those, that are on earth
 All after ill example gone astray.
 War once had for its instrument the sword:
 But now 't is made, taking the bread away
 Which the good Father locks from none.  --And thou,
 That writes but to cancel, think, that they,
 Who for the vineyard, which thou wastest, died,
 Peter and Paul live yet, and mark thy doings.
 Thou hast good cause to cry, "My heart so cleaves
 To him, that liv'd in solitude remote,
 And from the wilds was dragg'd to martyrdom,
 I wist not of the fisherman nor Paul."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XIX
 
 Before my sight appear'd, with open wings,
 The beauteous image, in fruition sweet
 Gladdening the thronged spirits.  Each did seem
 A little ruby, whereon so intense
 The sun-beam glow'd that to mine eyes it came
 In clear refraction.  And that, which next
 Befalls me to portray, voice hath not utter'd,
 Nor hath ink written, nor in fantasy
 Was e'er conceiv'd.  For I beheld and heard
 The beak discourse; and, what intention form'd
 Of many, singly as of one express,
 Beginning: "For that I was just and piteous,
 l am exalted to this height of glory,
 The which no wish exceeds: and there on earth
 Have I my memory left, e'en by the bad
 Commended, while they leave its course untrod."
 
 Thus is one heat from many embers felt,
 As in that image many were the loves,
 And one the voice, that issued from them all.
 Whence I address them: "O perennial flowers
 Of gladness everlasting! that exhale
 In single breath your odours manifold!
 Breathe now; and let the hunger be appeas'd,
 That with great craving long hath held my soul,
 Finding no food on earth.  This well I know,
 That if there be in heav'n a realm, that shows
 In faithful mirror the celestial Justice,
 Yours without veil reflects it.  Ye discern
 The heed, wherewith I do prepare myself
 To hearken; ye the doubt that urges me
 With such inveterate craving."  Straight I saw,
 Like to a falcon issuing from the hood,
 That rears his head, and claps him with his wings,
 His beauty and his eagerness bewraying.
 So saw I move that stately sign, with praise
 Of grace divine inwoven and high song
 Of inexpressive joy.  "He," it began,
 "Who turn'd his compass on the world's extreme,
 And in that space so variously hath wrought,
 Both openly, and in secret, in such wise
 Could not through all the universe display
 Impression of his glory, that the Word
 Of his omniscience should not still remain
 In infinite excess.  In proof whereof,
 He first through pride supplanted, who was sum
 Of each created being, waited not
 For light celestial, and abortive fell.
 Whence needs each lesser nature is but scant
 Receptacle unto that Good, which knows
 No limit, measur'd by itself alone.
 Therefore your sight, of th' omnipresent Mind
 A single beam, its origin must own
 Surpassing far its utmost potency.
 The ken, your world is gifted with, descends
 In th' everlasting Justice as low down,
 As eye doth in the sea; which though it mark
 The bottom from the shore, in the wide main
 Discerns it not; and ne'ertheless it is,
 But hidden through its deepness.  Light is none,
 Save that which cometh from the pure serene
 Of ne'er disturbed ether: for the rest,
 'Tis darkness all, or shadow of the flesh,
 Or else its poison.  Here confess reveal'd
 That covert, which hath hidden from thy search
 The living justice, of the which thou mad'st
 Such frequent question; for thou saidst--'A man
 Is born on Indus' banks, and none is there
 Who speaks of Christ, nor who doth read nor write,
 And all his inclinations and his acts,
 As far as human reason sees, are good,
 And he offendeth not in word or deed.
 But unbaptiz'd he dies, and void of faith.
 Where is the justice that condemns him?  where
 His blame, if he believeth not?'--What then,
 And who art thou, that on the stool wouldst sit
 To judge at distance of a thousand miles
 With the short-sighted vision of a span?
 To him, who subtilizes thus with me,
 There would assuredly be room for doubt
 Even to wonder, did not the safe word
 Of scripture hold supreme authority.
 
 "O animals of clay!  O spirits gross I
 The primal will, that in itself is good,
 Hath from itself, the chief Good, ne'er been mov'd.
 Justice consists in consonance with it,
 Derivable by no created good,
 Whose very cause depends upon its beam."
 
 As on her nest the stork, that turns about
 Unto her young, whom lately she hath fed,
 While they with upward eyes do look on her;
 So lifted I my gaze; and bending so
 The ever-blessed image wav'd its wings,
 Lab'ring with such deep counsel.  Wheeling round
 It warbled, and did say: "As are my notes
 To thee, who understand'st them not, such is
 Th' eternal judgment unto mortal ken."
 
 Then still abiding in that ensign rang'd,
 Wherewith the Romans over-awed the world,
 Those burning splendours of the Holy Spirit
 Took up the strain; and thus it spake again:
 "None ever hath ascended to this realm,
 Who hath not a believer been in Christ,
 Either before or after the blest limbs
 Were nail'd upon the wood.  But lo! of those
 Who call 'Christ, Christ,' there shall be many found,
  In judgment, further off from him by far,
 Than such, to whom his name was never known.
 Christians like these the Ethiop shall condemn:
 When that the two assemblages shall part;
 One rich eternally, the other poor.
 
 "What may the Persians say unto your kings,
 When they shall see that volume, in the which
 All their dispraise is written, spread to view?
 There amidst Albert's works shall that be read,
 Which will give speedy motion to the pen,
 When Prague shall mourn her desolated realm.
 There shall be read the woe, that he doth work
 With his adulterate money on the Seine,
 Who by the tusk will perish: there be read
 The thirsting pride, that maketh fool alike
 The English and Scot, impatient of their bound.
 There shall be seen the Spaniard's luxury,
 The delicate living there of the Bohemian,
 Who still to worth has been a willing stranger.
 The halter of Jerusalem shall see
 A unit for his virtue, for his vices
 No less a mark than million.  He, who guards
 The isle of fire by old Anchises honour'd
 Shall find his avarice there and cowardice;
 And better to denote his littleness,
 The writing must be letters maim'd, that speak
 Much in a narrow space.  All there shall know
 His uncle and his brother's filthy doings,
 Who so renown'd a nation and two crowns
 Have bastardized.  And they, of Portugal
 And Norway, there shall be expos'd with him
 Of Ratza, who hath counterfeited ill
 The coin of Venice.  O blest Hungary!
 If thou no longer patiently abid'st
 Thy ill-entreating! and, O blest Navarre!
 If with thy mountainous girdle thou wouldst arm thee
 In earnest of that day, e'en now are heard
 Wailings and groans in Famagosta's streets
 And Nicosia's, grudging at their beast,
 Who keepeth even footing with the rest."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XX
 
 When, disappearing, from our hemisphere,
 The world's enlightener vanishes, and day
 On all sides wasteth, suddenly the sky,
 Erewhile irradiate only with his beam,
 Is yet again unfolded, putting forth
 Innumerable lights wherein one shines.
 Of such vicissitude in heaven I thought,
 As the great sign, that marshaleth the world
 And the world's leaders, in the blessed beak
 Was silent; for that all those living lights,
 Waxing in splendour, burst forth into songs,
 Such as from memory glide and fall away.
 
 Sweet love! that dost apparel thee in smiles,
 How lustrous was thy semblance in those sparkles,
 Which merely are from holy thoughts inspir'd!
 
 After the precious and bright beaming stones,
 That did ingem the sixth light, ceas'd the chiming
 Of their angelic bells; methought I heard
 The murmuring of a river, that doth fall
 From rock to rock transpicuous, making known
 The richness of his spring-head: and as sound
 Of cistern, at the fret-board, or of pipe,
 Is, at the wind-hole, modulate and tun'd;
 Thus up the neck, as it were hollow, rose
 That murmuring of the eagle, and forthwith
 Voice there assum'd, and thence along the beak
 Issued in form of words, such as my heart
 Did look for, on whose tables I inscrib'd them.
 
 "The part in me, that sees, and bears the sun,,
 In mortal eagles," it began, "must now
 Be noted steadfastly: for of the fires,
 That figure me, those, glittering in mine eye,
 Are chief of all the greatest.  This, that shines
 Midmost for pupil, was the same, who sang
 The Holy Spirit's song, and bare about
 The ark from town to town; now doth he know
 The merit of his soul-impassion'd strains
 By their well-fitted guerdon.  Of the five,
 That make the circle of the vision, he
 Who to the beak is nearest, comforted
 The widow for her son: now doth he know
 How dear he costeth not to follow Christ,
 Both from experience of this pleasant life,
 And of its opposite.  He next, who follows
 In the circumference, for the over arch,
 By true repenting slack'd the pace of death:
 Now knoweth he, that the degrees of heav'n
 Alter not, when through pious prayer below
 Today's is made tomorrow's destiny.
 The other following, with the laws and me,
 To yield the shepherd room, pass'd o'er to Greece,
 From good intent producing evil fruit:
 Now knoweth he, how all the ill, deriv'd
 From his well doing, doth not helm him aught,
 Though it have brought destruction on the world.
 That, which thou seest in the under bow,
 Was William, whom that land bewails, which weeps
 For Charles and Frederick living: now he knows
 How well is lov'd in heav'n the righteous king,
 Which he betokens by his radiant seeming.
 Who in the erring world beneath would deem,
 That Trojan Ripheus in this round was set
 Fifth of the saintly splendours?  now he knows
 Enough of that, which the world cannot see,
 The grace divine, albeit e'en his sight
 Reach not its utmost depth."  Like to the lark,
 That warbling in the air expatiates long,
 Then, trilling out his last sweet melody,
 Drops satiate with the sweetness; such appear'd
 That image stampt by the' everlasting pleasure,
 Which fashions like itself all lovely things.
 
 I, though my doubting were as manifest,
 As is through glass the hue that mantles it,
 In silence waited not: for to my lips
 "What things are these?"  involuntary rush'd,
 And forc'd a passage out: whereat I mark'd
 A sudden lightening and new revelry.
 The eye was kindled: and the blessed sign
 No more to keep me wond'ring and suspense,
 Replied: "I see that thou believ'st these things,
 Because I tell them, but discern'st not how;
 So that thy knowledge waits not on thy faith:
 As one who knows the name of thing by rote,
 But is a stranger to its properties,
 Till other's tongue reveal them.  Fervent love
 And lively hope with violence assail
 The kingdom of the heavens, and overcome
 The will of the Most high; not in such sort
 As man prevails o'er man; but conquers it,
 Because 't is willing to be conquer'd, still,
 Though conquer'd, by its mercy conquering.
 
 "Those, in the eye who live the first and fifth,
 Cause thee to marvel, in that thou behold'st
 The region of the angels deck'd with them.
 They quitted not their bodies, as thou deem'st,
 Gentiles but Christians, in firm rooted faith,
 This of the feet in future to be pierc'd,
 That of feet nail'd already to the cross.
 One from the barrier of the dark abyss,
 Where never any with good will returns,
 Came back unto his bones.  Of lively hope
 Such was the meed; of lively hope, that wing'd
 The prayers sent up to God for his release,
 And put power into them to bend his will.
 The glorious Spirit, of whom I speak to thee,
 A little while returning to the flesh,
 Believ'd in him, who had the means to help,
 And, in believing, nourish'd such a flame
 Of holy love, that at the second death
 He was made sharer in our gamesome mirth.
 The other, through the riches of that grace,
 Which from so deep a fountain doth distil,
 As never eye created saw its rising,
 Plac'd all his love below on just and right:
 Wherefore of grace God op'd in him the eye
 To the redemption of mankind to come;
 Wherein believing, he endur'd no more
 The filth of paganism, and for their ways
 Rebuk'd the stubborn nations.  The three nymphs,
 Whom at the right wheel thou beheldst advancing,
 Were sponsors for him more than thousand years
 Before baptizing.  O how far remov'd,
 Predestination! is thy root from such
 As see not the First cause entire: and ye,
 O mortal men! be wary how ye judge:
 For we, who see our Maker, know not yet
 The number of the chosen: and esteem
 Such scantiness of knowledge our delight:
 For all our good is in that primal good
 Concentrate, and God's will and ours are one."
 
 So, by that form divine, was giv'n to me
 Sweet medicine to clear and strengthen sight,
 And, as one handling skillfully the harp,
 Attendant on some skilful songster's voice
 Bids the chords vibrate, and therein the song
 Acquires more pleasure; so, the whilst it spake,
 It doth remember me, that I beheld
 The pair of blessed luminaries move.
 Like the accordant twinkling of two eyes,
 Their beamy circlets, dancing to the sounds.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXI
 
 Again mine eyes were fix'd on Beatrice,
 And with mine eyes my soul, that in her looks
 Found all contentment.  Yet no smile she wore
 And, "Did I smile," quoth she, "thou wouldst be straight
 Like Semele when into ashes turn'd:
 For, mounting these eternal palace-stairs,
 My beauty, which the loftier it climbs,
 As thou hast noted, still doth kindle more,
 So shines, that, were no temp'ring interpos'd,
 Thy mortal puissance would from its rays
 Shrink, as the leaf doth from the thunderbolt.
 Into the seventh splendour are we wafted,
 That underneath the burning lion's breast
 Beams, in this hour, commingled with his might,
 Thy mind be with thine eyes: and in them mirror'd
 The shape, which in this mirror shall be shown."
 Whoso can deem, how fondly I had fed
 My sight upon her blissful countenance,
 May know, when to new thoughts I chang'd, what joy
 To do the bidding of my heav'nly guide:
 In equal balance poising either weight.
 
 Within the crystal, which records the name,
 (As its remoter circle girds the world)
 Of that lov'd monarch, in whose happy reign
 No ill had power to harm, I saw rear'd up,
 In colour like to sun-illumin'd gold.
 
 A ladder, which my ken pursued in vain,
 So lofty was the summit; down whose steps
 I saw the splendours in such multitude
 Descending, ev'ry light in heav'n, methought,
 Was shed thence.  As the rooks, at dawn of day
 Bestirring them to dry their feathers chill,
 Some speed their way a-field, and homeward some,
 Returning, cross their flight, while some abide
 And wheel around their airy lodge; so seem'd
 That glitterance, wafted on alternate wing,
 As upon certain stair it met, and clash'd
 Its shining. And one ling'ring near us, wax'd
 So bright, that in my thought: said: "The love,
 Which this betokens me, admits no doubt."
 
 Unwillingly from question I refrain,
 To her, by whom my silence and my speech
 Are order'd, looking for a sign: whence she,
 Who in the sight of Him, that seeth all,
 Saw wherefore I was silent, prompted me
 T' indulge the fervent wish; and I began:
 "I am not worthy, of my own desert,
 That thou shouldst answer me; but for her sake,
 Who hath vouchsaf'd my asking, spirit blest!
 That in thy joy art shrouded! say the cause,
 Which bringeth thee so near: and wherefore, say,
 Doth the sweet symphony of Paradise
 Keep silence here, pervading with such sounds
 Of rapt devotion ev'ry lower sphere?"
 "Mortal art thou in hearing as in sight;"
 Was the reply: "and what forbade the smile
 Of Beatrice interrupts our song.
 Only to yield thee gladness of my voice,
 And of the light that vests me, I thus far
 Descend these hallow'd steps: not that more love
 Invites me; for lo! there aloft, as much
 Or more of love is witness'd in those flames:
 But such my lot by charity assign'd,
 That makes us ready servants, as thou seest,
 To execute the counsel of the Highest."
 "That in this court," said I, "O sacred lamp!
 Love no compulsion needs, but follows free
 Th' eternal Providence, I well discern:
 This harder find to deem, why of thy peers
 Thou only to this office wert foredoom'd."
 I had not ended, when, like rapid mill,
 Upon its centre whirl'd the light; and then
 The love, that did inhabit there, replied:
 "Splendour eternal, piercing through these folds,
 Its virtue to my vision knits, and thus
 Supported, lifts me so above myself,
 That on the sov'ran essence, which it wells from,
 I have the power to gaze: and hence the joy,
 Wherewith I sparkle, equaling with my blaze
 The keenness of my sight.  But not the soul,
 That is in heav'n most lustrous, nor the seraph
 That hath his eyes most fix'd on God, shall solve
 What thou hast ask'd: for in th' abyss it lies
 Of th' everlasting statute sunk so low,
 That no created ken may fathom it.
 And, to the mortal world when thou return'st,
 Be this reported; that none henceforth dare
 Direct his footsteps to so dread a bourn.
 The mind, that here is radiant, on the earth
 Is wrapt in mist.  Look then if she may do,
 Below, what passeth her ability,
 When she is ta'en to heav'n."  By words like these
 Admonish'd, I the question urg'd no more;
 And of the spirit humbly sued alone
 T' instruct me of its state.  "'Twixt either shore
 Of Italy, nor distant from thy land,
 A stony ridge ariseth, in such sort,
 The thunder doth not lift his voice so high,
 They call it Catria: at whose foot a cell
 Is sacred to the lonely Eremite,
 For worship set apart and holy rites."
 A third time thus it spake; then added: "There
 So firmly to God's service I adher'd,
 That with no costlier viands than the juice
 Of olives, easily I pass'd the heats
 Of summer and the winter frosts, content
 In heav'n-ward musings.  Rich were the returns
 And fertile, which that cloister once was us'd
 To render to these heavens: now 't is fall'n
 Into a waste so empty, that ere long
 Detection must lay bare its vanity
 Pietro Damiano there was I yclept:
 Pietro the sinner, when before I dwelt
 Beside the Adriatic, in the house
 Of our blest Lady.  Near upon my close
 Of mortal life, through much importuning
 I was constrain'd to wear the hat that still
 From bad to worse it shifted.--Cephas came;
 He came, who was the Holy Spirit's vessel,
 Barefoot and lean, eating their bread, as chanc'd,
 At the first table.  Modern Shepherd's need
 Those who on either hand may prop and lead them,
 So burly are they grown: and from behind
 Others to hoist them.  Down the palfrey's sides
 Spread their broad mantles, so as both the beasts
 Are cover'd with one skin.  O patience! thou
 That lookst on this and doth endure so long."
 I at those accents saw the splendours down
 From step to step alight, and wheel, and wax,
 Each circuiting, more beautiful.  Round this
 They came, and stay'd them; uttered them a shout
 So loud, it hath no likeness here: nor I
 Wist what it spake, so deaf'ning was the thunder.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXII
 
 Astounded, to the guardian of my steps
 I turn'd me, like the chill, who always runs
 Thither for succour, where he trusteth most,
 And she was like the mother, who her son
 Beholding pale and breathless, with her voice
 Soothes him, and he is cheer'd; for thus she spake,
 Soothing me: "Know'st not thou, thou art in heav'n?
 And know'st not thou, whatever is in heav'n,
 Is holy, and that nothing there is done
 But is done zealously and well?  Deem now,
 What change in thee the song, and what my smile
 had wrought, since thus the shout had pow'r to move thee.
 In which couldst thou have understood their prayers,
 The vengeance were already known to thee,
 Which thou must witness ere thy mortal hour,
 The sword of heav'n is not in haste to smite,
 Nor yet doth linger, save unto his seeming,
 Who in desire or fear doth look for it.
 But elsewhere now l bid thee turn thy view;
 So shalt thou many a famous spirit behold."
 Mine eyes directing, as she will'd, I saw
 A hundred little spheres, that fairer grew
 By interchange of splendour.  I remain'd,
 As one, who fearful of o'er-much presuming,
 Abates in him the keenness of desire,
 Nor dares to question, when amid those pearls,
 One largest and most lustrous onward drew,
 That it might yield contentment to my wish;
 And from within it these the sounds I heard.
 
 "If thou, like me, beheldst the charity
 That burns amongst us, what thy mind conceives,
 Were utter'd.  But that, ere the lofty bound
 Thou reach, expectance may not weary thee,
 I will make answer even to the thought,
 Which thou hast such respect of.  In old days,
 That mountain, at whose side Cassino rests,
 Was on its height frequented by a race
 Deceived and ill dispos'd: and I it was,
 Who thither carried first the name of Him,
 Who brought the soul-subliming truth to man.
 And such a speeding grace shone over me,
 That from their impious worship I reclaim'd
 The dwellers round about, who with the world
 Were in delusion lost.  These other flames,
 The spirits of men contemplative, were all
 Enliven'd by that warmth, whose kindly force
 Gives birth to flowers and fruits of holiness.
 Here is Macarius; Romoaldo here:
 And here my brethren, who their steps refrain'd
 Within the cloisters, and held firm their heart."
 
 I answ'ring, thus; "Thy gentle words and kind,
 And this the cheerful semblance, I behold
 Not unobservant, beaming in ye all,
 Have rais'd assurance in me, wakening it
 Full-blossom'd in my bosom, as a rose
 Before the sun, when the consummate flower
 Has spread to utmost amplitude.  Of thee
 Therefore entreat I, father! to declare
 If I may gain such favour, as to gaze
 Upon thine image, by no covering veil'd."
 
 "Brother!"  he thus rejoin'd, "in the last sphere
 Expect completion of thy lofty aim,
 For there on each desire completion waits,
 And there on mine: where every aim is found
 Perfect, entire, and for fulfillment ripe.
 There all things are as they have ever been:
 For space is none to bound, nor pole divides,
 Our ladder reaches even to that clime,
 And so at giddy distance mocks thy view.
 Thither the Patriarch Jacob saw it stretch
 Its topmost round, when it appear'd to him
 With angels laden.  But to mount it now
 None lifts his foot from earth: and hence my rule
 Is left a profitless stain upon the leaves;
 The walls, for abbey rear'd, turned into dens,
 The cowls to sacks choak'd up with musty meal.
 Foul usury doth not more lift itself
 Against God's pleasure, than that fruit which makes
 The hearts of monks so wanton: for whate'er
 Is in the church's keeping, all pertains.
 To such, as sue for heav'n's sweet sake, and not
 To those who in respect of kindred claim,
 Or on more vile allowance.  Mortal flesh
 Is grown so dainty, good beginnings last not
 From the oak's birth, unto the acorn's setting.
 His convent Peter founded without gold
 Or silver; I with pray'rs and fasting mine;
 And Francis his in meek humility.
 And if thou note the point, whence each proceeds,
 Then look what it hath err'd to, thou shalt find
 The white grown murky.  Jordan was turn'd back;
 And a less wonder, then the refluent sea,
 May at God's pleasure work amendment here."
 
 So saying, to his assembly back he drew:
 And they together cluster'd into one,
 Then all roll'd upward like an eddying wind.
 
 The sweet dame beckon'd me to follow them:
 And, by that influence only, so prevail'd
 Over my nature, that no natural motion,
 Ascending or descending here below,
 Had, as I mounted, with my pennon vied.
 
 So, reader, as my hope is to return
 Unto the holy triumph, for the which
 I ofttimes wail my sins, and smite my breast,
 Thou hadst been longer drawing out and thrusting
 Thy finger in the fire, than I was, ere
 The sign, that followeth Taurus, I beheld,
 And enter'd its precinct.  O glorious stars!
 O light impregnate with exceeding virtue!
 To whom whate'er of genius lifteth me
 Above the vulgar, grateful I refer;
 With ye the parent of all mortal life
 Arose and set, when I did first inhale
 The Tuscan air; and afterward, when grace
 Vouchsaf'd me entrance to the lofty wheel
 That in its orb impels ye, fate decreed
 My passage at your clime.  To you my soul
 Devoutly sighs, for virtue even now
 To meet the hard emprize that draws me on.
 
 "Thou art so near the sum of blessedness,"
 Said Beatrice, "that behooves thy ken
 Be vigilant and clear.  And, to this end,
 Or even thou advance thee further, hence
 Look downward, and contemplate, what a world
 Already stretched under our feet there lies:
 So as thy heart may, in its blithest mood,
 Present itself to the triumphal throng,
 Which through the' etherial concave comes rejoicing."
 
 I straight obey'd; and with mine eye return'd
 Through all the seven spheres, and saw this globe
 So pitiful of semblance, that perforce
 It moved my smiles: and him in truth I hold
 For wisest, who esteems it least: whose thoughts
 Elsewhere are fix'd, him worthiest call and best.
 I saw the daughter of Latona shine
 Without the shadow, whereof late I deem'd
 That dense and rare were cause.  Here I sustain'd
 The visage, Hyperion! of thy sun;
 And mark'd, how near him with their circle, round
 Move Maia and Dione; here discern'd
 Jove's tempering 'twixt his sire and son; and hence
 Their changes and their various aspects
 Distinctly scann'd.  Nor might I not descry
 Of all the seven, how bulky each, how swift;
 Nor of their several distances not learn.
 This petty area (o'er the which we stride
 So fiercely), as along the eternal twins
 I wound my way, appear'd before me all,
 Forth from the havens stretch'd unto the hills.
 Then to the beauteous eyes mine eyes return'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIII
 
 E'en as the bird, who midst the leafy bower
 Has, in her nest, sat darkling through the night,
 With her sweet brood, impatient to descry
 Their wished looks, and to bring home their food,
 In the fond quest unconscious of her toil:
 She, of the time prevenient, on the spray,
 That overhangs their couch, with wakeful gaze
 Expects the sun; nor ever, till the dawn,
 Removeth from the east her eager ken;
 So stood the dame erect, and bent her glance
 Wistfully on that region, where the sun
 Abateth most his speed; that, seeing her
 Suspense and wand'ring, I became as one,
 In whom desire is waken'd, and the hope
 Of somewhat new to come fills with delight.
 
 Short space ensued; I was not held, I say,
 Long in expectance, when I saw the heav'n
 Wax more and more resplendent; and, "Behold,"
 Cried Beatrice, "the triumphal hosts
 Of Christ, and all the harvest reap'd at length
 Of thy ascending up these spheres."  Meseem'd,
 That, while she spake her image all did burn,
 And in her eyes such fullness was of joy,
 And I am fain to pass unconstrued by.
 
 As in the calm full moon, when Trivia smiles,
 In peerless beauty, 'mid th' eternal nympus,
 That paint through all its gulfs the blue profound
 In bright pre-eminence so saw I there,
 O'er million lamps a sun, from whom all drew
 Their radiance as from ours the starry train:
 And through the living light so lustrous glow'd
 The substance, that my ken endur'd it not.
 
 O Beatrice! sweet and precious guide!
 Who cheer'd me with her comfortable words!
 "Against the virtue, that o'erpow'reth thee,
 Avails not to resist.  Here is the might,
 And here the wisdom, which did open lay
 The path, that had been yearned for so long,
 Betwixt the heav'n and earth."  Like to the fire,
 That, in a cloud imprison'd doth break out
 Expansive, so that from its womb enlarg'd,
 It falleth against nature to the ground;
 Thus in that heav'nly banqueting my soul
 Outgrew herself; and, in the transport lost.
 Holds now remembrance none of what she was.
 
 "Ope thou thine eyes, and mark me: thou hast seen
 Things, that empower thee to sustain my smile."
 
 I was as one, when a forgotten dream
 Doth come across him, and he strives in vain
 To shape it in his fantasy again,
 Whenas that gracious boon was proffer'd me,
 Which never may be cancel'd from the book,
 Wherein the past is written.  Now were all
 Those tongues to sound, that have on sweetest milk
 Of Polyhymnia and her sisters fed
 And fatten'd, not with all their help to boot,
 Unto the thousandth parcel of the truth,
 My song might shadow forth that saintly smile,
 flow merely in her saintly looks it wrought.
 And with such figuring of Paradise
 The sacred strain must leap, like one, that meets
 A sudden interruption to his road.
 But he, who thinks how ponderous the theme,
 And that 't is lain upon a mortal shoulder,
 May pardon, if it tremble with the burden.
 The track, our ventrous keel must furrow, brooks
 No unribb'd pinnace, no self-sparing pilot.
 
 "Why doth my face," said Beatrice, "thus
 Enamour thee, as that thou dost not turn
 Unto the beautiful garden, blossoming
 Beneath the rays of Christ?  Here is the rose,
 Wherein the word divine was made incarnate;
 And here the lilies, by whose odour known
 The way of life was follow'd."  Prompt I heard
 Her bidding, and encounter once again
 The strife of aching vision.  As erewhile,
 Through glance of sunlight, stream'd through broken cloud,
 Mine eyes a flower-besprinkled mead have seen,
 Though veil'd themselves in shade; so saw I there
 Legions of splendours, on whom burning rays
 Shed lightnings from above, yet saw I not
 The fountain whence they flow'd.  O gracious virtue!
 Thou, whose broad stamp is on them, higher up
 Thou didst exalt thy glory to give room
 To my o'erlabour'd sight: when at the name
 Of that fair flower, whom duly I invoke
 Both morn and eve, my soul, with all her might
 Collected, on the goodliest ardour fix'd.
 And, as the bright dimensions of the star
 In heav'n excelling, as once here on earth
 Were, in my eyeballs lively portray'd,
 Lo! from within the sky a cresset fell,
 Circling in fashion of a diadem,
 And girt the star, and hov'ring round it wheel'd.
 
 Whatever melody sounds sweetest here,
 And draws the spirit most unto itself,
 Might seem a rent cloud when it grates the thunder,
 Compar'd unto the sounding of that lyre,
 Wherewith the goodliest sapphire, that inlays
 The floor of heav'n, was crown'd. "Angelic Love
 I am, who thus with hov'ring flight enwheel
 The lofty rapture from that womb inspir'd,
 Where our desire did dwell: and round thee so,
 Lady of Heav'n! will hover; long as thou
 Thy Son shalt follow, and diviner joy
 Shall from thy presence gild the highest sphere."
 
 Such close was to the circling melody:
 And, as it ended, all the other lights
 Took up the strain, and echoed Mary's name.
 
 The robe, that with its regal folds enwraps
 The world, and with the nearer breath of God
 Doth burn and quiver, held so far retir'd
 Its inner hem and skirting over us,
 That yet no glimmer of its majesty
 Had stream'd unto me: therefore were mine eyes
 Unequal to pursue the crowned flame,
 That rose and sought its natal seed of fire;
 And like to babe, that stretches forth its arms
 For very eagerness towards the breast,
 After the milk is taken; so outstretch'd
 Their wavy summits all the fervent band,
 Through zealous love to Mary: then in view
 There halted, and "Regina Coeli" sang
 So sweetly, the delight hath left me never.
 
 O what o'erflowing plenty is up-pil'd
 In those rich-laden coffers, which below
 Sow'd the good seed, whose harvest now they keep.
 
 Here are the treasures tasted, that with tears
 Were in the Babylonian exile won,
 When gold had fail'd them.  Here in synod high
 Of ancient council with the new conven'd,
 Under the Son of Mary and of God,
 Victorious he his mighty triumph holds,
 To whom the keys of glory were assign'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIV
 
 "O ye! in chosen fellowship advanc'd
 To the great supper of the blessed Lamb,
 Whereon who feeds hath every wish fulfill'd!
 If to this man through God's grace be vouchsaf'd
 Foretaste of that, which from your table falls,
 Or ever death his fated term prescribe;
 Be ye not heedless of his urgent will;
 But may some influence of your sacred dews
 Sprinkle him.  Of the fount ye alway drink,
 Whence flows what most he craves."  Beatrice spake,
 And the rejoicing spirits, like to spheres
 On firm-set poles revolving, trail'd a blaze
 Of comet splendour; and as wheels, that wind
 Their circles in the horologe, so work
 The stated rounds, that to th' observant eye
 The first seems still, and, as it flew, the last;
 E'en thus their carols weaving variously,
 They by the measure pac'd, or swift, or slow,
 Made me to rate the riches of their joy.
 
 From that, which I did note in beauty most
 Excelling, saw I issue forth a flame
 So bright, as none was left more goodly there.
 Round Beatrice thrice it wheel'd about,
 With so divine a song, that fancy's ear
 Records it not; and the pen passeth on
 And leaves a blank: for that our mortal speech,
 Nor e'en the inward shaping of the brain,
 Hath colours fine enough to trace such folds.
 
 "O saintly sister mine! thy prayer devout
 Is with so vehement affection urg'd,
 Thou dost unbind me from that beauteous sphere."
 
 Such were the accents towards my lady breath'd
 From that blest ardour, soon as it was stay'd:
 To whom she thus: "O everlasting light
 Of him, within whose mighty grasp our Lord
 Did leave the keys, which of this wondrous bliss
 He bare below! tent this man, as thou wilt,
 With lighter probe or deep, touching the faith,
 By the which thou didst on the billows walk.
 If he in love, in hope, and in belief,
 Be steadfast, is not hid from thee: for thou
 Hast there thy ken, where all things are beheld
 In liveliest portraiture.  But since true faith
 Has peopled this fair realm with citizens,
 Meet is, that to exalt its glory more,
 Thou in his audience shouldst thereof discourse."
 
 Like to the bachelor, who arms himself,
 And speaks not, till the master have propos'd
 The question, to approve, and not to end it;
 So I, in silence, arm'd me, while she spake,
 Summoning up each argument to aid;
 As was behooveful for such questioner,
 And such profession: "As good Christian ought,
 Declare thee, What is faith?"  Whereat I rais'd
 My forehead to the light, whence this had breath'd,
 Then turn'd to Beatrice, and in her looks
 Approval met, that from their inmost fount
 I should unlock the waters.  "May the grace,
 That giveth me the captain of the church
 For confessor," said I, "vouchsafe to me
 Apt utterance for my thoughts!" then added: "Sire!
 E'en as set down by the unerring style
 Of thy dear brother, who with thee conspir'd
 To bring Rome in unto the way of life,
 Faith of things hop'd is substance, and the proof
 Of things not seen; and herein doth consist
 Methinks its essence,"--"Rightly hast thou deem'd,"
 Was answer'd: "if thou well discern, why first
 He hath defin'd it, substance, and then proof."
 
 "The deep things," I replied, "which here I scan
 Distinctly, are below from mortal eye
 So hidden, they have in belief alone
 Their being, on which credence hope sublime
 Is built; and therefore substance it intends.
 And inasmuch as we must needs infer
 From such belief our reasoning, all respect
 To other view excluded, hence of proof
 Th' intention is deriv'd."  Forthwith I heard:
 "If thus, whate'er by learning men attain,
 Were understood, the sophist would want room
 To exercise his wit."  So breath'd the flame
 Of love: then added: "Current is the coin
 Thou utter'st, both in weight and in alloy.
 But tell me, if thou hast it in thy purse."
 
 "Even so glittering and so round," said I,
 "I not a whit misdoubt of its assay."
 
 Next issued from the deep imbosom'd splendour:
 "Say, whence the costly jewel, on the which
 Is founded every virtue, came to thee."
 "The flood," I answer'd, "from the Spirit of God
 Rain'd down upon the ancient bond and new,--
 Here is the reas'ning, that convinceth me
 So feelingly, each argument beside
 Seems blunt and forceless in comparison."
 Then heard I: "Wherefore holdest thou that each,
 The elder proposition and the new,
 Which so persuade thee, are the voice of heav'n?"
 
 "The works, that follow'd, evidence their truth;"
 I answer'd: "Nature did not make for these
 The iron hot, or on her anvil mould them."
 "Who voucheth to thee of the works themselves,"
 Was the reply, "that they in very deed
 Are that they purport?  None hath sworn so to thee."
 
 "That all the world," said I, "should have been turn'd
 To Christian, and no miracle been wrought,
 Would in itself be such a miracle,
 The rest were not an hundredth part so great.
 E'en thou wentst forth in poverty and hunger
 To set the goodly plant, that from the vine,
 It once was, now is grown unsightly bramble."
 That ended, through the high celestial court
 Resounded all the spheres.  "Praise we one God!"
 In song of most unearthly melody.
 And when that Worthy thus, from branch to branch,
 Examining, had led me, that we now
 Approach'd the topmost bough, he straight resum'd;
 "The grace, that holds sweet dalliance with thy soul,
 So far discreetly hath thy lips unclos'd
 That, whatsoe'er has past them, I commend.
 Behooves thee to express, what thou believ'st,
 The next, and whereon thy belief hath grown."
 
 "O saintly sire and spirit!" I began,
 "Who seest that, which thou didst so believe,
 As to outstrip feet younger than thine own,
 Toward the sepulchre?  thy will is here,
 That I the tenour of my creed unfold;
 And thou the cause of it hast likewise ask'd.
 And I reply: I in one God believe,
 One sole eternal Godhead, of whose love
 All heav'n is mov'd, himself unmov'd the while.
 Nor demonstration physical alone,
 Or more intelligential and abstruse,
 Persuades me to this faith; but from that truth
 It cometh to me rather, which is shed
 Through Moses, the rapt Prophets, and the Psalms.
 The Gospel, and that ye yourselves did write,
 When ye were gifted of the Holy Ghost.
 In three eternal Persons I believe,
 Essence threefold and one, mysterious league
 Of union absolute, which, many a time,
 The word of gospel lore upon my mind
 Imprints: and from this germ, this firstling spark,
 The lively flame dilates, and like heav'n's star
 Doth glitter in me."  As the master hears,
 Well pleas'd, and then enfoldeth in his arms
 The servant, who hath joyful tidings brought,
 And having told the errand keeps his peace;
 Thus benediction uttering with song
 Soon as my peace I held, compass'd me thrice
 The apostolic radiance, whose behest
 Had op'd lips; so well their answer pleas'd.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXV
 
 If e'er the sacred poem that hath made
 Both heav'n and earth copartners in its toil,
 And with lean abstinence, through many a year,
 Faded my brow, be destin'd to prevail
 Over the cruelty, which bars me forth
 Of the fair sheep-fold, where a sleeping lamb
 The wolves set on and fain had worried me,
 With other voice and fleece of other grain
 I shall forthwith return, and, standing up
 At my baptismal font, shall claim the wreath
 Due to the poet's temples: for I there
 First enter'd on the faith which maketh souls
 Acceptable to God: and, for its sake,
 Peter had then circled my forehead thus.
 
 Next from the squadron, whence had issued forth
 The first fruit of Christ's vicars on the earth,
 Toward us mov'd a light, at view whereof
 My Lady, full of gladness, spake to me:
 "Lo! lo! behold the peer of mickle might,
 That makes Falicia throng'd with visitants!"
 
 As when the ring-dove by his mate alights,
 In circles each about the other wheels,
 And murmuring cooes his fondness; thus saw I
 One, of the other great and glorious prince,
 With kindly greeting hail'd, extolling both
 Their heavenly banqueting; but when an end
 Was to their gratulation, silent, each,
 Before me sat they down, so burning bright,
 I could not look upon them.  Smiling then,
 Beatrice spake: "O life in glory shrin'd!"
 Who didst the largess of our kingly court
 Set down with faithful pen! let now thy voice
 Of hope the praises in this height resound.
 For thou, who figur'st them in shapes, as clear,
 As Jesus stood before thee, well can'st speak them."
 
 "Lift up thy head, and be thou strong in trust:
 For that, which hither from the mortal world
 Arriveth, must be ripen'd in our beam."
 
 Such cheering accents from the second flame
 Assur'd me; and mine eyes I lifted up
 Unto the mountains that had bow'd them late
 With over-heavy burden.  "Sith our Liege
 Wills of his grace that thou, or ere thy death,
 In the most secret council, with his lords
 Shouldst be confronted, so that having view'd
 The glories of our court, thou mayst therewith
 Thyself, and all who hear, invigorate
 With hope, that leads to blissful end; declare,
 What is that hope, how it doth flourish in thee,
 And whence thou hadst it?"  Thus proceeding still,
 The second light: and she, whose gentle love
 My soaring pennons in that lofty flight
 Escorted, thus preventing me, rejoin'd:
 Among her sons, not one more full of hope,
 Hath the church militant: so 't is of him
 Recorded in the sun, whose liberal orb
 Enlighteneth all our tribe: and ere his term
 Of warfare, hence permitted he is come,
 From Egypt to Jerusalem, to see.
 The other points, both which thou hast inquir'd,
 Not for more knowledge, but that he may tell
 How dear thou holdst the virtue, these to him
 Leave I; for he may answer thee with ease,
 And without boasting, so God give him grace."
 Like to the scholar, practis'd in his task,
 Who, willing to give proof of diligence,
 Seconds his teacher gladly, "Hope," said I,
 "Is of the joy to come a sure expectance,
 Th' effect of grace divine and merit preceding.
 This light from many a star visits my heart,
 But flow'd to me the first from him, who sang
 The songs of the Supreme, himself supreme
 Among his tuneful brethren.  'Let all hope
 In thee,' so speak his anthem, 'who have known
 Thy name;' and with my faith who know not that?
 From thee, the next, distilling from his spring,
 In thine epistle, fell on me the drops
 So plenteously, that I on others shower
 The influence of their dew."  Whileas I spake,
 A lamping, as of quick and vollied lightning,
 Within the bosom of that mighty sheen,
 Play'd tremulous; then forth these accents breath'd:
 "Love for the virtue which attended me
 E'en to the palm, and issuing from the field,
 Glows vigorous yet within me, and inspires
 To ask of thee, whom also it delights;
 What promise thou from hope in chief dost win."
 
 "Both scriptures, new and ancient," I reply'd;
 "Propose the mark (which even now I view)
 For souls belov'd of God. Isaias saith,
 That, in their own land, each one must be clad
 In twofold vesture; and their proper lands this delicious life.
 In terms more full,
 And clearer far, thy brother hath set forth
 This revelation to us, where he tells
 Of the white raiment destin'd to the saints."
 And, as the words were ending, from above,
 "They hope in thee," first heard we cried: whereto
 Answer'd the carols all.  Amidst them next,
 A light of so clear amplitude emerg'd,
 That winter's month were but a single day,
 Were such a crystal in the Cancer's sign.
 
 Like as a virgin riseth up, and goes,
 And enters on the mazes of the dance,
 Though gay, yet innocent of worse intent,
 Than to do fitting honour to the bride;
 So I beheld the new effulgence come
 Unto the other two, who in a ring
 Wheel'd, as became their rapture.  In the dance
 And in the song it mingled.  And the dame
 Held on them fix'd her looks: e'en as the spouse
 Silent and moveless.  "This is he, who lay
 Upon the bosom of our pelican:
 This he, into whose keeping from the cross
 The mighty charge was given."  Thus she spake,
 Yet therefore naught the more remov'd her Sight
 From marking them, or ere her words began,
 Or when they clos'd.  As he, who looks intent,
 And strives with searching ken, how he may see
 The sun in his eclipse, and, through desire
 Of seeing, loseth power of sight: so I
 Peer'd on that last resplendence, while I heard:
 "Why dazzlest thou thine eyes in seeking that,
 Which here abides not?  Earth my body is,
 In earth: and shall be, with the rest, so long,
 As till our number equal the decree
 Of the Most High.  The two that have ascended,
 In this our blessed cloister, shine alone
 With the two garments.  So report below."
 
 As when, for ease of labour, or to shun
 Suspected peril at a whistle's breath,
 The oars, erewhile dash'd frequent in the wave,
 All rest; the flamy circle at that voice
 So rested, and the mingling sound was still,
 Which from the trinal band soft-breathing rose.
 I turn'd, but ah! how trembled in my thought,
 When, looking at my side again to see
 Beatrice, I descried her not, although
 Not distant, on the happy coast she stood.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXVI
 
 With dazzled eyes, whilst wond'ring I remain'd,
 Forth of the beamy flame which dazzled me,
 Issued a breath, that in attention mute
 Detain'd me; and these words it spake: "'T were well,
 That, long as till thy vision, on my form
 O'erspent, regain its virtue, with discourse
 Thou compensate the brief delay.  Say then,
 Beginning, to what point thy soul aspires:
 
 "And meanwhile rest assur'd, that sight in thee
 Is but o'erpowered a space, not wholly quench'd:
 Since thy fair guide and lovely, in her look
 Hath potency, the like to that which dwelt
 In Ananias' hand." I answering thus:
 "Be to mine eyes the remedy or late
 Or early, at her pleasure; for they were
 The gates, at which she enter'd, and did light
 Her never dying fire.  My wishes here
 Are centered; in this palace is the weal,
 That Alpha and Omega, is to all
 The lessons love can read me."  Yet again
 The voice which had dispers'd my fear, when daz'd
 With that excess, to converse urg'd, and spake:
 "Behooves thee sift more narrowly thy terms,
 And say, who level'd at this scope thy bow."
 
 "Philosophy," said I, ''hath arguments,
 And this place hath authority enough
 'T' imprint in me such love: for, of constraint,
 Good, inasmuch as we perceive the good,
 Kindles our love, and in degree the more,
 As it comprises more of goodness in 't.
 The essence then, where such advantage is,
 That each good, found without it, is naught else
 But of his light the beam, must needs attract
 The soul of each one, loving, who the truth
 Discerns, on which this proof is built.  Such truth
 Learn I from him, who shows me the first love
 Of all intelligential substances
 Eternal: from his voice I learn, whose word
 Is truth, that of himself to Moses saith,
 'I will make all my good before thee pass.'
 Lastly from thee I learn, who chief proclaim'st,
 E'en at the outset of thy heralding,
 In mortal ears the mystery of heav'n."
 
 "Through human wisdom, and th' authority
 Therewith agreeing," heard I answer'd, "keep
 The choicest of thy love for God.  But say,
 If thou yet other cords within thee feel'st
 That draw thee towards him; so that thou report
 How many are the fangs, with which this love
 Is grappled to thy soul."  I did not miss,
 To what intent the eagle of our Lord
 Had pointed his demand; yea noted well
 Th' avowal, which he led to; and resum'd:
 "All grappling bonds, that knit the heart to God,
 Confederate to make fast our clarity.
 The being of the world, and mine own being,
 The death which he endur'd that I should live,
 And that, which all the faithful hope, as I do,
 To the foremention'd lively knowledge join'd,
 Have from the sea of ill love sav'd my bark,
 And on the coast secur'd it of the right.
 As for the leaves, that in the garden bloom,
 My love for them is great, as is the good
 Dealt by th' eternal hand, that tends them all."
 
 I ended, and therewith a song most sweet
 Rang through the spheres; and "Holy, holy, holy,"
 Accordant with the rest my lady sang.
 And as a sleep is broken and dispers'd
 Through sharp encounter of the nimble light,
 With the eye's spirit running forth to meet
 The ray, from membrane on to the membrane urg'd;
 And the upstartled wight loathes that he sees;
 So, at his sudden waking, he misdeems
 Of all around him, till assurance waits
 On better judgment: thus the saintly came
 Drove from before mine eyes the motes away,
 With the resplendence of her own, that cast
 Their brightness downward, thousand miles below.
 Whence I my vision, clearer shall before,
 Recover'd; and, well nigh astounded, ask'd
 Of a fourth light, that now with us I saw.
 
 And Beatrice: "The first diving soul,
 That ever the first virtue fram'd, admires
 Within these rays his Maker."  Like the leaf,
 That bows its lithe top till the blast is blown;
 By its own virtue rear'd then stands aloof;
 So I, the whilst she said, awe-stricken bow'd.
 Then eagerness to speak embolden'd me;
 And I began: "O fruit! that wast alone
 Mature, when first engender'd!  Ancient father!
 That doubly seest in every wedded bride
 Thy daughter by affinity and blood!
 Devoutly as I may, I pray thee hold
 Converse with me: my will thou seest; and I,
 More speedily to hear thee, tell it not."
 
 It chanceth oft some animal bewrays,
 Through the sleek cov'ring of his furry coat.
 The fondness, that stirs in him and conforms
 His outside seeming to the cheer within:
 And in like guise was Adam's spirit mov'd
 To joyous mood, that through the covering shone,
 Transparent, when to pleasure me it spake:
 "No need thy will be told, which I untold
 Better discern, than thou whatever thing
 Thou holdst most certain: for that will I see
 In Him, who is truth's mirror, and Himself
 Parhelion unto all things, and naught else
 To him.  This wouldst thou hear; how long since God
 Plac'd me high garden, from whose hounds
 She led me up in this ladder, steep and long;
 What space endur'd my season of delight;
 Whence truly sprang the wrath that banish'd me;
 And what the language, which I spake and fram'd
 Not that I tasted of the tree, my son,
 Was in itself the cause of that exile,
 But only my transgressing of the mark
 Assign'd me.  There, whence at thy lady's hest
 The Mantuan mov'd him, still was I debarr'd
 This council, till the sun had made complete,
 Four thousand and three hundred rounds and twice,
 His annual journey; and, through every light
 In his broad pathway, saw I him return,
 Thousand save sev'nty times, the whilst I dwelt
 Upon the earth.  The language I did use
 Was worn away, or ever Nimrod's race
 Their unaccomplishable work began.
 For naught, that man inclines to, ere was lasting,
 Left by his reason free, and variable,
 As is the sky that sways him.  That he speaks,
 Is nature's prompting: whether thus or thus,
 She leaves to you, as ye do most affect it.
 Ere I descended into hell's abyss,
 El was the name on earth of the Chief Good,
 Whose joy enfolds me: Eli then 't was call'd
 And so beseemeth: for, in mortals, use
 Is as the leaf upon the bough; that goes,
 And other comes instead.  Upon the mount
 Most high above the waters, all my life,
 Both innocent and guilty, did but reach
 From the first hour, to that which cometh next
 (As the sun changes quarter), to the sixth."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXVII
 
 Then  "Glory to the Father, to the Son,
 And to the Holy Spirit," rang aloud
 Throughout all Paradise, that with the song
 My spirit reel'd, so passing sweet the strain:
 And what I saw was equal ecstasy;
 One universal smile it seem'd of all things,
 Joy past compare, gladness unutterable,
 Imperishable life of peace and love,
 Exhaustless riches and unmeasur'd bliss.
 
 Before mine eyes stood the four torches lit;
 And that, which first had come, began to wax
 In brightness, and in semblance such became,
 As Jove might be, if he and Mars were birds,
 And interchang'd their plumes.  Silence ensued,
 Through the blest quire, by Him, who here appoints
 Vicissitude of ministry, enjoin'd;
 When thus I heard: "Wonder not, if my hue
 Be chang'd; for, while I speak, these shalt thou see
 All in like manner change with me.  My place
 He who usurps on earth (my place, ay, mine,
 Which in the presence of the Son of God
 Is void), the same hath made my cemetery
 A common sewer of puddle and of blood:
 The more below his triumph, who from hence
 Malignant fell."  Such colour, as the sun,
 At eve or morning, paints an adverse cloud,
 Then saw I sprinkled over all the sky.
 And as th' unblemish'd dame, who in herself
 Secure of censure, yet at bare report
 Of other's failing, shrinks with maiden fear;
 So Beatrice in her semblance chang'd:
 And such eclipse in heav'n methinks was seen,
 When the Most Holy suffer'd.  Then the words
 Proceeded, with voice, alter'd from itself
 So clean, the semblance did not alter more.
 "Not to this end was Christ's spouse with my blood,
 With that of Linus, and of Cletus fed:
 That she might serve for purchase of base gold:
 But for the purchase of this happy life
 Did Sextus, Pius, and Callixtus bleed,
 And Urban, they, whose doom was not without
 Much weeping seal'd.  No purpose was of our
 That on the right hand of our successors
 Part of the Christian people should be set,
 And part upon their left; nor that the keys,
 Which were vouchsaf'd me, should for ensign serve
 Unto the banners, that do levy war
 On the baptiz'd: nor I, for sigil-mark
 Set upon sold and lying privileges;
 Which makes me oft to bicker and turn red.
 In shepherd's clothing greedy wolves below
 Range wide o'er all the pastures.  Arm of God!
 Why longer sleepst thou?  Caorsines and Gascona
 Prepare to quaff our blood.  O good beginning
 To what a vile conclusion must thou stoop!
 But the high providence, which did defend
 Through Scipio the world's glory unto Rome,
 Will not delay its succour: and thou, son,
 Who through thy mortal weight shall yet again
 Return below, open thy lips, nor hide
 What is by me not hidden."  As a Hood
 Of frozen vapours streams adown the air,
 What time the she-goat with her skiey horn
 Touches the sun; so saw I there stream wide
 The vapours, who with us had linger'd late
 And with glad triumph deck th' ethereal cope.
 Onward my sight their semblances pursued;
 So far pursued, as till the space between
 From its reach sever'd them: whereat the guide
 Celestial, marking me no more intent
 On upward gazing, said, "Look down and see
 What circuit thou hast compass'd."  From the hour
 When I before had cast my view beneath,
 All the first region overpast I saw,
 Which from the midmost to the bound'ry winds;
 That onward thence from Gades I beheld
 The unwise passage of Laertes' son,
 And hitherward the shore, where thou, Europa!
 Mad'st thee a joyful burden: and yet more
 Of this dim spot had seen, but that the sun,
 A constellation off and more, had ta'en
 His progress in the zodiac underneath.
 
 Then by the spirit, that doth never leave
 Its amorous dalliance with my lady's looks,
 Back with redoubled ardour were mine eyes
 Led unto her: and from her radiant smiles,
 Whenas I turn'd me, pleasure so divine
 Did lighten on me, that whatever bait
 Or art or nature in the human flesh,
 Or in its limn'd resemblance, can combine
 Through greedy eyes to take the soul withal,
 Were to her beauty nothing.  Its boon influence
 From the fair nest of Leda rapt me forth,
 And wafted on into the swiftest heav'n.
 
 What place for entrance Beatrice chose,
 I may not say, so uniform was all,
 Liveliest and loftiest.  She my secret wish
 Divin'd; and with such gladness, that God's love
 Seem'd from her visage shining, thus began:
 "Here is the goal, whence motion on his race
 Starts; motionless the centre, and the rest
 All mov'd around.  Except the soul divine,
 Place in this heav'n is none, the soul divine,
 Wherein the love, which ruleth o'er its orb,
 Is kindled, and the virtue that it sheds;
 One circle, light and love, enclasping it,
 As this doth clasp the others; and to Him,
 Who draws the bound, its limit only known.
 Measur'd itself by none, it doth divide
 Motion to all, counted unto them forth,
 As by the fifth or half ye count forth ten.
 The vase, wherein time's roots are plung'd, thou seest,
 Look elsewhere for the leaves.  O mortal lust!
 That canst not lift thy head above the waves
 Which whelm and sink thee down!  The will in man
 Bears goodly blossoms; but its ruddy promise
 Is, by the dripping of perpetual rain,
 Made mere abortion: faith and innocence
 Are met with but in babes, each taking leave
 Ere cheeks with down are sprinkled; he, that fasts,
 While yet a stammerer, with his tongue let loose
 Gluts every food alike in every moon.
 One yet a babbler, loves and listens to
 His mother; but no sooner hath free use
 Of speech, than he doth wish her in her grave.
 So suddenly doth the fair child of him,
 Whose welcome is the morn and eve his parting,
 To negro blackness change her virgin white.
 
 "Thou, to abate thy wonder, note that none
 Bears rule in earth, and its frail family
 Are therefore wand'rers.  Yet before the date,
 When through the hundredth in his reck'ning drops
 Pale January must be shor'd aside
 From winter's calendar, these heav'nly spheres
 Shall roar so loud, that fortune shall be fain
 To turn the poop, where she hath now the prow;
 So that the fleet run onward; and true fruit,
 Expected long, shall crown at last the bloom!"
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXVII
 
 So she who doth imparadise my soul,
 Had drawn the veil from off our pleasant life,
 And bar'd the truth of poor mortality;
 When lo! as one who, in a mirror, spies
 The shining of a flambeau at his back,
 Lit sudden ore he deem of its approach,
 And turneth to resolve him, if the glass
 Have told him true, and sees the record faithful
 As note is to its metre; even thus,
 I well remember, did befall to me,
 Looking upon the beauteous eyes, whence love
 Had made the leash to take me.  As I turn'd;
 And that, which, in their circles, none who spies,
 Can miss of, in itself apparent, struck
 On mine; a point I saw, that darted light
 So sharp, no lid, unclosing, may bear up
 Against its keenness.  The least star we view
 From hence, had seem'd a moon, set by its side,
 As star by side of star.  And so far off,
 Perchance, as is the halo from the light
 Which paints it, when most dense the vapour spreads,
 There wheel'd about the point a circle of fire,
 More rapid than the motion, which first girds
 The world.  Then, circle after circle, round
 Enring'd each other; till the seventh reach'd
 Circumference so ample, that its bow,
 Within the span of Juno's messenger,
 lied scarce been held entire. Beyond the sev'nth,
 Follow'd yet other two.  And every one,
 As more in number distant from the first,
 Was tardier in motion; and that glow'd
 With flame most pure, that to the sparkle' of truth
 Was nearest, as partaking most, methinks,
 Of its reality.  The guide belov'd
 Saw me in anxious thought suspense, and spake:
 "Heav'n, and all nature, hangs upon that point.
 The circle thereto most conjoin'd observe;
 And know, that by intenser love its course
 Is to this swiftness wing'd."  To whom I thus:
 "It were enough; nor should I further seek,
 Had I but witness'd order, in the world
 Appointed, such as in these wheels is seen.
 But in the sensible world such diff'rence is,
 That is each round shows more divinity,
 As each is wider from the centre.  Hence,
 If in this wondrous and angelic temple,
 That hath for confine only light and love,
 My wish may have completion I must know,
 Wherefore such disagreement is between
 Th' exemplar and its copy: for myself,
 Contemplating, I fail to pierce the cause."
 
 "It is no marvel, if thy fingers foil'd
 Do leave the knot untied: so hard 't is grown
 For want of tenting."  Thus she said: "But take,"
 She added, "if thou wish thy cure, my words,
 And entertain them subtly.  Every orb
 Corporeal, doth proportion its extent
 Unto the virtue through its parts diffus'd.
 The greater blessedness preserves the more.
 The greater is the body (if all parts
 Share equally) the more is to preserve.
 Therefore the circle, whose swift course enwheels
 The universal frame answers to that,
 Which is supreme in knowledge and in love
 Thus by the virtue, not the seeming, breadth
 Of substance, measure, thou shalt see the heav'ns,
 Each to the' intelligence that ruleth it,
 Greater to more, and smaller unto less,
 Suited in strict and wondrous harmony."
 
 As when the sturdy north blows from his cheek
 A blast, that scours the sky, forthwith our air,
 Clear'd of the rack, that hung on it before,
 Glitters; and, With his beauties all unveil'd,
 The firmament looks forth serene, and smiles;
 Such was my cheer, when Beatrice drove
 With clear reply the shadows back, and truth
 Was manifested, as a star in heaven.
 And when the words were ended, not unlike
 To iron in the furnace, every cirque
 Ebullient shot forth scintillating fires:
 And every sparkle shivering to new blaze,
 In number did outmillion the account
 Reduplicate upon the chequer'd board.
 Then heard I echoing on from choir to choir,
 "Hosanna," to the fixed point, that holds,
 And shall for ever hold them to their place,
 From everlasting, irremovable.
 
 Musing awhile I stood: and she, who saw
 by inward meditations, thus began:
 "In the first circles, they, whom thou beheldst,
 Are seraphim and cherubim.  Thus swift
 Follow their hoops, in likeness to the point,
 Near as they can, approaching; and they can
 The more, the loftier their vision.  Those,
 That round them fleet, gazing the Godhead next,
 Are thrones; in whom the first trine ends.  And all
 Are blessed, even as their sight descends
 Deeper into the truth, wherein rest is
 For every mind.  Thus happiness hath root
 In seeing, not in  loving, which of sight
 Is aftergrowth.  And of the seeing such
 The meed, as unto each in due degree
 Grace and good-will their measure have assign'd.
 The other trine, that with still opening buds
 In this eternal springtide blossom fair,
 Fearless of bruising from the nightly ram,
 Breathe up in warbled melodies threefold
 Hosannas blending ever, from the three
 Transmitted. hierarchy of gods, for aye
 Rejoicing, dominations first, next then
 Virtues, and powers the third.  The next to whom
 Are princedoms and archangels, with glad round
 To tread their festal ring; and last the band
 Angelical, disporting in their sphere.
 All, as they circle in their orders, look
 Aloft, and downward with such sway prevail,
 That all with mutual impulse tend to God.
 These once a mortal view beheld.  Desire
 In Dionysius so intently wrought,
 That he, as I have done rang'd them; and nam'd
 Their orders, marshal'd in his thought.  From him
 Dissentient, one refus'd his sacred read.
 But soon as in this heav'n his doubting eyes
 Were open'd, Gregory at his error smil'd
 Nor marvel, that a denizen of earth
 Should scan such secret truth; for he had learnt
 Both this and much beside of these our orbs,
 From an eye-witness to heav'n's mysteries."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXIX
 
 No longer than what time Latona's twins
 Cover'd of Libra and the fleecy star,
 Together both, girding the' horizon hang,
 In even balance from the zenith pois'd,
 Till from that verge, each, changing hemisphere,
 Part the nice level; e'en so brief a space
 Did Beatrice's silence hold.  A smile
 Bat painted on her cheek; and her fix'd gaze
 Bent on the point, at which my vision fail'd:
 When thus her words resuming she began:
 "I speak, nor what thou wouldst inquire demand;
 For I have mark'd it, where all time and place
 Are present.  Not for increase to himself
 Of good, which may not be increas'd, but forth
 To manifest his glory by its beams,
 Inhabiting his own eternity,
 Beyond time's limit or what bound soe'er
 To circumscribe his being, as he will'd,
 Into new natures, like unto himself,
 Eternal Love unfolded.  Nor before,
 As if in dull inaction torpid lay.
 For not in process of before or aft
 Upon these waters mov'd the Spirit of God.
 Simple and mix'd, both form and substance, forth
 To perfect being started, like three darts
 Shot from a bow three-corded.  And as ray
 In crystal, glass, and amber, shines entire,
 E'en at the moment of its issuing; thus
 Did, from th' eternal Sovran, beam entire
 His threefold operation, at one act
 Produc'd coeval.  Yet in order each
 Created his due station knew: those highest,
 Who pure intelligence were made: mere power
 The lowest: in the midst, bound with strict league,
 Intelligence and power, unsever'd bond.
 Long tract of ages by the angels past,
 Ere the creating of another world,
 Describ'd on Jerome's pages thou hast seen.
 But that what I disclose to thee is true,
 Those penmen, whom the Holy Spirit mov'd
 In many a passage of their sacred book
 Attest; as thou by diligent search shalt find
 And reason in some sort discerns the same,
 Who scarce would grant the heav'nly ministers
 Of their perfection void, so long a space.
 Thus when and where these spirits of love were made,
 Thou know'st, and how: and knowing hast allay'd
 Thy thirst, which from the triple question rose.
 Ere one had reckon'd twenty, e'en so soon
 Part of the angels fell: and in their fall
 Confusion to your elements ensued.
 The others kept their station: and this task,
 Whereon thou lookst, began with such delight,
 That they surcease not ever, day nor night,
 Their circling.  Of that fatal lapse the cause
 Was the curst pride of him, whom thou hast seen
 Pent with the world's incumbrance.  Those, whom here
 Thou seest, were lowly to confess themselves
 Of his free bounty, who had made them apt
 For ministries so high: therefore their views
 Were by enlight'ning grace and their own merit
 Exalted; so that in their will confirm'd
 They stand, nor feel to fall.  For do not doubt,
 But to receive the grace, which heav'n vouchsafes,
 Is meritorious, even as the soul
 With prompt affection welcometh the guest.
 Now, without further help, if with good heed
 My words thy mind have treasur'd, thou henceforth
 This consistory round about mayst scan,
 And gaze thy fill.  But since thou hast on earth
 Heard vain disputers, reasoners in the schools,
 Canvas the' angelic nature, and dispute
 Its powers of apprehension, memory, choice;
 Therefore, 't is well thou take from me the truth,
 Pure and without disguise, which they below,
 Equivocating, darken and perplex.
 
 "Know thou, that, from the first, these substances,
 Rejoicing in the countenance of God,
 Have held unceasingly their view, intent
 Upon the glorious vision, from the which
 Naught absent is nor hid: where then no change
 Of newness with succession interrupts,
 Remembrance there needs none to gather up
 Divided thought and images remote
 
 "So that men, thus at variance with the truth
 Dream, though their eyes be open; reckless some
 Of error; others well aware they err,
 To whom more guilt and shame are justly due.
 Each the known track of sage philosophy
 Deserts, and has a byway of his own:
 So much the restless eagerness to shine
 And love of singularity prevail.
 Yet this, offensive as it is, provokes
 Heav'n's anger less, than when the book of God
 Is forc'd to yield to man's authority,
 Or from its straightness warp'd: no reck'ning made
 What blood the sowing of it in the world
 Has cost; what favour for himself he wins,
 Who meekly clings to it.  The aim of all
 Is how to shine: e'en they, whose office is
 To preach the Gospel, let the gospel sleep,
 And pass their own inventions off instead.
 One tells, how at Christ's suffering the wan moon
 Bent back her steps, and shadow'd o'er the sun
 With intervenient disk, as she withdrew:
 Another, how the light shrouded itself
 Within its tabernacle, and left dark
 The Spaniard and the Indian, with the Jew.
 Such fables Florence in her pulpit hears,
 Bandied about more frequent, than the names
 Of Bindi and of Lapi in her streets.
 The sheep, meanwhile, poor witless ones, return
 From pasture, fed with wind: and what avails
 For their excuse, they do not see their harm?
 Christ said not to his first conventicle,
 'Go forth and preach impostures to the world,'
 But gave them truth to build on; and the sound
 Was mighty on their lips; nor needed they,
 Beside the gospel, other spear or shield,
 To aid them in their warfare for the faith.
 The preacher now provides himself with store
 Of jests and gibes; and, so there be no lack
 Of laughter, while he vents them, his big cowl
 Distends, and he has won the meed he sought:
 Could but the vulgar catch a glimpse the while
 Of that dark bird which nestles in his hood,
 They scarce would wait to hear the blessing said.
 Which now the dotards hold in such esteem,
 That every counterfeit, who spreads abroad
 The hands of holy promise, finds a throng
 Of credulous fools beneath.  Saint Anthony
 Fattens with this his swine, and others worse
 Than swine, who diet at his lazy board,
 Paying with unstamp'd metal for their fare.
 
 "But (for we far have wander'd) let us seek
 The forward path again; so as the way
 Be shorten'd with the time.  No mortal tongue
 Nor thought of man hath ever reach'd so far,
 That of these natures he might count the tribes.
 What Daniel of their thousands hath reveal'd
 With finite number infinite conceals.
 The fountain at whose source these drink their beams,
 With light supplies them in as many modes,
 As there are splendours, that it shines on: each
 According to the virtue it conceives,
 Differing in love and sweet affection.
 Look then how lofty and how huge in breadth
 The' eternal might, which, broken and dispers'd
 Over such countless mirrors, yet remains
 Whole in itself and one, as at the first."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXX
 
 Noon's fervid hour perchance six thousand miles
 From hence is distant; and the shadowy cone
 Almost to level on our earth declines;
 When from the midmost of this blue abyss
 By turns some star is to our vision lost.
 And straightway as the handmaid of the sun
 Puts forth her radiant brow, all, light by light,
 Fade, and the spangled firmament shuts in,
 E'en to the loveliest of the glittering throng.
 Thus vanish'd gradually from my sight
 The triumph, which plays ever round the point,
 That overcame me, seeming (for it did)
 Engirt by that it girdeth.  Wherefore love,
 With loss of other object, forc'd me bend
 Mine eyes on Beatrice once again.
 
 If all, that hitherto is told of her,
 Were in one praise concluded, 't were too weak
 To furnish out this turn.  Mine eyes did look
 On beauty, such, as I believe in sooth,
 Not merely to exceed our human, but,
 That save its Maker, none can to the full
 Enjoy it.  At this point o'erpower'd I fail,
 Unequal to my theme, as never bard
 Of buskin or of sock hath fail'd before.
 For, as the sun doth to the feeblest sight,
 E'en so remembrance of that witching smile
 Hath dispossess my spirit of itself.
 Not from that day, when on this earth I first
 Beheld her charms, up to that view of them,
 Have I with song applausive ever ceas'd
 To follow, but not follow them no more;
 My course here bounded, as each artist's is,
 When it doth touch the limit of his skill.
 
 She (such as I bequeath her to the bruit
 Of louder trump than mine, which hasteneth on,
 Urging its arduous matter to the close),
 Her words resum'd, in gesture and in voice
 Resembling one accustom'd to command:
 "Forth from the last corporeal are we come
 Into the heav'n, that is unbodied light,
 Light intellectual replete with love,
 Love of true happiness replete with joy,
 Joy, that transcends all sweetness of delight.
 Here shalt thou look on either mighty host
 Of Paradise; and one in that array,
 Which in the final judgment thou shalt see."
 
 As when the lightning, in a sudden spleen
 Unfolded, dashes from the blinding eyes
 The visive spirits dazzled and bedimm'd;
 So, round about me, fulminating streams
 Of living radiance play'd, and left me swath'd
 And veil'd in dense impenetrable blaze.
 Such weal is in the love, that stills this heav'n;
 For its own flame the torch this fitting ever!
 
 No sooner to my list'ning ear had come
 The brief assurance, than I understood
 New virtue into me infus'd, and sight
 Kindled afresh, with vigour to sustain
 Excess of light, however pure.  I look'd;
 And in the likeness of a river saw
 Light flowing, from whose amber-seeming waves
 Flash'd up effulgence, as they glided on
 'Twixt banks, on either side, painted with spring,
 Incredible how fair; and, from the tide,
 There ever and anon, outstarting, flew
 Sparkles instinct with life; and in the flow'rs
 Did set them, like to rubies chas'd in gold;
 Then, as if drunk with odors, plung'd again
 Into the wondrous flood; from which, as one
 Re'enter'd, still another rose.  "The thirst
 Of knowledge high, whereby thou art inflam'd,
 To search the meaning of what here thou seest,
 The more it warms thee, pleases me the more.
 But first behooves thee of this water drink,
 Or ere that longing be allay'd."  So spake
 The day-star of mine eyes; then thus subjoin'd:
 "This stream, and these, forth issuing from its gulf,
 And diving back, a living topaz each,
 With all this laughter on its bloomy shores,
 Are but a preface, shadowy of the truth
 They emblem: not that, in themselves, the things
 Are crude; but on thy part is the defect,
 For that thy views not yet aspire so high."
 Never did babe, that had outslept his wont,
 Rush, with such eager straining, to the milk,
 As I toward the water, bending me,
 To make the better mirrors of mine eyes
 In the refining wave; and, as the eaves
 Of mine eyelids did drink of it, forthwith
 Seem'd it unto me turn'd from length to round,
 Then as a troop of maskers, when they put
 Their vizors off, look other than before,
 The counterfeited semblance thrown aside;
 So into greater jubilee were chang'd
 Those flowers and sparkles, and distinct I saw
 Before me either court of heav'n displac'd.
 
 O prime enlightener! thou who crav'st me strength
 On the high triumph of thy realm to gaze!
 Grant virtue now to utter what I kenn'd,
     There is in heav'n a light, whose goodly shine
 Makes the Creator visible to all
 Created, that in seeing him alone
 Have peace; and in a circle spreads so far,
 That the circumference were too loose a zone
 To girdle in the sun.  All is one beam,
 Reflected from the summit of the first,
 That moves, which being hence and vigour takes,
 And as some cliff, that from the bottom eyes
 Its image mirror'd in the crystal flood,
 As if 't admire its brave appareling
 Of verdure and of flowers: so, round about,
 Eyeing the light, on more than million thrones,
 Stood, eminent, whatever from our earth
 Has to the skies return'd.  How wide the leaves
 Extended to their utmost of this rose,
 Whose lowest step embosoms such a space
 Of ample radiance!  Yet, nor amplitude
 Nor height impeded, but my view with ease
 Took in the full dimensions of that joy.
 Near or remote, what there avails, where God
 Immediate rules, and Nature, awed, suspends
 Her sway?  Into the yellow of the rose
 Perennial, which in bright expansiveness,
 Lays forth its gradual blooming, redolent
 Of praises to the never-wint'ring sun,
 As one, who fain would speak yet holds his peace,
 Beatrice led me; and, "Behold," she said,
 "This fair assemblage! stoles of snowy white
 How numberless!  The city, where we dwell,
 Behold how vast! and these our seats so throng'd
 Few now are wanting here!  In that proud stall,
 On which, the crown, already o'er its state
 Suspended, holds thine eyes--or ere thyself
 Mayst at the wedding sup,--shall rest the soul
 Of the great Harry, he who, by the world
 Augustas hail'd, to Italy must come,
 Before her day be ripe.  But ye are sick,
 And in your tetchy wantonness as blind,
 As is the bantling, that of hunger dies,
 And drives away the nurse.  Nor may it be,
 That he, who in the sacred forum sways,
 Openly or in secret, shall with him
 Accordant walk: Whom God will not endure
 I' th' holy office long; but thrust him down
 To Simon Magus, where Magna's priest
 Will sink beneath him: such will be his meed."
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXI
 
 In fashion, as a snow-white rose, lay then
 Before my view the saintly multitude,
 Which in his own blood Christ espous'd.  Meanwhile
 That other host, that soar aloft to gaze
 And celebrate his glory, whom they love,
 Hover'd around; and, like a troop of bees,
 Amid the vernal sweets alighting now,
 Now, clustering, where their fragrant labour glows,
 Flew downward to the mighty flow'r, or rose
 From the redundant petals, streaming back
 Unto the steadfast dwelling of their joy.
 Faces had they of flame, and wings of gold;
 The rest was whiter than the driven snow.
 And as they flitted down into the flower,
 From range to range, fanning their plumy loins,
 Whisper'd the peace and ardour, which they won
 From that soft winnowing.  Shadow none, the vast
 Interposition of such numerous flight
 Cast, from above, upon the flower, or view
 Obstructed aught.  For, through the universe,
 Wherever merited, celestial light
 Glides freely, and no obstacle prevents.
 
 All there, who reign in safety and in bliss,
 Ages long past or new, on one sole mark
 Their love and vision fix'd.  O trinal beam
 Of individual star, that charmst them thus,
 Vouchsafe one glance to gild our storm below!
 
 If the grim brood, from Arctic shores that roam'd,
 (Where helice, forever, as she wheels,
 Sparkles a mother's fondness on her son)
 Stood in mute wonder 'mid the works of Rome,
 When to their view the Lateran arose
 In greatness more than earthly; I, who then
 From human to divine had past, from time
 Unto eternity, and out of Florence
 To justice and to truth, how might I choose
 But marvel too?  'Twixt gladness and amaze,
 In sooth no will had I to utter aught,
 Or hear.  And, as a pilgrim, when he rests
 Within the temple of his vow, looks round
 In breathless awe, and hopes some time to tell
 Of all its goodly state: e'en so mine eyes
 Cours'd up and down along the living light,
 Now low, and now aloft, and now around,
 Visiting every step.  Looks I beheld,
 Where charity in soft persuasion sat,
 Smiles from within and radiance from above,
 And in each gesture grace and honour high.
 
 So rov'd my ken, and its general form
 All Paradise survey'd: when round I turn'd
 With purpose of my lady to inquire
 Once more of things, that held my thought suspense,
 But answer found from other than I ween'd;
 For, Beatrice, when I thought to see,
 I saw instead a senior, at my side,
  Rob'd, as the rest, in glory.  Joy benign
 Glow'd in his eye, and o'er his cheek diffus'd,
 With gestures such as spake a father's love.
 And, "Whither is she vanish'd?"  straight I ask'd.
 
 "By Beatrice summon'd," he replied,
 "I come to aid thy wish.  Looking aloft
 To the third circle from the highest, there
 Behold her on the throne, wherein her merit
 Hath plac'd her."  Answering not, mine eyes I rais'd,
 And saw her, where aloof she sat, her brow
 A wreath reflecting of eternal beams.
 Not from the centre of the sea so far
 Unto the region of the highest thunder,
 As was my ken from hers; and yet the form
 Came through that medium down, unmix'd and pure,
 
 "O Lady! thou in whom my hopes have rest!
 Who, for my safety, hast not scorn'd, in hell
 To leave the traces of thy footsteps mark'd!
 For all mine eyes have seen, I, to thy power
 And goodness, virtue owe and grace.  Of slave,
 Thou hast to freedom brought me; and no means,
 For my deliverance apt, hast left untried.
 Thy liberal bounty still toward me keep.
 That, when my spirit, which thou madest whole,
 Is loosen'd from this body, it may find
 Favour with thee."  So I my suit preferr'd:
 And she, so distant, as appear'd, look'd down,
 And smil'd; then tow'rds th' eternal fountain turn'd.
 
 And thus the senior, holy and rever'd:
 "That thou at length mayst happily conclude
 Thy voyage (to which end I was dispatch'd,
 By supplication mov'd and holy love)
 Let thy upsoaring vision range, at large,
 This garden through: for so, by ray divine
 Kindled, thy ken a higher flight shall mount;
 And from heav'n's queen, whom fervent I adore,
 All gracious aid befriend us; for that I
 Am her own faithful Bernard."  Like a wight,
 Who haply from Croatia wends to see
 Our Veronica, and the while 't is shown,
 Hangs over it with never-sated gaze,
 And, all that he hath heard revolving, saith
 Unto himself in thought: "And didst thou look
 E'en thus, O Jesus, my true Lord and God?
 And was this semblance thine?"  So gaz'd I then
 Adoring; for the charity of him,
 Who musing, in the world that peace enjoy'd,
 Stood lively before me.  "Child of grace!"
 Thus he began: "thou shalt not knowledge gain
 Of this glad being, if thine eyes are held
 Still in this depth below.  But search around
 The circles, to the furthest, till thou spy
 Seated in state, the queen, that of this realm
 Is sovran."  Straight mine eyes I rais'd; and bright,
 As, at the birth of morn, the eastern clime
 Above th' horizon, where the sun declines;
 To mine eyes, that upward, as from vale
 To mountain sped, at th' extreme bound, a part
 Excell'd in lustre all the front oppos'd.
 And as the glow burns ruddiest o'er the wave,
 That waits the sloping beam, which Phaeton
 Ill knew to guide, and on each part the light
 Diminish'd fades, intensest in the midst;
 So burn'd the peaceful oriflame, and slack'd
 On every side the living flame decay'd.
 And in that midst their sportive pennons wav'd
 Thousands of angels; in resplendence each
 Distinct, and quaint adornment. At their glee
 And carol, smil'd the Lovely One of heav'n,
 That joy was in the eyes of all the blest.
 
 Had I a tongue in eloquence as rich,
 As is the colouring in fancy's loom,
 'T were all too poor to utter the least part
 Of that enchantment.  When he saw mine eyes
 Intent on her, that charm'd him, Bernard gaz'd
 With so exceeding fondness, as infus'd
 Ardour into my breast, unfelt before.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXII
 
 Freely the sage, though wrapt in musings high,
 Assum'd the teacher's part, and mild began:
 "The wound, that Mary clos'd, she open'd first,
 Who sits so beautiful at Mary's feet.
 The third in order, underneath her, lo!
 Rachel with Beatrice. Sarah next,
 Judith, Rebecca, and the gleaner maid,
 Meek ancestress of him, who sang the songs
 Of sore repentance in his sorrowful mood.
 All, as I name them, down from deaf to leaf,
 Are in gradation throned on the rose.
 And from the seventh step, successively,
 Adown the breathing tresses of the flow'r
 Still doth the file of Hebrew dames proceed.
 For these are a partition wall, whereby
 The sacred stairs are sever'd, as the faith
 In Christ divides them.  On this part, where blooms
 Each leaf in full maturity, are set
 Such as in Christ, or ere he came, believ'd.
 On th' other, where an intersected space
 Yet shows the semicircle void, abide
 All they, who look'd to Christ already come.
 And as our Lady on her glorious stool,
 And they who on their stools beneath her sit,
 This way distinction make: e'en so on his,
 The mighty Baptist that way marks the line
 (He who endur'd the desert and the pains
 Of martyrdom, and for two years of hell,
 Yet still continued holy), and beneath,
 Augustin, Francis, Benedict, and the rest,
 Thus far from round to round.  So heav'n's decree
 Forecasts, this garden equally to fill.
 With faith in either view, past or to come,
 Learn too, that downward from the step, which cleaves
 Midway the twain compartments, none there are
 Who place obtain for merit of their own,
 But have through others' merit been advanc'd,
 On set conditions: spirits all releas'd,
 Ere for themselves they had the power to choose.
 And, if thou mark and listen to them well,
 Their childish looks and voice declare as much.
 
 "Here, silent as thou art, I know thy doubt;
 And gladly will I loose the knot, wherein
 Thy subtle thoughts have bound thee.  From this realm
 Excluded, chalice no entrance here may find,
 No more shall hunger, thirst, or sorrow can.
 A law immutable hath establish'd all;
 Nor is there aught thou seest, that doth not fit,
 Exactly, as the finger to the ring.
 It is not therefore without cause, that these,
 O'erspeedy comers to immortal life,
 Are different in their shares of excellence.
 Our Sovran Lord--that settleth this estate
 In love and in delight so absolute,
 That wish can dare no further--every soul,
 Created in his joyous sight to dwell,
 With grace at pleasure variously endows.
 And for a proof th' effect may well suffice.
 And 't is moreover most expressly mark'd
 In holy scripture, where the twins are said
 To, have struggled in the womb.  Therefore, as grace
 Inweaves the coronet, so every brow
 Weareth its proper hue of orient light.
 And merely in respect to his prime gift,
 Not in reward of meritorious deed,
 Hath each his several degree assign'd.
 In early times with their own innocence
 More was not wanting, than the parents' faith,
 To save them: those first ages past, behoov'd
 That circumcision in the males should imp
 The flight of innocent wings: but since the day
 Of grace hath come, without baptismal rites
 In Christ accomplish'd, innocence herself
 Must linger yet below.  Now raise thy view
 Unto the visage most resembling Christ:
 For, in her splendour only, shalt thou win
 The pow'r to look on him."  Forthwith I saw
 Such floods of gladness on her visage shower'd,
 From holy spirits, winging that profound;
 That, whatsoever I had yet beheld,
 Had not so much suspended me with wonder,
 Or shown me such similitude of God.
 And he, who had to her descended, once,
 On earth, now hail'd in heav'n; and on pois'd wing.
 "Ave, Maria, Gratia Plena," sang:
 To whose sweet anthem all the blissful court,
 From all parts answ'ring, rang: that holier joy
 Brooded the deep serene.  "Father rever'd:
 Who deign'st, for me, to quit the pleasant place,
 Wherein thou sittest, by eternal lot!
 Say, who that angel is, that with such glee
 Beholds our queen, and so enamour'd glows
 Of her high beauty, that all fire he seems."
 So I again resorted to the lore
 Of my wise teacher, he, whom Mary's charms
 Embellish'd, as the sun the morning star;
 Who thus in answer spake: "In him are summ'd,
 Whatever of buxomness and free delight
 May be in Spirit, or in angel, met:
 And so beseems: for that he bare the palm
 Down unto Mary, when the Son of God
 Vouchsaf'd to clothe him in terrestrial weeds.
 Now let thine eyes wait heedful on my words,
 And note thou of this just and pious realm
 The chiefest nobles.  Those, highest in bliss,
 The twain, on each hand next our empress thron'd,
 Are as it were two roots unto this rose.
 He to the left, the parent, whose rash taste
 Proves bitter to his seed; and, on the right,
 That ancient father of the holy church,
 Into whose keeping Christ did give the keys
 Of this sweet flow'r: near whom behold the seer,
 That, ere he died, saw all the grievous times
 Of the fair bride, who with the lance and nails
 Was won.  And, near unto the other, rests
 The leader, under whom on manna fed
 Th' ungrateful nation, fickle and perverse.
 On th' other part, facing to Peter, lo!
 Where Anna sits, so well content to look
 On her lov'd daughter, that with moveless eye
 She chants the loud hosanna: while, oppos'd
 To the first father of your mortal kind,
 Is Lucia, at whose hest thy lady sped,
 When on the edge of ruin clos'd thine eye.
 
 "But (for the vision hasteneth so an end)
 Here break we off, as the good workman doth,
 That shapes the cloak according to the cloth:
 And to the primal love our ken shall rise;
 That thou mayst penetrate the brightness, far
 As sight can bear thee.  Yet, alas! in sooth
 Beating thy pennons, thinking to advance,
 Thou backward fall'st.  Grace then must first be gain'd;
 Her grace, whose might can help thee.  Thou in prayer
 Seek her: and, with affection, whilst I sue,
 Attend, and yield me all thy heart."  He said,
 And thus the saintly orison began.
 
 
 
 
 CANTO XXXIII
 
 "O virgin mother, daughter of thy Son,
 Created beings all in lowliness
 Surpassing, as in height, above them all,
 Term by th' eternal counsel pre-ordain'd,
 Ennobler of thy nature, so advanc'd
 In thee, that its great Maker did not scorn,
 Himself, in his own work enclos'd to dwell!
 For in thy womb rekindling shone the love
 Reveal'd, whose genial influence makes now
 This flower to germin in eternal peace!
 Here thou to us, of charity and love,
 Art, as the noon-day torch: and art, beneath,
 To mortal men, of hope a living spring.
 So mighty art thou, lady! and so great,
 That he who grace desireth, and comes not
 To thee for aidance, fain would have desire
 Fly without wings.  Nor only him who asks,
 Thy bounty succours, but doth freely oft
 Forerun the asking.  Whatsoe'er may be
 Of excellence in creature, pity mild,
 Relenting mercy, large munificence,
 Are all combin'd in thee.  Here kneeleth one,
 Who of all spirits hath review'd the state,
 From the world's lowest gap unto this height.
 Suppliant to thee he kneels, imploring grace
 For virtue, yet more high to lift his ken
 Toward the bliss supreme.  And I, who ne'er
 Coveted sight, more fondly, for myself,
 Than now for him, my prayers to thee prefer,
 (And pray they be not scant) that thou wouldst drive
 Each cloud of his mortality away;
 That on the sovran pleasure he may gaze.
 This also I entreat of thee, O queen!
 Who canst do what thou wilt! that in him thou
 Wouldst after all he hath beheld, preserve
 Affection sound, and human passions quell.
 Lo!  Where, with Beatrice, many a saint
 Stretch their clasp'd hands, in furtherance of my suit!"
 
 The eyes, that heav'n with love and awe regards,
 Fix'd on the suitor, witness'd, how benign
 She looks on pious pray'rs: then fasten'd they
 On th' everlasting light, wherein no eye
 Of creature, as may well be thought, so far
 Can travel inward.  I, meanwhile, who drew
 Near to the limit, where all wishes end,
 The ardour of my wish (for so behooved),
 Ended within me. Beck'ning smil'd the sage,
 That I should look aloft: but, ere he bade,
 Already of myself aloft I look'd;
 For visual strength, refining more and more,
 Bare me into the ray authentical
 Of sovran light.  Thenceforward, what I saw,
 Was not for words to speak, nor memory's self
 To stand against such outrage on her skill.
 As one, who from a dream awaken'd, straight,
 All he hath seen forgets; yet still retains
 Impression of the feeling in his dream;
 E'en such am I: for all the vision dies,
 As 't were, away; and yet the sense of sweet,
 That sprang from it, still trickles in my heart.
 Thus in the sun-thaw is the snow unseal'd;
 Thus in the winds on flitting leaves was lost
 The Sybil's sentence.  O eternal beam!
 (Whose height what reach of mortal thought may soar?)
 Yield me again some little particle
 Of what thou then appearedst, give my tongue
 Power, but to leave one sparkle of thy glory,
 Unto the race to come, that shall not lose
 Thy triumph wholly, if thou waken aught
 Of memory in me, and endure to hear
 The record sound in this unequal strain.
 
 Such keenness from the living ray I met,
 That, if mine eyes had turn'd away, methinks,
 I had been lost; but, so embolden'd, on
 I pass'd, as I remember, till my view
 Hover'd the brink of dread infinitude.
 
 O grace! unenvying of thy boon! that gav'st
 Boldness to fix so earnestly my ken
 On th' everlasting splendour, that I look'd,
 While sight was unconsum'd, and, in that depth,
 Saw in one volume clasp'd of love, whatever
 The universe unfolds; all properties
 Of substance and of accident, beheld,
 Compounded, yet one individual light
 The whole.  And of such bond methinks I saw
 The universal form: for that whenever
 I do but speak of it, my soul dilates
 Beyond her proper self; and, till I speak,
 One moment seems a longer lethargy,
 Than five-and-twenty ages had appear'd
 To that emprize, that first made Neptune wonder
 At Argo's shadow darkening on his flood.
 
 With fixed heed, suspense and motionless,
 Wond'ring I gaz'd; and admiration still
 Was kindled, as I gaz'd.  It may not be,
 That one, who looks upon that light, can turn
 To other object, willingly, his view.
 For all the good, that will may covet, there
 Is summ'd; and all, elsewhere defective found,
 Complete.  My tongue shall utter now, no more
 E'en what remembrance keeps, than could the babe's
 That yet is moisten'd at his mother's breast.
 Not that the semblance of the living light
 Was chang'd (that ever as at first remain'd)
 But that my vision quickening, in that sole
 Appearance, still new miracles descry'd,
 And toil'd me with the change.  In that abyss
 Of radiance, clear and lofty, seem'd methought,
 Three orbs of triple hue clipt in one bound:
 And, from another, one reflected seem'd,
 As rainbow is from rainbow: and the third
 Seem'd fire, breath'd equally from both.  Oh speech
 How feeble and how faint art thou, to give
 Conception birth!  Yet this to what I saw
 Is less than little.  Oh eternal light!
 Sole in thyself that dwellst; and of thyself
 Sole understood, past, present, or to come!
 Thou smiledst; on that circling, which in thee
 Seem'd as reflected splendour, while I mus'd;
 For I therein, methought, in its own hue
 Beheld our image painted: steadfastly
 I therefore por'd upon the view.  As one
 Who vers'd in geometric lore, would fain
 Measure the circle; and, though pondering long
 And deeply, that beginning, which he needs,
 Finds not; e'en such was I, intent to scan
 The novel wonder, and trace out the form,
 How to the circle fitted, and therein
 How plac'd: but the flight was not for my wing;
 Had not a flash darted athwart my mind,
 And in the spleen unfolded what it sought.
 
 Here vigour fail'd the tow'ring fantasy:
 But yet the will roll'd onward, like a wheel
 In even motion, by the Love impell'd,
 That moves the sun in heav'n and all the stars.
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Divine Comedy of Dante:  Paradise

 
 
 
 Produced by Paul Murray, Marc Andre Selig and PG Distributed Proofreaders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
               IL  CONVITO
 
               THE BANQUET
 
                   OF
 
             DANTE ALIGHIERI
 
 
              Translated By
 
          Elizabeth Price Sayer
 
    With An Introduction By Henry Morely
 LL.D., Professor Of English Literature At
        University College, London
 
 
                  1887
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 This translation of Dante's Convito--the first in English--is from the
 hand of a lady whose enthusiasm for the genius of Dante has made it a
 chief pleasure of her life to dwell on it by translating, not his
 Divine Comedy only, but also the whole body of his other works. Among
 those works the Vita Nuova and the Convito have a distinct place, as
 leading up to the great masterpiece. In the New Life, Man starts on
 his career with human love that points to the divine. In the Banquet,
 he passes to mature life and to love of knowledge that declares the
 power and the love of God in the material and moral world about us and
 within us. In the Divine Comedy, the Poet passes to the world to come,
 and rises to the final union of the love for Beatrice, the beatifier,
 with the glory of the Love of God. Of this great series, the crowning
 work has, of course, had many translators, and there have been
 translators also of the book that shows the youth of love. But the
 noble fragment of the Convito that unites these two has, I believe,
 never yet been placed within reach of the English reader, except by a
 translation of its poems only into unrhymed measure in Mr. Charles
 Lyell's "Poems of the Vita Nuova and the Convito," published in 1835.
 
 The Convito is a fragment. There are four books where fifteen were
 designed, including three only of the intended fourteen songs. But the
 plan is clear, and one or two glances forward to the matter of the
 last book, which would have had Justice for its theme, show that all
 was to have been brought to a high spiritual close.
 
 Its aim was no less than the lifting of men's minds by knowledge of
 the world without them and within them, bound together in creation,
 showing forth the Mind of the Creator. The reader of this volume must
 not flinch from the ingenious dialectics of the mediaeval reasoner on
 Man and Nature. Dante's knowledge is the knowledge of his time.
 Science had made little advance since Aristotle--who is "the
 Philosopher" taken by Dante for his human guide--first laid its
 foundations. It is useful, no doubt, to be able in a book like this,
 shaped by a noble mind, to study at their best the forms of reasoning
 that made the science of the Middle Ages. But the reader is not called
 upon to make his mind unhappy with endeavours to seize all the points,
 say, of a theory of the heavens that was most ingenious, but in no
 part true. The main thing is to observe how the mistaken reasoning
 joins each of the seven sciences to one of the seven heavens, and here
 as everywhere joins earth to heaven, and bids man lift his head and
 look up, Godward, to the source of light. If spiritual truth could
 only come from right and perfect knowledge, this would have been a
 world of dead souls from the first till now; for future centuries, in
 looking back at us, will wonder at the little faulty knowledge that we
 think so much. But let the known be what it may, the true soul rises
 from it to a sense of the divine mysteries of Wisdom and of Love.
 Dante's knowledge may be full of ignorance, and so is ours. But he
 fills it as he can with the Spirit of God. He is not content that men
 should be as sheep, and look downward to earth for all the food they
 need. He bids them to a Banquet of another kind, whose dishes are of
 knowledge for the mind and heavenward aspiration for the soul.
 
 Dante's Convito--of which the name was, no doubt, suggested by the
 Banquets of Plato and Xenophon--was written at the close of his life,
 after the Divine Comedy, and no trace has been found of more of its
 songs than the three which may have been written and made known some
 time before he began work on their Commentary. Death stayed his hand,
 and the completion passed into a song that joined the voice of Dante
 to the praise in heaven.
 
 H.M.
 
 _April_ 1887.
 
 
 
 
 THE
 
 BANQUET OF DANTE ALIGHIERI
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 The First Treatise.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 As the Philosopher says in the beginning of the first Philosophy, "All
 men naturally desire Knowledge." The reason of which may be, that each
 thing, impelled by the intuition of its own nature, tends towards its
 perfection, hence, forasmuch as Knowledge is the final perfection of
 our Soul, in which our ultimate happiness consists, we are all
 naturally subject to the desire for it.
 
 Verily, many are deprived of this most noble perfection, by divers
 causes within the man and without him, which remove him from the use
 of Knowledge.
 
 Within the man there may be two defects or impediments, the one on the
 part of the Body, the other on the part of the Soul. On the part of
 the Body it is, when the parts are unfitly disposed, so that it can
 receive nothing as with the deaf and dumb, and their like. On the part
 of the Soul it is, when evil triumphs in it, so that it becomes the
 follower of vicious pleasures, through which it is so much deceived,
 that on account of them it holds everything in contempt.
 
 Without the man, two causes may in like manner be understood, of which
 one comes of necessity, the other of stagnation. The first is the
 management of the family and conduct of civil affairs, which fitly
 draws to itself the greater number of men, so that they cannot live in
 the quietness of speculation. The other is the fault of the place
 where a person is born and reared, which will ofttimes be not only
 without any School whatever, but may be far distant from studious
 people. The two first of these causes--the first of the hindrance from
 within, and the first of the hindrance from without--are not deserving
 of blame, but of excuse and pardon; the two others, although the one
 more than the other, deserve blame and are to be detested.
 
 Hence, he who reflects well, can manifestly see that they are few who
 can attain to the enjoyment of Knowledge, though it is desired by all,
 and almost innumerable are the fettered ones who live for ever
 famished of this food.
 
 Oh, blessed are those few who sit at that table where the Bread of
 Angels is eaten, and wretched those who can feed only as the Sheep.
 But because each man is naturally friendly to each man, and each
 friend grieves for the fault of him whom he loves; they who are fed at
 that high table are full of mercy towards those whom they see straying
 in one pasture with the creatures who eat grass and acorns.
 
 And forasmuch as Mercy is the Mother of Benevolence, those who know
 how, do always liberally offer their good wealth to the true poor, and
 are like a living stream, whose water cools the before-named natural
 thirst. I, then, who sit not at the blessed table, but having fled
 from the pasture of the common herd, lie at the feet of those who sit
 there and gather up what falls from them, by the sweetness which I
 find in that which I collect little by little, I know the wretched
 life of those whom I have left behind me; and moved mercifully for the
 unhappy ones, not forgetting myself, I have reserved something which I
 have shown to their eyes long ago, and for this I have made them
 greatly desirous. Wherefore, now wishing to prepare for them, I mean
 to make a common Banquet of this which I have shown to them, and of
 that needed bread without which food such as this could not be eaten
 by them at their feast; bread fit for such meat, which I know, without
 it, would be furnished forth in vain. And therefore I desire that no
 one should sit at this Banquet whose members are so unfitly disposed
 that he has neither teeth, nor tongue, nor palate: nor any follower of
 vice; inasmuch as his stomach is full of venomous and hurtful humours,
 so that it will retain no food whatever. But let those come to us,
 whosoever they be, who, pressed by the management of civil and
 domestic life, have felt this human hunger, and at one table with
 others who have been in like bondage, let them sit. But at their feet
 let us place all those who have been the slaves of sloth, and who are
 not worthy to sit higher: and then let these and those eat of my dish,
 with the bread which I will cause them to taste and to digest.
 
 The meat at this repast will be prepared in fourteen different ways,
 that is, in fourteen Songs, some of whose themes will be of Love and
 some of Virtue: which, without the present bread, might have some
 shadow of obscurity, so that to many they might be acceptable more on
 account of their form than because of their spirit. But this bread is
 the present Exposition. It will be the Light whereby each colour of
 their design will be made visible.
 
 And if in the present work, which is named "Convito"--the Banquet, the
 glad Life Together--I desire that the subject should be discussed more
 maturely than in the Vita Nuova--the New Life--I do not therefore mean
 in any degree to undervalue that Fresh Life, but greatly to enhance
 it; seeing how reasonable it is for that age to be fervid and
 passionate, and for this to be mature and temperate. At one age it is
 fit to speak and work in one way, and at another age in another way;
 because certain manners are fit and praiseworthy at one age which are
 improper and blameable at another, as will be demonstrated with
 suitable argument in the fourth treatise of this Book. In that first
 Book (Vita Nuova) at the entrance into my youth I spoke; and in this
 latter I speak after my youth has already passed away. And since my
 true meaning may be other than that which the aforesaid songs show
 forth, I mean by an allegoric exposition to explain these after the
 literal argument shall have been reasoned out: so that the one
 argument with the other shall give a relish to those who are the
 guests invited to this Banquet. And of them all I pray that if the
 feast be not so splendid as befits the proclamation thereof, let them
 impute each defect, not to my will but to my means, since my will here
 is to a full and loving Liberality.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 In preparing for every well-ordered Banquet the servants are wont to
 take the proper bread, and see that it is clean from all blemish;
 wherefore I, who in the present writing stand in servant's place,
 intend firstly to remove two spots from this exposition which at my
 repast stands in the place of bread.
 
 The one is, that it appears to be unlawful for any one to speak of
 himself; the other, that it seems to be unreasonable to speak too
 deeply when giving explanations. Let the knife of my judgment pare
 away from the present treatise the unlawful and the unreasonable. One
 does not permit any Rhetorician to speak of himself without a
 necessary cause. And from this is the man removed, because he can
 speak of no one without praise or blame of those of whom he speaks;
 which two causes commonly induce a man to speak of himself. And in
 order to remove a doubt which here arises, I say that it is worse for
 any one to blame than to praise himself, although neither may have to
 be done. The reason is, that anything which is essentially wrong is
 worse than that which is wrong through accident. For a man openly to
 bring contempt on himself is essentially wrong to his friend, because
 a man owes it to take account of his fault secretly, and no one is
 more friendly to himself than the man himself. In the chamber of his
 thoughts, therefore, he should reprove himself and weep over his
 faults, and not before the world. Again, a man is but seldom blamed
 when he has not the power or the knowledge requisite to guide himself
 aright: but he is always blamed when weak of will, because our good or
 evil dispositions are measured by the strength of will. Wherefore he
 who blames himself proves that he knows his fault, while he reveals
 his want of goodness; if, therefore, he know his fault, let him no
 more speak evil of himself. If a man praise himself it is to avoid
 evil, as it were; inasmuch as it cannot be done except such
 self-laudation become in excess dishonour; it is praise in appearance,
 it is infamy in substance. For the words are spoken to prove that of
 which he has not inward assurance. Hence, he who lauds himself proves
 his belief that he is not esteemed to be a good man, and this befalls
 him not unless he have an evil conscience, which he reveals by
 self-praise, and in so revealing it he blames himself.
 
 And, again, self-praise and self-blame are to be shunned equally, for
 this reason, that it is false witnessing. Because there is no man who
 can be a true and just judge of himself, so much will self-love
 deceive him. Hence it happens that every man has in his own judgment
 the measures of the false merchant, who sells with the one, and buys
 with the other. Every man weights the scales against his own
 wrong-doing, and adds weight to his good deeds; so that the number and
 the quantity and the weight of the good deeds appear to him to be
 greater than if they were tried in a just balance; and in like manner
 the evil appears less. Wherefore speaking of himself with praise or
 with blame, either he speaks falsely with regard to the thing of which
 he speaks, or he speaks falsely by the fault of his judgment; and as
 the one is untruth, so is the other. And therefore, since to acquiesce
 is to admit, he is wrong who praises or who blames before the face of
 any man; because the man thus appraised can neither acquiesce nor deny
 without falling into the error of either praising or blaming himself.
 Reserve the way of due correction, which cannot be taken without
 reproof of error, and which corrects if understood. Reserve also the
 way of due honour and glory, which cannot be taken without mention of
 virtuous works, or of dignities that have been worthily acquired.
 
 And in truth, returning to the main argument, I say, as before, that
 it is permitted to a man for requisite reasons to speak of himself.
 And amongst the several requisite reasons two are most evident: the
 one is when a man cannot avoid great danger and infamy, unless he
 discourse of himself; and then it is conceded for the reason, that to
 take the less objectionable of the only two paths, is to take as it
 were a good one. And this necessity moved Boethius to speak of
 himself, in order that under pretext of Consolation he might excuse
 the perpetual shame of his imprisonment, by showing that imprisonment
 to be unjust; since no other man arose to justify him. And this reason
 moved St. Augustine to speak of himself in his Confessions; that, by
 the progress of his life, which was from bad to good, and from good to
 better, and from better to best, he might give example and
 instruction, which, from truer testimony, no one could receive.
 Therefore, if either of these reasons excuse me, the bread of my
 moulding is sufficiently cleared from its first impurity.
 
 The fear of shame moves me; and I am moved by the desire to give
 instruction which others truly are unable to give. I fear shame for
 having followed passion so ardently, as he may conceive who reads the
 afore-named Songs, and sees how greatly I was ruled by it; which shame
 ceases entirely by the present speech of myself, which proves that not
 passion but virtue may have been the moving cause.
 
 I intend also to demonstrate the true meaning of those Poems, which
 some could not perceive unless I relate it, because it is concealed
 under the veil of Allegory; and this it not only will give pleasure to
 hear, but subtle instruction, both as to the diction and as to the
 intention of the other writings.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 Much fault is in that thing which is appointed to remove some grave
 evil, and yet encourages it; even as in the man who might be sent to
 quell a tumult, and, before he had quelled it, should begin another.
 
 And forasmuch as my bread is made clean on one side, it behoves me to
 cleanse it on the other, in order to shun this reproof: that my
 writing, which one may term, as it were, a Commentary, is appointed to
 remove obscurity from the before-mentioned Songs, and is, in fact,
 itself at times a little hard to understand. This obscurity is here
 intended, in order to avoid a greater defect, and does not occur
 through ignorance. Alas! would that it might have pleased the
 Dispenser of the Universe that the cause of my excuse might never have
 been; that others might neither have sinned against me, nor I have
 suffered punishment unjustly; the punishment, I say, of exile and
 poverty! Since it was the pleasure of the citizens of the most
 beautiful and the most famous daughter of Rome, Florence, to cast me
 out from her most sweet bosom (wherein I was born and nourished even
 to the height of my life, and in which, with her goodwill, I desire
 with all my heart to repose my weary soul, and to end the time which
 is given to me), I have gone through almost all the land in which this
 language lives--a pilgrim, almost a mendicant--showing forth against
 my will the wound of Fortune, with which the ruined man is often
 unjustly reproached. Truly I have been a ship without a sail and
 without a rudder, borne to divers ports and lands and shores by the
 dry wind which blows from doleful poverty; and I have appeared vile in
 the eyes of many, who perhaps through some report may have imaged me
 in other form. In the sight of whom not only my person became vile,
 but each work already completed was held to be of less value than that
 might again be which remained yet to be done.
 
 The reason wherefore this happens (not only to me but to all), it now
 pleases me here briefly to touch upon. And firstly, it is because
 rumour goes beyond the truth; and then, what is beyond the truth
 restricts and strangles it. Good report is the first born of kindly
 thought in the mind of the friend; which the mind of the foe, although
 it may receive the seed, conceives not.
 
 That mind which gives birth to it in the first place, so to make its
 gift more fair, as by the charity of friendship, keeps not within
 bounds of truth, but passes beyond them. When one does that to adorn a
 tale, he speaks against his conscience; when it is charity that causes
 him to pass the bounds, he speaks not against conscience.
 
 The second mind which receives this, not only is content with the
 exaggeration of the first mind, but its own report adds its own effect
 of endeavours to embellish, and so by this action, and by the
 deception which it also receives from the goodwill generated in it,
 good report is made more ample than it should be; either with the
 consent or the dissent of the conscience; even as it was with the
 first mind. And the third receiving mind does this; and the fourth;
 and thus the exaggeration of good ever grows. And so, by turning the
 aforesaid motives in the contrary direction, one can perceive why
 ill-fame in like manner is made to grow. Wherefore Virgil says in the
 fourth of the AEneid: "Let Fame live to be fickle, and grow as she
 goes." Clearly, then, he who is willing may perceive that the image
 generated by Fame alone is always larger, whatever it may be, than the
 thing imaged is, in its true state.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 Having previously shown the reason why Fame magnifies the good and the
 evil beyond due limit, it remains in this chapter to show forth those
 reasons which make evident why the Presence restricts in the opposite
 way, and having shown this I will return to the principal proposition.
 I say, then, that for three causes his Presence makes a person of less
 value than he is. The first is childishness, I do not say of age, but
 of mind; the second is envy; and these are in the judge: the third is
 human impurity; and this is in the person judged. The first, one can
 briefly reason thus: the greater part of men live according to sense
 and not according to reason, after the manner of children, and the
 like of these judge things simply from without; and the goodness which
 is ordained to a fit end they perceive not, because the eyes of
 Reason, which they need in order to perceive it, are closed. Hence,
 they soon see all that they can, and judge according to their sight.
 
 And forasmuch as any opinion they form on the good fame of others,
 from hearsay, with which, in the presence of the person judged, their
 imperfect judgment may dissent, they amend not according to reason,
 because they judge merely according to sense, they will deem that
 which they have first heard to be a lie as it were, and dispraise the
 person who was previously praised. Hence, in such men, and such are
 almost all, Presence restricts the one fame and the other. Such men as
 these are inconstant and are soon cloyed; they are often gay and often
 sad from brief joys and sorrows; speedy friends and speedy foes; each
 thing they do like children, without the use of reason.
 
 The second observation from these reasons is, that due comparison is
 cause for envy to the vicious; and envy is a cause of evil judgment,
 because it does not permit Reason to argue for that which is envied,
 and the judicial power is then like the judge who hears only one side.
 Hence, when such men as these perceive a person to be famous, they are
 immediately jealous, because they compare members and powers; and they
 fear, on account of the excellence of such an one, to be themselves
 accounted of less worth; and these passionate men, not only judge
 evilly, but, by defamation, they cause others to judge evilly.
 Wherefore with such men their apprehension restricts the
 acknowledgment of good and evil in each person represented; and I say
 this also of evil, because many who delight in evil deeds have envy
 towards evil-doers.
 
 The third observation is of human frailty, which one accepts on the
 part of him who is judged, and from which familiar conversation is not
 altogether free. In evidence of this, it is to be known that man is
 stained in many parts; and, as says St. Augustine, "none is without
 spot." Now, the man is stained with some passion, which he cannot
 always resist; now, he is blemished by some fault of limb; now, he is
 bruised by some blow from Fortune; now, he is soiled by the ill-fame
 of his parents, or of some near relation: things which Fame does not
 bear with her, but which hang to the man, so that he reveals them by
 his conversation; and these spots cast some shadow upon the brightness
 of goodness, so that they cause it to appear less bright and less
 excellent. And this is the reason why each prophet is less honoured in
 his own country; and this is why the good man ought to give his
 presence to few, and his familiarity to still fewer, in order that his
 name may be received and not despised. And this third observation may
 be the same for the evil as for the good, if we reverse the conditions
 of the argument. Wherefore it is clearly evident that by
 imperfections, from which no one is free, the seen Presence restricts
 right perception of the good and of the evil in every one, more than
 truth desires. Hence, since, as has been said above, I myself have
 been, as it were, visibly present to all the Italians, by which I
 perhaps am made more vile than truth desires, not only to those to
 whom my repute had already run, but also to others, whereby I am made
 the lighter; it behoves me that with a more lofty style I may give to
 the present work a little gravity, through which it may show greater
 authority. Let this suffice to excuse the difficulty of my commentary.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 Since this bread is now cleared of accidental spots, it remains to
 excuse it from a substantial one, that is for being in my native
 tongue and not in Latin; which by similitude one may term, of
 barley-meal and not of wheaten flour. And from this it is briefly
 excused by three reasons which moved me to choose the one rather than
 the other. One springs from the avoidance of inconvenient Unfitness:
 the second from the readiness of well-adjusted Liberality; the third
 from the natural Love for one's own Native Tongue. And these things,
 with the grounds for them, to the staying of all possible reproof, I
 mean in due order to reason out in this form.
 
 That which most adorns and commends human actions, and which most
 directly leads them to a good result, is the use of dispositions best
 adapted to the end in view; as the end aimed at in knighthood is
 courage of mind and strength of body. And thus he who is ordained to
 the service of others, ought to have those dispositions which are
 suited to that end; as submission, knowledge and obedience, without
 which any one is unfit to serve well. Because if he is not subject to
 each of these conditions, he proceeds in his service always with
 fatigue and trouble, and but seldom continues in it. If he is not
 obedient, he never serves except as in his wisdom he thinks fit, and
 when he wills; which is rather the service of a friend than of a
 servant. Hence, to escape this disorder, this commentary is fit, which
 is made as a servant to the under-written Songs, in order to be
 subject to these, and to each separate command of theirs. It must be
 conscious of the wants of its lord, and obedient to him, which
 dispositions would be all wanting to it if it were a Latin servant,
 not a native, since the songs are all in the language of our people.
 For, in the first place, if it had been a Latin servant he would be
 not a subject but a sovereign, in nobility, in virtue, and in beauty;
 in nobility, because the Latin is perpetual and incorruptible; the
 language of the vulgar is unstable and corruptible. Hence we see in
 the ancient writings of the Latin Comedies and Tragedies that they
 cannot change, being the same Latin that we now have; this happens not
 with our native tongue, which, being home-made, changes at pleasure.
 Hence we see in the cities of Italy, if we will look carefully back
 fifty years from the present time, many words to have become extinct,
 and to have been born, and to have been altered. But if a little time
 transforms them thus, a longer time changes them more. So that I say
 that, if those who departed from this life a thousand years ago should
 come back to their cities, they would believe those cities to be
 inhabited by a strange people, who speak a tongue discordant from
 their own. On this subject I will speak elsewhere more completely in a
 book which I intend to write, God willing, on the "Language of the
 People."
 
 Again, the Latin was not subject, but sovereign, through virtue. Each
 thing has virtue in its nature, which does that to which it is
 ordained; and the better it does it so much the more virtue it has:
 hence we call that man virtuous who lives a life contemplative or
 active, doing that for which he is best fitted; we ascribe his virtue
 to the horse that runs swiftly and much, to which end he is ordained:
 we see virtue of a sword that cuts through hard things well, since it
 has been made to do so. Thus speech, which is ordained to express
 human thought, has virtue when it does that; and most virtue is in the
 speech which does it most. Hence, forasmuch as the Latin reveals many
 things conceived in the mind which the vulgar tongue cannot express,
 even as those know who have the use of either language, its virtue is
 far greater than that of the vulgar tongue.
 
 Again, it was not subject, but sovereign, because of its beauty. That
 thing man calls beautiful whose parts are duly proportionate, because
 beauty results from their harmony; hence, man appears to be beautiful
 when his limbs are duly proportioned; and we call a song beautiful
 when the voices in it, according to the rule of art, are in harmony
 with each other. Hence, that language is most beautiful in which the
 words most fitly correspond, and this they do more in the Latin than
 in the present Language of the People, since the beautiful vulgar
 tongue follows use, and the Latin, Art. Hence, one concedes it to be
 more beautiful, more virtuous and more noble. And so one concludes, as
 first proposed; that is, that the Latin Commentary would have been the
 Sovereign, not the Subject, of the Songs.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 Having shown how the present Commentary could not have been the
 subject of Songs written in our native tongue, if it had been in the
 Latin, it remains to show how it could not have been capable or
 obedient to those Songs; and then it will be shown how, to avoid
 unsuitable disorder, it was needful to speak in the native tongue.
 
 I say that Latin would not have been a capable servant for my Lord the
 Vernacular, for this reason. The servant is required chiefly to know
 two things perfectly: the one is the nature of his lord, because there
 are lords of such an asinine nature that they command the opposite of
 that which they desire; and there are others who, without speaking,
 wish to be understood and served; and there are others who will not
 let the servant move to do that which is needful, unless they have
 ordered it. And because these variations are in men, I do not intend
 in the present work to show, for the digression would be enlarged too
 much, except as I speak in general, that such men as these are beasts,
 as it were, to whom reason is of little worth. Wherefore, if the
 servant know not the nature of his lord, it is evident that he cannot
 serve him perfectly. The other thing is, that it is requisite for the
 servant to know also the friends of his lord; for otherwise he could
 not honour them, nor serve them, and thus he would not serve his lord
 perfectly: forasmuch as the friends are the parts of a whole, as it
 were, because their whole is one wish or its opposite. Neither would
 the Latin Commentary have had such knowledge of those things as the
 vulgar tongue itself has. That the Latin cannot be acquainted with the
 Vulgar Tongue and with its friends, is thus proved. He who knows
 anything in general knows not that thing perfectly; even as he who
 knows from afar off one animal, knows not that animal perfectly,
 because he knows not if it be a dog, a wolf, or a he-goat. The Latin
 knows the Vulgar tongue in general, but not separately; for if it
 should know it separately it would know all the Vulgar Tongues,
 because it is not right that it should know one more than the other;
 and thus, what man soever might possess the complete knowledge of the
 Latin tongue, the use of that knowledge would show him all
 distinctions of the Vulgar. But this is not so, for one used to the
 Latin does not distinguish, if he be a native of Italy, the vulgar
 tongue of Provence from the German, nor can the German distinguish the
 vulgar Italian tongue from that of Provence: hence, it is evident that
 the Latin is not cognizant of the Vulgar. Again, it is not cognizant
 of its friends, because it is impossible to know the friends without
 knowing the principal; hence, if the Latin does not know the Vulgar,
 as it is proved above, it is impossible for it to know its friends.
 Again, without conversation or familiarity, it is impossible to know
 men; and the Latin has no conversation with so many in any language as
 the Vulgar has, to which all are friends, and consequently cannot know
 the friends of the Vulgar.
 
 And this, that it would be possible to say, is no contradiction; that
 the Latin does converse with some friends of the Vulgar: but since it
 is not familiar with all, it is not perfectly acquainted with its
 friends, whereas perfect knowledge is required, and not defective.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 Having proved that the Latin Commentary could not have been a capable
 servant, I will tell how it could not have been an obedient one. He is
 obedient who has the good disposition which is called obedience. True
 obedience must have three things, without which it cannot be: it
 should be sweet, and not bitter; entirely under control, and not
 impulsive; with due measure, and not excessive; which three things it
 was impossible for the Latin Commentary to have; and, therefore, it
 was impossible for it to be obedient. That to the Latin it would have
 been impossible, as is said, is evident by such an argument as this:
 each thing which proceeds by an inverse order is laborious, and
 consequently is bitter, and not sweet; even as to sleep by day and to
 wake by night, and to go backwards and not forwards. For the subject
 to command the sovereign, is to proceed in the inverse order; because
 the direct order is, for the sovereign to command the subject; and
 thus it is bitter, and not sweet; and because to the bitter command it
 is impossible to give sweet obedience, it is impossible, when the
 subject commands, for the obedience of the sovereign to be sweet.
 Hence if the Latin is the sovereign of the Vulgar Tongue, as is shown
 above by many reasons, and the Songs, which are in place of
 commanders, are in the Vulgar Tongue, it is impossible for the
 argument to be sweet. Then is obedience entirely commanded, and in no
 way spontaneous, when that which the obedient man does, he would not
 have done of his own will, either in whole or in part, without
 commandment. And, therefore, if it might be commanded to me to carry
 two long robes upon my back, and if without commandment I should carry
 one, I say that my obedience is not entirely commanded, but is in part
 spontaneous; and such would have been that of the Latin Commentary,
 and consequently it would not have been obedience entirely commanded.
 What such might have been appears by this, that the Latin, without the
 command of this Lord, the Vernacular, would have expounded many parts
 of his argument (and it does expound, as he who searches well the
 books written in Latin may perceive), which the Vulgar Tongue does
 nowhere.
 
 Again, obedience is within bounds, and not excessive, when it goes to
 the limit of the command, and no further; as Individual Nature is
 obedient to Universal Nature when she makes thirty-two teeth in the
 man, and no more and no less; and when she makes five fingers on the
 hand, and no more and no less; and the man is obedient to Justice when
 he does that which the Law commands, and no more and no less.
 
 Neither would the Latin have done this, but it would have sinned not
 only in the defect, and not only in the excess, but in each one; and
 thus its obedience would not have been within due limit, but
 intemperate, and consequently it would not have been obedient. That
 the Latin would not have been the executor of the commandment of his
 Lord, and that neither would he have been a usurper, one can easily
 prove. This Lord, namely, these Songs, to which this Commentary is
 ordained for their servant, commands and desires that they shall be
 explained to all those whose mind is so far intelligent that when they
 hear speech they can understand, and when they speak they can be
 understood. And no one doubts, that if the Songs should command by
 word of mouth, this would be their commandment. But the Latin would
 not have explained them, except to the learned men: and so that the
 rest could not have understood. Hence, forasmuch as the number of
 unlearned men who desire to understand those Songs may be far greater
 than the learned, it follows that it could not have fulfilled its
 commandment so well as the Native Tongue, which is understood both by
 the Learned and the Unlearned. Again, the Latin would have explained
 them to people of another language, as to the Germans, to the English,
 and to others; and here it would have exceeded their commandment. For
 against their will, speaking freely, I say, their meaning would be
 explained there where they could not convey it in all their beauty.
 
 And, therefore, let each one know, that nothing which is harmonized by
 the bond of the Muse can be translated from its own language into
 another, without breaking all its sweetness and harmony. And this is
 the reason why Homer was not translated from Greek into Latin, like
 the other writings that we have of the Greeks. And this is the reason
 why the verses of the Psalms are without sweetness of music and
 harmony; for they were translated from Hebrew into Greek, and from
 Greek into Latin, and in the first translation all that sweetness
 vanished.
 
 And, thus is concluded that which was proposed in the beginning of the
 chapter immediately before this.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 Since it is proved by sufficient reasons that, in order to avoid
 unsuitable confusion, it would be right that the above-named Songs be
 opened and explained by a Commentary in our Native Tongue and not in
 the Latin, I intend to show again how a ready Liberality makes me
 select this way and leave the other. It is possible, then, to perceive
 a ready Liberality in three things, which go with this Native Tongue,
 and which would not have gone with the Latin. The first is to give to
 many; the second is to give useful things; the third is to give the
 gift without being asked for it.
 
 For to give to and to assist one person is good; but to give to and to
 assist many is ready goodness, inasmuch as it has a similitude to the
 good gifts of God, who is the Benefactor of the Universe. And again,
 to give to many is impossible without giving to one, forasmuch as one
 is included in many. But to give to one may be good without giving to
 many, because he who assists many does good to one and to the other;
 he who assists one does good to one only: hence, we see the imposers
 of the laws, especially if they are for the common good, hold the eyes
 fixed whilst compiling these laws. Again, to give useless things to
 the receiver is also a good, inasmuch as he who gives, shows himself
 at least to be a friend; but it is not a perfect good, and therefore
 it is not ready: as if a knight should give to a doctor a shield, and
 as if the doctor should give to a knight the written aphorisms of
 Hippocrates, or rather the technics of Galen; because the wise men say
 that "the face of the gift ought to be similar to that of the
 receiver," that is, that it be suitable to him, and that it be useful;
 and therein it is called ready liberality in him who thus
 discriminates in giving.
 
 But forasmuch as moral discourses usually create a desire to see their
 origin, in this chapter I intend briefly to demonstrate four reasons
 why of necessity the gift (in order that it be ready liberality)
 should be useful to him who receives. Firstly, because virtue must be
 cheerful and not sad in every action: hence, if the gift be not
 cheerful in the giving and in the receiving, in it there is not
 perfect nor ready virtue. And this joy can spring only from the
 utility, which resides in the giver through the giving, and which
 comes to the receiver through the receiving. In the giver, then, there
 must be the foresight, in doing this, that on his part there shall
 remain the benefit of an inherent virtue which is above all other
 advantages; and that to the receiver come the benefit of the use of
 the thing given. Thus the one and the other will be cheerful, and
 consequently it will be a ready liberality, that is, a liberality both
 prompt and well considered.
 
 Secondly, because virtue ought always to move things forwards and
 upwards. For even as it would be a blameable action to make a spade of
 a beautiful sword, or to make a fair basin of a lovely lute; so it is
 wrong to move anything from a place where it may be useful, and to
 carry it into a place where it may be less useful. And since it is
 blameable to work in vain, it is wrong not merely to put the thing in
 a place where it may be less useful, but even in a place where it may
 be equally useful. Hence, in order that the changing of the place of a
 thing may be laudable, it must always be for the better, because it
 ought to be especially praiseworthy; and this the gift cannot be, if
 by transformation it become not more precious. Nor can it become more
 precious, if it be not more useful to the receiver than to the giver.
 Wherefore, one concludes that the gift must be useful to him who
 receives it, in order that it may be in itself ready liberality.
 
 Thirdly, because the exercise of the virtue of itself ought to be the
 acquirer of friends. For our life has need of these, and the end of
 virtue is to make life happy. But that the gift may make the receiver
 a friend, it must be useful to him, because utility stamps on the
 memory the image of the gift, which is the food of friendship, and the
 firmer the impression, so much the greater is the utility; hence,
 Martino was wont to say, "Never will fade from my mind the gift
 Giovanni made me." Wherefore, in order that in the gift there may be
 its virtue, which is Liberality, and that it may be ready, it must be
 useful to him who receives it.
 
 Finally, since the act of virtue should be free, not forced, it is
 free action, when a person goes willingly to any place; which is shown
 by his keeping the face turned thitherward; it is forced action, when
 he goes against his will; which is shown by his not looking cheerfully
 towards the place whither he goes: and thus the gift looks towards its
 appointed place when it addresses itself to the need of the receiver.
 And since it cannot address itself to that need except it be useful,
 it follows, in order that it may be with free action, that the virtue
 be free, and that the gift go freely to its object, which is the
 receiver; and consequently the gift must be to the utility of the
 receiver, in order that there may be a prompt and reasonable
 Liberality therein.
 
 The third respect in which one can observe a ready Liberality, is
 giving unasked; because, to give what is asked, is, on one side, not
 virtue, but traffic; for, the receiver buys, although the giver may
 not sell; and so Seneca says "that nothing is purchased more dearly
 than that whereon prayers are expended." Hence, in order that in the
 gift there be ready Liberality, and that one may perceive that to be
 in it, there must be freedom from each act of traffic, and the gift
 must be unasked. Wherefore that which is besought costs us so dear, I
 do not mean to argue now, because it will be fully discussed in the
 last treatise of this book.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 A Latin Commentary would be wanting in all the three above-mentioned
 conditions, which must concur, in order that in the benefit conferred
 there may be ready Liberality; and our Mother Tongue possesses all, as
 it is possible to show thus manifestly. The Latin would not have
 served many; for if we recall to memory that which is discoursed of
 above, the learned men, without the Italian tongue, could not have had
 this service. And those who know Latin, if we wish to see clearly who
 they are, we shall find that, out of a thousand one only would have
 been reasonably served by it, because they would not have received it,
 so prompt are they to avarice, which removes them from each nobility
 of soul that especially desires this food. And to the shame of them, I
 say that they ought not to be called learned men: because they do not
 acquire knowledge for the use of it, but forasmuch as they gain money
 or dignity thereby; even as one ought not to call him a harper who
 keeps a harp in his house to be lent out for a price, and not to use
 it for its music.
 
 Returning, then, to the principal proposition, I say that one can see
 clearly how the Latin would have given its good gift to few, but the
 Mother Tongue will serve many. For the willingness of heart which
 awaits this service, is in those who, through misuse of the world,
 have left Literature to men who have made of her a harlot; and these
 nobles are princes, barons, knights, and many other noble people, not
 only men, but women, whose language is that of the people and
 unlearned. Again, the Latin would not have been giver of a useful
 gift, as the Mother Tongue will be; forasmuch as nothing is useful
 except inasmuch as it is used; nor is there a perfect existence with
 inactive goodness. Even so of gold, and pearls, and other treasures
 which are subterranean, those which are in the hand of the miser are
 in a lower place than is the earth wherein the treasure was concealed.
 The gift truly of this Commentary is the explanation of the Songs, for
 whose service it is made. It seeks especially to lead men to wisdom
 and to virtue, as will be seen by the process of this treatise. This
 design those only could have in use in whom true nobility is sown,
 after the manner that will be described in the fourth treatise; and
 these are almost all men of the people, as those are noble which in
 this chapter are named above. And there is no contradiction, though
 some learned man may be amongst them; for, as says my Master Aristotle
 in the first book of the Ethics, "One swallow does not make the
 Spring." It is, then, evident that the Mother Tongue will give the
 useful thing where Latin would not have given it. Again, the Mother
 Tongue will give that gift unasked, which the Latin would not have
 given, because it will give itself in form of a Commentary which never
 was asked for by any person. But this one cannot say of the Latin,
 which for Commentary and for Expositions to many writings has often
 been in request, as one can perceive clearly in the opening of many a
 book.
 
 And thus it is evident that a ready Liberality moved me to use the
 Mother Tongue rather than Latin.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 
 He greatly needs excuse who, at a feast so noble in its provisions,
 and so honourable in its guests, sets bread of barley, not of wheaten
 flour: and evident must be the reason which can make a man depart from
 that which has long been the custom of others, as the use of Latin in
 writing a Commentary. And, therefore, he would make the reason
 evident; for the end of new things is not certain, because experience
 of them has never been had before: hence, the ways used and observed
 are estimated both in process and in the end.
 
 Reason, therefore, is moved to command that man should diligently look
 about him when he enters a new path, saying, "that, in deliberating
 about new things, that reason must be clear which can make a man
 depart from an old custom." Let no one marvel, then, if the digression
 touching my apology be long; but, as is necessary, let him bear its
 length with patience.
 
 Continuing it, I say that, since it has been shown how, in order to
 avoid unsuitable confusion and from readiness of liberality, I fixed
 on the Commentary in the Mother Tongue and left the Latin, the order
 of the entire apology requires that I now prove how I attached myself
 to that through the natural love for my native tongue, which is the
 third and last reason which moved me to this. I say that natural love
 moves the lover principally to three things: the one is to exalt the
 loved object, the second is to be jealous thereof, the third is to
 defend it, as each one sees constantly to happen; and these three
 things made me adopt it, that is, our Mother Tongue, which naturally
 and accidentally I love and have loved.
 
 I was moved in the first place to exalt it. And that I do exalt it may
 be seen by this reason: it happens that it is possible to magnify
 things in many conditions of greatness, and nothing makes so great as
 the greatness of that goodness which is the mother and preserver of
 all other forms of greatness. And no greater goodness can a man have
 than that of virtuous action, which is his own goodness, by which the
 greatness of true dignity and of true honour, of true power, of true
 riches, of true friends, of true and pure renown, are acquired and
 preserved: and this greatness I give to this friend, inasmuch as that
 which he had of goodness in latent power and hidden, I cause him to
 have in action and revealed in its own operation, which is to declare
 thought.
 
 Secondly, I was moved by jealousy of it. The jealousy of the friend
 makes a man anxious to secure lasting provision; wherefore, thinking
 that, from the desire to understand these Songs, some unlearned man
 would have translated the Latin Commentary into the Mother Tongue; and
 fearing that the Mother Tongue might have been employed by some one
 who would have made it seem ugly, as he did who translated the Latin
 of the "Ethics," I endeavoured to employ it, trusting in myself more
 than in any other. Again, I was moved to defend it from its numerous
 accusers, who depreciate it and commend others, especially the Langue
 d'Oc, saying, that the latter is more beautiful and better than this,
 therein deviating from the truth. For by this Commentary the great
 excellence of our common Lingua di Si will appear, since through it,
 most lofty and most original ideas may be as fitly, sufficiently, and
 easily expressed as if it were by the Latin itself, which cannot show
 its virtue in things rhymed because of accidental ornaments which are
 connected therewith--that is, the rhyme and the rhythm, or the
 regulated measure; as it is with the beauty of a lady when the
 splendour of the jewels and of the garments excite more admiration
 than she herself. He, therefore, who wishes to judge well of a lady
 looks at her when she is alone and her natural beauty is with her,
 free from all accidental ornament. So it will be with this Commentary,
 in which will be seen the facility of the syllables, the propriety of
 the conditions, and the sweet orations which are made in our Mother
 Tongue, which a good observer will perceive to be full of most sweet
 and most amiable beauty. But, since it is most determined in its
 intention to show the error and the malice of the accuser, I will
 tell, to the confusion of those who accuse the Italian language,
 wherefore they are moved to do this; and this I shall do in a special
 chapter, in order that their shame may be more notable.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 
 To the perpetual shame and abasement of the evil men of Italy who
 commend the Mother Tongue of other nations and depreciate their own, I
 say that their action proceeds from five abominable causes: the first
 is blindness of discretion; the second, mischievous self-justification;
 the third, greed of vainglory; the fourth, an invention of envy; the
 fifth and last, vileness of mind, that is, cowardice. And each one of
 these grave faults has a great following, for few are those who are
 free from them.
 
 Of the first, one can reason thus. As the sensitive part of the soul
 has its eyes, with which it learns the difference of things, inasmuch
 as they are coloured externally; so the rational part has its eye with
 which it learns the difference of things, inasmuch as each is ordained
 to some end; and this is discretion. And as he who is blind with the
 eyes of sense goes always according to the guidance of others judging
 evil and good; so he who is blinded from the light of discretion,
 always goes in his judgment according to the cry, right or wrong as it
 may be. Hence, whenever the guide is blind, it must follow that what
 blind man soever leans on him must come to a bad end. Therefore it is
 written that, "If the blind lead the blind, both fall into the ditch."
 This cry has been long raised against our Mother Tongue, for the
 reasons which will be argued below.
 
 After this cry the blind men above mentioned, who are infinite, as it
 were with one hand on the shoulder of these false witnesses, have
 fallen into the ditch of false opinion, from which they know not how
 to escape. From the use of the sight of discretion the mass of the
 people are debarred, because each being occupied from the early years
 of his life with some trade, he so directs his mind to that, by force
 of necessity, that he understands nought else. And forasmuch as the
 habit of virtue, moral as well as intellectual, cannot possibly be had
 all on a sudden, but it must be acquired through long custom, and as
 these people place their custom in some art, and care not to discern
 other things, it is impossible to them to have discretion. Wherefore
 it happens that often they cry aloud: "Long live Death!" and "Let Life
 die!" because some one begins the cry. And this is the most dangerous
 defect in their blindness. For this reason Boethius judges glory of
 the people vain, because he sees it to be without discernment. These
 persons are to be termed sheep and not men; for if a sheep should leap
 over a precipice of a thousand feet, all the others would follow after
 it; and if one sheep, for some cause or other, in crossing a road,
 leaps, all the others leap, even when they see nothing to leap over.
 And I once saw many leap into a well, because one had leapt into it,
 believing perhaps that it was leaping a wall; notwithstanding that the
 shepherd, weeping and shouting, with arms and breast set himself
 against them.
 
 The second faction against our Mother Tongue springs from a malicious
 self-justification. There are many who would rather be thought masters
 than be such; and to avoid the opposite--that is, to be held not to be
 such--they always cast blame on the material they work on, or upon the
 instrument; as the clumsy smith blames the iron given to him, and the
 bad harpist blames the harp, thinking to cast the blame of the bad
 blade and of the bad music upon the iron and upon the harp, and to
 lift it from themselves. Thus there are some, and not a few, who
 desire that a man may hold them to be orators; and to excuse
 themselves for not speaking, or for speaking badly, they accuse or
 throw blame on the material, that is, their own Mother Tongue, and
 praise that of other lands, which they are not required to employ. And
 he who wishes to see wherefore this iron is to be blamed, let him look
 at the work which good artificers make of it, and he will understand
 the malice of those who, in casting blame upon it, think thereby to
 excuse themselves. Against such as these, Tullius exclaims in the
 beginning of his book, which he names the book "De Finibus," because
 in his time they blamed the Roman Latin and praised the Greek grammar.
 And thus I say, for like reasons, that these men vilify the Italian
 tongue, and glorify that of Provence.
 
 The third faction against our Mother Tongue springs from greed of
 vainglory. There are many who, by describing certain things in some
 other language, and by praising that language, deem themselves to be
 more worthy of admiration than if they described them in their own.
 And undoubtedly to learn well a foreign tongue is deserving of some
 praise for intellect; but it is a blameable thing to applaud that
 language beyond truth, to glorify one's self for such an acquisition.
 
 The fourth springs from an invention of envy. So that, as it is said
 above, envy is always where there is equality. Amongst the men of one
 nation there is the equality of the native tongue; and because one
 knows not how to use it like the other, therefrom springs envy. The
 envious man then argues, not blaming himself for not knowing how to
 speak like him who does speak as he should, but he blames that which
 is the material of his work, in order to rob, by depreciating the work
 on that side, him who does speak, of honour and fame; like him who
 should find fault with the blade of a sword, not in order to throw
 blame on the sword, but on the whole work of the master.
 
 The fifth and last faction springs from vileness of mind. The
 magnanimous man always praises himself in his heart; and so the
 pusillanimous man, on the contrary, always deems himself less than he
 is. And because to magnify and to diminish always have respect to
 something, by comparison with which the large-minded man makes himself
 great and the small-minded man makes himself small, it results
 therefrom that the magnanimous man always makes others less than they
 are, and the pusillanimous makes others always greater. And therefore
 with that measure wherewith a man measures himself, he measures his
 own things, which are as it were a part of himself. It results that to
 the magnanimous man his own things always appear better than they are,
 and those of others less good; the pusillanimous man always believes
 his things to be of little value, and those of others of much worth.
 Wherefore many, on account of this vileness of mind, depreciate their
 native tongue, and applaud that of others; and all such as these are
 the abominable wicked men of Italy who hold this precious Mother
 Tongue in vile contempt, which if it be vile in any case, is so only
 inasmuch as it sounds in the evil mouth of these adulterers, under
 whose guidance go those blind men of whom I spoke in the first
 argument.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 
 If flames of fire should issue visibly through the windows of a house,
 and if any one should ask if there were fire within it, and if another
 should answer "Yes" to him, one would not well know how to judge which
 of those might be mocking the most. Not otherwise would the question
 and the answer pass between me and that man who should ask me if love
 for my own language is in me, and if I should answer "Yes" to him,
 after the arguments propounded above.
 
 But, nevertheless, it has to be proved that not only love, but the
 most perfect love for it exists in me, and again its adversaries must
 be blamed. Whilst demonstrating this to him who will understand well,
 I will tell how I became the friend of it, and then how my friendship
 is confirmed.
 
 I say that (as Tullius writes in his book on Friendship, not
 dissenting from the opinion of the Philosopher opened up in the eighth
 and in the ninth of the Ethics) Neighbourhood and Goodness are,
 naturally, the causes of the birth of Love: Benevolence, Study, and
 Custom are the causes of the growth of Love. And there have been all
 these causes to produce and to strengthen the love which I bear to my
 Native Language, as I shall briefly demonstrate. A thing is so much
 the nearer in proportion as it is most nearly allied to all the other
 things of its own kind; wherefore, of all men the son is nearest to
 the father, and of all the Arts, Medicine is nearest to the Doctor,
 and Music to the Musician, because they are more allied to them than
 the others. Of all parts of the earth the nearest is that whereon a
 man lives, because he is most united to it. And thus his own Native
 Language is nearest to him, inasmuch as he is most united to it; for
 it, and it alone, is first in the mind before any other. And not only
 of itself is it united, but by accident, inasmuch as it is united with
 the persons nearest to him, as his parents, and his fellow-citizens,
 and his own people. And this is his own Mother Tongue, which is not
 only nearest, but especially the nearest to each man. Therefore, if
 near neighbourhood be the seed of friendship, as is said above, it is
 manifest that it has been one of the causes of the love which I bear
 to my Native Language, which is nearer to me than the others. The
 above-mentioned cause, whereby that alone which stands first in each
 mind is most bound to it, gave rise to the custom of the people, that
 the first-born sons should succeed to the inheritance solely as being
 the nearest relatives; and because the nearest relatives, therefore
 the most beloved.
 
 Again, Goodness made me a friend to it. And here it is to be known
 that all goodness inherent in anything is loveable in that thing; as
 in manhood to be well bearded, and in womanhood to be all over the
 face quite free from hair; as in the setter to have good scent, and as
 in the greyhound to be swift. And in proportion as it is native, so
 much the more is it delightful. Hence, although each virtue is
 loveable in man, that is the most loveable in him which is most human:
 and this is Justice, which alone is in the rational part, or rather in
 the intellectual, that is, in the Will. This is so loveable that as
 says the Philosopher in the fifth book of the Ethics, its enemies love
 it, such as thieves and robbers; and, therefore, we see that its
 opposite, that is, Injustice, is especially hated; such as treachery,
 ingratitude, falsehood, theft, rapine, deceit, and their like; the
 which are such inhuman sins, that, in order to excuse himself from the
 infamy of such, it is granted through long custom that a man may speak
 of himself, as has been said above, and may say if he be faithful and
 loyal. Of this virtue I shall speak hereafter more fully in the
 fourteenth treatise; and here quitting it, I return to the
 proposition. Having proved, then, that the goodness of a thing is
 loved the more the more it is innate, the more it is to be loved and
 commended for itself, it remains to see what that goodness is. And we
 see that, in all speech, to express a thought well and clearly is the
 thing most to be admired and commended. This, then, is its first
 goodness. And forasmuch as this is in our Mother Tongue, as is made
 evident in another chapter, it is manifest that it has been the cause
 of the love which I bear to it; since, as has been said, "Goodness is
 the producer of Love."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 
 Having said how in the Mother Tongue there are those two things which
 have made me its friend, that is, nearness to me and its innate
 goodness, I will tell how by kindness and union in study, and through
 the benevolence of long use, the friendship is confirmed and grows.
 Firstly, I say that I for myself have received from it the greatest
 benefits. And, therefore, it is to be known that, amongst all
 benefits, that is the greatest which is most precious to him who
 receives it; and nothing is so precious as that through which all
 other things are wished; and all the other things are wished for the
 perfection of him who wishes. Wherefore, inasmuch as a man may have
 two perfections, one first and one second (the first causes him to be,
 the second causes him to be good), if the Native Language has been to
 me the cause of the one and of the other, I have received from it the
 greatest benefit. And that it may have been the cause of this
 condition in me can be shown briefly. The efficient cause for the
 existence of things is not one only, but among many efficient causes
 one is the chief of the others, hence the fire and the hammer are the
 efficient causes of the sword-blade, although the workman is
 especially so. This my Mother Tongue was the bond of union between my
 forefathers, who spoke with it, even as the fire is the link between
 the iron and the smith who makes the knife; therefore it is evident
 that it co-operated in my birth, and so it was in some way the cause
 of my being. Again, this my Mother Tongue was my introducer into the
 path of knowledge, which is the ultimate perfection, inasmuch as with
 it I entered into the Latin Language, and with it I was taught; the
 which Latin was then the way of further advancement for me. And so it
 is evident and known by me that this my language has been my great
 benefactor. Also it has been engaged with me in one self-same study,
 and this I can thus prove. Each thing naturally studies its
 self-preservation; hence, if the Mother Tongue could seek anything of
 itself, it would seek that; and that would be to secure for itself a
 position of the greatest stability: but greater stability it could not
 secure than by uniting itself with number and with rhyme.
 
 And this self-same study has been mine, as is so evident that it
 requires no testimony; therefore its study and mine have been one and
 the same, whereby the harmony of friendship is confirmed and
 increased. Also between us there has been the benevolence of long use:
 for from the beginning of my life I have had with it kind fellowship
 and conversation, and have used it, when deliberating, interpreting,
 and questioning; wherefore, if friendship increases through long use,
 as in all reason appears, it is manifest that in me it has increased
 especially, for with this my Mother Tongue I have spent all my time.
 And thus one sees that to the shaping of this friendship there have
 co-operated all causes of birth and growth. Therefore, let it be
 concluded that not only Love, but the most Perfect Love, is that which
 I have for it. So it is, and ought to be.
 
 Thus, casting the eyes backwards and gathering up the afore-stated
 reasons, one can see that this Bread, with which the Meat of the
 under-written Poems ought to be eaten, is made clear enough of
 blemishes, and of fault in the nature of its grain. Wherefore, it is
 time to attend to and serve up the viands.
 
 This will be that barley-bread with which a thousand will satisfy
 themselves; and my full baskets shall overflow with it. This will be
 that new Light, that new Sun, which shall rise when the sun of this
 our day shall set, and shall give light to those who are in darkness
 and in gloom because the sun of this our day gives light to them no
 more.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 The Second Treatise.
 
 
     Ye who the third Heaven move, intent of thought,
       Hear reasoning that is within my heart,
       Thoughts that to none but you I can impart:
     Heaven, that is moved by you, my life has brought
       To where it stands, therefore I pray you heed
       What I shall say about the life I lead.
 
     To you I tell the heart's new cares: always
       The sad Soul weeps within it, and there hears
       Voice of a Spirit that condemns her tears,
     A Spirit that descends in your star's rays.
       Thought that once fed the grieving heart was sweet,
       Thought that oft fled up to your Father's feet.
 
     There it beheld a Lady glorified,
       Of whom so sweetly it discoursed to me
       That the Soul said, "With her I long to be!"
     Now One appears that drives the thought aside,
       And masters me with so effectual might
       That my heart quivers to the outward sight.
 
     This on a Lady fixes my regard
       And says, "Who seeks where his salvation lies
       Must gaze intently in this Lady's eyes,
     Nor dread the sighs of anguish!" O, ill-starred!
       Such opposite now breaks the humble dream
       Of the crowned angel in the glory beam.
 
     Still, therefore, the Soul weeps, "The tender stir,"
       It says, "of thought that once consoled me flies!"
       That troubled one asks, "When into thine eyes
     Looked she? Why doubted they my words of her?"
       I said, "Her eyes bear death to such as I:
       Yet, vainly warned, I gaze on her and die.
 
     "Thou art not dead, but in a vain dismay,
       Dear Soul of ours so lost in thy distress,"
       Whispers a spirit voice of tenderness.
     "This Lady's beauty darkens all your day,
       Vile fear possesses you; see, she is lowly
       Pitiful, courteous, though so wise and holy.
 
     "Think thou to call her Mistress evermore:
       Save thou delude thyself, then shall there shine
       High miracles before thee, so divine
     That thou shalt say, O Love, when I adore,
       True Lord, behold the handmaid of the Lord,
       Be it unto me according to thy Word!"
 
     My song, I do believe there will be few
       Who toil to understand thy reasoning;
       But if thou pass, perchance, to those who bring
     No skill to give thee the attention due,
       Then pray I, dear last-born, let them rejoice
       To find at least a music in my voice.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 Since I, the servant, with preliminary discourse in the preceding
 Treatise, have with all due care prepared my bread, the time now
 summons, and requires my ship to leave the port: wherefore, having
 trimmed the mizen-mast of reason to the wind of my desire, I enter the
 ocean with the hope of an easy voyage, and a healthful happy haven to
 be reached at the end of my supper. But in order that my food may be
 more profitable, before the first dish comes on the table I wish to
 show how it ought to be eaten. I say then, as is narrated in the first
 chapter, that this exposition must be Literal and Allegorical; and to
 make this explicit one should know that it is possible to understand a
 book in four different ways, and that it ought to be explained chiefly
 in this manner.
 
 The one is termed Literal, and this is that which does not extend
 beyond the text itself, such as is the fit narration of that thing
 whereof you are discoursing, an appropriate example of which is the
 third Song, which discourses of Nobility.
 
 Another is termed Allegorical, and it is that which is concealed under
 the veil of fables, and is a Truth concealed under a beautiful
 Untruth; as when Ovid says that Orpheus with his lute made the wild
 beasts tame, and made the trees and the stones to follow him, which
 signifies that the wise man with the instrument of his voice makes
 cruel hearts gentle and humble, and makes those follow his will who
 have not the living force of knowledge and of art; who, having not the
 reasoning life of any knowledge whatever, are as the stones. And in
 order that this hidden thing should be discovered by the wise, it will
 be demonstrated in the last Treatise. Verily the theologians take this
 meaning otherwise than do the poets: but, because my intention here is
 to follow the way of the poets, I shall take the Allegorical sense
 according as it is used by the poets.
 
 The third sense is termed Moral; and this is that which the readers
 ought intently to search for in books, for their own advantage and for
 that of their descendants; as one can espy in the Gospel, when Christ
 ascended the Mount for the Transfiguration, that, of the twelve
 Apostles, He took with Him only three. From which one can understand
 in the Moral sense that in the most secret things we ought to have but
 little company.
 
 The fourth sense is termed Mystical, that is, above sense,
 supernatural; and this it is, when spiritually one expounds a writing
 which even in the Literal sense by the things signified bears express
 reference to the Divine things of Eternal Glory; as one can see in
 that Song of the Prophet which says that by the exodus of the people
 of Israel from Egypt Judaea is made holy and free. That this happens to
 be true according to the letter is evident. Not less true is that
 which it means spiritually, that in the Soul's liberation from Sin (or
 in the exodus of the Soul from Sin) it is made holy and free in its
 powers.
 
 But in demonstrating these, the Literal must always go first, as that
 in whose sense the others are included, and without which it would be
 impossible and irrational to understand the others. Especially is it
 impossible in the Allegorical, because, in each thing which has a
 within and a without, it is impossible to come to the within if you do
 not first come to the without. Wherefore, since in books the Literal
 meaning is always external, it is impossible to reach the others,
 especially the Allegorical, without first coming to the Literal.
 Again, it is impossible, because in each thing, natural and
 artificial, it is impossible to proceed to the form without having
 first laid down the matter upon which the form should be. Thus, it is
 impossible for the form of the gold to come, if the matter, that is,
 its subject, is not first laid down and prepared; or for the form of
 the ark to come, if the material, that is, the wood, be not first laid
 down and prepared. Therefore, since the Literal meaning is always the
 subject and the matter of the others, especially of the Allegorical,
 it is impossible to come first to the meaning of the others before
 coming to it. Again, it is impossible, because in each thing, natural
 and artificial, it is impossible to proceed unless the foundation be
 first laid, as in the house, so also in the mind. Therefore, since
 demonstration must be the building up of Knowledge, and Literal
 demonstration must be the foundation of the other methods of
 interpreting, especially of the Allegorical, it is impossible to come
 first to the others before coming to that. Again, if it were possible
 that it could be so ordered, it would be irrational, that is, out of
 order; and, therefore, one would proceed with, much fatigue and with
 much error. Hence, as the Philosopher says in the first book of the
 Physics, Nature desires that we proceed in due order in our search for
 knowledge, that is, by proceeding from that which we know well to that
 which we know not so well; so I say that Nature desires it, inasmuch
 as this way to knowledge is innate in us; and therefore, if the other
 meanings, apart from the Literal, are less understood--which they are,
 as evidently appears--it would be irrational to demonstrate them if
 the Literal had not first been demonstrated.
 
 I, then, for these reasons will discourse in due order of each Song,
 firstly upon its Literal meaning, and after that I will discourse of
 its Allegory, that is, the hidden Truth, and sometimes I will touch
 incidentally on the other meanings as may be convenient to place and
 time.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 Beginning, then, I say that the star of Venus had twice revolved in
 that circle which causes the evening and the morning to appear,
 according to the two varying seasons, since the death of that blessed
 Beatrice, who lives in Heaven with the Angels, and on Earth with my
 soul; when that gentle Lady, of whom I made mention at the end of the
 "Vita Nuova," first appeared before my eyes, accompanied by Love, and
 assumed a position in my mind. And, as has been stated by me in the
 little book referred to, more because of her gentle goodness than from
 choice of mine, it befell that I consented to be her servant. For she
 appeared impassioned with such sorrow for my sad widowed life that the
 spirits of my eyes became especially friendly to her; and, so
 disposed, they then depicted her to be such that my good-will was
 content to espouse itself to that image. But because Love is not born
 suddenly, nor grows great nor comes to perfection in haste, but
 desires time and food for thought, especially there where there are
 antagonistic thoughts which impede it, there must needs be, before
 this new Love could be perfect, a great battle between the thought of
 its food and of that which was antagonistic to it, which still held
 the fortress of my mind for that glorious Beatrice. For the one was
 succoured on one side continually by the ever-present vision, and the
 other on the opposite side by the memory of the past. And the help of
 the ever-present sight increased each day, which memory could not do,
 in opposing that which to a certain degree prevented me from turning
 the face towards the past. Wherefore it seemed to me so wonderful, and
 also so hard to endure, that I could not support it, and with a loud
 cry (to excuse myself from the struggle, in which it seemed to me that
 I had failed in courage) I lifted up my voice towards that part whence
 came the victory of the new thought, which was full of virtuous power,
 even the power of celestial virtue; and I began to say: "You! who the
 third Heaven move, intent of thought." For the intelligent
 understanding of which Song, one must first know its divisions well,
 so that it will then be easy to perceive its meaning.
 
 In order that it may no longer be necessary to preface the
 explanations of the others, I say that the order which will be taken
 in this Treatise I intend to keep through all the others. I say, then,
 that the proposed Song is contained within three principal parts. The
 first is the first verse of that, in which certain Intelligences are
 induced to listen to what I intend to say, or rather by a more usual
 form of speech we should call them Angels, who are in the revolution
 of the Heaven of Venus, as the movers thereof. The second is in the
 lines which follow after the first, in which is made manifest that
 which I felt spiritually amidst various thoughts. The third is in the
 last lines, wherein the man begins to speak to the work itself, as if
 to comfort it, as it were, and all these three parts are in due order
 to be demonstrated, as has been said above.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 That we may more easily perceive the Literal meaning of the first
 division, to which we now attend, it is requisite to know who and what
 are those who are summoned to my audience, and what is that third
 Heaven which I say is moved by them. And firstly I will speak of the
 Heaven; then I will speak of those whom I address And although with
 regard to the truth concerning those things it is possible to know but
 little, yet so much as human reason can discern gives more delight
 than the best known and most certain of the things judged by the
 sense; according to the opinion of the Philosopher in his book on
 Animals.
 
 I say, then, that concerning the number of the Heavens and their site,
 different opinions are held by many, although the truth at last may be
 found. Aristotle believed, following merely the ancient foolishness of
 the Astrologers, that there might be only eight Heavens, of which the
 last one, and which contained all, might be that where the fixed stars
 are, that is, the eighth sphere, and that beyond it there could be no
 other. Again, he believed that the Heaven of the Sun might be
 immediate with that of the Moon, that is, second to us. And this
 opinion of his, so erroneous, he who wishes can see in the second book
 on Heaven and the World, which is in the second of the Books on
 Natural History. In fact, he excuses himself for this in the twelfth
 book of the Metaphysics, where he clearly proves himself to have
 followed also another opinion where he was obliged to speak of
 Astrology. Ptolemy, then, perceiving that the eighth sphere is moved
 by many movements, seeing its circle to depart from the right circle,
 which turns from East to West, constrained by the principles of
 Philosophy, which of necessity desires a Primum Mobile, a most simple
 one, supposed another Heaven to be outside the Heaven of the fixed
 stars, which might make that revolution from East to West which I say
 is completed in twenty-four hours nearly, that is, in twenty-three
 hours, fourteen parts of the fifteen of another, counting roughly.
 Therefore, according to him, and according to that which is held in
 Astrology and in Philosophy since those movements were seen, there are
 nine moveable Heavens; the site of which is evident and determined,
 according to an Art which is termed Perspective, Arithmetical and
 Geometrical, by which and by other sensible experiences it is visibly
 and reasonably seen, as in the eclipses of the Sun it appears
 sensibly, that the Moon is below the Sun; and as by the testimony of
 Aristotle, who saw with his own eyes, according to what he says in the
 second book on Heaven and the World, the Moon, being new, to enter
 below Mars, on the side not shining, and Mars to remain concealed so
 long that he re-appeared on the other bright side of the Moon, which
 was towards the West.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 And the order of the houses is this, that the first that they
 enumerate is that where the Moon is; the second is that where Mercury
 is; the third is that where Venus is; the fourth is that where the Sun
 is; the fifth is that where Mars is; the sixth is that where Jupiter
 is; the seventh is that where Saturn is; the eighth is that of the
 Stars; the ninth is that which is not visible except by that movement
 which is mentioned above, which they designate the great Crystalline
 sphere, diaphanous, or rather all transparent. Truly, beyond all
 these, the Catholics place the Empyrean Heaven, which is as much as to
 say, the Heaven of Flame, or rather the Luminous Heaven; and they
 assign it to be immoveable, in order to have in itself, according to
 each part, that which its material desires. And this is why that first
 moved--the Primum Mobile--has such extremely rapid motion. For,
 because of the most fervent appetite which each part of it has to be
 united with each part of that most Divine Heaven of Peace, in which it
 revolves with so much desire, its velocity is almost incomprehensible.
 And this quiet and peaceful Heaven is the place of that Supreme Deity
 who from above beholds the whole. This is the place of the blessed
 Spirits, according as Holy Church teaches, which cannot speak falsely;
 and even Aristotle seems to feel this, to him who understands him
 well, in the first book of Heaven and the World. This is the highest
 bound of the World, within which the whole World is included, and
 beyond which there is nothing. And it is in no place, but was formed
 alone in the First Mind, which the Greeks term Protonoe. This is that
 magnificence of which the Psalmist spoke when he sang to God: "Thy
 glory is raised above the Heavens."
 
 So, then, gathering together this which is discussed, it seems that
 there may be ten Heavens, of which the Heaven of Venus may be the
 third; whereof mention is made in that part which I intend to
 demonstrate. And it is to be known that each Heaven below the
 Crystalline has two firm poles as to itself; and the ninth has them
 firm and fixed, and not mutable in any respect. And each one, the
 ninth even as the others, has a circle, which one may term the equator
 of its own Heaven; which equally, in each part of its revolution, is
 remote from one pole and from the other, as he who rolls an apple or
 any other round thing can sensibly perceive. And this circle has more
 swiftness in its movement than any other part of its Heaven, in each
 Heaven, as he may perceive who considers well. And each part, in
 proportion as it is nearer to it, moves so much the more swiftly; so
 much the slower in proportion as it is more remote and nearer to the
 pole; since its revolution is less, and it must of necessity be in one
 self-same time with the greater. I say again, that in proportion as
 the Heaven is nearer to the equatorial circle, so much the more noble
 is it in comparison to its poles; since it has more motion and more
 actuality and more life and more form and more touch from that which
 is above itself, and consequently has more virtue. Hence the stars in
 the Heaven of the fixed stars are more full of power amongst
 themselves in proportion as they are nearer to that circle.
 
 And upon the back of this circle in the Heaven of Venus, of which I
 now speak, is a little sphere, which revolves by itself in this
 Heaven, the circle of which Astrologers call Epicycle; and as the
 great sphere revolves about two poles, so does this little sphere: and
 so has this little sphere the equatorial circle; and so much the more
 noble it is in proportion as it is nearer to those: and in the arc, or
 rather back, of this circle is fixed the most brilliant star of Venus.
 And, although it may be said that there are ten Heavens according to
 strict Truth, this number does not comprehend them all: for that of
 which mention is made, the Epicycle, in which the star is fixed, is a
 Heaven by itself, or rather sphere; and it has not one essence with
 that which bears it, although it may be more like to it than to the
 others, and with it is called one Heaven, and they name the one and
 the other from the star. How the other Heavens and the other stars may
 be is not for present discussion; let it suffice that the nature of
 the third Heaven, with which I am at present concerned, has been told,
 and concerning which all that is at present needful has been shown.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 Since it has been shown in the preceding chapter what this third
 Heaven is, and how it is ordered in itself, it remains to show who
 those are who move it. It is then to be known, in the first place,
 that the movers thereof are substances apart from material, that is,
 Intelligences, which the common people term Angels: and of these
 creatures, as of the Heavens, different persons have had different
 ideas, although the truth may be found. There were certain
 Philosophers, of whom Aristotle appears to be one in his Metaphysics,
 although in the first book on Heaven and Earth incidentally he appears
 to think otherwise, who only believed these to be so many as there are
 revolutions in the Heavens, and no more; saying, that the others would
 have been eternally in vain, without operation, which was impossible,
 inasmuch as their being is their operation. There were others, like
 Plato, a most excellent man, who place not only so many Intelligences
 as there are movements in Heaven, but even as there are species of
 things, that is, manners of things; as of one species are all mankind,
 and of another all the gold, and of another all the silver, and so
 with all: and they are of opinion that as the Intelligences of the
 Heavens are generators of those movements each after his kind, so
 these were generators of the other things, each one being a type of
 its species: and Plato calls them _Ideas_, which is as much as to
 say, so many universal forms and natures.
 
 The Gentiles called them Gods and Goddesses, although they could not
 understand those so philosophically as Plato did; and they adored
 their images, and built large temples to them, as to Juno, whom they
 called the Goddess of Power; as to Vulcan, whom they called the God of
 Fire; as to Pallas, or rather Minerva, whom they called the Goddess of
 Wisdom; and to Ceres, whom they called the Goddess of Corn. Opinions
 such as these the testimony of the Poets makes manifest, for they
 describe to a certain extent the mode of the Gentiles both in their
 sacrifices and in their faith; and it is testified also in many names,
 remains of antiquity, or in names of places and ancient buildings, as
 he who will can easily find. And although these opinions above
 mentioned might be built upon a good foundation by human reason and by
 no slight knowledge, yet the Truth was not seen by them, either from
 defect of reason or from defect of instruction. Yet even by reason it
 was possible to see that very numerous were the creatures above
 mentioned who are not such as men can understand. And the one reason
 is this: no one doubts, neither Philosopher, nor Gentile, nor Jew, nor
 Christian, nor any one of any sect, that they are either the whole or
 the greater part full of all Blessedness, and that those blessed ones
 are in a most perfect state. Therefore, since that which is here Human
 Nature may have not only one Beatitude, but two Beatitudes, as that of
 the Civil Life and that of the Contemplative, it would be irrational
 if we should see these Celestial Beings to have the Beatitude of the
 Active Life, that is, the Civil, in the government of the World, and
 not to have that of the Contemplative, which is the most excellent and
 most Divine.
 
 But since that which has the Beatitude of the Civil government cannot
 have the other, because their intellect is one and perpetual, there
 must be others beyond this ministry, who live only in contemplation.
 And because this latter life is more Divine--and in proportion as the
 thing is more Divine so much the more is it in the image of God--it is
 evident that this life is more beloved of God: and if it be more
 beloved, so much the more vast has its Beatitude been; and if it has
 been more vast, so much the more vivifying power has He given to it
 rather than to the other; therefore one concludes that there may De a
 much larger number of those creatures than the effects tend to show.
 And this is not opposed to that which Aristotle seems to state in the
 tenth book of the Ethics, that to the separate substances the
 Contemplative Life must be requisite; as also the Active Life must be
 imperative to them. Nevertheless, in the contemplation of certain
 truths the revolution of the Heaven follows, which is the government
 of the World; which is, as it were, a Civil government ordained and
 comprehended in the contemplation of the movers, that is, the ruling
 Intelligences. The other reason is, that no effect is greater than the
 cause, because the cause cannot give that which it has not; wherefore,
 since the Divine Intellect is the cause of all, especially of the
 Human Intellect, it follows that the Human Intellect does not dominate
 the Divine, but is dominated by it in proportion to the superior power
 of the Divine. Hence, if we, by the reason above stated, and by many
 others, understand God to have been able to create Spiritual Creatures
 almost innumerable, it is quite evident that He has made them in this
 great number. Many other reasons it were possible to see: but let
 these suffice for the present. Nor let any one marvel if these and
 other reasons which we could adduce concerning this are not fully
 demonstrated; since likewise we ought to wonder at their excellence,
 which overpowers the eyes of the Human Mind, as the Philosopher says
 in the second book of the Metaphysics, and he affirms their existence.
 Though we have not any perception of them from which our knowledge can
 begin, yet some light from their most vivacious essence shines upon
 our intellect, inasmuch as we perceive the above-mentioned reasons and
 many others, even as he who has the eyes closed affirms the air to be
 luminous, because of some little brightness or ray of light which
 passes through the pupils; as it is with the bat, for not otherwise
 are the eyes of the intellect closed, so long as the soul is bound and
 prisoned by the organs of our body.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 It has been said that, through defective instruction, the ancients saw
 not the Truth concerning the Spiritual Creatures, although the people
 of Israel were in part instructed by their Prophets, through whom by
 many modes of speech and in many ways God had spoken to them, as the
 Apostle says. But we are therein instructed by Him who came from God,
 by Him who made them, by Him who preserves them, that is, by the
 Emperor of the Universe, who is Christ the Son of the Supreme God, and
 the Son of the Virgin Mary, a woman truly, and the daughter of Joseph
 and Anna--very Man, who was slain by us in order that He might bring
 us Life; who was the Light which enlightens us in the Darkness, even
 as John the Evangelist says; and He told us the Truth of those things
 which we could not have known without Him, nor seen truly. The first
 thing and the first secret which He showed us was one of the
 before-mentioned Beings or creatures. This was that one, His great
 Legate, the Angel Gabriel, who came to Mary, a young damsel of
 thirteen years, on the part of the Heavenly Saviour. This our Saviour,
 with His own mouth, said, that the Father could give Him many Legions
 of Angels. This He denied not, when it was said to Him that the Father
 had commanded His Angels that they should minister unto Him and should
 serve Him. Wherefore, it is evident to us that these creatures are in
 a very great number; since His Spouse and Secretary, Holy Church, of
 whom Solomon says: "Who is this that cometh forth from the Desert,
 full of those things which give delight, leaning upon her friend?"
 says, believes, and preaches these most noble creatures to be almost
 innumerable; and She divides them into three Hierarchies, that is to
 say, three holy, or rather Divine, Principalities: and each Hierarchy
 has three orders, so that nine orders of spiritual creatures the
 Church holds and affirms.
 
 The first is that of the Angels, the second of the Archangels, the
 third of the Thrones; and these three orders make the first
 Hierarchy--not first as to nobility, nor as to creation, for the
 others are more noble, and all were created together, but first in
 degree, according to our perception of their exaltation.
 
 Then there are the Dominations; after them the Virtues; then the
 Principalities; and these make the second Hierarchy.
 
 Above these are the Powers and the Cherubim, and above all are the
 Seraphim; and these make the third Hierarchy.
 
 And the most potent reason for their contemplation is the number in
 which the Hierarchies are, and that in which the orders are. For,
 since the Divine Majesty is in Three Persons, which have one
 substance, it is possible to contemplate them triply. For it is
 possible to contemplate the Supreme Power of the Father, which the
 first Hierarchy gazes upon, namely, that which is first by nobility,
 and which we enumerate last. And it is possible to contemplate the
 Supreme Wisdom of the Son; and upon this the second Hierarchy gazes.
 And it is possible to contemplate the Supreme and most fervent Charity
 of the Holy Spirit; and upon this the third Hierarchy gazes, which,
 being nearest to us, gives of the gifts which it receives.
 
 And, since it is possible to regard each person in the Divine Trinity
 triply, so in each Hierarchy there are three orders which contemplate
 diversely. It is possible to consider the Father having regard to none
 but Him; and this is the contemplation of the Seraphim, who see more
 of the First Cause than any other Angelic Nature. It is possible to
 consider the Father according as He has relation to the Son, that is,
 how He is apart from Him, and how united with Him; and this is the
 contemplation of the Cherubim. It is possible again to consider the
 Father according as from Him proceeds the Holy Spirit, and how it is
 apart from Him and how united with Him; and this is the contemplation
 of the Powers.
 
 And in like way it is possible to contemplate the Son and the Holy
 Spirit.
 
 Wherefore, there must be nine orders of contemplative Spirits to gaze
 into the Light, which alone beholds itself completely. And this is not
 the place to be silent so much as one word. I say, that of all these
 orders some were lost as soon as they were created, perhaps in number
 of the tenth part, to restore which Human Nature was created. The
 numbers, the orders, the Hierarchies, declare the glory of the movable
 Heavens, which are nine; and the tenth announces this Unity and
 stability of God. And therefore the Psalmist says: "The Heavens
 declare the glory of God, and the Firmament showeth His handiwork."
 Wherefore it is reasonable to believe that the movers of the Heaven of
 the Moon are of the order of the Angels, and those of Mercury may be
 the Archangels, and those of Venus may be the Thrones, in whom the
 Love of the Holy Spirit being innate, they do their work conformably
 to it, which means that the revolution of that Heaven is full of Love.
 The form of the said Heaven takes from this a virtue by whose glow
 souls here below are kindled to love according to their disposition.
 
 And because the ancients perceived that Heaven to be here below the
 cause of Love, they said that Love was the son of Venus, as Virgil
 testifies in the first book of the AEneid, where Venus says to Love:
 "Oh! son, my virtue, son of the great Father, who takest no heed of
 the darts of Typhoeus." And Ovid so testifies in the fifth book of
 his Metamorphoses, when he says that Venus said to Love: "Son, my
 arms, my power." And there are Thrones which are ordered to the
 government of this Heaven in number not great, concerning which the
 Philosophers and the Astrologers have thought differently, according
 as they held different opinions concerning its revolutions. But all
 may be agreed, as many are, in this, as to how many movements it
 makes. Of this, as abbreviated in the book of the Aggregation of the
 Stars, you may find in the better demonstration of the Astrologers
 that there are three: one, according as the star moves towards its
 Epicycle; the other, according as the Epicycle moves with its whole
 Heaven equally with that of the Sun; the third, according as the whole
 of that Heaven moves, following the movement of the starry sphere from
 West to East in one hundred years one degree. So that to these Three
 Movements there are Three Movers. Again, if the whole of this Heaven
 moves and turns with the Epicycle from East to West once in each
 natural day, that movement, whether it be caused by some Intelligence
 or whether it be through the rapid movement of the Primum Mobile, God
 knows, for to me it seems presumptuous to judge. These Movers produce,
 caring for that alone, the revolution proper to that sphere which each
 one moves. The most noble form of the Heaven, which has in itself the
 principle of this passive Nature, revolves, touched by the Moving
 Power, which cares for this; and I say touched, not by a bodily touch,
 but by a Power which directs itself to that operation. And these
 Movers are those to whom I begin to speak and to whom I put my
 inquiry.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 According to that which is said above in the third chapter of this
 treatise, in order to understand well the first part of the Song I
 comment on, it is requisite to discourse of those Heavens, and of
 their Movers; and in the three preceding chapters this has been
 discussed. I say, then, to those whom I proved to be Movers of the
 Heaven of Venus: "Ye who, with thought intent" (_i.e._, with the
 intellect alone, as is said above), "the third Heaven move, Hear
 reasoning that is within my heart;" and I do not say "Hear" because
 they hear any sound, for they have no sense of hearing; but I say
 "Hear," meaning with that hearing which they have, which is of the
 understanding through the intellect. I say, "Hear reasoning that is
 within my heart," within me, which as yet has not appeared externally.
 It is to be known that throughout this Song, according to the one
 sense (the Literal), and the other sense (the Allegorical), the Heart
 is concerned with the secret within, and not any other special part of
 the soul or body. When I have called them to hear that which I wish to
 say, I assign two reasons why I ought fitly to speak to them. One is
 the novelty of my condition, which, from not having been experienced
 by other men, would not be so understood by them as by those who
 superintend such effects in their operation. And this reason I touch
 upon when I say: "To you alone its new thoughts I impart." The other
 reason is: when a man receives a benefit or injury, he ought first to
 relate it to him who bestows or inflicts it, if he can, rather than to
 others; in order that, if it be a benefit, he who receives it may show
 himself grateful towards the benefactor, and, if it be an injury, let
 him lead the doer thereof to gentle mercy with sweet words. And this
 reason I touch upon when I say: "Heaven, that is moved by you, my life
 has brought To where it stands;" that is to say, your operation,
 namely, your revolution, is that which has drawn me into the present
 condition; therefore I conclude and say that my speech ought to be to
 them, such as is said; and I say here: "Therefore to you 'tis need
 That I should speak about the life I lead." And after these reasons
 assigned, I beseech them to listen when I speak.
 
 But, because in each manner of speech the speaker especially ought to
 look to persuasion, that is, to the pleasing of the audience, as that
 which is the beginning of all other persuasions, as do the
 Rhetoricians, and the most powerful persuasion to render the audience
 attentive is to promise to say new and wonderful things, I add to the
 prayer made for attention, this persuasion, or embellishment,
 announcing to them my intention to speak of new things, that is, the
 division which is in my mind; and great things, namely, the power of
 their star; and I say this in those last words of this first part:
 
     To you I'll tell the heart's new cares: always
       The sad Soul weeps within it, and there hears
       Voice of a Spirit that condemns her tears,
     A Spirit that descends through your star's rays.
 
 And to the full understanding of these words, I say that this Spirit
 is no other than a frequent thought how to commend and beautify this
 new Lady. And this Soul is no other than another thought, accompanied
 with acquiescence, which, repudiating that Spirit, commends and
 beautifies the memory of that glorious Beatrice. But, again, because
 the last sentiment of the mind, acquiescence, is held by that thought
 which memory assisted, I call it the Soul, and the other the Spirit;
 as we are accustomed to call the City those who hold it, and not those
 who fight it, although the one and the other may be citizens. I say
 also, that this Spirit comes on the rays of the star, because one
 desires to know that the rays of each Heaven are the way by which
 their virtue descends into things here below. And since the rays are
 no other than a light which comes from the source of Light through the
 air even to the thing illuminated, and the light has no source except
 the star, because the other Heaven is transparent, I say not that this
 Spirit, this thought, comes from their Heaven entirely, but from their
 star. And their star, through the nobility of its Movers, is of such
 virtue that in our souls, and in other things, it has very great
 power, notwithstanding that it is so far from us, about one hundred
 and sixty-seven times farther than it is to the centre of the Earth,
 which is three thousand two hundred and fifty miles. And this is the
 Literal exposition of the first part of the Song.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 What I have said shows clearly enough the Literal meaning of the first
 part. In the second, there is to be understood how it makes manifest
 what I experienced from the struggle within me; and this part has two
 divisions. In the first place it describes the quality of these
 oppositions, according as their cause was within me. Then I narrate
 what the one and the other voice of opposition said; and upon that
 firstly which described what was being lost, in the passage which is
 the second of that part and the third of the Song. In evidence, then,
 of the meaning of the first division, it is to be known that things
 must be named by that part of their form which is the noblest and
 best, as Man by Reason, and not by Sense, nor by aught else which is
 less noble; therefore, when one speaks of the living man, one should
 understand the man using Reason, which is his especial Life, and is
 the action of his noblest part. And, therefore, whoso departs from
 Reason and uses only the Senses is not a living man, but a living
 beast, as says that most excellent Boethius, "Let the Ass live."
 
 Rightly I speak, because thought is the right act of reason, wherefore
 the beasts who have it not do not think; and I speak not only of the
 lesser beasts, but of those who have a human appearance with the
 spirit of a sheep or of some other abominable beast. I say then:
 "Thought that once fed my grieving heart"--thought, that is, of the
 inner life--"was sweet" (sweet, insomuch as it is persuasive, that is,
 pleasing, or beautiful, gentle, delightful); this thought often sped
 away to the feet of the Father of those Spirits to whom I speak, that
 is, God; that is to say, that I in thought contemplated the realm of
 the Blessed. "Thought that once fled up to the Father's feet." And I
 name the final cause immediately, because I ascended there above in
 thought when I say, "There I beheld a Lady glorified," to let you
 understand that I was certain, and am certain by its gracious
 revelation, that she was in Heaven; wherefore I, thinking many times
 how this was possible for me, went thither, rapt, as it were. Then
 subsequently I speak of the effect of this thought, in order to let
 you understand its sweetness, which was such that it made me desirous
 of Death, that I also might go where she was gone. And of this I speak
 there: "Of whom so sweetly it discoursed to me That the Soul said,
 'With her would I might be!'" And this is the root of one of the
 struggles which was in me. And it is to be known that here one terms
 Thought, and not Soul, that which ascended to see that Blessed Spirit,
 because it was an especial thought sent on that mission; the Soul is
 understood, as is stated in the preceding chapter, as thought in
 general, with acquiescence.
 
 Then, when I say, "Now One appears that drives the thought aside," I
 touch the root of the other struggle, saying how that previous thought
 was wont to be the life of me, even as another appears, which makes
 that one cease to be. I say, "drives the thought aside," in order to
 show that one to be antagonistic, for naturally the opposing one
 drives aside the other, and that which is driven appears to yield
 through want of power. And I say that this thought, which newly
 appears, is powerful in taking hold of me and in subduing my Soul,
 saying that it "masters me with such effectual might" that the heart,
 that is, my inner life, trembles so much that my countenance shows it
 in some new appearance.
 
 Subsequently I show the power of this new thought by its effect,
 saying that it makes me "fix my regard" on a Lady, and speaks to me
 words of allurement, that is to say, it reasons before the eyes of my
 intelligent affection, in order the better to induce me, promising me
 that the sight of her eyes is its salvation. And in order to make this
 credible to the Soul experienced in love, it says that it is for no
 one to gaze into the eyes of this woman who fears the anguish of
 laboured sighs. And it is a beautiful mode of rhetoric when externally
 it appears that you disembellish a thing, and yet really embellish it
 within. This new thought of love could not induce my mind to consent,
 except by discoursing of the virtue of the eyes of this fair Lady so
 profoundly.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 Now that it is shown how and whereof Love is born, and the antagonist
 that fought with me, I must proceed to open the meaning of that part
 in which different thoughts contend within me. I say that, firstly,
 one must speak on the part of the Soul, that is, of the former
 thought, and then of the other; for this reason, that always that
 which the speaker intends most especially to say he ought to reserve
 in the background, because that which is said finally, remains most in
 the mind of the hearer. Therefore, since I mean to speak further, and
 to discourse of that which performs the work of those to whom I speak,
 rather than of that which undoes this work, it was reasonable first to
 mention and to discourse of the condition of the part which was
 undone, and then of that which was generated by the other.
 
 But here arises a doubt, which is not to be passed over without
 explanation. It would be possible for any one to say: Since Love is
 the effect of these Intelligences, to whom I speak, and that of the
 first Love might be the same as that of the new Love, why should their
 virtue destroy the one, and produce the other? since it ought to
 preserve the first, for the reason that each cause loves its effect,
 and ought to protect what it loves. To this question one can easily
 reply, that the effect of those Spirits, as has been said, is Love:
 and since they could not save it except in those who are subject to
 their revolution, they transfer it from that part which is beyond
 their power to that which is within reach, from the soul departed out
 of this life, into that which is yet living; as human nature transfers
 in the human form its preservation of the father to the son, because
 it cannot in this father preserve perpetually its effect: I say effect
 in as far as soul and body are united, and not effect in as far as
 that soul, which is divided from the body, lasts for ever, in a nature
 more than human. And thus is the question solved.
 
 But since the immortality of the Soul is here touched upon, I will
 make a digression upon that; because to discourse of that will make a
 fit conclusion to the mention I have made of that living and blessed
 Beatrice, of whom I do not intend to speak further in this book.
 
 For proposition I say that, amongst all the bestialities, that is the
 most foolish, the most vile, and most damnable which believes no other
 life to be after this life; wherefore, if we turn over all books,
 whether of philosophers or of the other wise writers, all agree in
 this, that in us there is some everlasting principle. And this
 especially Aristotle seems to desire in that book on the Soul; this
 especially each stoic seems to desire; this Tullius seems to desire,
 especially in that book on Old Age. This each of the Poets who have
 spoken according to the faith of the Gentiles seems to desire; this
 the law seems to desire, among Jews, Saracens, and Tartars, and all
 other people who live according to some civil law. And if all these
 could be deceived, there would result an impossibility which even to
 describe would be horrible. Each man is certain that human nature is
 the most perfect of all natures here below. This no one denies: and
 Aristotle affirms it when he says, in the twelfth book On Animals,
 that man is the most perfect of all the animals. Therefore, since many
 who live are entirely mortal, as are the brute animals, and all may
 be, whilst they live, without that hope of the other life; if our hope
 should be in vain, our want would be greater than that of any other
 animal. There have been many who have given this life for that: and
 thus it would follow that the most perfect animal, man, would be the
 most imperfect, which is impossible; and that that part, namely,
 reason, which is his chief perfection, would be in him the cause of
 the chief defect: which seems strange to say of the whole. And again
 it would follow that Nature, in contradiction to herself, could have
 put this hope in the human mind; since it is said that many have
 hastened to death of the body that they might live in the other life;
 and this also is impossible. Again, we have continual experience of
 our immortality in the divination of our dreams, which could not be if
 there were no immortal part in us, since immortal must be the
 revelation. This part may be either corporeal or incorporeal if one
 think well and closely. I say corporeal or incorporeal, because of the
 different opinions which I find concerning this. That which is moved,
 or rather informed, by an immediate informer, ought to have proportion
 to the informer; and between the mortal and the immortal there is no
 proportion. Again, we are assured of it by the most truthful doctrine
 of Christ, which is the Way, the Truth, and the Light: the Way,
 because by it without impediment we go to the happiness of that
 immortality; the Truth, because it endures no error; the Light,
 because it enlightens us in the darkness of worldly ignorance. This
 doctrine, I say, which above all other reasons makes us certain of it;
 for it has been given to us by Him who sees and measures our
 immortality, which we cannot perfectly see whilst our immortal is
 mingled with the mortal. But we see it by faith perfectly; and by
 reason we see it with the cloud of obscurity which grows from the
 mixture of the mortal with the immortal. This ought to be the most
 powerful argument that both are in us: and I thus believe, thus
 affirm; and I am equally certain, after this life, to pass to that
 other and better life--there where that glorious Lady lives, with whom
 my soul was enamoured when it was struggling, as will be set forth in
 the next chapter.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 
 Returning to the proposition, I say that in that verse which begins "A
 foe so strong I find him that he destroys," I intend to make manifest
 that which was discoursing in my Soul, the ancient thought against the
 new; and first briefly I show the cause of its lamentation, when I
 say: "This opposite now breaks the humble dream Of the crowned angel
 in the glory-beam." This one is that especial thought of which it is
 said above that it was wont to be the life of the sorrowing heart.
 Then when I say, "Still, therefore, my Soul weeps," it is evident that
 my Soul is still on its side, and speaks with sadness; and I say that
 it speaks words of lamentation, as if it might wonder at the sudden
 transformation, saying: "'The tender star,' It says, 'that once was my
 consoler, flies.'" It can well say consoler, for in the great loss
 which I sustained in the death of Beatrice this thought, which
 ascended into Heaven, had given to my Soul much consolation.
 
 Then afterwards I say, that all my thought, my Soul, of which I say,
 "That troubled one," turns in excuse of itself, and speaks against the
 eyes; and this is made evident there: "That troubled one asked, 'When
 into thine eyes Looked she?'" And I say that she speaks of them and
 against them three things: the first is, she blasphemes the hour when
 this woman saw them. And here you must know, that although many things
 in one hour can come into the eyes, truly that which comes by a
 straight line into the point of the pupil, that truly one sees, and
 that only is sealed in the imaginative part. And this is, because the
 nerve by which the visible spirit runs is directed to that part, and
 thereupon truly one eye cannot look on the eye of another so that it
 is not seen by it; for as that which looks receives the form of the
 pupil by a right line, so by that same line its form passes into that
 eye which gazes. And many times in the direction of that line a shaft
 flies from the bow of Love, with whom each weapon is light. Therefore,
 when I ask, "When first into mine eyes looked she?" it is as much as
 to ask, "When did her eyes and mine look into each other?"
 
 The second point is in that which reproves their disobedience, when it
 says, "Of her, why doubted they my words?" Then it proceeds to the
 third thing and says that it is not right to reprove them for
 precaution, but for their disobedience; for it says that, sometimes,
 when speaking of this woman, it might be said, "Her eyes bear death to
 such as I," if she could have opened the way of approach. And indeed
 one ought to believe that my Soul knew of its own inclination ready to
 receive the operation of this power, and therefore dreaded it; for the
 act of the agent takes full effect in the patient who has the
 inclination to receive it, as the Philosopher says in the second book
 on the Soul. And, therefore, if wax could have the spirit of fear, it
 would fear most to come into the rays of the Sun, which would not turn
 it into stone, since its disposition is to yield to that strong
 operation.
 
 Lastly, the Soul reveals in its speech that their presumption had been
 dangerous when it says, "Yet vainly warned, I gazed on her and die."
 And thus it closes its speech, to which the new thought replies, as
 will be declared in the following chapter.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 
 The meaning of that part in which the Soul speaks, that is, the old
 thought which is undone, has been shown. Now, in due order, the
 meaning must be shown of the part in which the new antagonistic
 thought speaks; and this part is contained entirely in the verse or
 stanza which begins, "Thou art not dead," which part, in order to
 understand it well, I will divide into two; that in the first part,
 which begins "Thou art not dead," it then says, continuing its last
 words, "It is not true that thou art dead; but the cause wherefore
 thou to thyself seemest to be dead is a deadly dismay into which thou
 art vilely fallen because of this woman who has appeared to thee." And
 here it is to be observed that, as Boethius says in his Consolation,
 each sudden change of things does not happen without some flurry of
 mind. And this is expressed in the reproof of that thought which is
 called "the spirit voice of tenderness," when it gave me to understand
 that my consent was inclining towards it; and thus, one can easily
 comprehend this, and recognize its victory, when it already says,
 "Dear Soul of ours," therein making itself familiar. Then, as is
 stated, it commands where it ought to rebuke that Soul, in order to
 induce it to come to her; and therefore it says to her: "See, she is
 lowly, Pitiful, courteous, though so wise and holy."
 
 These are two things which are a fit remedy for the fear with which
 the Soul appeared impassioned; for, firmly united, they cause the
 individual to hope well, and especially Pity, which causes all other
 goodness to shine forth by its light. Wherefore Virgil, speaking of
 AEneas, in his greater praise calls him compassionate, pitiful; and
 that is not pity such as the common people understand it, which is to
 lament over the misfortunes of others; nay, this is an especial effect
 which is called Mercy, Pity, Compassion; and it is a passion. But
 compassion is not a passion; rather a noble disposition of mind,
 prepared to receive Love, Mercy, and other charitable passions. Then
 it says: "See also how courteous, though so wise and holy."
 
 Here it says three things which, according as they can be acquired by
 us, make the person especially pleasing. It says Wise. Now, what is
 more beautiful in a woman than knowledge? It says Courteous. Nothing
 in a woman can be more excellent than courtesy. And neither are the
 wretched common people deceived even in this word, for they believe
 that courtesy is no other than liberality; for liberality is an
 especial, and not a general courtesy. Courtesy is all one with
 honesty, modesty, decency; and because the virtues and good manners
 were the custom in Courts anciently, as now the opposite is the
 custom, this word was taken from the Courts; which word, if it should
 now be taken from the Courts, especially of Italy, would and could
 express no other than baseness. It says Holy. The greatness which is
 here meant is especially well accompanied with the two afore-mentioned
 virtues; because it is that light which reveals the good and the evil
 of the person clearly. And how much knowledge and how much virtuous
 custom does there not seem to be wanting by this light! How much
 madness and how much vice are seen to be by this light! Better would
 it be for the wretched madmen high in station, stupid and vicious, to
 be of low estate, that neither in the world nor after this life they
 should be so infamous. Truly for such Solomon says in Ecclesiastes:
 "There is a sore evil that I have seen under the Sun; namely, riches
 kept for the owners thereof to their hurt."
 
 Then subsequently it lays a command on it, that is, on my Soul, that
 it should now call this one its Lady: "Think thou to call her Mistress
 evermore," promising my Soul that it will be quite content with her
 when it shall have clear perception of all her wonderful
 accomplishments; and then this one says: "Save thou delude thyself,
 then shall there shine High miracles before thee;" neither does it
 speak otherwise even to the end of that stanza. And here ends the
 Literal meaning of all that which I say in this Song, speaking to
 these Celestial Intelligences.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 
 Finally, according to that which the letter of this Commentary said
 above, when I divided the principal parts of this Song, I turn back
 with the face of my discourse to the same Song, and I speak to that.
 And in order that this part may be understood more fully, I say that
 generally in each Song there is what is called a Tornata, because the
 Reciters, who originally were accustomed to compose it, so contrived
 that when the song was sung, with a certain part of the song they
 could return to it. But I have rarely done it with that intention;
 and, in order that others may perceive, this I have seldom placed it
 with the sequence of the Song, so long as it is in the rhythm which is
 necessary to the measure. But I have used it when it was requisite to
 express something independent of the meaning of the Song, and which
 was needful for its embellishment, as it will be possible to perceive
 in this and in the other Songs.
 
 And, therefore, I say at present, that the goodness and the beauty of
 each discourse are parted and divided; for the goodness is in the
 meaning, and the beauty in the ornament of the words. And the one and
 the other are with delight, although the goodness is especially
 delightful. Wherefore, since the goodness of this Song might be
 difficult to perceive, because of the various persons who are led to
 speak in it, where so many distinctions are required; and the beauty
 would be easy to see, it seemed to me, of the nature of the Song that
 by some men more attention might be paid to the beauty of the words
 than to the goodness of matter. And this is what I say in that part.
 
 But, because it often happens that to admonish seems presumptuous in
 certain conditions, it is usual for the Rhetorician to speak
 indirectly to others, directing his words, not to him for whom he
 speaks, but towards another. And truly this method is maintained here;
 for to the Song the words go, and to the men the meaning of them. I
 say then: "My Song, I do believe there will be few Who toil to
 understand thy reasoning." And I state the cause, which is double.
 First, because thou speakest with fatigue--with fatigue, I say, for
 the reason which is stated; and then because thou speakest with
 difficulty--with difficulty, I say, as to the novelty of the meaning.
 Now afterwards I admonish it, and say:
 
       But if thou pass perchance by those who bring
     No skill to give thee the attention due,
       Then pray I, dear last-born, let them rejoice
       At least to find a music in my voice.
 
 For in this I desire to say no other according to what is said above,
 except "Oh, men, you who cannot see the meaning of this Song, do not
 therefore refuse it; but pay attention to its beauty, which is great,
 both for construction, which belongs to the Grammarians; and for the
 order of the discourse, which belongs to the Rhetoricians; as well as
 for the rhythm of its parts, which belongs to the Musicians." For
 which things he who looks well can see that there may be beauty in it.
 And this is the entire Literal meaning of the first Song which is
 prepared for the first dish in my Banquet.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 
 Since the Literal meaning has been sufficiently explained, we must now
 proceed to the Allegorical and true exposition. And, therefore,
 beginning again from the first head, I say that when I had lost the
 chief delight of my Soul in former time, I was left so stung with
 sadness that no consolation whatever availed me. Nevertheless, after
 some time, my mind, reasoning with itself to heal itself, took heed,
 since neither my own nor that of another availed to comfort it, to
 turn to the method which a certain disconsolate one had adopted when
 he looked for Consolation. And I set myself to read that book of
 Boethius, not known to many, in which, when a captive exile, he had
 consoled himself. And, again, hearing that Tullius had written another
 book, in which, treating of Friendship, he had spoken words for the
 consolation of Laelius, a most excellent man, on the death of his
 friend Scipio, I set myself to read it. And although at first it was
 difficult to me to enter into their meaning, yet, finally, I entered
 into it so much as the knowledge of grammar that I possessed, together
 with some slight power of intellect, enabled me to do: by which power
 of intellect I formerly beheld many things almost like a person in a
 dream, as may be seen in the Vita Nuova. And as it is wont to be that
 a man goes seeking for silver, and beyond his purpose he finds gold,
 whose hidden cause appears not perhaps without the Divine Will; I, who
 sought to console myself, found not only a remedy for my tears, but
 words of authors and of sciences and of books; reflecting on which I
 judged well that Philosophy, who was the Lady of these authors, of
 these sciences, and of these books, might be a supreme thing. And I
 imagined her in the form of a gentle Lady; and I could imagine her in
 no other attitude than a compassionate one, because if willingly the
 sense of Truth beheld her, hardly could it turn away from her. And
 with this imagination I began to go where she is demonstrated
 truthfully, that is, to the Schools of the Religious, and to the
 disputations of the Philosophers; so that in a short time, perhaps of
 thirty months, I began to feel her sweetness so much that my love for
 her chased away and destroyed all other thought. Wherefore I, feeling
 myself to rise from the thought of the first Love to the virtue of
 this new one, as if wondering at myself, opened my mouth in the speech
 of the proposed Song, showing my condition under the figure of other
 things: for of the Lady with whom I was enamoured, no rhyme of any
 Vernacular was worthy to speak openly, neither were the hearers so
 well prepared that they could have easily understood the words without
 figure: neither would faith have been given by them to the true
 meaning, as to the figurative; since if the truth of the whole was
 believed, that I was inclined to that love, it would not be believed
 of this. I then begin to speak: "Ye who, intent of thought, the third
 Heaven move."
 
 And because, as has been said, this Lady was the daughter of God, the
 Queen of all, the most noble and most beautiful Philosophy, it remains
 to be seen who these Movers were, and what this third Heaven. And
 firstly of the third Heaven, according to the order which has been
 gone through. And here it is not needful to proceed to division, and
 to explanation of the letter, for, having turned the fictitious speech
 away from that which it utters to that which it means, by the
 exposition just gone through, this meaning is sufficiently made
 evident.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV.
 
 
 In order to see what is meant by the "third Heaven," one has in the
 first place to perceive what I desire to express by this word Heaven
 alone: and then one will see how and why this third Heaven was needful
 to us. I say that by Heaven I mean Science, and by the Heavens "the
 Sciences," from three resemblances which the Heavens have with the
 Sciences, especially by the order and number in which they must
 appear; as will be seen by discussing that word Third. The first
 similitude is the revolution of the one and the other round one fixed
 centre. For each movable Heaven revolves round its centre, which, on
 account of its movement, moves not; and thus each Science moves round
 its subject, which itself moves not; for no Science demonstrates its
 own foundation, but presupposes that. The second similitude is the
 illumination of the one and the other. For each Heaven illuminates
 visible things; and thus each Science illuminates the things
 intelligible. And the third similitude is the inducing of perfection
 in the things so inclined. Of which induction, as to the first
 perfection, that is, of the substantial generation, all the
 philosophers agree that the Heavens are the cause, although they
 attribute this in different ways: some from the Movers, as Plato,
 Avicenna, and Algazel; some from the stars themselves, especially the
 human souls, as Socrates, and also Plato and Dionysius the
 Academician; and some from celestial virtue which is in the natural
 heat of the seed, as Aristotle and the other Peripatetics. Thus the
 Sciences are the cause in us of the induction of the second
 perfection; by the use of which we can speculate concerning the Truth,
 which is our ultimate perfection, as the Philosopher says in the sixth
 book of the Ethics, when he says that Truth is the good of the
 intellect. Because of these and many other resemblances, it is
 possible to call Science, Heaven.
 
 Now it remains to see why it is called the third Heaven. Here it is
 requisite to reflect somewhat with regard to a comparison which exists
 between the order of the Heavens and that of the Sciences Wherefore,
 as has been previously described, the Seven Heavens next to us are
 those of the Planets; then there are two Heavens above these, the
 Mobile, and one above all, Quiet. To the Seven first correspond the
 Seven Sciences of the _Trivium_ and of the _Quadrivium_,
 namely, Grammar, Logic, Rhetoric, Arithmetic, Music, Geometry, and
 Astrology. To the eighth Sphere, i.e., to the starry, correspond
 Natural Science, which is termed Physics, and the first Science, which
 is termed Metaphysics. To the ninth Sphere corresponds Moral Science;
 and to the Quiet Heaven corresponds Divine Science, which is
 designated Theology.
 
 And the reason why this is, remains briefly to be seen. I say that the
 Heaven of the Moon is likened unto Grammar because it is possible to
 find a comparison to it. For if you look at the Moon well, two things
 are seen to be proper to it which are not seen in the other stars: the
 one is the shadow which is in it, which is no other than the rarity of
 its body, in which the rays of the Sun can find no end wherefrom to
 strike back again as in the other parts; the other is the variation of
 its brightness, which now shines on one side, and now on the other,
 according as the Sun sees it. And these two properties Grammar has:
 for, because of its infinity, the rays of reason can find no end in it
 in parts, especially of the words; and it shines now on this side, now
 on that, inasmuch as certain words, certain declensions, certain
 constructions, are in use which were not formerly, and many formerly
 were which again will be; as Horace says in the beginning of his book
 on the art of Poetry, when he says: "Many words will spring up again
 which have now fallen out of use."
 
 And the Heaven of Mercury may be compared to Logic because of two
 properties: that Mercury is the smallest star in Heaven, that the
 amount of its diameter is no more than two hundred and thirty-two
 miles, according as Alfergano puts it, who says that it is one
 twenty-eighth part of the diameter of the Earth, which is six thousand
 five hundred miles; the other property is, that it is more concealed
 by the rays of the Sun than any other star. And these two properties
 are in Logic: for Logic is less in substance than any other Science,
 for it is perfectly compiled and terminated in so much text as is
 found in the old Art and the new; and it is more concealed than any
 other Science, inasmuch as it proceeds with more sophistical and
 probable arguments than any other.
 
 And the Heaven of Venus may be compared to Rhetoric because of two
 properties: the one is the brightness of its aspect, which is most
 sweet to behold, far more than any other star; the other is its
 appearance, now in the morning, now in the evening. And these two
 properties are in Rhetoric: for Rhetoric is the sweetest of all
 Sciences, since it principally aims at sweetness. It appears in the
 morning, when the Rhetorician speaks before the face of the hearer; it
 appears in the evening, that is, afterwards, when it speaks by Letters
 in distant parts.
 
 And the Heaven of the Sun may be compared to Arithmetic because of two
 properties: the one is, that with his light all the other stars are
 informed; the other is that the eye cannot gaze at it. And these two
 properties are in Arithmetic, which with its light illuminates all its
 Sciences: for their subjects are all considered under some Number, and
 with Number one always proceeds in the consideration of these; as in
 Natural Science the movable body is the subject, which movable body
 has in itself three reasons of continuity, and this has in itself
 reason of infinite number. And of Natural Science its first and
 chiefest consideration is to consider the principles of natural
 objects, which are three, that is, matter, privation, and form; in
 which this Number is seen, and not only in all together, but again in
 each one, as he who considers subtly may perceive. Wherefore,
 Pythagoras, according to what Aristotle says in the first book of the
 Physics, established as the principles of natural things, the equal
 and the unequal; considering all things to be Number. The other
 property of the Sun is again seen in Number, of which Number is the
 Science of Arithmetic, that the eye of the intellect cannot gaze at
 it. For Number, inasmuch as it is considered in itself, is infinite;
 and this we cannot, understand.
 
 And the Heaven of Mars may be compared to Music because of two
 properties. One is its most beautiful relative position; for, when
 enumerating the movable Heavens, from which one soever you may begin,
 either from the lowest or from the highest, this Heaven of Mars is the
 fifth; it is the central one of all, that is, of the first, of the
 second, of the third, and of the fourth. The other is, that this Mars
 dries up and burns things, because his heat is like to that of fire;
 and this is why it appears flaming in colour, sometimes more and
 sometimes less, according to the density and rarity of the vapours
 which follow it, which of themselves are often kindled, as is
 determined in the first book on Meteors. And, therefore, Albumassar
 says that the kindling of these vapours signifies the death of Kings
 and the change of Kingdoms; for they are the effects of the dominion
 of Mars. And, therefore, Seneca says that, on the death of Augustus,
 he beheld on high a ball of fire. And in Florence, at the beginning of
 its destruction, there was seen in the air, in the form of a cross, a
 great quantity of these vapours following the planet Mars. And these
 two properties are in Music, which is all relative, as is seen in
 harmonized words and in songs, from which the sweeter harmony results
 in proportion as the relation is more beautiful, which in this Science
 is especially beautiful, because there is in it a special harmony.
 Again, Music attracts to itself human spirits, which are as it were
 chiefly vapours from the heart, so that they almost cease from all
 labour; so is the whole soul when it hears it, and the power of all
 those spirits flies as it were to the spirit of sense, which receives
 the sound.
 
 And the Heaven of Jupiter can be compared to Geometry because of two
 properties. The one is, that it moves between two Heavens, repugnant
 to its good tempering, namely, that of Mars and that of Saturn. Hence
 Ptolemy says, in the book alluded to, that Jupiter is a star of a
 temperate complexion, midway between the cold of Saturn and the heat
 of Mars. The other is, that amongst all the stars it appears white, as
 if silvered. And these things are in the Science of Geometry. Geometry
 moves between two things antagonistic to it; as between the point and
 the circle, and I term circle freely anything that is round, either a
 body or superfices; for, as Euclid says, the point is the beginning of
 Geometry, and, according to what he says, the circle is the most
 perfect figure in it, which must therefore have reason for its end; so
 that between the point and the circle, as between the beginning and
 the end, Geometry moves. And these two are antagonistic to its
 certainty; for the point by its indivisibility is immeasurable, and
 the circle, on account of its arc, it is impossible to square
 perfectly, and therefore it is impossible to measure precisely. And
 again, Geometry is most white, inasmuch as it is without spot of
 error, and it is most certain in itself, and by its handmaid, called
 Perspective.
 
 And the Heaven of Saturn has two properties because of which it can be
 compared to Astrology. One is the slowness of its movement through the
 twelve signs; for twenty-nine years and more, according to the
 writings of the Astrologers, is the time that it requires in its
 orbit. The other is, that above all the other planets it is highest.
 And these two properties are in Astrology, for in completing its
 circle, as in the acquirement of this Science, the greatest space of
 time is revolved, because its demonstrations are more than any other
 of the aforementioned Sciences, and long experience is requisite to
 those who would acquire good judgment in it. And again, it is the
 highest of all the others, because, as Aristotle says in the
 commencement of his book on the Soul, the Science is high, because of
 its nobility, and because of the nobleness of its subject and its
 certainty. And this Science more than any other of those mentioned
 above is noble and high, for noble and high is its subject, which is
 the movement of the Heavens; and high and noble, because of its
 certainty, which is without any defect, even as that which springs
 from the most perfect and most regular principle. And if any one
 believe that there is defect in it, it is not on the part of the
 Science, but, as Ptolemy says, it is through our negligence, and to
 that it must be imputed.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV.
 
 
 After the comparisons which I have made of the seven first Heavens, we
 must now proceed to the others, which are three, as has been often
 stated.
 
 I say that the Starry Heaven may be compared to Physics because of
 three properties, and to Metaphysics because of three others. For it
 shows us of itself two visible things, such as the multitude of stars
 and such as the Galaxy, that white circle which the common people call
 the Path of St. James. It shows to us also one of the poles, and keeps
 the other hidden from us. And it shows to us one movement alone from
 East to West; and another, which it makes from West to East, it keeps
 almost, as it were, hidden from us. Therefore, in due order are to be
 seen, first the comparison with the Physical and then that with the
 Metaphysical.
 
 I say that the Starry Heaven shows us many stars; for, according to
 what the wise men of Egypt have seen, even to the last star which
 appeared to them in the Meridian, they place there twenty-two thousand
 bodies of stars, of which I speak. And in this it has the greatest
 similitude with Physics, if these three numbers, namely, Two, and
 Twenty, and Thousand, are regarded well and subtly. For by the two is
 meant the local movement, which is of necessity from one point to
 another; and by the twenty is signified the movement of the
 alteration, for, since from the ten upwards one advances not except by
 altering this ten with the other nine and with itself; and the most
 beautiful alteration which it receives is its own with itself, and the
 first which it receives is the twenty; reasonably by this number the
 said movement is signified. And by the thousand is signified the
 movement of increase, which in name, that is, this thousand, is the
 greater number, and to increase still more is not possible except by
 multiplying this. And these three movements alone are observed in
 Physics, as it is demonstrated in the fifth chapter of his first book.
 
 And because of the Milky Way, this Heaven has a great similitude with
 Metaphysics. Wherefore, it is to be known that concerning this Galaxy
 the Philosophers have had different opinions. For the followers of
 Pythagoras said that the Sun at some time or other went astray from
 his path, and, passing through other parts not suitable to his fervent
 heat, he burnt the place through which he passed, and there remained
 that appearance of the conflagration. And I believe that they were
 moved by the fable of Phaeton, which Ovid relates in the beginning of
 the second part of his Metamorphoses. Others said, such as Anaxagoras
 and Democritus, that it was the light of the Sun reflected into that
 part. And these opinions, with demonstrative reasons, they proved over
 and over again. What Aristotle may have said of this is not so easy to
 learn, because his opinion is not found to be the same in one
 translation as in the other; and I believe that it might be due to the
 error of the translators, for in the new one he seems to say that the
 Galaxy is a collection of vapours under the stars of that part which
 always attract them; and this does not seem to be the true reason. In
 the old translation he says that the Galaxy is no other than a
 multitude of fixed stars in that part, so small that we cannot
 distinguish them from here below, but that they cause the whiteness
 which we call the Milky Way. And it may be that the Heaven in that
 part is more dense, and therefore retains and represents that light;
 and this opinion Avicenna and Ptolemy seem to share with Aristotle.
 Therefore, since the Galaxy is an effect of those stars which we
 cannot see, if we understand those things by their effect alone, and
 Metaphysics treats of the first substances, which we cannot similarly
 understand except by their effects, it is evident that the Starry
 Heaven has a great similitude to Metaphysics.
 
 Again, by the pole which we see is signified the things known to our
 senses, concerning which, taking them universally, the Science of
 Physics treats; and by the pole which we do not see is signified the
 things which are without matter, which are not sensible, concerning
 which Metaphysics treats; and therefore the said Heaven has a great
 similitude with the one Science and with the other.
 
 Again, by the two movements it signifies these two Sciences: for by
 the movement in which every day revolves, and makes a new revolution
 from point to point, it signifies things natural and corruptible which
 daily complete their path, and their material is changed from form to
 form; and of this the Science of Physics treats. And by the almost
 insensible movement which it makes from West to East by one degree in
 a hundred years, it signifies things incorruptible, which received
 from God the beginning of their creation, and will have no end; but of
 these Metaphysics treats. Therefore I say that this movement signifies
 those things, for it began this revolution which will have no end; the
 end of the revolution being to return to one self-same point, to which
 this Heaven will not return by this movement, which has revolved a
 little more than the sixth part from the commencement of the world;
 and we are now in the last age of the world, and verily we wait the
 consummation of the celestial movement. Thus it is evident that the
 Starry Heaven, on account of many properties, may be compared to the
 Science of Physics and Metaphysics.
 
 The Crystalline Heaven, which, as the Primum Mobile, has been
 previously counted, has a sufficiently evident comparison to Moral
 Philosophy; for Moral Philosophy, according to what Tommaso says upon
 the second book of the Ethics, teaches us method in the other
 Sciences.
 
 For as the Philosopher says in the fifth book of the Ethics, legal
 Justice requires the Sciences to be learnt, and commands, in order
 that they may not be abandoned, that they be learnt and taught: thus,
 the said Heaven rules with its movement the daily revolution of all
 the others; from which revolution every day all those receive and send
 below the virtues of their several parts. For, if the revolution of
 this Heaven could not rule over that, but little of their power would
 descend below, and little of their aspect. Wherefore we hold that, if
 it could be possible for this ninth Heaven not to move, the third part
 of the Heaven would not again be seen in any part from the Earth:
 Saturn would be for fourteen years and a half concealed from any place
 on the Earth, Jupiter would be hidden for six years, and Mars for
 almost a whole year, and the Sun for one hundred and eighty-two days
 and fourteen hours (I say days, meaning so much time as so many days
 measure); and Venus and Mercury, almost like the Sun, would be hidden
 and would reappear, and the Moon for the space of fourteen days and a
 half would be hidden from all people. Verily, here below there would
 be neither generation, nor the life of animals, nor of plants; there
 would be no night, nor day, nor week, nor month, nor year; but the
 whole Universe would be disordered, and the movement of the stars
 would be in vain. Not otherwise, should Moral Philosophy cease to be,
 would the other Sciences be hidden for some time, and there would be
 no generation nor life of happiness, and all books would be in vain,
 and all discoveries of old. Therefore it is sufficiently evident that
 there is a comparison between this Heaven and Moral Philosophy.
 
 Again, the Empyrean Heaven, because of its Peace, bears a similitude
 to the Divine Science, which is full of all Peace; which endures no
 conflict of opinion or of sophistical arguments, on account of the
 most excellent certainty of its subject, which is God. And of this He
 Himself speaks to His disciples: "My peace I give to you: My peace I
 leave unto you," giving and leaving to them His doctrine, which is
 this Science whereof I speak.
 
 Solomon says of this Science: "Sixty are the queens, and eighty the
 friendly concubines; and youthful virgins without number; but one is
 my dove and my perfect one." All the Sciences he terms queens, and
 friends, and virgins; and he calls this one dove, because it is
 without blemish of strife; and he calls this one perfect, because it
 causes us to see perfectly the Truth in which our Soul finds Peace.
 
 And therefore the comparison of the Heavens to the Sciences having
 been thus reasoned out, it is easy to see that by the Third Heaven I
 mean Rhetoric, which has been likened unto the Third Heaven, as
 appears above.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 
 By the similitudes spoken of it is possible to see who these Movers
 are to whom I speak; what are the Movers of that Heaven; even as
 Boethius and Tullius, who by the sweetness of their speech sent me, as
 has before been stated, to the Love, which is the study of that most
 gentle Lady, Philosophy, by the rays of their star, which is the
 written word of that fair one. Therefore in each Science the written
 word is a star full of light, which that Science reveals And, this
 being made manifest, it is easy to see the true meaning of the first
 verse of the purposed Poem by means of the exposition, Figurative and
 Literal. And by means of this self-same exposition one can
 sufficiently understand the second verse, even to that part where it
 says, This Spirit made me look on a fair Lady: where it should be
 known that this Lady is Philosophy; which truly is a Lady full of
 sweetness, adorned with modesty, wonderful for wisdom, the glory of
 freedom, as in the Third Treatise, where her Nobility will be
 described, it is made manifest. And then where it says: "Who seeks
 where his Salvation lies, Must gaze intently in this Lady's eyes;" the
 eyes of this Lady are her demonstrations, which look straight into the
 eyes of the intellect, enamour the Soul, and set it free from the
 trammels of circumstance. Oh, most sweet and ineffable forms, swift
 stealers of the human mind, which appear in these demonstrations, that
 is, in the eyes of Philosophy, when she discourses to her faithful
 friends! Verily in you is Salvation, whereby he is made blessed who
 looks at you, and is saved from the death of Ignorance and Vice. Where
 it says, "Nor dread the sighs of anguish, joys debarred," the wish is
 to signify, if he fear not the labour of study and the strife of
 conflicting opinions, which flow forth ever multiplying from the
 living Spring in the eyes of this Lady, and then her light still
 continuing, they fall away, almost like little morning clouds before
 the Sun. And now the intellect, become her friend, remains free and
 full of certain Truth, even as the atmosphere is rendered pure and
 bright by the shining of the midday Sun.
 
 The third passage again is explained by the Literal exposition as far
 as to where it says, "Still therefore the Soul weeps." Here it is
 desirable to attend to a certain moral sense which may be observed in
 these words: that a man ought not for the sake of the greater friend
 to forget the service received from the lesser; but if one must follow
 the one and leave the other, the greater is to be followed, with
 honest lamentation for desertion of the other, whereby he gives
 occasion to the one whom he follows to bestow more love on him. Then
 there where it says, "Of my eyes," has no other meaning except that
 bitter was the hour when the first demonstration of this Lady entered
 into the eyes of my intellect, which was the cause of this most close
 attachment. And there where it says, "My peers," it means the Souls
 set free from miserable and vile pleasures, and from vulgar habits,
 endowed with understanding and memory. And then it says, "Her eyes
 bear death," and then it says, "I gazed on her and die," which appears
 contrary to that which is said above of Salvation by this Lady. And
 therefore it is to be known that one Spirit speaks here on one side
 and the other speaks there on the other; which two dispute
 contrariwise, according to that which is made evident above. Wherefore
 it is no wonder if here the one Spirit says Yes, and there the other
 Spirit says No. Then in the stanza where it says, "A sweet voice of
 tenderness," a thought is meant which was born of my deep
 contemplation; wherefore it is to be known that by Love, in this
 Allegory, is always meant that deep contemplation which is the earnest
 application of the enamoured mind to that object wherewith it is
 enamoured. Then when it says, "There shall shine High miracles before
 thee," it announces that through her the adornments of the miracles
 will be seen; and it speaks truly, that the adornment of the miracles
 is to see the cause of the same, which she demonstrates; as in the
 beginning of the book on Metaphysics the Philosopher seems to feel,
 saying that, through the contemplation of these adornments, men began
 to be enamoured with this Lady. And concerning this word, i.e.,
 miracle, in the following treatise I shall speak more fully. What then
 follows of this Song is sufficiently explained by the other
 exposition.
 
 And thus at the end of this Second Treatise, I say and affirm that the
 Lady with whom I became enamoured after the first Love was the most
 beautiful and most excellent daughter of the Ruler of the Universe, to
 which daughter Pythagoras gave the name of Philosophy. And here ends
 the Second Treatise, which is brought in for the first dish at my
 Banquet.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 The Third Treatise.
 
 
     Love, reasoning of my Lady in my mind
       With constant pleasure, oft of her will say
       Things over which the intellect may stray;
     His words make music of so sweet a kind
       That the Soul hears and feels, and cries, Ah, me,
       That I want power to tell what thus I see!
 
     If I would tell of her what thus I hear,
       First, all that Reason cannot make its own
       I needs must leave; and of what may be known
     Leave part, for want of words to make it clear.
       If my Song fail, blame wit and words, whose force
       Fails to tell all I hear in Love's discourse.
 
     The Sun sees not in travel round the earth,
       Till it reach her abode, so fair a thing
       As she of whom Love causes me to sing.
     All minds of Heaven wonder at her worth;
       Mortals, enamoured, find her in their thought
       When Love his peace into their minds has brought.
 
     Her Maker saw that she was good, and poured,
       Beyond our Nature, fulness of His Power
       On her pure soul, whence shone this holy dower
     Through all her frame, with beauty so adored
       That from the eyes she touches heralds fly
       Heartward with longings, heavenward with a sigh.
 
     On her fair frame Virtue Divine descends
       As on the angel that beholds His face.
       Fair one who doubt, go with her, mark the grace
     In all her acts. Downward from Heaven bends
       An angel when the speaks, who can attest
       A power in her by none of us possessed.
 
     The graceful acts that she shows forth to all
       Rival in calls to love that love must hear;
       Fair in all like her, fairest she'll appear
     Who is most like her. We, content to call
       Her face a Miracle, have Faith made sure:
       For that, He made her ever to endure.
 
     Her aspect shows delights of Paradise,
       Seen in her eyes and in her smiling face;
       Love brought them there as to his dwelling-place.
     They dazzle reason, as the Sun the eyes;
       And since I cannot fix on them my gaze
       Words must suffice that little speak their praise.
 
     Rain from her beauty little flames of fire,
       Made living with a spirit to create
       Good thoughts, and crush the vices that innate
     Make others vile. Fair one, who may desire
       Escape from blame as one not calm or meek,
       From her, who is God's thought, thy teaching seek.
 
     My Song, it seems you speak this to oppose
       The saying of a sister Song of mine:
       This lowly Lady whom you call divine,
     Your sister called disdainful and morose.
       Though Heaven, you know, is ever bright and pure,
       Eyes may have cause to find a star obscure.
 
     So when your sister called this Lady proud
       She judged not truly, by what seemed; but fear
       Possessed her soul; and still, when I come near
     Her glance, there's dread. Be such excuse allowed,
       My Song, and when thou canst, approach her, say;
       My Lady, take all homage I can pay.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 In the preceding treatise is described how my second Love took its
 rise from the compassionate countenance of a Lady; which Love, finding
 my Soul inclined to its ardour, after the manner of fire, was kindled
 from a slight spark into a great flame; so that not only during my
 waking hours, but during sleep, its light threw many a vision into my
 mind. And how great the desire which Love excited to behold this Lady,
 it would be impossible either to tell or to make understood. And not
 only of her was I thus desirous, but of all those persons who had any
 nearness to her, either as acquaintances or as relations. Oh! how many
 were the nights, when the eyes of other persons were closed in sleep,
 that mine, wide open, gazed fixedly upon the tabernacle of my Love.
 
 And as the rapidly increasing fire must of necessity be seen, it being
 impossible for fire to remain hidden, the desire seized me to speak of
 the Love that I could no longer restrain within me. And although I
 could receive but little help from my own counsel, yet, inasmuch as,
 either from the will of Love or from my own promptness, I drew nigh to
 it many times, I deliberated, and I saw that, in speaking of Love,
 there could be no more beautiful nor more profitable speech than that
 which commends the beloved person. And in this deliberation three
 reasons assisted me. One of them was self-love, which is the source of
 all the rest, as every one sees. For there is no more lawful nor more
 courteous way of doing honour to one's self than by doing honour to
 one's friend; and, since friendship cannot exist between the unlike,
 wherever one sees friendship, likeness is understood; and wherever
 likeness is understood, thither runs public praise or blame. And from
 this reason two great lessons may be learnt: the one is, never to wish
 that any vicious man should seem your friend, for in that case a bad
 opinion is formed of him who has made the evil man his friend; the
 other is, that no one ought to blame his friend publicly, because, if
 you consider well the aforesaid reason, he but points to himself with
 his finger in his eye.
 
 The second reason was the desire for the duration of this friendship;
 wherefore it is to be known, as the Philosopher says in the ninth book
 of the Ethics, in the friendship of persons of unequal position it is
 requisite, for the preservation of that friendship, for a certain
 proportion to exist between them, which may reduce the dissimilarity
 to a similarity, as between the master and the servant. For, although
 the servant cannot render the same benefit to the master that is
 conferred on him, yet he ought to render the best that he can, with so
 much solicitude and freewill that that which is dissimilar in itself
 may become similar through the evidence of good-will, which proves the
 friendship, confirms and preserves it. Wherefore I, considering myself
 lower than that Lady, and perceiving myself benefited by her,
 endeavoured to praise her according to my ability. And, if it be not
 similar of itself, my prompt freewill proves at least that if I could
 I would do more, and thus it makes its friendship similar to that of
 this gentle Lady.
 
 The third reason was an argument of prudence; for, as Boethius says,
 "It is not sufficient to look only at that which is before the eyes,
 that is, at the Present; and, therefore, Prudence, Foresight, is given
 to us, which looks beyond to that which may happen." I say that I
 thought that for a long time I might be reproached by many with levity
 of mind, on hearing that I had turned from my first Love. Wherefore,
 to remove this reproach, there was no better argument than to state
 who the Lady was who had thus changed me; that, by her manifest
 excellence, they might gain some perception of her virtue; and that,
 by the comprehension of her most exalted virtue, they might be able to
 see that all stability of mind could be in that mutability: and,
 therefore, they should not judge me light and unstable. I then began
 to praise this Lady, and if not in the most suitable manner, at least
 as well as I could at first; and I began to say: "Love, reasoning of
 my Lady in my mind." This Song chiefly has three parts. The first is
 the whole of the first two stanzas, in which I speak in a preliminary
 manner. The second is the whole of the six following stanzas, in which
 is described that which is intended, i.e., the praise of that gentle
 Lady; the first of which begins: "The Sun sees not in travel round the
 earth." The third part is in the last two stanzas, in which,
 addressing myself to the Song, I purify it from all doubtful
 interpretation. And these three parts remain to be discussed now in
 due order.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 Turning, then, to the First Part, which was composed as a Proem or
 Preface to the Song or Poem, I say that it is fitly divided into three
 parts. In the first place, it alludes to the ineffable condition of
 this theme; secondly, it describes my insufficiency to speak of it in
 a perfect manner; and this second part begins: "If I would tell of her
 what thus I hear." Finally, I excuse myself for my insufficiency, for
 which they ought not to lay blame to my charge; and I commence this
 part when I say: "If my Song fail."
 
 I begin, then: "Love, reasoning of my Lady in my mind," where in the
 first place it is to be seen who this speaker is, and what this place
 is in which I say that he is speaking. Love, taking him in his true
 sense, and considering him subtly, is no other than the spiritual
 union of the Soul with the beloved object; into which union, of its
 own nature, the Soul hastens sooner or later, according as it is free
 or impeded. And the reason for that natural disposition may be this:
 each substantial form proceeds from its First Cause, which is God, as
 is written in the book of Causes; and they receive not diversity from
 that First Cause, which is the most simple, but from the secondary
 causes, and from the material into which it descends. Wherefore, in
 the same book it is written, when treating of the infusion of the
 Divine Goodness: "The bounties and good gifts make diverse things,
 through the concurrence of that which receives them." Wherefore, since
 each effect retains somewhat of the nature of its cause, as Alfarabio
 says when he affirms that that which has been the first cause of a
 round body has in some way an essentially round form, so each form in
 some way has the essence of the Divine Nature in itself; not that the
 Divine Nature can be divided and communicated to these, but
 participated in by these, almost in the same way that the other stars
 participate in the nature of the Sun. And the nobler the form, the
 more does it retain of that Divine Nature.
 
 Wherefore the human Soul, which is the noblest form of all those which
 are generated under Heaven, receives more from the Divine Nature than
 any other. And since it is most natural to wish to be in God, for as
 in the book quoted above one reads, the first thing is to exist, and
 before that there is nothing, the human Soul desires to exist
 naturally with all possible desire. And since its existence depends
 upon God, and is preserved by Him, it naturally desires and longs to
 be united to God, and so add strength to its own being. And since, in
 the goodness of Human Nature, Reason gives us proof of the Divine, it
 follows that, naturally, the Human Soul is united therewith by the
 path of the spirit so much the sooner, and so much the more firmly, in
 proportion as those good qualities appear more perfect; which
 appearance of perfection is achieved according as the power of the
 Soul to produce a good impression is strong and clear, or is
 trammelled and obscure. And this union is that which we call Love,
 whereby it is possible to know that which is within the Soul, by
 looking at those whom it loves in the world without. This Love, which
 is the union of my Soul with that gentle Lady in whom so much of the
 Divine Light was revealed to me, is that speaker of whom I speak;
 since from him continuous thoughts were born, whilst gazing at and
 considering the wondrous power of this Lady who was spiritually made
 one with my Soul.
 
 The place in which I say that he thus speaks is the Mind. But in
 saying that it is the Mind, one does not attach more meaning to this
 than before; and therefore it is to be seen what this Mind properly
 signifies. I say, then, that the Philosopher, in the second book on
 the Soul, when speaking of its powers, says that the Soul principally
 has three powers, which are, to Live, to Feel, and to Reason: and he
 says also to Move, but it is possible to make this one with feeling,
 since every Soul moves that feels, either with all the senses or with
 one alone; for the power to move is conjoined with feeling. And
 according to that which he says, it is most evident that these powers
 are so entwined that the one is a foundation of the other; and that
 which is the foundation can of itself be divided; but the other, which
 is built upon it, cannot be apart from its foundation. Therefore, the
 Vegetative power, whereby one lives, is the foundation upon which one
 feels, that is, sees, hears, tastes, smells, and touches; and this
 vegetative power of itself can be the Soul, vegetative, as we see in
 all the plants. The Sensitive cannot exist without that. We find
 nothing that feels, and does not live. And this Sensitive power is the
 foundation of the Intellectual, that is, of the Reason; so that, in
 animate mortals, the Reasoning power is not found without the
 Sensitive. But the Sensitive is found without Reason, as in the
 beasts, and in the birds, and in the fishes, and in any brute animal,
 as we see. And that Soul which contains all these powers is the most
 perfect of all. And the Human Soul possessing the nobility of the
 highest power, which is Reason, participates in the Divine Nature,
 after the manner of an eternal Intelligence: for the Soul is ennobled
 and denuded of matter by that Sovereign Power in proportion as the
 Divine Light of Truth shines into it, as into an Angel; and Man is
 therefore called by the Philosophers the Divine Animal.
 
 In this most noble part of the Soul are many virtues, as the
 Philosopher says, especially in the third chapter of the Soul, where
 he says that there is in it a virtue which is called Scientific, and
 one which is called Ratiocinative, or rather deliberative; and with
 this there are certain virtues, as Aristotle says in that same place,
 such as the Inventive and the Judging. And all these most noble
 virtues, and the others which are in that excellent power, are
 designated by that one word, which we sought to understand, that is,
 Mind. Wherefore it is evident that by Mind is meant the highest,
 noblest part of a man's Soul.
 
 And it is seen to be so, for only of man and of the Divine substances
 is this Mind predicated, as can plainly be seen in Boethius, who first
 predicates it of men, where he says to Philosophy: "Thou, and God who
 placed thee in the mind of men;" then he predicates it of God, when he
 says: "Thou dost produce everything from the Divine Model, Thou most
 beautiful One, bearing the beautiful World in Thy mind." Neither was
 it ever predicated of brute animals; nay, of many men who appear
 defective in the most perfect part, it does not seem that it ought to
 be, or that it could be, predicated; and therefore such as these are
 termed in the Latin Tongue _amenti_ and _dementi_, that is,
 without mind. Hence one can now perceive that it is Mind which is the
 perfect and most precious part of the Soul in which is God.
 
 And that is the place where I say that Love discourses to me of my
 Lady.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 Not without cause do I say that this Love was at work in my mind; but
 it is said reasonably, in order to explain what this Love is, by the
 place in which it works. Wherefore, it is to be known that each thing,
 as is said above, for the reason shown above, has its especial Love,
 as the simple bodies have Love, innate, each in its proper place.
 Therefore the Earth always descends to the centre, the fire to the
 circumference above near the Heaven of the Moon, and always ascends
 towards that. The bodies first composed, such as are the minerals,
 have love for the place where their generation is ordained, and in
 which they increase, and from which they have vigour and power.
 Wherefore, we see the loadstone always receive power from the place of
 its generation. Each of the plants which are first animated, that is,
 first animated with a vegetative soul has most evident love for a
 particular place, according as its nature may require; and therefore
 we see certain plants almost always grow by the side of the streams,
 and certain others upon the mountain tops, and certain others grow by
 the sea-shore, or at the foot of hills, which, if they are
 transplanted, either die entirely or live a sad life, as it were, like
 a being separated from his friend. The brute beasts have a most
 evident love, not only for places, but we see also their love towards
 each other. Men have their own love for things perfect and excellent;
 and since Man, although his Soul is one substance alone, because of
 his nobility, partakes of the nature of each of these things, he can
 possess all these affections, and he does possess them all. By his
 part in the nature of the simple body, as earth, naturally it tends
 downwards; therefore, when he moves his body upwards, he becomes more
 weary.
 
 Because of the second nature, of the mixed body, it loves the place of
 its generation, and even the time; and therefore each one naturally is
 of more power in his own place and in his own time than in any other.
 Wherefore, one reads in the History of Hercules, and in the greater
 Ovid, and in Lucan, and in other Poets, that when fighting with the
 Giant who was named Antaeus, every time that the Giant was weary, and
 laid his body down on the earth at full length, either by the will or
 strength of Hercules, new strength and vigour then surged up in him,
 drawn wholly from the Earth, in which and from which he was produced;
 Hercules, perceiving this, at last seized him, and having compressed
 and raised him above the Earth, he held him so tightly, without
 allowing him to touch the Earth again, that he conquered Antaeus by
 excess of strength, and killed him. According to the testimony of the
 books, this battle took place in Africa.
 
 And because of the third nature, that is, of the plants, Man has a
 love for a certain food, not inasmuch as it affects the senses, but in
 so much as it is nutritious; and that particular food does the work of
 that most perfect Nature, while certain other food, dissimilar, acts
 but imperfectly. And therefore we see that certain food will make men
 handsome, and strong-limbed, and very brightly coloured, and certain
 other food will do the opposite of this.
 
 And by the fourth nature, of the animals, that is, the sensitive, Man
 has the other love, by which he loves according to the sensible
 appearance, like the beasts; and this love in Man especially has need
 of control, because of its excessive operation in the delights given,
 especially through sight and touch.
 
 And because of the fifth and last nature, which is the true Human
 Nature, and, to use a better phrase, the Angelic, namely, the
 Rational, Man has by it the Love of Truth and Virtue; and from this
 Love is born true and perfect friendship from the honest intercourse
 of which the Philosopher speaks in the eighth book of the Ethics, when
 he treats of Friendship.
 
 Wherefore, since this nature is termed Mind, as is proved above, I
 spoke of Love as discoursing in my Mind in order to explain that this
 Love was the Friendship which is born of that most noble nature, that
 is, of Truth and Virtue, and to exclude each false opinion, by which
 my Love might be suspected to spring from pleasure of the Senses.
 
 I then say, "With constant pleasure," to make people understand its
 continuance and its fervour. And I say that it often whispers "Things
 over which the intellect may stray." And I speak truth, because my
 thoughts, when reasoning of her, often sought to draw conclusions of
 her, which I could not comprehend, and I was alarmed, so that I seemed
 almost like one dazed, even as he who, looking with the eye along a
 direct line, sees first the nearest things clearly; then, proceeding,
 it sees them less clearly; then, further on, doubtfully; then,
 proceeding an immense way, the sight is divided from the object, and
 sees nothing. And this is one unspeakable thing of that which I have
 taken for a theme; and consequently I relate the other when I say:
 
     His words make music of so sweet a kind
       That the Soul hears and feels, and cries, Ah, me,
       That I want power to tell what thus I see!
 
 And because I know not how to tell it, I say that my soul laments,
 saying, "Ah, me, that I want power." And this is the other unspeakable
 thing, that the tongue is not a complete and perfect follower of all
 that the intellect sees. And I say, "That the Soul hears and feels;"
 hearing, as to the words, and feeling, as to the sweetness of the
 sound.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 Now that the two ineffable parts of this matter have been discussed,
 we must proceed to discuss words that describe my insufficiency.
 
 I say, then, that my insufficiency arises from a double cause, even as
 in a twofold manner the exalted nature of my Lady surpasses all, in
 the way which has been told. For I am compelled, by the poverty of my
 intellect, to omit much of the truth concerning her which shone into
 my mind like rays of light, but which my mind receives like a
 transparent body, unable to gather up the ends thereof and reflect
 them back. And this I express in that following part: "First, all that
 Reason cannot make its own I needs must leave." Then, when I say, "And
 of what can be known," I say that not even to that which I do
 understand am I sufficient, because my tongue is not so eloquent that
 it could tell that which is discoursed in my thoughts concerning her.
 It may be seen, therefore, that, with respect to the Truth, it is very
 little that I shall say; and this redounds to her great praise, if
 well considered, in that which was the main intention. And it is
 possible to say that this form of speech came indeed from the workshop
 of Rhetoric, which on every side lays its hand upon the main
 intention. Then, when it says, "If my Song fail," I excuse myself for
 my fault, which ought not, then, to be blamed when others see that my
 words are far below the dignity of this Lady. And I say that, if the
 defect is in my rhymes, that is, in my words, which are appointed to
 discourse of her, for this are to be blamed the weakness of the
 intellect and the abruptness of our speech: "blame wit and words,"
 which are overpowered by the thought, so that they cannot follow it
 entirely, especially there where the thought is born of love, because
 there the Soul searches more deeply than elsewhere. It would be quite
 possible for any one to say: Thou dost excuse and accuse thyself all
 in one breath, which is a reason for blame, not for escape from blame,
 inasmuch as the blame, which is mine, is cast on the intellect and on
 the speech; for, if it be good, I ought to be praised for it in so
 much as it is so; and if it be defective, I ought to be blamed. To
 this it is possible to reply, briefly, that I do not accuse myself,
 but that I excuse myself in truth. And therefore it is to be known,
 according to the opinion of the Philosopher in the third book of the
 Ethics, that man is worthy of praise or of blame only in those things
 which it is in his power to do or not to do; but in those things over
 which he has no power he deserves neither blame nor praise, since
 either the praise or blame is to be attributed to some other, although
 the things may be parts of the man himself. Therefore, we ought not to
 blame the man because his body, from his birth, may be ugly, since it
 was not in his power to make it beautiful; but our blame should fall
 on the evil disposition of the matter whereof he is made, whose source
 was a defect of Nature. And even so we ought not to praise the man for
 the beauty of form which he may have from his birth, for he was not
 the maker of it; but we ought to praise the artificer, that is, Human
 Nature, who shapes her material into so much beauty when she is not
 impeded. And therefore the priest said well to the Emperor who laughed
 and scoffed at the ugliness of his body: "The Lord, He is God: It is
 He that hath made us, and not we ourselves;" and these are the words
 of the Prophet in a verse of the Psalms, written neither more nor less
 than according to the reply of the Priest.
 
 And therefore let the wicked evil-born ones perceive that, if they put
 their chief care in the adornment of their persons, it must be with
 all modesty; for to do that is no other than to adorn the work of
 another, that is, Nature, and to abandon their own proper work.
 
 Returning, then, to the proposition, I say that our intellect, through
 defect of the power through which it sees organic power, that is, the
 imagination, is not able to ascend to certain things, because the
 imagination cannot help it and has not the wherewithal, such as are
 the substances apart from matter, which (if we can have any knowledge
 of them) we cannot fully comprehend.
 
 And the man is not to blame for this, because he was not the maker of
 this defect; nay, Universal Nature did this, which is God, who wills
 that in this life we be without this light. And because He was the
 cause, it would be presumptuous to argue concerning it. So that if my
 earnest thought transported me into a place where my imagination
 failed my intellect, I was not to blame if I could not possibly
 understand.
 
 Again, a bound is set to our understanding in each operation thereof;
 but not by us, but by Universal Nature; and therefore it is to be
 known that the bounds of the understanding are wider in thought than
 in speech, and wider in speech than in signs. Hence, if our thought,
 not only that which fails in a perfect intellect, but also that which
 in a perfect intellect attains its end, is the conqueror of speech, we
 are not to blame, because we are not the makers of it. And therefore I
 prove that I do truthfully excuse myself when I say: "Blame wit and
 words, whose force Fails to tell all that I hear Love discourse;" for,
 sufficiently clear ought to appear the good-will, which alone we
 should regard in respect to merits that are human.
 
 And thus is now explained the first principal part of this Song which
 flows from my hand.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 Discourse on the first part of the Song has now made its meaning open
 and clear, and it is needful to proceed to the second; for the clearer
 perception of which, three divisions are desirable, according as it is
 contained in three sections. For in the first part I praise that Lady
 entirely and generally, as in the Soul so in the body; in the second
 part I descend to especial commendation of the Soul; and in the third,
 to especial praise of the body. The first part begins: "The Sun sees
 not in travel round the earth;" the second begins: "Her Maker saw that
 she was good;" the third begins: "Rain from her beauty little flames
 of fire," and these parts or divisions in due order are to be
 discussed.
 
 I say then: "The Sun sees not in travel round the earth;" where it is
 to be known, in order to have perfect understanding thereof, how the
 Earth is circled round by the Sun. In the first place, I say that by
 the Earth I do not here mean the whole body of the Universe, but only
 that part of the sea and land, following the common speech, which is
 thus wont to designate it, whereupon some one exclaims, "This man has
 seen all the World," meaning "this part of the sea and land." This
 World Pythagoras and his followers asserted to be one of the stars,
 and they also said that there was another opposite to it, similar to
 it: and they called that one Antictona; and he said that both were in
 one sphere which revolved from East to West, and by this revolution
 the Sun was circled round us, and now he was seen, and now he was not
 seen. And he said that the fire was in the centre of these,
 considering the fire to be a more noble body than the water and than
 the Earth, and giving the noblest centre to the four simple bodies; he
 said that the fire, when it appeared to ascend, according to strict
 truth descended to the centre. Then Plato was of another opinion, and
 he wrote in a book of his, which he called Timaeus, that the Earth with
 the sea was indeed the centre of all, but that its whole sphere
 revolved round its centre, following the first movement of the
 Heavens, but much slower on account of its gross material, and because
 of the immense distance from that first moved. These opinions are
 confuted in the second chapter, Of Heaven and the World, by that
 glorious Philosopher, to whom Nature opened her secrets most freely;
 and by him it is therein proved that this World, the Earth, is of
 itself stable and fixed to all eternity. And his reasons, which
 Aristotle states in order to break those other opinions and to affirm
 the truth, it is not my intention here to narrate; therefore, let it
 be enough for those to whom I speak, to know, upon his great
 authority, that this Earth is fixed, and does not revolve, and that
 it, with the sea, is the centre of the Heavens. These Heavens revolve
 round this centre continuously, even as we see; in which revolution
 there must of necessity be two fixed Poles, and a circle equally
 distant from these round which all especially revolves. Of these two
 Poles, the one is visible to almost all the discovered Earth, that is,
 the Northern Pole; the other is hidden from almost all the discovered
 Earth, that is, the Southern Pole. The circle spread from them is that
 part of Heaven under which the Sun revolves when it is in Aries and
 Libra. Wherefore, it is to be known that if a stone could fall from
 this Pole of ours, it would fall there beyond into the sea precisely
 upon that surface of the sea, where, if a man could be, he would
 always have the Sun above the middle of his head; and I believe that
 from Rome to that place, going in a straight line to the North, the
 distance may be almost two thousand seven hundred miles, or a little
 more or less. Imagining, then, in order to understand better what I
 say, that there is in that place a city, and that its name may be
 Maria, I say again that if from the other Pole, that is, the Southern,
 a stone could fall, that it would fall upon that part of the ocean
 which is precisely on this ball opposite to Maria; and I believe that
 from Rome to where this second stone would fall, going in a direct
 line to the South, the distance may be seven thousand five hundred
 miles, a little more or less. And here let us imagine another city,
 which may have the name of Lucia; and the distance, from whatever part
 one draws the line, is ten thousand two hundred miles between the one
 and the other, that is, half the circumference of this ball, so that
 the citizens of Maria hold the soles of the feet opposite the soles of
 the feet of the citizens of Lucia. Let us imagine also a circle upon
 this ball which is in every part equi-distant from Maria as from
 Lucia. I believe that this circle, according to what I understand by
 the assertions of the Astrologers, and by that of Albertus Magnus in
 his book On the Nature of Places and on the Properties of the
 Elements, and also by the testimony of Lucan in his ninth book, would
 divide this Earth uncovered by the sea in the Meridian, almost through
 all the extreme end of the first climate, where there are amongst the
 other people the Garamanti, who are almost always naked; to whom came
 Cato with the people of Rome when flying from the dominion of Caesar.
 Having marked out these three places upon this ball, one can easily
 see how the Sun circles round it.
 
 I say, then, that the Heaven of the Sun revolves from West to East,
 not directly against the diurnal movement, that is, of the day and
 night, but obliquely against that, so that its mid-circle, which is
 equally between its Poles, in which is the body of the Sun, cuts into
 two opposite parts the circle of the two first Poles, in the beginning
 of Aries and in the beginning of Libra; and it is divided by two arcs
 from it, one towards the North and one towards the South; the points
 of these two said arcs are equi-distant from the first circle in every
 part by twenty-three degrees and one point more, and the one point is
 the tropic of Cancer, and the other is the tropic of Capricorn;
 therefore it must be that Maria in the sign of Aries can see, when the
 Sun sinks below the mid-circle of the first Poles, this Sun to revolve
 round the Earth below, or rather the sea, like a millstone, of which
 only one half of its body appears, and can see this come rising up
 after the manner of the screw of a vine-press, so much so that it
 completes ninety-one rotations, or a little more. When these rotations
 are completed, its ascension is to Maria almost as much in proportion
 as it ascends to us in the half-third, that is, of the equal day and
 night; and if a man could stand in Maria, with his face always turned
 to the Sun, he would see that Sun pass by on the right. Then by the
 same way it seems to descend another ninety-one rotations, or a little
 more, so much so that it circles round below the Earth, or rather sea,
 not showing the whole of itself; and then it is hidden, and Lucia
 begins to see it, which, the same as Maria, then sees it to ascend and
 to descend around itself with the same number of rotations. And if a
 man could stand in Lucia, with his face always turned towards the Sun,
 he would see it pass to the left. Therefore, it is possible to see
 that these places have in the year one day of six months' duration,
 and one night of the same length of time; and when one has the day the
 other has the night.
 
 It must be also that the circle where the Garamanti are, as has been
 said above, upon this ball, can see the Sun revolve precisely above
 them, not after the fashion of a mill-stone, but of a wheel, which
 cannot in any part be seen except the centre, when it goes under
 Aries. And then it is seen to depart from its place immediately above
 and go towards Maria ninety-one days, or a little more, and by so many
 to return to its position; and then, when it has turned back, it goes
 before Libra, and even so departs and goes towards Lucia ninety-one
 days, or a little more, and in so many returns to its position. And
 this place always has the day equal with the night, either on this
 side or on that, as the Sun goes, and twice a year it has the summer
 of intense heat, and two little winters. It must also be that the two
 distances, which are midway from the two imaginary Cities and the
 mid-circle, see the Sun variously, according as they are remote from,
 and near to, these places.
 
 Now, by what has been said, this can be seen by him who has good
 understanding, to which it is well to give a little fatigue. He can
 now perceive that, by the Divine Providence, the World is so ordained
 that the sphere of the Sun, being revolved and turned round to one
 point, this ball whereon we are in every part receives an equal share
 of light and darkness. Oh, ineffable Wisdom, Thou which didst thus
 ordain! Oh, how poor and feeble is our mind when seeking to comprehend
 Thee! And you, O men, for whose benefit and pleasure I write, in what
 fearful blindness do you live if you never raise your eyes upwards to
 these things, but keep them fixed in the mud of your foolishness.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 In the preceding chapter is shown after what manner the Sun travels
 round the Earth; so that now one can proceed to demonstrate the
 meaning of the part to which this thought belongs. I say, then, that
 in that first part I begin to praise that Lady by comparison with
 other things. And I say that the Sun, circling round the Earth, sees
 nothing so gentle as that Lady; wherefore it follows that she is,
 according to the letter, the most gentle of all things that the sun
 shines upon. And it says: "Till the hour;" wherefore it is to be known
 that "hour" is understood in two ways by the Astrologers. The one is,
 that of the day and of the night they make twenty-four hours--twelve
 of the day, twelve of the night, however long or short the day may be.
 And these hours are short and long in the day and night according as
 the day and night increase and diminish. And these hours the Church
 uses when it says, Prima, Tertia, Sexta, and Nona--first, third,
 sixth, and ninth; and these are termed hours temporal. The other mode
 is, that, making of the day and of the night twenty-four hours, the
 day sometimes has fifteen hours and the night nine; and sometimes the
 night has sixteen and the day eight, according as the day and night
 increase and diminish; and they term these hours equal at the
 Equinox, and those that are termed temporal are always the same,
 because, the day being equal to the night, it must happen thus.
 
 Then when I say, "All Minds of Heaven wonder at her worth," I praise
 her, not having respect to any other thing. And I say that the
 Intelligences of Heaven behold her, and that the people here below
 think of that gentle Lady when they have more of that peace which
 delights them. And here it is to be known that each Mind or Intellect
 in Heaven above, according to that which is written in the book Of
 Causes, knows that which is above itself and that which is below
 itself; therefore it knows God as its Cause; therefore it knows that
 which is below itself as its effect.
 
 And since God is the most universal cause of everything, to know Him
 is to know all, according to the degree of the Intelligence; wherefore
 all the Intelligences know the human form in as far as it is by
 intention fixed or determined in the Divine Mind. The moving
 Intelligences especially know it; since they are the most especial
 causes of it, and of every kind of form; and they know the most
 perfect, as far as they can know it, as their rule and pattern.
 
 And if this human form, copied and individualized, is not perfect, it
 is not the fault of the said copy or image, but of the matter from
 which the individual is formed. Therefore when I say, "All Minds in
 Heaven wonder at her worth," I wish to express no other than that she
 is thus made, even as the express image of the human form in the
 Divine Mind. And each Mind there above beholds her by virtue of that
 quality which exists especially in those angelic Minds which build up
 and shape, with Heaven, things that exist below. And to confirm this,
 I subjoin when I say, "Mortals, enamoured, find her in their thought
 When Love his peace into their minds has brought," where it is to be
 known that each thing especially desires its perfection, and in that
 its every desire finds peace and calm, and for that peace each thing
 is desired.
 
 And this is that desire which always makes every pleasure appear
 incomplete, for there is no joy or pleasure so great in this life that
 it can quench the thirst in our Soul, for always the desire for that
 perfection remains in the Mind. And since this Lady is truly that
 perfection, I say that people here below receive great delight when
 they have most peace; for she abides then in their thoughts. For this
 Lady, I say, is perfect in as high a degree as it is possible for
 Human Nature to be.
 
 Then when I say, "Her Maker saw that she was good," I prove that not
 only this Lady is the most perfect in the human race, but more than
 the most perfect, inasmuch as she receives from the Divine Goodness
 more than human dues. Wherefore one can reasonably believe that as
 each Master loves most his best work far more than the other work, so
 God loves the good human being far above the rest. And forasmuch as
 His Bounty is of necessity not restricted by any limit, His love has
 no regard to the amount due to him who receives, but it overflows in
 gifts, and in the blessings of power and grace. Wherefore I say here,
 that this God, who gave life or being to this Lady, through love or
 charity for her perfection pours into her of His Bounty beyond the
 limits of the amount due to our nature.
 
 Then when I say, "On her pure soul," I prove this that has been said
 with reasonable testimony, which gives us to know that, as the
 Philosopher says in the second chapter, On the Soul, the Soul is the
 act of the Body; and if it be its act, it is its Cause; and as it is
 written in the book before, quoted, On Causes, each Cause infuses into
 its effect some of the goodness which it receives from its own Cause,
 which is "God." Wherefore, since in her are seen wonderful things, so
 much so on the part of the body that they make each beholder desirous
 to see those things, it is evident that her form, which is her Soul,
 guides it as its proper Cause and receives miraculously the gracious
 goodness of God.
 
 And thus is proved, by that appearance, which exceeds the due
 appointment of our nature, which in her is most perfect, as has been
 said above, that this Lady is by God endowed with good gifts and made
 a noble thing. And this is the whole Literal meaning of the first
 section of the second principal part.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 Having commended this Lady generally, both according to the Soul and
 according to the Body, I proceed to praise her specially according to
 the Soul.
 
 And first I praise her Soul for its goodness, that is great in itself;
 then I commend it for a goodness that is great in others, and useful
 to the World. And that second part begins when I say, firstly, "On her
 fair frame Virtue Divine descends;" where it is to be known that the
 Divine Goodness descends into all things, and otherwise they could not
 exist; but, although this goodness springs from the First Cause, it is
 received diversely, according to the more or less of virtue in the
 recipients. Wherefore it is written in the book Of Causes: "The First
 Goodness sends His good gifts forth upon things in one stream. Verily
 each thing receives from this stream according to the manner of its
 virtue and its being." And we can have a sensible, living example of
 this in the Sun. We see the light of the Sun, which is one thing,
 derived from one fountain, to be variously received by material
 substances; as Albertus Magnus says in his book On the Intellect, that
 certain bodies, through having mixed in themselves an excess of
 transparent brightness, so soon as the Sun sees them they become so
 bright that, by the multiplication of light within them, their aspect
 is hardly discernible, and from themselves they render back to others
 great splendour or brilliancy, such as is gold and any gem. Sure I am
 that by being entirely transparent, not only do they receive the
 light, but that they do not intercept it; nay, they pass it on, like
 stained glass, coloured with their own colour, to other things. And
 there are certain other bodies so overpowering in the purity of the
 transparency that they become so radiant as to overpower the
 adjustments of the eye, and you cannot look at them without fatigue of
 sight; such as are the mirrors. Certain others are so free from
 transparency, that but little light can they receive; as is the Earth.
 Thus the Goodness of God is received in sundrywise by the sundry
 substances, that is, in one way by the Angels, who are without
 grossness of matter, as if transparent through their purity of form;
 and otherwise by the human Soul, which although on one side it may be
 free from matter, on another side it is impeded: even as the man who
 is all in the water but his head, of whom one cannot say that he is
 entirely in the water, or entirely out of it. Again otherwise it is
 received by the animals, whose soul is wholly comprised in matter; but
 I say that the soul of animals receives of the Goodness of God in
 proportion as it is ennobled. Again otherwise is it received by the
 minerals; and otherwise by the Earth, than by the others, because the
 Earth is most material, and therefore most remote, and most out of all
 proportion to the First most simple and most high Cause, which is
 alone Intellectual, that is to say, God.
 
 And although here below there may be placed general degrees of
 excellence, nevertheless, singular degrees of excellence may also be
 placed; that is to say, that amongst human Souls one Soul may receive
 more bountifully than another. And since in the intellectual order of
 the Universe one ascends and descends by degrees almost continuous
 from the lowest form to the highest, and from the highest to the
 lowest, as we see in the visible order of things; and between the
 Angelic Nature, which is intellectual, and the Human Soul there may be
 no step, but the one rise to the other as it were continuously through
 the height of the degrees; and from the Human Soul and the most
 perfect soul of the brute animals, again, there may not be any break
 in the descent. For as we see many men so vile and of such low
 condition that it seems almost that it can be no other than bestial,
 so it is to be asserted and firmly believed that there may be some men
 so noble and of a condition so exalted that it can be no other than
 that of the Angel. Otherwise the human species could not be continued
 on every side, which cannot be. Such as these Aristotle calls, in the
 seventh book of the Ethics, Divine; and such a one I say that this
 Lady is, so that the Divine Virtue, after the manner that it descends
 into the Angel, descends into her.
 
 Then when I say, "Fair one who doubt," I prove this by the experience
 that it is possible to have of it in those operations which are proper
 to the rational Soul, wherein the Divine Light shines forth more
 quickly, that is, in the speech and in the actions, which are wont to
 be termed conduct and deportment. Wherefore it is to be known that
 only man amongst the animals speaks, and has conduct and acts which
 are called rational, because he alone has Reason in himself. And if
 any one might wish to say, in contradiction, that a certain bird can
 speak, as appears true, especially of the magpie and of the parrot;
 and that some beast performs acts, or rather things, by rule, as
 appears in the ape and in some other; I reply that it is not true that
 they speak, nor that they have rules, because they have not Reason,
 from which these things must proceed; neither is there in them the
 principle of these operations; neither do they know what that is;
 neither do they understand that by those acts something is intended;
 but that only which they see and hear they represent, even as the
 image of somebody may be reflected in a glass. Wherefore, as in the
 mirror the corporal image which the mirror shows is not true, so the
 image of Reason, in the acts and the speech which the brute soul
 represents, or rather shows, is not true. I say that what gentle Lady
 soever doubts should "go with her, mark the grace In all her acts." I
 do not say man, because one can derive experience more modestly from
 the woman than from the man; and I say she will find that "Downward
 from Heaven bends An angel when she speaks." For her speech, because
 of its exalted character and because of its sweetness, kindles in the
 mind of him who hears it a thought of Love, which I call a celestial
 Spirit; since from Heaven is the source and from Heaven the intention
 thereof, as has been already narrated. From which thought I pass to a
 firm opinion that this Lady is of miraculous power, that there is "A
 power in her by none of us possessed." Her actions, by their suavity
 and by their moderation, "Rival in calls to Love that Love must hear."
 They cause Love to awaken and again to hear whenever he is sown by the
 power of bountiful Nature. Which natural seed acts as in the next
 treatise is shown.
 
 Then when I say, "Fair in all like her, fairest she'll appear Who is
 most like her," I intend to narrate how the goodness and the power of
 her soul are good and useful to others; and, firstly, how useful it is
 to other women, saying that she is "Fair in all like her," where I
 present a clear or bright example to the women, from gazing at which
 they can make their beauty seem gentle in following the same.
 Secondly, I relate how useful she is to all people, saying that her
 aspect assists our faith, which is more useful to the whole Human Race
 than all other things beside; for it is that by which we escape from
 Eternal Death and acquire Eternal Life; and she assists our Faith, for
 the first foundation of our Faith is on the miracles performed by Him
 who was crucified, who created our Reason, and willed that it should
 be less than His power. He performed these miracles, then, in His own
 name for His saints; and many men are so obstinate that they are in
 doubt of those miracles if there be the least mist or cloud around
 them; and they cannot believe any miracle unless they have visible
 experience of the same; and this Lady is a thing visibly miraculous,
 of which the eyes of men daily can have experience, and which can make
 the other miracles appear possible to us. Wherefore it is manifest
 that this Lady, with her marvellous aspect, assists our Faith. And,
 therefore, finally I say:
 
                            We, content to call
     Her face a Miracle, have Faith made sure:
     For that God made her ever to endure.
 
 And thus ends the second section of the second principal part of the
 Song according to its Literal meaning.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 Amongst the Works of Divine Wisdom, Man is the most wonderful,
 considering how in one form the Divine Power joined three natures; and
 in such a form how subtly harmonized his body must be. It is organized
 for all his distinct powers; wherefore, because of the great concord
 there must be, among so many organs, to secure their perfect response
 to each other, in all the multitude of men but few are perfect. And if
 this Creature is so wonderful, certainly it is a dread thing to
 discourse of his conditions, not only in words, but even in thought.
 So that to this apply those words of Ecclesiastes: "I beheld all the
 Work of God, that a Man cannot find out the Work that is done under
 the Sun." And those other words there, where he says: "Let not thine
 heart be hasty to utter anything before God: for God is in Heaven, and
 thou upon Earth: therefore let thy words be few." I, then, who in this
 third section intend to speak of a certain condition of such a
 creature, inasmuch as, through the goodness of the Soul, visible
 beauty appears in his body, I begin timorously uncertain, intending,
 if not fully, at least partially, to untie such a knot as this. I say,
 then, that since the meaning of that section is clear, wherein this
 Lady is praised on the part of the Soul, we are now to proceed and to
 see how it is when I say: "Her aspect shows delights of Paradise." I
 praise her on the part of the body, and I say that in her aspect
 bright gleams appear which show us pleasant things, and amongst others
 those of Paradise.
 
 The most noble state of all, and that which is the crown of every
 good, is to be at peace within one's self; and this is to be happy.
 And this content is truly (although in another manner) in her aspect;
 so that, by looking at her, the people find peace, so sweetly does her
 Beauty feed the eyes of the beholders; but in another way, for the
 Peace that is perpetual in Paradise is not attainable by any man.
 
 And since some one might ask where this wonderful content appears in
 this Lady, I distinguish in her person two parts, in which human
 pleasure and displeasure most appear. Wherefore it is to be known that
 in whatever part the Soul most fulfils its office, it strives most
 earnestly to adorn that part, and there it does its work most subtly.
 Wherefore we see that in the Face of Man, where it fulfils its office
 more than in any other outward part, it works so subtly that, by
 making itself subtle therein as much as its material permits, it
 causes that no face is like another, because its utmost power over
 matter, which is dissimilar in almost all, is there brought into
 action; and because in the face the Soul works especially in two
 places, as if in those two places all the three Natures of the Soul
 had jurisdiction, that is, in the Eyes and in the Mouth, these it
 chiefly adorns, and there it spends its care to make all beautiful if
 it can. And in these two places I say that those pleasures of content
 appear, saying: "Seen in her eyes and in her smiling face;" the which
 two places, by means of a beautiful comparison, may be designated the
 balconies of the woman who dwells in the house of the body, she being
 the Soul; because there, although veiled, as it were, the Soul often
 shows itself. The Soul shows itself so evidently in the eyes that it
 is possible to know its present passion if you look attentively.
 
 Six passions are proper to the human Soul of which the Philosopher
 makes mention in his Rhetoric, namely, Grace, Zeal, Mercy, Envy, Love,
 and Shame; and with whichever of these the Soul is impassioned, there
 comes into the window of the Eyes the semblance of it, unless it be
 repressed within, and shut from view by great power of will. Wherefore
 some one formerly plucked out his eyes that an inward shame should not
 appear without, as Statius the Poet says of the Theban Oedipus when he
 says that with eternal night he loosed his damned shame.
 
 It reveals itself in the Mouth, like colour behind glass as it were.
 And what is a smile or a laugh except a coruscation of the Soul's
 delight, a light shot outwardly from that which shines within? And
 therefore it is right for a man to reveal his Soul by a well-tempered
 cheerfulness, smiling moderately with a due restraint, and with slight
 movement of the limbs; so that the Lady, that is, the Soul, which
 then, as has been said, shows herself, may appear modest, and not
 dissolute. Therefore the book on the Four Cardinal Virtues commands us
 thus: "Let thy smile be without loud laughter, that is, without
 cackling like a hen."
 
 Ah, the sweet wonder of my Lady's smile, which is never seen but in
 the eyes!
 
 And I say of these delights seen in her eyes and smile: "Love brought
 them there as to his dwelling place;" where it is possible to consider
 Love in a twofold form. First, the Love of the Soul, peculiar or
 proper to these places; secondly, universal Love, which inclines
 things to love and to be loved, which ordains the Soul to rule these
 parts.
 
 Then, when I say, "They dazzle Reason," I excuse myself for this, that
 it appears of such exceeding beauty that I can tell but little, owing
 to its overpowering force; and I say that I can say but little
 concerning it for two reasons. The one is, that those things which
 appear in her aspect overpower our intellect; and I tell how this
 conquest is made: that "They dazzle Reason, as sunbeams our eyes,"
 when the Sun overpowers our feeble sight, if not also the healthy and
 the strong. The other is, that the man cannot look fixedly at it,
 because the Soul becomes inebriate therein; so that incontinently,
 after gazing thereat, it fails in all its operations.
 
 Then, when I say, "Rain from her beauty little flames of fire," I
 recur to discourse of its effect, since to discourse entirely of it is
 not possible. Wherefore it is to be known that all those things which
 subdue our intellect, so that it is unable to see what they are, are
 most suitably to be discussed in their effects; wherefore of God, and
 of His separate substances, and of the first matter we can thus have
 some knowledge. And therefore I say that the beauty of that Lady rains
 little flames of fire, meaning the ardour of Love and of Charity,
 "Made living with a spirit," that is, Love informed by a gentle
 spirit, which is direct desire, through which and from which "to
 create Good thoughts;" and it not only does this, but it crushes and
 destroys its opposite, the innate vices which are especially the foes
 of all good thoughts.
 
 And here it is to be known that there are certain vices in the Man to
 which he is naturally disposed; as certain men of a choleric
 complexion are disposed to anger: and such vices as these are innate,
 that is, natural. Others are the vices of habit, for which not the
 complexion, but habit, or custom, is to blame; such as intemperance,
 and especially intemperance in wine. But these vices are subdued and
 put to flight by good habits, and the man is made virtuous thereby
 without finding fatigue in his moderation, as the Philosopher says in
 the second book of the Ethics. Truly there is this difference between
 the natural passions and the habitual, that through use of good morals
 the habitual entirely vanish, because their origin, the evil habit, is
 destroyed by its opposite; but the natural, the source of which is in
 the complexion of the passionate man, although they may be made much
 lighter by good morals, yet they do not entirely disappear as far as
 regards the first cause, but they almost wholly disappear in act,
 because custom is not equal to nature, which is the source of such a
 passion. And therefore the man is more praiseworthy who guides himself
 and rules himself when he is of an evil disposition by nature, in
 opposition to natural impulse, than he who, being gifted with a good
 disposition by nature, carries himself naturally well; as it is more
 praiseworthy to control a bad horse than one that is not troublesome.
 I say, then, that those little flames which rain down from her beauty
 destroy the innate, or the natural, vices, to make men understand that
 her beauty has power to renew Nature in those who behold it, which is
 a miraculous thing. And this confirms that which is observed above in
 the other chapter when I say that she is the helper of our Faith.
 
 Finally, when I say, "Lady, who may desire Escape from blame," I
 infer, under pretext of admonishing another, the end for which so much
 beauty was made. And I say that what lady believes her beauty to be
 open to blame through some defect, let her look on this most perfect
 example; where it is understood that it is designed not only to
 improve and raise the good, but also to convert evil to good. And,
 finally, it is subjoined that she is "God's thought," that is, from
 the Mind of God. And this to make men understand that, by design of
 the Creator, Nature is made to produce such an effect.
 
 And thus ends the whole of the second chief part of the Song.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 The order of the present treatise requires, after these two parts of
 the Song have been discussed, according to my intention, that we now
 proceed to the third, in which I intend to purify the Song from a
 reproof which might be unfavourable to it.
 
 And it is this, that before I composed it, this Lady seeming to me to
 be somewhat fierce and haughty against me, I made a little ballad, in
 which I called her proud and angry, which appears to be contrary to
 that which is here reasoned; and therefore I turn to the Song, and,
 under colour of teaching it how it is proper that it should excuse
 itself, I make an excuse for that which came before. And this, when
 one addresses inanimate things, is a figure which is called by
 rhetoricians, Prosopopoeia, and the Poets often use it. "My Song, it
 seems you speak this to oppose," The intention of which address, to
 make it more easy of understanding, it behoves me to divide into three
 sections: first, one affirms wherefore excuse is necessary; then, one
 proceeds with the excuse, when I say, "Though Heaven, you know;"
 finally, I speak to the Song as to a person well skilled in that which
 it is right to do when I say, "Be such excuse allowed."
 
 I say, then, in the first place: "My Song, it seems you speak this to
 oppose The saying of a sister Song of mine." For the sake of
 similitude, I say sister; for as that woman is called a sister who is
 born of the same father, so may a man call that work a sister which is
 wrought by the same worker; for our work is in some degree a thing
 begotten. And I say why it seems opposed or contrary to that sister
 Song, saying: "This lovely Lady whom you count divine, Your sister
 called disdainful and morose." This accusation being affirmed, I
 proceed to the excuse, by quoting an example, wherein the Truth is
 quite opposite to the appearance of Truth, and it is quite possible to
 take the false semblance of Truth for Truth itself, regarding Truth
 itself as Falsehood. I say: "Though Heaven, you know, is ever high and
 pure, Men's eyes may fail, and find a star obscure;" where it is shown
 that it is the property of colour and light to be visible, as
 Aristotle affirms in the second book Of the Soul and in the book on
 Sense and Sensation. Other things, indeed, are visible, but it is not
 their property to be so, nor to be tangible, as in form, height,
 number, motion, and rest, which are said to be subject to the Common
 Sense, and which we comprehend by union of many senses; but of colour
 and light it is the property to be visible, because with the sight
 only we comprehend them. These visible things, both those of which it
 is the property and those subject to the Common Sense, inasmuch as
 they are visible, come within the eye; I do not say the things, but
 their form; through the transparent medium, not really, but by
 intention, as it were through transparent glass. And in the humour
 which is in the pupil of the eye this current which makes the form
 visible is completed, because that humour is closed behind like a
 mirror which has its glass backed with lead; so that it cannot pass
 farther on, but strikes there, after the manner of a ball, and stops;
 so that the form which does not appear in the transparent medium,
 having reached the disc behind, shines brightly thereon; and this is
 the reason why the image appears only in the glass which has lead at
 the back.
 
 From this pupil the visual spirit, which is continued from it to the
 part of the Brain, the anterior, where the sensitive power is,
 suddenly, without loss of time, depicts it as in the clear spring of a
 fountain; and thus we see. Wherefore, in order that its vision be
 truthful, that is, such as the visible thing is in itself, the medium
 through which the form comes to the eye must be without any colour,
 and so also the humour of the pupil; otherwise the visible form would
 be stained of the colour of the medium and of that of the pupil. And
 this is the reason why they who wish to make things appear of a
 certain colour in a mirror interpose that colour between the glass and
 the lead, the glass being pressed over it.
 
 Plato and other Philosophers said, indeed, that our sight was not
 because the visible came into the eye, but because the visual virtue
 went out to the visible form. And this opinion is confuted by the
 Philosopher in that book of his on Sense and Sensation. Having thus
 considered this law of vision, one can easily perceive how, although
 the star is always in one way bright, clear, and resplendent, and
 receives no change whatever except that of local movement, as is
 proved in that book on Heaven and the World, yet from many causes it
 may appear dim and obscure; since it may appear thus on account of the
 medium, the atmosphere, that changes continually. This medium changes
 from light to darkness, according to the presence or absence of the
 Sun; and during the presence of the Sun the medium, which is
 transparent, is so full of light that it overpowers the star, and
 therefore it no longer appears brilliant. This medium also changes
 from rare to dense, from dry to moist, because of the vapours of the
 Earth which rise continually. The medium, thus changed, changes by its
 density the image of the star, which passes through it, makes it
 appear dim, and by its moisture or dryness changes it in colour. In
 like manner it may thus appear through the visual organ, that is, the
 eye, which on account of some infirmity, or because of fatigue, is
 changed into some degree of dimness or into some degree of weakness.
 So it happens very often, owing to the membrane of the pupil becoming
 suffused with blood, on account of some corruption produced by
 weakness, that things all appear of a red colour; and therefore the
 star appears so coloured. And owing to the sight being weakened, there
 results in it some dispersion of the spirit, so that things do not
 appear united, but scattered, almost in the same way as our writing
 does on a wet piece of paper. And this is the reason why many persons,
 when they wish to read, remove the paper to some distance from the
 eyes, in order that the image thereof may come within the eye more
 easily and more subtly, and thereby the lettering is left impressed on
 the sight more distinctly and connectedly. For like reason the star
 also may appear blurred; and I had experience of this in the same year
 in which this Song was born, for, by trying the eyes very much in the
 labour of reading, the visual spirits were so weakened that the stars
 all appeared to me to be blurred by some white mist: and by means of
 long repose in shady and cool places, and by cooling the ball of the
 eye with spring water, I re-united the scattered powers, which I
 restored to their former good condition.
 
 And thus, for the reasons mentioned above, there are many visible
 causes why the star can appear to us different to what it really is.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 
 Leaving this digression, which has been needful for seeing the Truth,
 I return to the proposition, and I say that, as our eyes call, that
 is, judge, the star other than it really is as to its true condition,
 so this little ballad judged this Lady according to appearance, other
 than the Truth, through infirmity of the Soul, which was impassioned
 with too much desire. And this I make evident when I say that "fear
 possessed her soul." For this which I saw in her presence appeared
 fierce or proud to me. Where it is to be known that in proportion as
 the agent is more closely united to the patient, so much the more
 powerful is the passion, as may be understood from the opinion of the
 Philosopher in his book On Generation. Wherefore in proportion as the
 desired thing draws nigh to the person who desires it, so much the
 greater is the desire; and the Soul, more impassioned, unites itself
 more closely to the carnal part, and abandons reason more and more; so
 that the individual no longer judges like a man, but almost like some
 other animal, even according to appearance, not discerning the Truth.
 And this is the reason why the countenance, modest according to the
 truth, appears disdainful and proud in her.
 
 And that little ballad spoke, according to that judgment, as sensual
 and irrational at once. And herein it is sufficiently understood that
 this Song judges this Lady according to Truth, by the disagreement
 which it has with that other Song of harmony between it and that
 ballad. And not without reason I say, "When I come near to her
 glance," and not when she comes within mine. But in this I wish to
 express the great power which her eyes had over me; for, as if I had
 been transparent, through every part their light shone through me. And
 here it would be possible to assign reasons natural and supernatural,
 but let it suffice here to have said as much as I have; elsewhere I
 will discourse of it more suitably. Then when I say, "Be such excuse
 allowed," I impose on the Song instruction how, by the assigned
 reasons, it may excuse itself there where that is needful, namely,
 where there may be any suspicion of this opposition; for there is no
 more to say, except that whoever may feel doubtful as to the matter
 wherein this Song differs from the other, let him look at the reason
 which has been here stated. And such a figure as this is quite
 laudable in Rhetoric, and even necessary when the words are to one
 person and the intention is to another; because it is always
 praiseworthy to admonish and necessary also; but it is not always
 suitable in the mouth of every one. Wherefore, when the son is aware
 of the vice of the father, and when the subject is aware of the vice
 of the lord, and when the friend knows that the shame of his friend
 would be increased to him by admonition from him, when he knows that
 it would detract from his honour, or when he knows that his friend
 would not be patient, but enraged at the admonition, this figure is
 most beautiful and most useful. You may term it dissimulation; it is
 similar to the work of that wise warrior who attacked the castle on
 one side in order to draw off the defence from the other, for the
 attack and the design of the commander are not aimed at one and the
 same part.
 
 Also, I lay a command on this Song, that it ask permission of this
 Lady to speak of her; whereby one may infer that a man ought not to be
 presumptuous in praising another, ought not to take it for granted in
 his own mind that it is pleasing to the person praised, because often,
 when some one believes he is bestowing praise, it is taken as blame,
 either through defect of the speaker or through defect of him who
 hears. Wherefore it is requisite to have much discretion in this
 matter; which discretion is tantamount to asking permission, in the
 way in which I say that this Song or Poem should ask for it.
 
 And thus ends the whole Literal meaning of this treatise; wherefore
 the order of the work now requires the Allegorical exposition,
 following the Truth, to be proceeded with.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 
 Returning now, as the order requires, to the beginning of the Song, I
 say that this Lady is that Lady of the Intellect who is called
 Philosophy. But naturally praise excites a desire to know the person
 praised; and to know the thing may be to know what it is considered to
 be in itself, and in all that pertains to it, as the Philosopher says
 in the beginning of the book On Physics; and the name may reveal this
 when it bears some meaning, as he says in the fourth chapter of the
 Metaphysics, where it is said that the definition is that reason which
 the name signifies. Here, therefore, it is necessary, before
 proceeding farther with her praises, to prove and to say what this is
 that is called Philosophy, what this name signifies; and when this has
 been demonstrated, the present Allegory will be more efficaciously
 discussed. And first of all I will state who first gave this name;
 then I shall proceed to its signification.
 
 I say, then, that anciently in Italy, almost from the beginning of the
 foundation of Rome, which was seven hundred and fifty years, a little
 more or less, before the advent of the Saviour, according as Paul
 Orosius writes, about the time of Numa Pompilius, second king of the
 Romans, there lived a most noble Philosopher, who was named
 Pythagoras. And that he might be living about that time appears from
 something to which Titus Livius alludes incidentally in the first part
 of his History. And before him they were called the followers of
 Science, not Philosophers but Wise Men such as were those Seven most
 ancient Wise Men, who still live in popular fame. The first of them
 had the name of Solon, the second Chilon, the third Periander, the
 fourth Talus, the fifth Cleobulus, the sixth Bias, the seventh
 Pittacus. Pythagoras, being asked if he were considered to be a Wise
 Man, rejected this name, and stated himself to be not a Wise Man, but
 a Lover of Wisdom. And from this circumstance it subsequently arose
 that any man studious to acquire knowledge, was called a Lover of
 Wisdom, that is, a Philosopher; for inasmuch as "Philo" in Greek is
 equivalent to "Love" and "sophia" is equivalent to Wisdom, therefore,
 "Philo and sophia" mean the same as Love of Wisdom. Wherefore it is
 possible to see that those two words make that name Philosopher, which
 is as much as to say Lover of Wisdom. Therefore it may be observed
 that it is not a term of arrogance, but of humility.
 
 From this sprang naturally the word philosophy, as from the word
 friend springs naturally the word friendship. Wherefore it is possible
 to see, considering the signification of the first and second word,
 that philosophy is no other than friendship to wisdom, or rather to
 knowledge; wherefore to a certain degree it is possible to call every
 man a philosopher, according to the natural love which generates a
 desire for knowledge in each individual.
 
 But since the natural passions are common to all men, we do not
 specify those passions by some distinctive word, applied to some
 individual who shares our common nature, as when we say, John is the
 friend of Martin, we do not mean to signify merely the natural love
 which all men bear to all men, but we mean the friendship founded upon
 the natural love which is distinct and peculiar to certain
 individuals. Thus we do not term any one a philosopher because of the
 love common to us all. It is the intention or meaning of Aristotle, in
 the eighth book of the Ethics, that that man may be called a friend
 whose friendship is not concealed from the person beloved, and to whom
 also the beloved person is a friend, so that the attachment is mutual;
 and this must be so either for mutual benefit, or for pleasure, or for
 credit's sake. And thus, in order that a man may be a philosopher, it
 must be love to Wisdom which makes one of the sides friendly; it must
 be study and care which make the other side also friendly, so that
 familiarity and manifestation of benevolence may spring up between
 them; because without love and without study one cannot be called a
 philosopher, but there must be both the one and the other.
 
 And as friendship for the sake of pleasure given or for profit is not
 true friendship, but accidental, as the Ethics demonstrate, so
 philosophy for delight or profit is not true philosophy, but
 accidental. Wherefore one ought not to call him a true philosopher who
 for some pleasure or other may be a friend of Wisdom in some degree;
 even as there are many who take delight in repeating songs and in
 studying the same, and who delight in studying Rhetoric and Music, and
 who avoid and abandon the other Sciences, which are all members of
 Wisdom's body. One ought not to call him a true philosopher who is the
 friend of Wisdom for the sake of profit; such as are the Lawyers,
 Doctors, and almost all the Religious Men, who do not study for the
 sake of knowledge, but to acquire money or dignity; and if any one
 would give them that which they seek to acquire, they would not
 continue to study. And as amongst the various kinds of friendship,
 that which is for profit may be called the meanest friendship, so such
 men as these have less share in the name of Philosopher than any other
 people.
 
 Wherefore as the friendship conceived through honest affection is true
 and perfect and perpetual, so is that philosophy true and perfect
 which is generated by upright desire for knowledge, without regard to
 aught else, and by the goodness of the friendly soul; which is as much
 as to say, by right appetite and right reason. And it is possible to
 say here that as true friendship amongst men is, that each love each
 entirely, so the true Philosopher loves each part of Wisdom, and
 Wisdom each part of the Philosopher, so as to draw him wholly to
 herself, and to allow no thought of his to stray away to other things.
 Wherefore Wisdom herself says in the Proverbs of Solomon, "I love
 those who love me." And as true friendship of the mind, considered in
 itself alone, has for its subject the knowledge of good effects, and
 for its form the desire for the same, even so Philosophy considered in
 itself alone, apart from the Soul, has understanding for its subject,
 and for its form an almost divine love to intellect.
 
 And as the efficient cause of true friendship is Virtue, so the
 efficient cause of Philosophy is Truth. And as the end of true
 friendship is true affection, which proceeds from the intercourse
 proper to Humanity, that is, according to the dictates of Reason, as
 Aristotle seems to think in the ninth book of the Ethics, so the end
 of Philosophy is that most excellent affection which suffers no
 intermission or defect, that is, the true happiness which is acquired
 by the contemplation of Truth.
 
 And thus it is now possible to see who this my Lady is, in all her
 causes and in her whole reason, and why she is called Philosophy; and
 who is a true Philosopher, and who is one by accident.
 
 But in some fervour or heat of mind the one and the other end of the
 acts and of the passions are called by the word for the act itself or
 the passion; as Virgil does in the second book of the AEneid, where he
 calls Hector, "Oh, light" (which was the act) "and hope" (which is the
 passion) "of the Trojans:" for he was neither the light nor the hope,
 but he was the end whence came to them their light in council, and he
 was the end in which was reposed their hope of safety; as Statius
 writes in the fifth book of the Thebaid, when Hypsipyle says to
 Archemorus, "Oh, consolation of things and of the lost country! oh,
 honour of my servitude!" even as we say daily, showing the friend,
 "See my friendship;" and the father says to the son, "My love;" and so
 it is that, through long custom, the Sciences, in which most fervently
 Philosophy finds the end to which she looks, are called by her name,
 such as the Natural Science, the Moral Science, and the Metaphysical
 Science, which last, because most necessarily she looks to her end in
 that chiefly and most fervently, is called the First Philosophy.
 
 Now, therefore, since it has been seen what the true Philosophy is in
 its essence; which is that Lady of whom I speak; how her noble name
 through custom is communicated to the Sciences, and the first science
 is called the First Philosophy, I may proceed further with her praise.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 
 In the first chapter of this treatise the reason which moved me to
 this Song is so fully discussed that it is no longer necessary to
 discuss it further, for one can easily enough recall to mind what has
 been said in this exposition: and therefore, following the divisions
 made for the Literal meaning, I shall run through the Song, turning
 back to the sense of the letter where it may be needful. I say, "Love,
 reasoning of my Lady in my mind." By Love I mean the labour and pains
 I took to acquire the love of this Lady. If one wishes to know what
 labour, it can be here considered in two ways. There is one study
 which leads the man to the daily use of Art and Science; there is
 another study which he will employ in the acquired use. The first is
 that which I call Love, which fills my mind continually with new and
 most exalted ideas of this Lady: even as the anxious pains which one
 takes to acquire a friendship are wont to do; for, when desiring that
 friendship, a man is wont to take anxious thought concerning it. This
 is that study and that affection which usually precedes in men the
 begetting of the friendship, when already on one side Love is born,
 and desires and strives that it may be on the other; for, as is said
 above, Philosophy is born when the Soul and Wisdom have become
 friends, so that the one is loved by the other.
 
 Neither is it again needful to discuss that first stanza in the
 present explanation, which was reasoned out as the Proem in the
 Literal exposition; since, from the first argument thereof, it is easy
 enough to make out the meaning in this the second one.
 
 We may proceed, then, to the second part, which begins the treatise,
 and to that place where I say, "The Sun sees not in travel round the
 Earth." Here it is to be known that as, when discoursing of a sensible
 thing, one handles it suitably by means of an insensible thing, so of
 an intelligible thing, one fitly argues by means of an unintelligible.
 In the Literal sense one speaks of the Sun as a substantial and
 sensible body; so now it is fit, by image of the Sun, to discourse of
 the Spiritual and Unintelligible, that is, God.
 
 There is no visible thing in all the world more worthy to serve as a
 type of God than the Sun, which illuminates with visible light itself
 first, and then all the celestial and elemental bodies. Thus, God
 illuminates Himself first with intellectual light, and then the
 celestial and other intelligible beings. The Sun vivifies all things
 with his heat, and if anything is destroyed thereby, it is not by the
 intention of the cause, but it is an accidental effect: thus God
 vivifies all things in His Goodness, and, if any suffer evil, it is
 not by the Divine intention, but the effect is accidental. For, if God
 made the Angels good and evil, He did not make both by intention, but
 He made the good only; there followed afterwards, beyond His
 intention, the wickedness of the evil ones; but not so far beyond His
 intention that God could not foreknow in Himself their wickedness; but
 so great was the loving desire to produce the Spiritual creature that
 the foreknowledge that some would come to a bad end neither could nor
 should prevent God from continuing the production; as it would not be
 to the praise of Nature if, knowing of herself that the flowers of a
 tree in a certain part must perish, she should refuse to produce
 flowers on that tree, and should abandon the production of
 fruit-bearing trees as vain and useless. I say, then, that God, who
 encircles and understands all, in His encircling and His understanding
 sees nothing so gentle, so noble, as He sees when He shines on this
 Philosophy. For, although God Himself, beholding, may see all things
 together, inasmuch as the distinction of things is in Him in the same
 way as the effect is in the cause, yet He sees those things also apart
 and distinct. He sees, then, this Lady the most noble of all
 absolutely, inasmuch as most perfectly He sees her in Himself and in
 her essence. If what has been said above be recalled to mind,
 Philosophy is a loving use of Wisdom; which especially is in God,
 because in Him is Supreme Wisdom, and Supreme Love, and Supreme
 Action; which cannot be elsewhere except inasmuch as it proceeds from
 Him. It is, then, the Divine Philosophy of the Divine Being, since in
 Him nothing can be that is not part of His Essence; and it is most
 noble, because the Divine Essence is most noble, and it is in Him in a
 manner perfect and true, as if by eternal wedlock; it is in the other
 Intelligences in a less degree, as if platonic, as if a virgin love
 from whom no lover receives full and complete joy, but contents
 himself by gazing on the beauty of her countenance. Wherefore it is
 possible to say that God sees not, that He does not intently regard,
 anything so noble as this Lady; I say anything, inasmuch as He sees
 and distinguishes the other things, as has been said, seeing Himself
 to be the cause of all. Oh, most noble and most excellent heart, which
 is at peace in the bride of the Ruler of Heaven; and not bride only,
 but sister, and the daughter beloved above all others.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 
 Having seen in the beginning of the praises of this Lady how subtly it
 is said that she is of the Divine Substance, as was first to be
 considered, we proceed now to consider her as she is in the
 Intelligences that proceed thence. "All minds of Heaven wonder at her
 worth," where it is to be known that I say, "minds of Heaven," making
 that allusion to God which has been mentioned above; and from this one
 excludes the Intelligences who are exiled from the eternal country,
 who can never study Philosophy, because love in them is entirely
 extinct, and for the study of Philosophy, as has been already said,
 Love is necessary. One sees, therefore, that the spirits of Hell are
 deprived of the sight of this most beautiful Lady; and, since she is
 the blessing of the intellect, the deprivation of her is most bitter
 and full of every sadness.
 
 Then, when I say, "Mortals, enamoured, find her in their thought," I
 descend to show how she also may come into the Human Intelligence in a
 secondary degree; with which Human Philosophy I then proceed through
 the treatise, praising it. I say, then, that the mortals who "find her
 in their thought" in this life do not always find her there, but only
 "When Love his peace into their hearts has brought;" wherein there are
 to be seen three points which are alluded to in this text.
 
 The first is when one says, "Mortals, enamoured," because it seems to
 make a distinction in the human race, and of necessity it must be
 made; for, according to what manifestly appears, and which in the
 following treatise will be specially reasoned out, the greatest part
 of men live more according to the Sense than according to Reason; and
 those who live according to the Sense can never be enamoured of this
 Lady, since of her they can have no apprehension whatever.
 
 The second point is when it says, "When Love his peace into their
 minds has brought," where it appears to make a distinction of time.
 And that is necessary; for, although the separate Intelligences gaze
 at this Lady continually, the Human Intelligence cannot do so; since
 Human Nature, besides that which gives delight to the Intellect and
 the Reason, has need of many things requisite for its support which
 contemplation cannot furnish forth. Therefore our Wisdom is sometimes
 habitual only, and not actual; and this does not happen to the other
 Intelligences, which alone are perfect in their intellectual nature.
 And so, when our soul is not in the act of contemplation, one cannot
 truly say that it is in Philosophy, except inasmuch as it has the
 habit of it, and the power of being able to arouse it; sometimes,
 therefore, she is with the people who are enamoured of her here below,
 and sometimes not.
 
 The third point is, when it speaks of the time when those people are
 with her, namely, when Love has brought into their minds his peace;
 which means no other than when the man is in the act of contemplation,
 since he does not strive to feel the peace of that Lady except in the
 act of contemplation.
 
 And thus one sees how this Lady is firstly in the Mind of God,
 secondly in the other separate Intelligences through continual
 contemplation, and afterwards in the human intellect through
 interpreted contemplation. But the man who has her for his Lady is
 ever to be termed a Philosopher, notwithstanding that he may not be
 always in the final act of Philosophy, for it is usual to name other
 men after their habits. Wherefore we call any man virtuous, not merely
 when performing virtuous actions, but from having the habit or custom
 of virtue. And we call a man eloquent, even when he is not speaking,
 from his habit of eloquence, that is, of speaking well.
 
 And of this Philosophy, in which Human Intelligence has part, there
 will now be the following encomiums to prove how great a part of her
 good gifts is bestowed on Human Nature. I say, then, afterwards:
 
     Her Maker saw that she was good, and poured,
       Beyond our Nature, fulness of His Power
       On her pure Soul, whence shone this holy dower
     Through all her frame.
 
 For the capacity of our Nature is subdued by it, which it makes
 beautiful and virtuous. Wherefore, although into the habit of that
 Lady one may somewhat come, it is not possible to say that any one who
 enters thereinto properly has that habit; since the first study, that
 whereby the habit is begotten, cannot perfectly acquire that
 philosophy. And here one sees her lowly praise; for, perfect or
 imperfect, she never loses the name of perfection. And because of this
 her surpassing excellence, it says that the Soul of Philosophy "shone
 Through all her frame," that is, that God ever imparts to her of His
 Light.
 
 Here we may recall to mind what is said above, that Love is a form of
 Philosophy, and therefore here is called her Soul; which Love is
 manifest in the use of Wisdom, and such use brings with it a wonderful
 beauty, that is to say, contentment under any condition of the time,
 and contempt for those things which other men make their masters.
 
 Wherefore it happens that those other unhappy ones who gaze thereon,
 and think over their own defects from the desire for perfection, fall
 into the weariness of sighs; and this is meant where it says: "That
 from the eyes she touches heralds fly Heartward with longings,
 heavenward with a sigh."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV.
 
 
 As in the Literal exposition, after the general praises one descends
 to the especial, firstly on the part of the Soul, then on the part of
 the body, so now the text proceeds after the general encomium to
 descend to the especial commendation. As it is said above, Philosophy
 here has Wisdom for its material subject and Love for its form, and
 the habit of contemplation for the union of the two. Wherefore in this
 passage which subsequently begins, "On her fair form Virtue Divine
 descends," I mean to praise Love, which is part of Philosophy. Here it
 is to be known that for a virtue to descend from one thing into
 another there is no other way than to reduce that thing into its own
 similitude; as we see evidently in the natural agents, for their
 virtue descending into the things that are the patients, they bring
 those things into their similitude as far as they are able to attain
 it.
 
 We see that the Sun, pouring his rays down on this Earth, reduces the
 things thereon to his own similitude of light in proportion as they by
 their own disposition are able to receive light of his light. Thus, I
 say that God reduces this Love to His own Similitude as much as it is
 possible for it to bear likeness to Him. And it alludes to the nature
 of the creative act, saying, "As on the Angel that beholds His face."
 Where again it is to be known that the first Agent, who is God, paints
 His Virtue on some things by means of direct radiance, and on some
 things by means of reflected splendour; wherefore into the separate
 Intelligences the Divine Light shines without any interposing medium;
 into the others it is reflected from those Intelligences which were
 first illumined.
 
 But since mention is here made of Light and Splendour, for the more
 perfect understanding thereof I will show the difference between those
 words, according to the opinion of Avicenna. I say that it is the
 custom of Philosophers to speak of Heaven as Light, inasmuch as Light
 is there in its primeval Spring, or its first origin. They speak of it
 as a ray of Light while it passes through the medium from its source
 into the first body in which it has its end; they call it Splendour
 where it is reflected back from some part that has received
 illumination. I say, then, that the Divine Virtue or Power draws this
 Love into Its Own Similitude without any interposing medium.
 
 And it is possible to make this evident, especially in this, that as
 the Divine Love is Eternal, so must its object of necessity be
 eternal, so that those things are eternal which He loves. And thus it
 makes this Love to love, for the Wisdom into which this Love strikes
 is eternal. Wherefore it is written of her: "From the beginning,
 before Time was created, I am: and in the Time to come I shall not
 fail." And in the Proverbs of Solomon this Wisdom says: "I am
 established for ever." And in the beginning of the Gospel of John, her
 eternity is openly alluded to, as it is possible to observe. And
 therefore it results that there, where this Love shines, all the other
 Loves become obscure and almost extinct, since its eternal object
 subdues and overpowers all other objects in a manner beyond all
 comparison; and therefore the most excellent Philosophers in their
 actions openly demonstrate it, whereby we know that they have treated
 all other things with indifference except Wisdom. Wherefore
 Democritus, neglecting all care of his own person, trimmed neither his
 beard, nor the hair of his head, nor his nails. Plato, indifferent to
 the riches of this world, despised the royal dignity, for he was the
 son of a king. Aristotle, caring for no other friend, combated with
 his own best friend, even with the above-named Plato, his dearest
 friend after Philosophy. And why do we speak of these, when we find
 others who, for these thoughts, held their life in contempt, such as
 Zeno, Socrates, Seneca, and many more? It is evident, therefore, that
 in this Love the Divine Power, after the manner of an Angel, descends
 into men; and to give proof of this, the text presently exclaims:
 "Fair one who doubt, go with her, mark the grace In all her acts." By
 "Fair one" is meant the noble soul of judgment, free in its own power,
 which is Reason; hence the other souls cannot be called Ladies, but
 handmaids, since they are not for themselves, but for others; and the
 Philosopher says, in the first book of Metaphysics, that that thing is
 free which is a cause of itself and not for others. It says, "go with
 her, mark the grace In all her acts," that is, make thyself the
 companion of this Love, and look at that which will be found within
 it; and in part it alludes to this, saying, "Downward from Heaven
 bends An Angel when she speaks," meaning that where Philosophy is in
 action a celestial thought stoops down, in which this being reasons or
 discourses beyond the power of Human Nature.
 
 The Song says "from Heaven," to give people to understand that not
 only Philosophy, but the thoughts friendly to it, are abstracted from
 all low and earthly things. Then afterwards it says how she
 strengthens and kindles love wherever she appears with the sweet
 persuasions of her actions, which are in all her aspects modest,
 gentle, and without any domineering assumption. And subsequently, by
 still greater persuasion to induce a desire for her company, it says:
 "Fair in all like her, fairest she'll appear Who is most like her."
 Again it adds: "We, content to call Her face a Miracle," find help in
 it, where it is to be known that the regard of this Lady was freely
 ordained to arouse a desire in us for its acquisition, not only in her
 countenance, which she reveals to sight, but also in the things which
 she keeps hidden. Wherefore as, through her, much of that which is
 hidden is seen by means of Reason (and consequently to see by Reason
 without her seems a miracle), so, through her, one believes each
 miracle in the action of a higher intellectual Power to have reason,
 and therefore to be possible. From whence true Faith has its origin,
 from which comes the Hope to desire the Future, and from that are born
 the works of Charity, by which three Virtues we mount to become
 Philosophers in that celestial Athens where Stoics, Peripatetics, and
 Epicureans, by the practice of Eternal Truth, concur harmoniously in
 one desire.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV.
 
 
 In the preceding chapter this glorious Lady is praised according to
 one of her component parts, that is, Love. In this chapter I intend to
 explain that passage which begins, "Her aspect shows delights of
 Paradise," and here it is requisite to discuss and praise her other
 part, Wisdom.
 
 The text then says that in the face of this Lady things appear which
 show us joys of Paradise; and it distinguishes the place where this
 appears, namely, in the eyes and the smile. And here it must be known
 that the eyes of Wisdom are her demonstrations, whereby one sees the
 Truth most certainly; but her persuasions are in her smile, in which
 persuasions the inner Light of Wisdom reveals itself without any veil
 or concealment. And in these two is felt that most exalted joy which
 is the supreme good in Paradise. This joy cannot be in any other thing
 here below, except in gazing into these eyes and upon that smile. And
 the reason is this, that since each thing naturally desires its
 perfection, without which it cannot be at peace, to have that is to be
 blessed. For although it might possess all other things, yet, being
 without that, there would remain in it desire, which cannot consist
 with perfect happiness, since perfect happiness is a perfect thing,
 and desire is a defective thing. For one desires not that which he
 has, but that which he has not, and here is a manifest defect. And in
 this form solely can human perfection be acquired, as the perfection
 of Reason, on which, as on its principal part, our essential being all
 depends. All our other actions, as to feel or hear, to take food, and
 the rest, are through this one alone; and this is for itself, and not
 for others. So that, if that be perfect, it is so perfect that the
 man, inasmuch as he is a man, sees each desire fulfilled, and thus he
 is happy. And therefore it is said in the Book of Wisdom: "Whoso
 casteth away Wisdom and Knowledge is unhappy," that is to say, he
 suffers the privation of happiness. From the habit of Wisdom it
 follows that a man learns to be happy and content, according to the
 opinion of the Philosopher. One sees, then, how in the aspect of this
 Lady joys of Paradise appear, and therefore one reads in the Book of
 Wisdom quoted above, when speaking of her, "She is a shining whiteness
 of the Eternal Light; a Mirror without blemish, of the Majesty of
 God." Then when it says, "Things over which the intellect may stray,"
 I excuse myself, saying that I can say but little concerning these, on
 account of their overpowering influence. Where it is to be known that
 in any way these things dazzle our intellect, inasmuch as they affirm
 certain things to be, which our intellect is unable to comprehend,
 that is, God and Eternity, and the first Matter which most certainly
 they do not see, and with all faith they believe to be. And even what
 they are we cannot understand; and so, by not denying things, it is
 possible to draw near to some knowledge of them, but not otherwise.
 
 Truly here it is possible to have some very strong doubt how it is
 that Wisdom can make the man completely happy without being able to
 show him certain things perfectly; since the natural desire for
 knowledge is in the man, and without fulfilment of the desire he
 cannot be fully happy. To this it is possible to reply clearly, that
 the natural desire in each thing is in proportion to the possibility
 of reaching to the thing desired; otherwise it would pass into
 opposition to itself, which is impossible; and Nature would have
 worked in vain, which also is impossible.
 
 It would pass into opposition, for, desiring its perfection, it would
 desire its imperfection, since he would desire always to desire, and
 never fulfil his desire. And into this error the cursed miser falls,
 and does not perceive that he desires always to desire, going
 backwards to reach to an impossible amount.
 
 Nature also would have worked in vain, since it would not be ordained
 to any end; and, in fact, human desire is proportioned in this life to
 that knowledge which it is possible to have here. One cannot pass that
 point except through error, which is outside the natural intention.
 And thus it is proportioned in the Angelic, and it is limited in Human
 Nature, and it finds its end in that Wisdom in proportion as the
 nature of each can apprehend it.
 
 And this is the reason why the Saints have no envy amongst themselves,
 since each one attains the end of his desire, and the desire of each
 is in due proportion to the nature of his goodness. Wherefore, since
 to know God and certain other things, as Eternity and the first
 Matter, is not possible to our Nature, naturally we have no desire for
 that knowledge, and hereby is this doubtful question solved.
 
 Then when I say, "Rain from her beauty little flames of fire," I
 proceed to another joy of Paradise, that is, from the secondary
 felicity, happiness, to this first one, which proceeds from her
 beauty, where it is to be known that Morality is the beauty of
 Philosophy. For as the beauty of the body is the result of its members
 in proportion as they are fitly ordered, so the beauty of Wisdom,
 which is the body of Philosophy, as has been said, results from the
 order of the Moral Virtues which visibly make that joy. And therefore
 I say that her beauty, which is Morality, rains down little flames of
 fire, meaning direct desire, which is begotten in the pleasure of the
 Moral Doctrine; which desire removes it again from the natural vices,
 and not only from the others. And thence springs that happiness which
 Aristotle defined in the first book of Ethics, saying, that it is Work
 according to Virtue in the Perfect Life.
 
 And when it says, "Fair one, who may desire Escape from blame," it
 proceeds in praise of Philosophy. I cry aloud to the people that they
 should follow her, telling them of her good gifts, that is to say,
 that by following her each one may become good. Therefore it says to
 each Soul, that feels its beauty is to blame because it does not
 appear what it ought to appear, let her look at this example. Where it
 is to be known that the Morals are the beauty of the Soul, that is to
 say, the most excellent virtues, which sometimes through vanity or
 through pride are made less beautiful or less agreeable, as in the
 last treatise it was possible to perceive. And therefore I say that,
 in order to shun this, one looks at that Lady, Philosophy, there where
 she is the example of Humility, namely, in that part of herself which
 is called Moral Philosophy. And I subjoin that by gazing at her (I
 say, at Wisdom) in that part, every vicious man will become upright
 and good. And therefore I say she has "a spirit to create Good
 thoughts, and crush the vices." She turns gently back him who has gone
 astray from the right course.
 
 Finally, in highest praise of Wisdom, I say of her that she is the
 Mother of every good Principle, saying that she is "God's thought,"
 who began the World, and especially the movement of the Heaven by
 which all things are generated, and wherein each movement has its
 origin, that is to say, that the Divine Thought is Wisdom. She was,
 when God made the World; whence it follows that she could make it, and
 therefore Solomon said in the Book of Proverbs, in the person of
 Wisdom: "When He prepared the Heavens, I was there: when He set a
 compass upon the face of the depth; when He established the clouds
 above; when He strengthened the fountains of the deep; when He gave to
 the sea His decree, that the waters should not pass His commandment;
 when He appointed the foundations of the Earth: then I was by Him, as
 one brought up with Him, and I was daily His delight, rejoicing always
 before Him." O, ye Men, worse than dead, who fly from the friendship
 of Wisdom, open your eyes, and see that before you were she was the
 Lover of you, preparing and ordaining the process of your being! Since
 you were made she came that she might guide you, came to you in your
 own likeness; and, if all of you cannot come into her presence, honour
 her in her friends, and follow their counsels, as of them who announce
 to you the will of this eternal Empress! Close not your ears to
 Solomon, who tells you "the path of the Just is as a shining Light,
 which goeth forth and increaseth even to the day of salvation." Follow
 after them, behold their works, which ought to be to you as a beacon
 of light for guidance in the path of this most brief life.
 
 And here we may close the Commentary on the true meaning of the
 present Song. The last stanza, which is intended for a refrain, can be
 explained easily enough by the Literal exposition, except inasmuch as
 it says that I there called this Lady "disdainful and morose." Where
 it is to be known that at the beginning this Philosophy appeared to me
 on the part of her body, which is Wisdom, morose, for she smiled not
 on me, insomuch that as yet I did not understand her persuasions; and
 she seemed to me disdainful, for she turned not her glance to me, that
 is to say, I could not see her demonstrations. But the defect was
 altogether on my side. From this, and from that which is given in the
 explanation of the Literal meaning of the Song, the Allegory of the
 refrain is evident. It is time, therefore, that we proceed farther,
 and this treatise end.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 The Fourth Treatise
 
 
       Soft rhymes of love I used to find
         Within my thought, I now must leave,
     Not without hope to turn to them again;
       But signs of a disdainful mind
         That in my Lady I perceive
     Have closed the way to my accustomed strain.
 
       And since time suits me now to wait,
         I put away the softer style
     Proper to love; rhyme subtle and severe
       Shall tell how Nobleman's estate
         Is won by worth, hold false and vile
     The judgment that from wealth derives a Peer.
 
         First calling on that Lord
           Who dwells within her eyes,
         Containing whom, my Lady learnt
           Herself to love and prize.
 
         One raised to Empire held,
           As far as he could see,
         Descent of wealth, and generous ways,
           To make Nobility.
 
         Another, lightly wise,
           That saying turned aside,
         Perchance for want of generous ways
           The second source denied.
 
         And followers of him
           Are all the men who rate
         Those noble in whose families
           The wealth has long been great.
 
         And so long among us
           The falsehood has had sway,
         That men call him a Nobleman,
           Though worthless, who can say.
 
         I nephew am, or son,
           Of one worth such a sum;
         But he who sees the Truth may know
           How vile he has become
 
         To whom the Truth was shown,
           Who from the Truth has fled,
         And though he walks upon the earth
           Is counted with the dead:
 
         Whoever shall define
           The man a living tree
         Will speak untruth and less than truth,
           Though more he may not see.
 
         The Emperor so erred;
           First set the false in view,
         Proceeding, on the other side,
           To what was less than true.
 
         For riches make not worth
           Although they can defile:
         Nor can their want take worth away:
           They are by nature vile.
 
         No painter gives a form
           That is not of his knowing;
         No tower leans above a stream
           That far away is flowing.
 
         How vile and incomplete
           Wealth is, let this declare
         However great the heap may be
           It brings no peace, but care.
 
         And hence the upright mind,
           To its own purpose true,
         Stands firm although the flood of wealth
           Sweep onward out of view
 
         They will not have the vile
           Turn noble, nor descent
         From parent vile produce a race
           For ever eminent.
 
         Yet this, they say, can be,
           Their reason halts behind,
         Since time they suit to noble birth
           By course of time defined.
 
         It follows then from this
           That all are high or base,
         Or that in Time there never was
           Beginning to our race.
 
         But that I cannot hold,
           Nor yet, if Christians, they;
         Sound intellect reproves their words
           As false, and turns away.
 
         And now I seek to tell,
           As it appears to me,
         What is, whence comes, what signs attest
           A true Nobility.
 
         I say that from one root
           Each Virtue firstly springs,
         Virtue, I mean, that Happiness
           To man, by action, brings.
 
         This, as the Ethics teach,
           Is habit of right choice
         That holds the means between extremes,
           So spake that noble voice.
 
         Nobility by right
           No other sense has had
         Than to import its subject's good,
           As vileness makes him bad.
 
         Such virtue shows its good
           To others' intellect,
         For when two things agree in one,
           Producing one effect.
 
         One must from other come,
           Or each one from a third,
         If each be as each, and more, then one
           From the other is inferred.
 
         Where Virtue is, there is
           A Nobleman, although
         Not where there is a Nobleman
           Must Virtue be also.
 
         So likewise that is Heaven
           Wherein a star is hung,
         But Heaven may be starless; so
           In women and the young
 
         A modesty is seen,
           Not virtue, noble yet;
         Comes virtue from what's noble, as
           From black comes violet;
 
         Or from the parent root
           It springs, as said before,
         And so let no one vaunt that him.
           A noble mother bore.
 
         They are as Gods whom Grace
           Has placed beyond all sin:
         God only gives it to the Soul
           That He finds pure within.
 
         That seed of Happiness
           Falls in the hearts of few,
         Planted by God within the Souls
           Spread to receive His dew.
 
         Souls whom this Grace adorns
           Declare it in each breath,
         From birth that joins the flesh and soul
           They show it until death.
 
         In Childhood they obey,
           Are gentle, modest, heed
         To furnish Virtue's person with
           The graces it may need.
 
         Are temperate in Youth,
           And resolutely strong,
         Love much, win praise for courtesy,
           Are loyal, hating wrong.
 
         Are prudent in their Age,
           And generous and just,
         And glad at heart to hear and speak
           When good to man's discussed.
 
         The fourth part of their life
           Weds them again to God,
         They wait, and contemplate the end,
           And bless the paths they trod.
 
       How many are deceived! My Song,
         Against the strayers: when you reach
     Our Lady, hide not from her that your end
       Is labour that would lessen wrong,
         And tell her too, in trusty speech,
     I travel ever talking of your Friend.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 Love, according to the unanimous opinion of the wise men who discourse
 of him, and as by experience we see continually, is that which brings
 together and unites the lover with the beloved; wherefore Pythagoras
 says, "In friendship many become one."
 
 And the things which are united naturally communicate their qualities
 to each other, insomuch that sometimes it happens that one is wholly
 changed into the nature of the other, the result being that the
 passions of the beloved person enter into the person of the lover, so
 that the love of the one is communicated to the other, and so likewise
 hatred, desire, and every other passion; wherefore the friends of the
 one are beloved by the other, and the enemies hated; and so in the
 Greek proverb it is said: "With friends all things ought to be in
 common."
 
 Wherefore I, having made a friend of this Lady, mentioned above in the
 truthful exposition, began to love and to hate according to her love
 and her hatred. I then began to love the followers of Truth, and to
 hate the followers of Error and Falsehood, even as she does. But since
 each thing is to be loved for itself and none are to be hated except
 for excess of evil, it is reasonable and upright to hate not the
 things, but the evil in the things, and to endeavour to distinguish
 between these. And if any person has this intention, my most excellent
 Lady understands especially how to distinguish the evil in anything,
 which is the cause of hate; since in her is all Reason, and in her is
 the fountain-head of all uprightness.
 
 I, following her as much as I could in her work as in her love,
 abominated and despised the errors of the people with infamy or
 reproach, not cast on those lost in error, but on the errors
 themselves; by blaming which, I thought to create displeasure and to
 separate the displeased ones from those faults in them which were
 hated by me. Amongst which errors one especially I reproved, which,
 because it is hurtful and dangerous not only to those who remain in
 it, but also to others who reprove it, I separate it from them and
 condemn.
 
 This is the error concerning Human Goodness, which, inasmuch as it is
 sown in us by Nature, ought to be termed Nobility; which error was so
 strongly entrenched by evil custom and by weak intellect that the
 opinion of almost all people was falsified or deceived by it; and from
 the false opinion sprang false judgments, and from false judgments
 sprang unjust reverence and unjust contempt; wherefore the good were
 held in vile disdain, and the evil were honoured and exalted. This was
 the worst confusion in the world; even as he can see who looks subtly
 at that which may result from it. And though it seemed that this my
 Lady had somewhat changed her sweet countenance towards me, especially
 where I gazed and sought to discover whether the first Matter of the
 Elements was created by God, for which reason I strengthened myself to
 frequent her presence a little, as if remaining there with her assent,
 I began to consider in my mind the fault of man concerning the said
 error. And to shun sloth, which is an especial enemy of this Lady, and
 to describe or state this error very clearly, this error which robs
 her of so many friends, I proposed to cry aloud to the people who are
 walking in the path of evil, in order that they might direct their
 steps to the right road; and I began a Song, in the beginning of which
 I said, "Soft rhymes of love I used to find," wherein I intend to lead
 the people back into the right path, the path of right knowledge
 concerning true Nobility, as by the knowledge of its text, to the
 explanation of which I now turn my attention, any one will be able to
 perceive.
 
 And since the intention of this Song is directed to a remedy so
 requisite, it was not well to speak under any figure of speech; but it
 was needful to prepare this medicine speedily, that speedy might be
 the restoration to health, which, being so corrupted, hastened to a
 hideous death. It will not, then, be requisite in the exposition of
 this Song to unveil any allegory, but simply to discuss its meaning
 according to the letter. By my Lady I always mean her who is spoken of
 in the preceding Song, that is to say, that Light of supreme virtue,
 Philosophy, whose rays cause the flowers of true Nobility to blossom
 forth in mankind and to bear fruit in the sons of men; concerning
 which true Nobility the proposed Song fully intends to treat.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 In the beginning of the explanation now undertaken, in order to render
 the meaning of the proposed Song more clear and distinct, it is
 requisite to divide that first part into two parts, for in the first
 part one speaks in the manner of a Proem or Preface; in the second,
 the subject under discussion is continued; and the second part begins
 in the commencement of the stanza, where it says:
 
     One raised to Empire held,
       As far as he could see,
     Descent of wealth, and generous ways,
       To make Nobility.
 
 The first part, again, can be comprehended in three divisions or
 members. In the first it states why I depart from my usual mode of
 speech; in the second, I say of what it is my intention to discourse;
 in the third, I call upon that Helper who most can aid me to establish
 Truth. The second member, clause, or division begins: "And since time
 suits me now." The third begins: "First calling on that Lord." I say
 then that I was compelled to abandon the soft rhymes of Love which I
 was accustomed to search for in my thoughts, and I assign the reason
 or cause; wherefore I say that it is not because I have given up all
 intention of making rhymes of Love, but because new aspects have
 appeared in my Lady which have deprived me of material for present
 speech of Love. Where it is to be known that it does not here say that
 the gestures of this Lady are disdainful and angry according to
 appearance only, as may be seen in the tenth chapter of the preceding
 treatise; for at another time I say that the appearance is contrary to
 the Truth; and how this can be, how one self-same thing can be sweet
 and appear bitter, or rather be clear and appear obscure, may there be
 seen clearly enough.
 
 Afterwards when I say, "And since time suits," I say, even as has been
 said, what that is whereof I intend to discourse. And that which it
 says in the words "time suits" is not here to be passed over with a
 dry foot, because there is a most powerful reason for my action; but
 it is to be seen how reasonably time must wait on all our acts, and
 especially on speech.
 
 Time, according to what Aristotle says in the fourth chapter of
 Physics, is the number of movement, first, second, and onwards; and
 the number of the celestial movement, which prepares the things here
 below to receive in various ways any informing power. For the Earth is
 prepared in one way in the beginning of Spring to receive into itself
 the informing power of the herbs and flowers, and the Winter
 otherwise; and in one manner is one season prepared to receive the
 seed, differing from another. And even so our Mind, inasmuch as it is
 founded upon the temper of the body, which has to follow the
 revolution of the Heaven, at one time is disposed in one way, at
 another time in another way; wherefore words, which are, as it were,
 the seeds of actions, ought very discreetly to be withheld or uttered;
 they should be spoken with such sound judgment that they may be well
 received, and good fruit follow from them; not withheld or spent so
 sparingly that barrenness is the result of their defective utterance.
 And therefore a suitable time should be chosen, both for him who
 speaks and for him who must hear: for if the speaker is badly
 prepared, very often his words are injurious or hurtful; and if the
 hearer is ill-disposed, those words which are good are ill received.
 And therefore Solomon says in Ecclesiastes: "There is a time to speak,
 and a time to be silent." Wherefore I, feeling within myself that my
 disposition to speak of Love was disturbed, for the cause which has
 been mentioned in the preceding chapter, it seemed to me that the time
 might suit me now, time which bears with it the fulfilment of every
 desire, and appears in the guise of a generous giver to those who
 grudge not to await him patiently. Wherefore St. James says in his
 Epistle, in the fifth chapter: "Behold, the husbandman waiteth for the
 precious fruit of the Earth, and hath long patience for it, until he
 receive the early and the latter rain." For all our sorrows, or cares,
 or vexations, if we inquire diligently into their origin, proceed, as
 it were, from not knowing the use of time. I say, "since the time
 suits," I will leave my pen alone, that is to say, the sweet or gentle
 style I used when I sang of Love; and I say that I will speak of that
 worth whereby a man is truly noble.
 
 And as it is possible to understand worth in many ways, here I intend
 to assume worth to be a power of Nature, or rather a goodness bestowed
 by her, as will be seen in what follows; and I promise to discourse on
 this subject with a "rhyme subtle and severe."
 
 Wherefore it is requisite to know that rhyme may be considered in a
 double sense, that is to say, in a wide and in a narrow sense. In the
 narrow sense, it is understood as that concordance which in the last
 and in the penultimate syllable it is usual to make. In the wide
 sense, it is understood for all that language which, with numbers and
 regulated time, falls into rhymed consonance; and thus it is desired
 that it should be taken and understood in this Proem. And therefore it
 says "severe," with reference to the sound of the style, which to such
 a subject must not be sweet and pleasing; and it says "subtle," with
 regard to the meaning of the words, which proceed with subtle argument
 and disputation.
 
 And I subjoin: "hold false and vile The judgment;" where again it is
 promised to confute the judgment of the people full of error: false,
 that is, removed from the Truth; and vile, that is to say, affirmed
 and fortified by vileness of mind. And it is to be observed that in
 this Proem I promise, firstly, to treat of the Truth, and then to
 confute the False; and in the treatise the opposite is done, for, in
 the first place, I confute the False, and then treat of the Truth,
 which does not appear rightly according to the promise. And therefore
 it is to be known that, although the intention is to speak of both,
 the principal intention is to handle the Truth; and the intention is
 to reprove the False or Untrue, in so far as by so doing I make the
 Truth appear more excellent.
 
 And here, in the first place, the promise is to speak of the Truth
 according to the chief intention, which creates in the minds of the
 hearers a desire to hear; for in the first treatise I reprove the
 False of Untrue in order that, the false opinions being chased away,
 the Truth may be received more freely. And this method was adopted by
 the master of human argument, Aristotle, who always in the first place
 fought with the adversaries of Truth, and then, having vanquished
 them, revealed or demonstrated Truth itself.
 
 Finally, when I say, "First calling on that Lord," I appeal to Truth
 to be with me, Truth being that Lord who dwells in the eyes of
 Philosophy, that is to say, in her demonstrations. And indeed Truth is
 that Lord; for the Soul espoused to Truth is the bride of Truth, and
 otherwise it is a slave or servant deprived of all liberty.
 
 And it says, "my Lady learnt Herself to love and prize," because this
 Philosophy, which has been said in the preceding treatise to be a
 loving use of Wisdom, beholds herself when the beauty of her eyes
 appears to her. And what else is there to be said, except that the
 Philosophic Soul not only contemplates this Truth, but again
 contemplates her own contemplation and the beauty of that, again
 revolving upon herself, and being enamoured with herself on account of
 the beauty of her first glance?
 
 And thus ends this which, as a Proem or Preface in three divisions,
 heads the present treatise.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 Having seen the meaning of the Proem, we must now follow the treatise,
 and, to demonstrate it clearly, it must be divided into its chief
 parts, which are three.
 
 In the first, one treats of Nobility according to the opinion of other
 men; in the second, one treats of it according to the true opinion; in
 the third, one addresses speech to the Song by way of ornament to that
 which has been said. The second part begins: "I say that from one root
 Each Virtue firstly springs." The third begins: "How many are
 deceived! My Song, Against the strayers." And after these general
 parts, it will be right to make other divisions, in order to make the
 meaning of the demonstration clear. Therefore, let no one marvel if it
 proceed with many divisions, since a great and high work is now on my
 hands, and one that is but little entered upon by authors; the
 treatise must be long and subtle into which the reader now enters with
 me, if I am to unfold perfectly the text according to the meaning
 which it bears.
 
 I say, then, that this first part is now divided into two: for in the
 first, the opinions of others are placed; in the second, those
 opinions are confuted; and this second part begins: "Whoever shall
 define The man a living tree." Again, the first part which remains has
 two clauses: the first is the variation of the opinion of the Emperor;
 the second is the variation of the opinion of the Common People, which
 is naked or void of all reason; and this second clause or division
 begins: "Another, lightly wise." I say then, "One raised to Empire,"
 that is to say, such an one made use of the Imperial Office. Where it
 is to be known that Frederick of Suabia, the last Emperor of the
 Romans (I say last with respect to the present time, notwithstanding
 that Rudolf, and Adolphus, and Albert were elected after his death and
 from his descendants), being asked what Nobility might be, replied
 that "it was ancient wealth, and good manners."
 
 And I say that there was another of less wisdom, who, pondering and
 revolving this definition in every part, removed the last particle,
 that is, the good manners, and held to the first, that is, to the
 ancient riches. And as he seems to have doubted the text, perhaps
 through not having good manners, and not wishing to lose the title of
 Nobility, he defined it according to that which made himself noble,
 namely, possession of ancient wealth.
 
 And I say that this opinion is that of almost all, saying that after
 it go all the people who make those men noble who have a long
 pedigree, and who have been rich through many generations; since in
 this cry do almost all men bark.
 
 These two opinions (although one, as has been said, is of no
 consequence whatever) seem to have two very grave arguments in support
 of them. The first is, that the Philosopher says that whatever appears
 true to the greatest number cannot be entirely false. The second is,
 the authority of the definition by an Emperor. And that one may the
 better see the power of the Truth, which conquers all other authority,
 I intend to argue with the one reason as with the other, to which it
 is a strong helper and powerful aid.
 
 And, firstly, one cannot understand Imperial authority until the roots
 of it are found. It is our intention to treat or discourse of them in
 an especial chapter.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 The radical foundation of Imperial Majesty, according to the Truth, is
 the necessity of Human Civilization, which is ordained to one end,
 that is, to a Happy Life. Nothing is of itself sufficient to attain
 this without some external help, since man has need of many things
 which one person alone is unable to obtain. And therefore the
 Philosopher says that man is naturally a companionable animal. And as
 a man requires for his sufficient comfort the domestic companionship
 of a family, so a house requires for its sufficient comfort a
 neighbourhood; otherwise there would be many wants to endure which
 would be an obstacle to happiness. And since a neighbourhood cannot
 satisfy all requirements, there must for the satisfaction of men be
 the City. Again, the City requires for its Arts and Manufactures to
 have an environment, as also for its defence, and to have brotherly
 intercourse with the circumjacent or adjacent Cities, and thence the
 Kingdom.
 
 But since the human mind in restricted possession of the Earth finds
 no peace, but always desires to acquire Glory, as we see by
 experience, discords and wars must arise between realm and realm.
 These are the tribulation of Cities; and through the Cities, of the
 neighbourhoods; and through the neighbourhoods, of the houses; and
 through the houses, of men; and thus is the happiness of man prevented
 or obstructed. Wherefore, in order to prevent these wars, and to
 remove the causes of them through all the Earth, so far as it is given
 to the Human Race to possess it, there must of necessity be Monarchy,
 that is to say, one sole principality; and there must be one Prince,
 who, possessing all, and not being able to desire more, holds the
 Kings content within the limits of the kingdoms, so that peace may be
 between them, wherein the Cities may repose, and in this rest the
 neighbouring hamlets may dwell together in mutual love; in this love
 the houses obtain all they need, which, being obtained, men can live
 happily, which is that end for which man was born. And to these
 reasons might be applied the words of the Philosopher, for he says, in
 the book On Politics, that when many things are ordained to one end,
 one of those must be the ruling power, and all the others must be
 governed by that. Even as we see in a ship that the different offices
 and the different means to different ends in that ship are ordained to
 one end alone, that is to say, to reach the desired port by a safe
 voyage, where as each officer orders his own work to the proper end,
 even so there is one who considers all these ends, and ordains those
 to the final one; and this is the Pilot, whose voice all must obey.
 
 We see this also in the religious bodies and in the military bodies,
 in all those things which are ordained to one end, as has been said.
 Wherefore it can plainly be seen that to attain the perfection of the
 Universal Union of the Human Race there must be one Pilot, as it were,
 who, considering the different conditions of the World, and ordaining
 the different and needful offices, may hold or possess over the whole
 the universal and incontestable office of Command. And this office is
 well designated Empire, without any addition, because it is of all
 other governments the government; and so he who is appointed to this
 office is designated Emperor, because of all Governors he is the
 Governor, and what he says is Law to all, and ought by all to be
 obeyed; and every other government derives vigour and authority from
 the government of this man. And thus it is evident that the Imperial
 Majesty and Authority is the most exalted in the Human Family.
 
 No doubt it would be possible for some one to cavil, saying, that
 although the office of Empire may be required in the World, that does
 not make the authority of the Roman Prince rationally supreme, which
 it is the intention of the treatise to prove; since the Roman Power
 was acquired, not by Reason nor by decree of Universal Election, but
 by Force, which seems to be opposed to Reason. To this one can easily
 reply, that the election of this Supreme Official must primarily
 proceed from that Council which foresees all things, that is, God;
 otherwise the election would not have been of equal benefit for all
 the people, since, before the pre-ordained Official, there was none
 who had the good of all at heart.
 
 And since a gentler nature in ruling, and a stronger in maintaining,
 and a more subtle in acquiring never was and never will be than that
 of the Latin People, as one can see by experience, and especially that
 of the Holy People, in whom was blended the noble Trojan blood; to
 that office it was elected by God. Wherefore, since, to obtain it, not
 without very great power could it be approached, and to employ it a
 most exalted and most humane benignity was required, this was the
 people which was most fitly prepared for it. Hence not by Force was it
 assumed in the first place by the Roman People but by Divine
 Ordinance, which is above all Reason. And Virgil is in harmony with
 this in the first book of the AEneid, when he says, speaking in the
 person of God: "On these [that is, on the Romans] I impose no limits
 to their possessions, nor to their duration; to them I have given
 boundless Empire." Force, then, was not the moving cause, as he
 believed who was cavilling; but there was an instrumental cause even
 as the blows of the hammer are the cause of the knife, and the soul of
 the workman is the moving and the efficient cause; and thus, not
 force, but a cause, even a Divine Cause, has been the origin of the
 Roman Empire.
 
 And that this is so it is possible to see by two most evident reasons,
 which prove that City to be the Empress, and to have from God an
 especial birth, and to have from God an especial success. But since in
 this chapter without too great length it would not be possible to
 discuss this subject, and long chapters are the enemies of Memory, I
 will again make a digression in another chapter in order to prove the
 reasons here alluded to, which are not without and may give great
 pleasure.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 It is no cause for wonder if the Divine Providence, which surpasses
 beyond measure all angelic and human foresight, often appears to us to
 proceed mysteriously, since many times human actions conceal their
 motives from men. But there is great cause for wonder when the
 execution of the Eternal Counsel proceeds so evidently that our reason
 can discern it. And therefore in the beginning of this chapter I can
 speak with the mouth of Solomon, who, in the person of Wisdom, says in
 his Proverbs: "Hear, for I will speak of excellent things!"
 
 The Divine Goodness unmeasureable, desiring to conform again to Itself
 the Human Creature, which, through the sin of the prevarication of the
 first Man, was separated from God and deformed thereby, it was
 decided, in that most exalted and most united Divine Consistory of the
 Trinity, that the Son of God should descend to the Earth to accomplish
 this union. And since at His advent into the world, not only Heaven,
 but Earth, must be in the best disposition; and the best disposition
 of the Earth is when it is a Monarchy, that is to say, all subject to
 one Prince, as has been said above, by Divine Providence it was
 ordained what people and what city should fulfil this, and that people
 was the Roman nation, and that city was glorious Rome. And since the
 Inn also wherein the Heavenly King must enter must of necessity be
 most cleanly and most pure, there was ordained a most Holy Race, from
 which, after many excellent or just ancestors, there should be born a
 Woman more perfect than all others, who should be the abode of the Son
 of God. And this race was the Race of David, from which was born the
 glory and honour of the Human Race, that is to say, Mary. And
 therefore it is written in Isaiah: "A virgin shall be born of the stem
 of Jesse, and a branch shall grow out of his roots." And Jesse was the
 father of the aforesaid David. And it happened at one period of time
 that when David was born, Rome was born, that is to say, AEneas then
 came from Troy to Italy, which was the origin of the most noble Roman
 City, even as the written word bears witness. Evident enough,
 therefore, is the Divine election of the Roman Empire by the birth of
 the Holy City, which was contemporaneous with the root of the race
 from which Mary sprang.
 
 And incidentally it is to be mentioned that, since this Heaven began
 to revolve, it never was in a better disposition than when He
 descended from on high, He who had made it and who is its Ruler, even
 as again by virtue of their arts the Mathematicians may be able to
 discover. The World never was nor ever will be so perfectly prepared
 as then, when it was governed by the voice of one man alone, Prince
 and Commander of the Roman people, even as Luke the Evangelist bears
 witness. And therefore there was Universal Peace, which never was
 again nor ever will be, for the Ship of the Human Family rightly by a
 sweet pathway was hastening to its rightful haven. Oh, ineffable and
 incomprehensible Wisdom of God, which in Heaven above didst prepare,
 so long beforehand, for Thy advent into Syria and here in Italy at the
 same time! And oh, most foolish and vile beasts who pasture in the
 guise of men--you who presume to speak against our Faith, and profess
 to know, as ye spin and dig, what God has ordained with so much
 forethought--curses be on you and your presumption, and on him who
 believes in you!
 
 And, as has been said above, at the end of the preceding chapter, the
 Roman People had from God not only an especial birth, but an especial
 success; for, briefly, from Romulus, who was the first father of Rome,
 even to its most perfect era, that is, to the time of its predicted
 Emperor, its success was achieved not only by human, but by Divine
 means. For if we consider the Seven Kings who first governed
 it--Romulus, Numa, Tullus, Ancus Martius, Servius Tullius, and the
 Tarquins, who were, as it were, the nurses and tutors of its
 Childhood--we shall be able to find, by the written word of Roman
 History, especially by Titus Livius, those to have been of different
 natures, according to the opportunity of the advancing tract of time.
 If we consider, then, its Adolescence, when it was emancipated from
 the regal tutorship by Brutus, the first Consul, even to Caesar, its
 first supreme Prince, we shall find it exalted, not with human, but
 with Divine citizens, into whom, not human, but Divine love was
 inspired in loving Rome; and this neither could be nor ought to be,
 except for an especial end intended by God through such infusion of a
 heavenly spirit. And who will say that there was no Divine inspiration
 in Fabricius when he rejected an almost infinite amount of gold
 because he was unwilling to abandon his country? or in Curius, whom
 the Samnites attempted to corrupt, who said, when refusing a very
 large quantity of gold for love of his country, that the Roman
 citizens did not desire to possess gold, but the possessors of the
 gold? Who will say there was no Divine inspiration in Mutius burning
 his own hand because it had failed in the blow wherewith he had
 thought to deliver Rome? Who will say of Torquatus, who sentenced his
 own son to death from love to the Public Good, that he could have
 endured this without a Divine Helper? Who will say this of the Brutus
 before mentioned? Who will say it of the Decii and of the Drusi, who
 laid down their lives for their country? Who will say of the captive
 Regulus of Carthage, sent to Rome to exchange the Carthaginian
 prisoners for Roman prisoners of war, who, after having explained the
 object of his embassy, gave counsel against himself; through pure love
 to Rome, that he was moved to do this by the impulse of Human Nature
 alone? Who will say it of Quinctius Cincinnatus, who, taken from the
 plough and made dictator, after the time of office had expired,
 spontaneously refusing its continuance, followed his plough again? Who
 will say of Camillus, banished and chased into exile, who, having come
 to deliver Rome from her enemies, and having accomplished her
 liberation, spontaneously returned into exile in order not to offend
 against the authority of the Senate, that he was without Divine
 inspiration? O, most sacred heart of Cato, who shall presume to speak
 of thee? Truly, to speak freely of thee is not possible; it were
 better to be silent and to follow Jerome, when, in the Preface of the
 Bible where he alludes to Paul, he says that it were better to be
 silent than say little. Certainly it must be evident, remembering the
 lives of these men and of the other Divine citizens, that such wonders
 could not have been without some light of the Divine Goodness, added
 to their own goodness of nature. And it must be evident that these
 most excellent men were instruments with which Divine Providence
 worked in the building up of the Roman Empire, wherein many times the
 arm of God appeared to be present. And did not God put His own hand to
 the battle wherein the Albans fought with the Romans in the beginning
 for the chief dominion, when one Roman alone held in his hands the
 liberty of Rome? And did not God interfere with His own hands when the
 Franks, having taken all Rome, attacked by stealth the Capitol by
 night, and the voice alone of a goose caused this to be known? And did
 not God interfere with His own hands when, in the war with Hannibal,
 having lost so many citizens that three bushels of rings were carried
 into Africa, the Romans wished to abandon the land, if the blessed
 Scipio the younger had not undertaken his expedition into Africa for
 the recovery of freedom? And did not God interfere with His own hands
 when a new citizen of humble station, Tullius, defended, against such
 a citizen as Catiline, the Roman liberty? Yes, surely. Wherefore one
 should not need to inquire further to see that an especial birth and
 an especial success were in the Mind of God decreed to that holy City.
 And certainly I am of a firm opinion that the stones which remain in
 her walls are worthy of reverence; and it is asserted and proved that
 the ground whereon she stands is worthy beyond all other that is
 occupied by man.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 Above, in the third chapter of this treatise, a promise was made to
 discourse of the supremacy of the Imperial Authority and of the
 Philosophic Authority. And since the Imperial Authority has been
 discussed, my digression must now proceed further in order to consider
 that of the Philosopher, according to the promise made.
 
 And here we must first see what is the meaning of this word; since
 here there is a greater necessity to understand it than there was
 above in the argument on the Imperial Authority, which, on account of
 its Majesty, does not seem to be doubted. It is then to be known that
 Authority is no other than the act of the Author.
 
 This word, that is to say, Auctore, without this third letter,
 _c_, can be derived from two roots. One is from a verb, whose use
 in grammar is much abandoned, which signifies to bind or to tie words
 together, that is, A U I E O; and whoso looks well at it in its first
 vowel or syllable will clearly perceive that it demonstrates it
 itself, for it is constituted solely of a tie of words, that is, of
 five vowels alone, which are the soul and bond of every word, and
 composed of them in a twisted way, to figure the image of a ligature;
 for beginning with the A, then it twists round into the U, and comes
 straight through the I into the E, then it revolves and turns round
 into the O: so that truly this figure represents A, E, I, O, U, which
 is the figure or form of a tie; and how much _Autore_ (Author)
 derives its origin from this word, one learns from the poets alone,
 who have bound their words together with the art of harmony; but on
 this signification we do not at present dwell. The other root from
 which the word "Autore" (Author) is derived, as Uguccione testifies in
 the beginning of his Derivations, is a Greek word, "Autentim," which
 in Latin means "worthy of faith and obedience." And thus "Autore"
 (Author), derived from this, is taken for any person worthy to be
 believed and obeyed; and thence comes this word, of which one treats
 at the present moment, that is to say, Authority. Wherefore one can
 see that Authority is equivalent to an act worthy of faith and
 obedience.
 
 [Here is a small break in the original, containing some such words
 as--Worthy, nay, most worthy, of obedience and of faith is Aristotle:]
 hence it is evident that his words are a supreme and chief Authority.
 That Aristotle is most worthy of faith and obedience, one can thus
 prove. Amongst workmen and artificers of different Arts and
 Manufactures, which are all directed to one final work of Art, or to
 one building, the Artificer or Designer of that work must be
 completely believed in, and implicitly obeyed by all, as the man who
 alone beholds the ultimate end of all the other ends. Hence the
 sword-cutler must believe in the knight, so must the bridle-maker and
 saddle-maker and the shield-maker, and all those trades which are
 appointed to the profession of knighthood. And since all human actions
 require an aim, which is that of human life, to which man is appointed
 inasmuch as he is man, the master and artificer who considers that aim
 and demonstrates it ought especially to be believed in and obeyed; and
 he is Aristotle; wherefore he is most worthy of faith and obedience.
 And in order to see how Aristotle is the master and leader of Human
 Reason in so far as it aims at its final operation, it is requisite to
 know that this our aim of life, which each one naturally desires, in
 most ancient times was searched for by the Wise Men; and since those
 who desire this end are so numerous, and their desires are as it were
 all singularly different, although they exist in us universally, it
 was nevertheless very difficult to discern that end whereon rightly
 each human appetite or desire might repose.
 
 There were then many ancient philosophers, the first and the chief of
 whom was Zeno, who saw and believed this end of human life to be
 solely a rigid honesty, that is to say, rigid without regard to any
 one in following Truth and Justice, to show no sorrow, to show no joy,
 to have no sense of any passion whatever. And they defined thus this
 honest uprightness, as that which, without bearing fruit, is to be
 praised for reason of itself. And these men and their sect were called
 Stoics; and that glorious Cato was one of them, of whom in the
 previous chapter I had not courage enough to speak.
 
 Other philosophers there were who saw and believed otherwise; and of
 these the first and chief was a philosopher, who was named Epicurus,
 who, seeing that each animal as soon as it is born is as it were
 directed by Nature to its right end, which shuns pain and seeks for
 pleasure, said that this end or aim of ours was enjoyment. I do not
 say greedy enjoyment, voluntade, but I write it with a _p_,
 voluptate, that is, delight or pleasure free from pain; and therefore
 between pleasure and pain no mean was placed. He said that pleasure
 was no other than no pain; as Tullius seems to say in the first
 chapter De Finibus. And of these, who from Epicurus are named
 Epicureans, was Torquatus, a noble Roman, descended from the blood of
 the glorious Torquatus mention of whom I made above. There were
 others, and they had their rise from Socrates, and then from his
 successor, Plato, who, looking more subtly, and seeing that in our
 actions it was possible to sin, and that one sinned in too much and in
 too little, said that our action, without excess and without defect,
 measured to the due mean of our own choice, is virtue, and virtue is
 the aim of man; and they called it action with virtue. And these were
 called Academicians, as was Plato and Speusippus, his nephew; they
 were thus called from the place where Plato taught, that is, the
 Academy; neither from Socrates did they take or assume any word,
 because in his Philosophy nothing was affirmed. Truly Aristotle, who
 had his surname from Stagira, and Xenocrates of Chalcedon, his
 companion, through the genius, almost Divine, which Nature had put
 into Aristotle, knowing this end by means of the Socratic method, with
 the Academic file, as it were, reduced Moral Philosophy to perfection,
 and especially Aristotle. And since Aristotle began to reason while
 walking hither and thither, they were called, he, I say, and his
 companions, Peripatetics, which means the same as walkers about. And
 since the perfection of this Morality by Aristotle was attained, the
 name of Academician became extinct, and all those who attached
 themselves to this sect are called Peripatetics, and these people hold
 the doctrine of the government of the World through all its parts: and
 it may be termed a catholic opinion, as it were. Wherefore it is
 possible to see that Aristotle was the Indicator and the Leader of the
 people to this mark. And this is what I wished to prove.
 
 Wherefore, collecting all together, the principal intention is
 manifest, that is to say, that the authority of him whom we understand
 to be the supreme Philosopher is full of complete vigour, and in no
 way repugnant to Imperial Authority. But the Imperial without the
 Philosopher is dangerous; and this without that is weak, not of
 itself, but through the disorder of the people: but when one is united
 with the other they are together most useful and full of all vigour;
 and therefore it is written in that Book of Wisdom: "Love the Light of
 Wisdom, all you who are before the people," that is to say, unite
 Philosophic Authority with the Imperial, in order to rule well and
 perfectly. O, you miserable ones, who rule at the present time! and O,
 most miserable ones, you who are ruled! For no Philosophic Authority
 is united with your governments, neither through suitable study nor by
 counsel; so that to all it is possible to repeat those words from
 Ecclesiastes: "Woe to thee, O land, when thy King is a child, and thy
 Princes eat in the morning;" and to no land is it possible to say that
 which follows: "Blessed art thou, O land, when thy King is the son of
 nobles, and thy Princes eat in due season, for strength and not for
 drunkenness."
 
 Ye enemies of God, look to your flanks, ye who have seized the
 sceptres of the kingdoms of Italy. And I say to you, Charles, and to
 you, Frederick, Kings, and to you, ye other Princes and Tyrants, see
 who sits by the side of you in council, and count how many times a day
 this aim of human life is indicated to you by your councillors. Better
 would it be for you, like swallows, to fly low down than, like kites,
 to make lofty circles over carrion.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 Since it is seen how much the Imperial Authority and the Philosophic
 are to be revered, which must support the opinions propounded, it is
 now for us to return into the straight path to the intended goal. I
 say, then, that this last opinion of the Common People has continued
 so long that without other cause, without inquiry into any reason,
 every man is termed Noble who may be the son or nephew of any brave
 man, although he himself is nothing. And this is what the Song says:
 
     And so long among us
       This falsehood has had sway,
     That men call him a Nobleman,
       Though worthless, who can say,
 
     I nephew am, or son,
       Of one worth such a sum.
 
 Wherefore it is to be observed that it is most dangerous negligence to
 allow this evil opinion to take root; for even as weeds multiply in
 the uncultivated field, and surmount and cover the ear of the corn, so
 that, looking at it from a distance, the wheat appears not, and
 finally the corn is lost; so the evil opinion in the mind, neither
 chastised nor corrected, increases and multiplies, so that the ear of
 Reason, that is, the true opinion, is concealed and buried as it were,
 and so it is lost. O, how great is my undertaking in this Song, for I
 wish now to weed the field so full of wild and woody plants as is this
 field of the common opinion so long bereft of tillage! Certainly I do
 not intend to cleanse all, but only those parts where the ears of
 Reason are not entirely overcome; that is, I intend to lift up again
 those in whom some little light of Reason still lives through the
 goodness of their nature; the others need only as much care as the
 brute beasts: wherefore it seems to me that it would not be a less
 miracle to lead back to Reason him in whom it is entirely extinct than
 to bring back to Life him who has been four days in the grave.
 
 Then the evil quality of this popular opinion is narrated suddenly, as
 if it were a horrible thing; it strikes at that, springing forth from
 the order of the confutation, saying, "But he who sees the Truth will
 know How vile he has become," in order to make people understand its
 intolerable wickedness, saying, that those men lie especially, for not
 only is the man vile, that is, not Noble, who, although descended from
 good people, is himself wicked, but also he is most vile; and I quote
 the example of the right path being indicated, where, to prove this,
 it is fit for me to propound a question, and to reply to that question
 in this way.
 
 There is a plain with certain paths, a field with hedges, with
 ditches, with rocks, with tanglewood, with all kinds of obstacles;
 with the exception of its two straight paths. And it has snowed so
 much that the snow covers everything, and presents one smooth
 appearance on every side, so that no trace of any path is to be seen.
 Here comes a man from one part of the country, and he wishes to go to
 a house which is on the other side; and by his industry, that is,
 through prudent foresight and through the goodness of genius, guided
 solely by himself, he goes through the right path whither he meant to
 go, leaving the prints of his footsteps behind him. Another comes
 after this man, and he wishes to go to that mansion, and to him it is
 only needful to follow the footprints left there; but through his own
 fault this man strays from the path, which the first man without a
 guide has known how to keep; this man, though it is pointed out to
 him, loses his way through the brambles and the rocks, and he goes not
 to the place whither he is bound.
 
 Which of these men ought to be termed excellent, brave, or worthy? I
 reply: He who went first. How would you designate that other man? I
 reply: "As most vile." Why is he not called unworthy or cowardly, that
 is to say, vile? I reply: Because unworthy, that is, vile, he should
 be called who, having no guide, might have failed to walk
 straightforward; but since this man had a guide, his error and his
 fault can rise higher; and therefore he is to be called, not vile, but
 most vile. And likewise he who, by his father or by some elder of his
 race is ennobled, and does not continue in a noble course, not only is
 he vile, but he is most vile, and deserving of as much contempt and
 infamy as any other villain, if not of more. And because a man may
 preserve himself from this vile baseness, Solomon lays this command on
 him who has had a brave and excellent ancestor, in the twenty-second
 chapter of Proverbs: "Remove not the ancient landmark, which thy
 fathers have set," And previously he says, in the fourth chapter of
 the said book: "The path of the Just," that is, of the worthy men, "is
 as the shining light, that shineth more and more unto the perfect day;
 the way of the wicked is as darkness, and they know not at what they
 stumble."
 
 Finally, when it says, "And though he walks upon the earth Is counted
 with the dead," to his greater disgrace I say that this most
 worthless man is dead, seeming still alive. Where it is to be known
 that the wicked man may be truly said to be dead, and especially he
 who goes astray from the path trodden by his good ancestor. And this
 it is possible to prove thus: as Aristotle says in the second book On
 the Soul, to live is to be with the living; and since there are many
 ways of living--as in the plants to vegetate; in the animals to
 vegetate and to feel and to move; in men to vegetate, to feel, to
 move, and to reason, or rather to understand; and since things ought
 to be denominated by the noblest part, it is evident that in animals
 to live is to feel--in the brute animals, I say; in man, to live is to
 use reason. Wherefore, if to live is the life or existence of man, and
 if thus to depart from the use of Reason, which is his life, is to
 depart from life or existence, even thus is that man dead.
 
 And does he not depart from the use of Reason who does not reason or
 think concerning the aim of his life? And does he not depart from the
 use of Reason who does not reason or think concerning the path which
 he ought to take? Certainly he does so depart; and this is evident
 especially in him who has the footprints before him, and looks not at
 them; and therefore Solomon says in the fifth chapter of Proverbs: "He
 shall die without instruction; and in the greatness of his folly he
 shall go astray," that is to say, he is dead who becomes a disciple,
 and who does not follow his master; and such an one is most vile.
 
 And of him it would be possible for some one to say: How is he dead
 and yet he walks? I reply, that as a man he is dead, but as a beast he
 has remained alive; for as the Philosopher says in the second book On
 the Soul, the powers of the Soul stand upon itself, as the figure of
 the quadrangle stands upon the triangle, and the pentagon stands upon
 the quadrangle; so the sensitive stands upon the vegetative, and the
 intellectual stands upon the sensitive. Wherefore, as, by removing the
 last side of the pentagon, the quadrangle remains, so by removing the
 last power of the Soul, that is, Reason, the man no longer remains,
 but a thing with a sensitive soul only, that is, the brute animal.
 
 And this is the meaning or intention of the second part of the devised
 Song, in which are placed the opinions of others.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 The most beautiful branch which grows up from the root of Reason is
 Discretion. For as St. Thomas says thereupon in the prologue to the
 book of Ethics, to know the order of one thing to another is the
 proper act of Reason; and this is Discretion. One of the most
 beautiful and sweetest fruits of this branch is the reverence which
 the lesser owes to the greater. Wherefore Tullius, in the first
 chapter of the Offices, when speaking of the beauty which shines forth
 in Uprightness, says that reverence is part of that beauty; and thus
 as this reverence is the beauty of Uprightness, so its opposite is
 baseness and want of uprightness; which opposite quality it is
 possible to term irreverence, or rather as impudent boldness, in our
 Vulgar Tongue.
 
 And therefore this Tullius in the same place says: "To treat with
 contemptuous indifference that which others think of one, not only is
 the act of an arrogant, but also of a dissolute person," which means
 no other except that arrogance and dissolute conduct show want of
 self-knowledge, which is the beginning of the capacity for all
 reverence. Wherefore I, desiring (and bearing meanwhile all reverence
 both to the Prince and to the Philosopher) to remove the infirmity
 from the minds of some men, in order afterwards to build up thereupon
 the light of truth, before I proceed to confute the opinions
 propounded, will show how, whilst confuting those opinions, I argue
 with irreverence neither against the Imperial Majesty nor against the
 Philosopher. For if in any part of this entire book I should appear
 irreverent, it would not be so bad as in this treatise; in which,
 whilst treating of Nobility, I ought to appear Noble, and not vile.
 
 And firstly I will prove that I do not presume against the authority
 of the Philosopher; then I will prove that I do not presume against
 Imperial Majesty.
 
 I say, then, that when the Philosopher says, "that which appears to
 the most is impossible to be entirely false," I do not mean to speak
 of the external appearance, that is, the sensual, but of that which
 appears within, the rational; since the sensual appearance, according
 to most people, is many times most false, especially in the common
 things appreciable by the senses, wherein the sense is often deceived.
 Thus we know that to most people the Sun appears of the width of a
 foot in diameter; and this is most false, for, according to the
 inquiry and the discovery which human reason has made with its skill,
 the diameter of the body of the Sun is five times as much as that of
 the Earth and also one-half time more, since the Earth in its diameter
 is six thousand five hundred miles, the diameter of the Sun, which to
 the sense of sight presents the appearance of the width of one foot,
 is thirty-five thousand seven hundred and fifty miles. Wherefore it is
 evident that Aristotle did not understand or judge it by the
 appearance which it presents to the sense of sight. And therefore, if
 I intend only to oppose false trust in appearance according to the
 senses, that is not done against the intention of the Philosopher, and
 therefore I do not offend against the reverence which is due to him.
 
 And that I intend to confute the appearance according to the sense is
 manifest; for those people who judge thus, judge only by what they
 feel or think of those things which fortune can give and take away.
 For, because they see great alliances made and high marriages to take
 place, and the wonderful palaces, the large possessions, great
 lordships, they believe that all those things are the causes of
 Nobility--nay, they believe them to be Nobility itself. For if they
 could judge with any appearance of reason, they would say the
 contrary, that is, that Nobility is the cause of these things, as will
 be seen in the sequel of this treatise. And even as it may be seen
 that I speak not against the reverence due to the Philosopher whilst
 confuting this error, so I speak not against the reverence due to the
 Empire; and the reason I intend to show. But when he reasons or argues
 before the adversary, the Rhetorician ought to use much caution in his
 speech, in order that the adversary may not derive thence material
 wherewith to disturb the Truth. I, who speak in this treatise in the
 presence of so many adversaries, cannot speak briefly; wherefore, if
 my digressions should be long, let no one marvel.
 
 I say, then, that, in order to prove that I am not irreverent to the
 Majesty of the Empire, it is requisite, in the first place, to see
 what reverence is. I say that reverence is no other than a confession
 of due submission by an evident sign; and, having seen this, it
 remains to distinguish between them. Irreverent expresses privation,
 not reverent expresses negation; and, therefore, irreverence is to
 disavow the due submission by a manifest sign. The want of reverence
 is to refuse submission as not due. A man can deny or refuse a thing
 in a double sense. In one way, the man can deny offending against the
 Truth when he abstains from the due confession, and this properly is
 to disavow. In another way, the man can deny offending against the
 Truth when he does not confess that which is not, and this is proper
 negation; even as for the man to deny that he is entirely mortal is to
 deny properly speaking. Wherefore, if I deny or refuse reverence due
 to the Imperial Authority, I am not irreverent, but I am not reverent;
 which is not against reverence, forasmuch as it offends not that
 Imperial Authority; even as not to live does not offend Life, but
 Death, which is privation of that Life, offends; wherefore, to die is
 one thing and not to live is another thing, for not to live is in the
 stones. And since Death expresses privation, which cannot be except in
 decease of the subject, and the stones are not the subject of Life,
 they should not be called dead, but not living. In like manner, I, who
 in this case ought not to have reverence to the Imperial Authority, am
 not irreverent if I deny or refuse it, but I am not reverent, which is
 neither boldness, nor presumption, nor a thing to be blamed. But it
 would be presumption to be reverent, if it could be called reverence,
 since it would fall into greater and more true irreverence, that is,
 into irreverence of Nature and of Truth, as will be seen in the
 sequel. Against this error that Master of Philosophers, Aristotle,
 guards, in the beginning of the book of Ethics, when he says: "If the
 friends are two, and one is the Truth, their one mind is the Truth's."
 If I have said that I am not reverent, that is, to deny reverence, or
 by a manifest sign to deny or refuse a submission not due. It is to be
 seen how this is to deny and not to disavow, that is to say, it
 remains to be seen how, in this case, I am not rightfully subject to
 the Imperial Majesty. It must be a long argument wherewith I intend to
 prove this in the chapter next following.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 To see how in this case, that is, in approving or in not approving the
 opinion of the Emperor, I am not held in subjection to him, it is
 necessary to recall to mind that which has been argued previously
 concerning the Imperial Office, in the fourth chapter of this
 treatise, namely, that to promote the perfection of human Life,
 Imperial Authority was designed; and that it is the director and ruler
 of all our operations, and justly so, for however far our operations
 extend themselves, so far the Imperial Majesty has jurisdiction, and
 beyond those limits it does not reach. But as each Art and Office of
 mankind is restricted by the Imperial Office within certain limits, so
 this Imperial Office is confined by God within certain bounds. And it
 is not to be wondered at, for the Office and the Arts of Nature in all
 her operations we see to be limited. For if we wish to take Universal
 Nature, it has jurisdiction as far as the whole World, I say as far as
 Heaven and Earth extend; and this within a certain limit, as is proved
 by the third chapter of the book on Physics, and by the first chapter,
 of Heaven and the World. Then the jurisdiction of Universal Nature is
 limited within a certain boundary, and consequently the individual; of
 which also He is the Limiter who is limited by nothing, that is, the
 First Goodness, that is, God, who alone with infinite capacity
 comprehends the Infinite. And, that we may see the limits of our
 operations, it is to be known that those alone are our operations
 which are subject to Reason and to Will; for, if in us there is the
 digestive operation, that is not human, but natural. And it is to be
 known that our Reason is ordained to four operations, separately to be
 considered; for those are operations which Reason only considers and
 does not produce, neither can produce, any one of them, such as are
 the Natural facts and the Supernatural and the Mathematics. And those
 are operations which it considers and does in its own proper act which
 are called rational, such as are the arts of speech. And those are
 operations which it considers and does in material beyond itself, such
 as are the Mechanical Arts. And all these operations, although the
 considering them is subject to our will, they in their essential form
 are not subject to our will; for although we might will that heavy
 things should mount upwards naturally, they would not be able to
 ascend; and although we might will that the syllogism with false
 premisses should conclude with demonstration of the Truth, it could
 not so conclude; and although we might will that the house should
 stand as firmly when leaning forward as when upright, it could not be;
 since of those operations we are not properly the factors, we are
 their discoverers; Another ordained them and made them, the great
 Maker, who alone can Will and Do All--God.
 
 There also are operations which our Reason considers and which lie in
 the act of the Will, such as to offend and to rejoice; such as to
 stand firm in the battle and to fly from it; such as to be chaste and
 to be lewd; these are entirely subject to our will, and therefore we
 are called from them good and evil, because such acts are entirely our
 own; for so far as our will can obtain power, so far do our operations
 extend. And since in all these voluntary operations there is some
 equity to preserve and some iniquity to shun--which equity may be lost
 through two causes, either through not knowing what it is, or through
 not wishing to follow it--the written Reason, the Law, was invented,
 both to point it out to us and to command its observance. Wherefore
 Augustine says: "If men could know this, that is, Equity, and knowing
 it would obey it, the written Reason, the Law, would not be needful."
 And therefore it is written in the beginning of the old Digests or
 Books of the Civil Law: "The written Reason is the Art of Goodness and
 of Equity." To write this, to show forth and to enforce this, is the
 business of that Official Post of which one speaks, that of the
 Emperor, to whom, as has been said, in so far as our own operations
 extend, we are subject, and no farther. For this reason in each Art
 and in each trade the artificers and the scholars are and ought to be
 subject to the chief and to the master of their trades and Art: beyond
 their callings the subjection ceases, because the superiority ceases.
 So that it is possible to speak of the Emperor in this manner, if we
 will represent his office figuratively, and say that he may be the
 rider of the Human Will, of which horse how it goes without its rider
 through the field is evident enough, and especially in miserable
 Italy, left without any means for its right government. And it is to
 be considered that in proportion as a thing is more fit for the
 Master's art, so much the greater is the subjection; for the cause
 being multiplied, so is the effect multiplied. Wherefore it is to be
 known that there are things which are such pure or simple Arts that
 Nature is their instrument; even as rowing with an oar, where the Art
 makes its instrument by impulsion, which is a natural movement; as in
 the threshing of the corn, where the Art makes its instrument, which
 is a natural quality. And in this especially a man ought to be subject
 to the chief and master of the Art. And there are things in which Art
 is the instrument of Nature, and these are lesser Arts; and in these
 the artificers are less subject to their chief, as in giving the seed
 to the Earth, where one must await the will of Nature; as to sail out
 of the harbour or port, where one must await the natural disposition
 of the weather; and therefore we often see in these things contention
 amongst the artificers, and the greater to ask counsel of the lesser.
 And there are other things which are not Arts, but appear to have some
 relationship with them; and therefore men are often deceived; and in
 these the scholars are not subject to a master, neither are they bound
 to believe in him so far as regards the Art. Thus, to fish seems to
 have some relationship with navigation; and to know the virtue of the
 herb or grass seems to have some relationship with agriculture; for
 these Arts have no general rule, since fishing may be below the Art of
 hunting, and beneath its command; to know the virtue of the herb may
 be below the science of medicine, or rather below its most noble
 teaching.
 
 Those things which have been argued concerning the other Arts in like
 manner may be seen in the Imperial Art, for there are rules in those
 Arts which are pure or simple Arts, as are the laws of marriage, of
 servants, of armies, of successors in offices of dignity; and in all
 these we may be entirely subject to the Emperor without doubt and
 without any suspicion whatever. There are other laws which are the
 followers of Nature, such as to constitute a man of sufficient age to
 fill some office in the administration; and to such a law as this we
 are entirely subject; there are many others which appear to have some
 relationship with the Imperial Art; and here he was and is deceived
 who believes that the Imperial judgment in this part may be authentic,
 as of youth, whose nature is laid down by no Imperial judgment, as it
 were, of the Emperor. Render, therefore, unto God that which is God's.
 Wherefore it is not to be believed, nor to be allowed, because it was
 said by Nero the Emperor that youth is beauty and strength of body;
 but credit would be given to the philosopher who should say that youth
 is the crown or summit of the natural life. And therefore it is
 evident that to define Nobility is not the function of the Art
 Imperial; and if it is not in the nature of the Art, when we are
 treating of Nobility we are not subject to it; and if we are not
 subject, we are not bound to yield reverence therein; and this is the
 conclusion we have sought.
 
 Now, therefore, with all freedom, with all liberty of mind, it remains
 to strike to the heart the vicious opinions, thereby causing them to
 fall to earth, in order that the Truth by means of this my victory may
 hold the field in the mind of him for whom it is good that this Light
 should shine clear.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X.
 
 
 Since the opinions of others concerning Nobility have now been brought
 forward, and since it has been shown that it is lawful for me to
 confute those opinions, I shall now proceed to discourse concerning
 that part of the Song which confutes those opinions, beginning, as has
 been said above: "Whoever shall define The man a living tree." And
 therefore it is to be known that in the opinion of the Emperor,
 although it states it defectively in one part, that is, where he spoke
 of "generous ways," he alluded to the manners of the Nobility; and
 therefore the Song does not intend to reprove that part: the other
 part, which is entirely opposed to the nature of Nobility, it does
 intend to confute, which cites two things when it says: "Descent of
 wealth," "The wealth has long been great," that is, time and riches,
 which are entirely apart from Nobility, as has been said, and as will
 be shown farther on; and, therefore, in this confutation two divisions
 are made: in the first we deny the Nobility of riches, then confute
 the idea that time can cause Nobility. The second part begins: "They
 will not have the vile Turn noble."
 
 It is to be known that, riches being reproved, not only is the opinion
 of the Emperor reproved in that part which alludes to the riches, but
 also entirely that opinion of the common people, which was founded
 solely upon riches. The first part is divided into two: in the first
 it says in a general way that the Emperor was erroneous in his
 definition of Nobility; secondly, it shows the reason why or how that
 is; and this begins that second part, "For riches make no Nobleman."
 
 I say, then, "Whoever shall define The man a living tree," that,
 firstly, he will speak untruth, inasmuch as he says "tree," and "less
 than truth," inasmuch as he says "living," and does not say rational,
 which is the difference whereby Man is distinguished from the Beast.
 Then I say that in this way he was erroneous in his definition, he who
 held Imperial Office, not saying Emperor, but "one raised to Empire,"
 to indicate, as has been said above, that this question is beyond the
 bounds of the Imperial Office. In like manner I say that he errs who
 places a false subject under Nobility, that is, "descent of wealth,"
 and then proceeds to a defective form, or rather difference, that is,
 "generous ways," which do not contain any essential part of Nobility,
 but only a small part, as will appear below. And it is not to be
 omitted, although the text may be silent, that my Lord the Emperor in
 this part did not err in the parts of the definition, but only in the
 mode of the definition, although, according to what fame reports of
 him, he was a logician and a great scholar; that is to say, the
 definition of Nobility can be made more sufficiently by the effects
 than by the principles or premisses, since it appears to have the
 place of a first principle or premiss, which it is not possible to
 notify by first things, but by subsequent things. Then, when I say,
 "For riches make not worth," I show how they cannot possibly be the
 cause of Nobility, because they are vile. And I prove that they have
 not the power to take it away, because they are disjoined so much from
 Nobility. And I prove these to be vile by an especial and most evident
 defect; and I do this when I say, "How vile and incomplete." Finally,
 I conclude, by virtue of that which is said above:
 
     And hence the upright mind,
       To its own purpose true,
     Stands firm although the flood of wealth
       Sweep onward out of view;
 
 which proves that which is said above, that those riches are disunited
 from Nobility by not following the effect of union with it. Where it
 is to be known that, as the Philosopher expresses it, all the things
 which make anything must first exist perfectly within the being of the
 thing out of which that other thing is made. Wherefore he says in the
 seventh chapter of the Metaphysics: "When one thing is generated from
 another, it is generated of that thing by being in that Being."
 
 Again, it is to be known that each thing which becomes corrupt is thus
 corrupted by some change or alteration, and each thing which is
 changed or altered must be conjoined with the cause of the change,
 even as the Philosopher expresses it in the seventh chapter of the
 book on Physics and in the first chapter on Generation. These things
 being propounded, I proceed thus, and I say that riches, as another
 man believed, cannot possibly bestow Nobility, and to prove how great
 is the difference between them I say that they are unable to take
 Nobility away from him who possesses it. To bestow it they have not
 the power, since by nature they are vile, and because of their
 vileness they are opposed to Nobility. And here by vileness one means
 baseness, through degeneracy, which is directly opposite to Nobility:
 for the one opposite thing cannot be the maker of the other, neither
 is it possible to be, for the reason given above, which is briefly
 added to the text, saying, "No painter gives a form That is not of his
 knowing." Wherefore no painter would be able to depict any figure or
 form if he could not first design what such figure or form ought to
 be.
 
 Again, riches cannot take it away, because they are so far from
 Nobility; and, for the reason previously narrated, that which alters
 or corrupts anything must be conjoined with that thing, and therefore
 it is subjoined: "No tower leans above a stream That far away is
 flowing," which means nothing more than to accord with that which has
 been previously said, that riches cannot take Nobility away, saying
 that Nobility is, as it were, an upright tower and riches a river
 flowing swiftly in the distance.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI.
 
 
 It now remains only to prove how vile riches are, and how disjoined
 and far apart they are from Nobility; and this is proved in two little
 parts of the text, to which at present it is requisite to pay
 attention, and then, those being explained, what I have said will be
 evident, namely, that riches are vile and far apart from Nobility, and
 hereby the reasons stated above against riches will be perfectly
 proved.
 
 I say then, "How vile and incomplete Wealth is," and to make evident
 what I intend to say it is to be known that the vileness or baseness
 of each thing is derived from the imperfection of that thing, and
 Nobility from its perfection: wherefore in proportion as a thing is
 perfect, it is noble in its nature; in proportion as it is imperfect,
 it is vile. And therefore, if riches are imperfect, it is evident that
 they are vile or base. And that they are imperfect, the text briefly
 proves when it says: "However great the heap may be, It brings no
 peace, but care;" in which it is evident, not only that they are
 imperfect, but most imperfect, and therefore they are most vile; and
 Lucan bears witness to this when he says, speaking of those same
 riches: "Without strife or contention or opposition, the Laws would
 perish, and you, Riches, the basest part of things, you move or are
 the cause of Battles." It is possible briefly to see their
 imperfection in three things quite clearly: firstly, in the
 indiscriminate manner in which they fall to a person's lot; secondly,
 in their dangerous increase; thirdly, in their hurtful possession.
 
 And, firstly, that which I demonstrate concerning this is to clear up
 a doubt which seems to arise, for, since gold, pearls, and lands, may
 have in their essential being perfect form and act, it does not seem
 true to say that they are imperfect. And therefore one must
 distinguish that inasmuch as by themselves, of them it is considered,
 they are perfect things, and they are not riches, but gold and pearls;
 but inasmuch as they are appointed to the possession of man they are
 riches, and in this way they are full of imperfection; which is not an
 unbecoming or impossible thing, considered from different points of
 view, to be perfect and imperfect. I say that their imperfection
 firstly may be observed in the indiscretion, or unwisdom, or folly, of
 their arrival, in which no distributive Justice shines forth, but
 complete iniquity almost always; which iniquity is the proper effect
 of imperfection. For if the methods or ways by which they come are
 considered, all may be gathered together in three methods, or kinds of
 ways: for, either they come by simple chance, as when without
 intention or hope they come upon some discovery not thought of; or
 they come by fortune which is aided by law or right, as by will, or
 testament, or succession; or they come by fortune, the helper of the
 Law, as by lawful or unlawful provision; lawful, I say, when by art,
 or skill, or by trade, or deserved kindness; unlawful, I say, when
 either by theft or rapine. And in each one of these three ways, one
 sees that inequitable character of which I speak, for more often to
 the wicked than to the good the hidden treasures which are discovered
 present themselves; and this is so evident, that it has no need of
 proof. I saw the place in the side of a hill, or mountain, in Tuscany,
 which is called Falterona, where the most vile peasant of all the
 country, whilst digging, found more than a bushel of the finest
 Santelena silver, which had awaited him perhaps for more than a
 thousand years. And in order to see this iniquity, Aristotle said that
 in proportion as the Man is subject to the Intellect, so much the less
 is he the slave of Fortune. And I say that oftener to the wicked than
 to the good befall legal inheritance and property by succession; and
 concerning this I do not wish to bring forward any proof, but let each
 one turn his eyes round his own immediate neighbourhood, and he will
 see that concerning which I am silent that I may not offend or bring
 shame to some one. Would to God that might be which was demanded by
 the Man of Provence, namely, that the man who is not the heir of
 goodness should lose the inheritance of wealth. And I say that many
 times to the wicked more than to the good comes rich provision, for
 the unlawful never comes to the good, because they refuse it; and what
 good man ever would endeavour to enrich himself by force or fraud?
 That would be impossible, for by the mere choice of the enterprise he
 would no more be good. And the lawful gains of wealth but rarely fall
 to the lot of the good, because, since much anxiety or anxious care is
 required therein, and the solicitude of the good is directed to
 greater things, the good man is rarely solicitous enough to seek them.
 Wherefore it is evident that in each way these riches fall unjustly or
 inequitably; and therefore our Lord called them wicked or unrighteous
 when He said, "Make to yourselves friends of the Mammon of
 unrighteousness," inviting and encouraging men to be liberal with good
 gifts, which are the begetters of friends. And what a beautiful
 exchange he makes who gives freely of these most imperfect things in
 order to have and to acquire perfect things, such as are the hearts of
 good and worthy men! This exchange it is possible to make every day.
 Certainly this is a new commerce, different from the others, which,
 thinking to win one man by generosity, has won thereby thousands and
 thousands. Who lives not again in the heart of Alexander because of
 his royal beneficence? Who lives not again in the good King of
 Castile, or Saladin, or the good Marquis of Monferrat, or the good
 Count of Toulouse, or Beltramo dal Bornio, or Galasso da Montefeltro,
 when mention is made of their noble acts of courtesy and liberality?
 Certainly not only those who would do the same willingly, had they the
 power, but those even who would die before they would do it, bear love
 to the memory of these good men.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 
 As has been said, it is possible to see the imperfection of riches not
 only in their indiscriminate advent, but also in their dangerous
 increase; and that in this we may perceive their defect more clearly,
 the text makes mention of it, saying of those riches, "However great
 the heap may be It brings no peace, but care;" they create more thirst
 and render increase more defective and insufficient. And here it is
 requisite to know that defective things may fail in such a way that on
 the surface they appear complete, but, under pretext of perfection,
 the shortcoming is concealed. But they may have those defects so
 entirely revealed that the imperfection is seen openly on the surface.
 And those things which do not reveal their defects in the first place
 are the most dangerous, since very often it is not possible to be on
 guard against them; even as we see in the traitor who, before our
 face, shows himself friendly, so that he causes us to have faith in
 him, and under pretext of friendship, hides the defect of his
 hostility. And in this way riches, in their increase, are dangerously
 imperfect, for, submitting to our eyes this that they promise, they
 bring just the contrary. The treacherous gains always promise that, if
 collected up to a certain amount, they will make the collector full of
 every satisfaction; and with this promise they lead the Human Will
 into the vice of Avarice. And, for this reason, Boethius calls them,
 in his book of Consolations, dangerous, saying, "Oh, alas! who was
 that first man who dug up the precious stones that wished to hide
 themselves, and who dug out the loads of gold once covered by the
 hills, dangerous treasures?"
 
 The treacherous ones promise, if we will but look, to remove every
 want, to quench all thirst, to bring satisfaction and sufficiency; and
 this they do to every man in the beginning, confirming promise to a
 certain point in their increase, and then, as soon as their pile
 rises, in place of contentment and refreshment they bring on an
 intolerable fever-thirst; and beyond sufficiency, they extend their
 limit, create a desire to amass more, and, with this, fear and anxiety
 far in excess of the new gain.
 
 Then, truly, they bring no peace, but more care, more trouble, than a
 man had in the first place when he was without them. And therefore
 Tullius says, in that book on Paradoxes, when execrating riches: "I at
 no time firmly believed the money of those men, or magnificent
 mansions, or riches, or lordships, or voluptuous joys, with which
 especially they are shackled, to be amongst things good or desirable,
 since I saw certain men in the abundance of them especially desire
 those wherein they abounded; because at no time is the thirst of
 cupidity quenched; not only are they tormented by the desire for the
 increase of those things which they possess, but also they have
 torment in the fear of losing them." And all these are the words of
 Tullius, and even thus they stand in that book which has been
 mentioned.
 
 And, as a stronger witness to this imperfection, hear Boethius,
 speaking in his book of Consolation: "If the Goddess of Riches were to
 expand and multiply riches till they were as numerous as the sands
 thrown up by the sea when tost by the tempest, or countless as the
 stars that shine, still Man would weep."
 
 And because still further testimony is needful to reduce this to a
 proof, note how much Solomon and his father David exclaim against
 them, how much against them is Seneca, especially when writing to
 Lucilius, how much Horace, how much Juvenal, and, briefly, how much
 every writer, every poet, and how much Divine Scripture. All Truthful
 cries aloud against these false enticers to sin, full of all defect.
 Call to mind also, in aid of faith, what your own eyes have seen, what
 is the life of those men who follow after riches, how far they live
 securely when they have piled them up, what their contentment is, how
 peacefully they rest.
 
 What else daily endangers and destroys cities, countries, individual
 persons, so much as the fresh heaping up of wealth in the possession
 of some man? His accumulation wakens new desires, to the fulfilment of
 which it is not possible to attain without injury to some one.
 
 And what else does the Law, both Canonical and Civil, intend to
 rectify except cupidity or avarice, which grows with its heaps of
 riches, and which the Law seeks to resist or prevent. Truly, the
 Canonical and the Civil Law make it sufficiently clear, if the first
 sections of their written word are read. How evident it is, nay, I say
 it is most evident, that these riches are, in their increase, entirely
 imperfect; when, being amassed, naught else but imperfection can
 possibly spring forth from them. And this is what the text says.
 
 But here arises a doubtful question, which is not to be passed over
 without being put and answered. Some calumniator of the Truth might be
 able to say that if, by increasing desire in their acquisition, riches
 are imperfect and therefore vile, for this reason science or knowledge
 is imperfect and vile, in the acquisition of which the desire steadily
 increases, wherefore Seneca says, "If I should have one foot in the
 grave, I should still wish to learn."
 
 But it is not true that knowledge is vile through imperfection. By
 distinction of the consequences, increase of desire is not in
 knowledge the cause of vileness. That it is perfect is evident, for
 the Philosopher, in the sixth book of the Ethics, says that science or
 knowledge is the perfect reason of certain things. To this question
 one has to reply briefly; but in the first place it is to be seen
 whether in the acquisition of Knowledge the desire for it is enlarged
 in the way suggested by the question, and whether the argument be
 rational. Wherefore I say that not only in the acquisition of
 knowledge and riches, but in each and every acquisition, human desire
 expands, although in different ways; and the reason is this: that the
 supreme desire of each thing bestowed by Nature in the first place is
 to return to its first source. And since God is the First Cause of our
 Souls, and the Maker of them after His Own Image, as it is written,
 "Let us make Man in Our Image, after Our likeness," the Soul
 especially desires to return to that First Cause. As a pilgrim, who
 goes along a path where he never journeyed before, may believe every
 house that he sees in the distance to be his inn, and, not finding it
 to be so, may direct his belief to the next, and so travel on from
 house to house until he reach the inn, even so our Soul, as soon as it
 enters the untrodden path of this life, directs its eyes to its
 supreme good, the sum of its day's travel to good; and therefore
 whatever thing it sees which seems to have in itself some goodness, it
 thinks to be the supreme good. And because its knowledge at first is
 imperfect, owing to want of experience and want of instruction, good
 things that are but little appear great to it; and therefore in the
 first place it begins to desire those. So we see little children
 desire above all things an apple; and then, growing older, they desire
 a little bird; and then, being older, desire a beautiful garment; and
 then a horse, and then a wife, and then moderate wealth, and then
 greater wealth, and then still more. And this happens because in none
 of these things that is found for which search is made, and as we live
 on we seek further. Wherefore it is possible to see that one desirable
 thing stands under the other in the eyes of our Soul in a way almost
 pyramidal, for the least first covers the whole, and is as it were the
 point of the desirable good, which is God, at the basis of all; so
 that the farther it proceeds from the point towards the basis, so much
 the greater do the desirable good things appear; and this is the
 reason why, by acquisition, human desires become broader the one after
 the other.
 
 But, thus this pathway is lost through error, even as in the roads of
 the earth; for as from one city to another there is of necessity an
 excellent direct road, and often another which branches from that, the
 branch road goes into another part, and of many others some do not go
 all the way, and some go farther round; so in Human Life there are
 different roads, of which one is the truest, and another the most
 misleading, and some are less right, and some less wrong. And as we
 see that the straightest road to the city satisfies desire and gives
 rest after toil, and that which goes in the opposite direction never
 satisfies and never can give rest, so it happens in our Life. The man
 who follows the right path attains his end, and gains his rest. The
 man who follows the wrong path never attains it, but with much fatigue
 of mind and greedy eyes looks always before him.
 
 Wherefore, although this argument does not entirely reply to the
 question asked above, at least it opens the way to the reply, which
 causes us to see that each desire of ours does not proceed in its
 expansion in one way alone. But because this chapter is somewhat
 prolonged, we will reply in a new chapter to the question, wherein may
 be ended the whole disputation which it is our intention to make
 against riches.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII.
 
 
 In reply to the question, I say that it is not possible to affirm
 properly that the desire for knowledge does increase, although, as has
 been said, it does expand in a certain way. For that which properly
 increases is always one; the desire for knowledge is not always one,
 but is many; and one desire fulfilled, another comes; so that,
 properly speaking, its expansion is not its increase, but it is
 advance of a succession of smaller things into great things. For if I
 desire to know the principles of natural things, as soon as I know
 these, that desire is satisfied and there is an end of it. If I then
 desire to know the why and the wherefore of each one of these
 principles, this is a new desire altogether. Nor by the advent of that
 new desire am I deprived of the perfection to which the other might
 lead me. Such an expansion as that is not the cause of imperfection,
 but of new perfection. That expansion of riches, however, is properly
 increased which is always one, so that no succession is seen therein,
 and therefore no end and no perfection.
 
 And if the adversary would say, that if the desire to know the first
 principles of natural things is one thing, and the desire to know what
 they are is another, so is the desire for a hundred marks one thing,
 and the desire for a thousand marks is another, I reply that it is not
 true; for the hundred is part of the thousand and is related to it, as
 part of a line to the whole of the line along which one proceeds by
 one impulse alone; and there is no succession there, nor completion of
 motion in any part. But to know what the principles of natural things
 are is not the same as to know what each one of them is; the one is
 not part of the other, and they are related to each other as diverging
 lines along which one does not proceed by one impulse, but the
 completed movement of the one succeeds the completed movement of the
 other. And thus it appears that, because of the desire for knowledge,
 knowledge is not to be called imperfect in the same way as riches are
 to be called imperfect, on account of the desire for them, as the
 question put it; for in the desire for knowledge the desires terminate
 successively with the attainment of their aims; and in the desire for
 riches, NO; so that the question is solved.
 
 Again, the adversary may calumniate, saying that, although many
 desires are fulfilled in the acquisition of knowledge, the last is
 never attained, which is the imperfection of that one desire, which
 does not gain its end; and that will be both one and imperfect.
 
 Again one here replies that it is not a truth which is brought forward
 in opposition, that is, that the last desire is never attained; for
 our natural desires, as is proved in the third treatise of this book,
 are all tending to a certain end; and the desire for knowledge is
 natural, so that this desire compasses a certain end, although but
 few, since they walk in the wrong path, accomplish the day's journey.
 And he who understands the Commentator in the third chapter, On the
 Soul, learns this of him; and therefore Aristotle says, in the tenth
 chapter of the Ethics, against Simonides the Poet, that man ought to
 draw near to Divine things as much as is possible; wherein he shows
 that our power tends towards a certain end. And in the first book of
 the Ethics he says that the disciplined Mind demands certainty in its
 knowledge of things in proportion as their nature received certainty,
 in which he proves that not only on the side of the man desiring
 knowledge, but on the side of the desired object of knowledge,
 attention ought to be given; and therefore St. Paul says: "Not much
 knowledge, but right knowledge in moderation." So that in whatever way
 the desire for knowledge is considered, either generally or
 particularly, it comes to perfection.
 
 And since knowledge is a noble perfection, and through the desire for
 it its perfection is not lost, as is the case with the accursed
 riches, we must note briefly how injurious they are when possessed,
 and this is the third notice of their imperfection. It is possible to
 see that the possession of them is injurious for two reasons: one,
 that it is the cause of evil; the other, that it is the privation of
 good. It is the cause of evil, which makes the timid possessor
 wakeful, watchful, and suspicious or hateful.
 
 How great is the fear of that man who knows he carries wealth about
 him, when walking abroad, when dwelling at home, when not only wakeful
 or watching, but when sleeping, not only the fear that he may lose his
 property, but fear for his life because he possesses these riches!
 Well do the miserable merchants know, who travel through the World,
 that the leaves which the wind stirs on the trees cause them to
 tremble when they are bearing their wealth with them; and when they
 are without it, full of confidence they go singing and talking, and
 thus make their journey shorter! Therefore the Wise Man says: "If the
 traveller enters on his road empty, he can sing in the presence of
 thieves." And this Lucan desires to express in the fifth book, when he
 praises the safety of poverty: "O, the safe and secure liberty of the
 poor Life! O, narrow dwelling-places and thrift! O, not again deem
 riches to be of the Gods! In what temples and within what palace walls
 could this be, that is to have no fear, in some tumult or other, of
 striking the hand of Caesar?"
 
 And Lucan says this when he depicts how Caesar came by night to the
 little house of the fisher Amyclas to cross the Adriatic Sea. And how
 great is the hatred that each man bears to the possessor of riches,
 either through envy, or from the desire to take possession of his
 wealth! So true it is, that often and often, contrary to due filial
 piety, the son meditates the death of the father; and most great and
 most evident experience of this the Italians can have, both on the
 banks of the Po and on the banks of the Tiber. And therefore Boethius
 in the second chapter of his Consolations says: "Certainly Avarice
 makes men hateful."
 
 Nay, their possession is privation of good, for, possessing those
 riches, a man does not give freely with generosity, which is a virtue,
 which is a perfect good, and which makes men magnificent and beloved;
 which does not lie in possession of those riches, but in ceasing to
 possess them. Wherefore Boethius in the same book says: "Then money is
 good when, bartered for other things, by the use of generosity one no
 longer possesses it." Wherefore the baseness of riches is sufficiently
 proved by all these remarks of his; and therefore the man with an
 upright desire and true knowledge never loves them; and, not loving
 them, he does not unite himself to them, but always desires them to be
 far from himself, except inasmuch as they are appointed to some
 necessary service; and it is a reasonable thing, since the perfect
 cannot be united with the imperfect. So we see that the curved line
 never joins the straight line, and if there be any conjunction, it is
 not of line to line, but of point to point. And thus it follows that
 the Mind which is upright in desire, and truthful in knowledge, is not
 disheartened at the loss of wealth: as the text asserts at the end of
 that part. And by this the text intends to prove that riches are as a
 river flowing in the distance past the upright tower of Reason, or
 rather of Nobility; and that these riches cannot take Nobility away
 from him who has it. And in this manner in the present Song it is
 argued against riches.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV.
 
 
 Having confuted the error of other men in that part wherein it was
 advanced in support of riches, it remains now to confute it in that
 part where Time is said to be a cause of Nobility, saying, "Descent of
 wealth;" and this reproof or confutation is made in that part which
 begins: "They will not have the vile Turn noble." And in the first
 place one confutes this by means of an argument taken from those men
 themselves who err in this way; then, to their greater confusion, this
 their argument is also destroyed; and it does this when it says, "It
 follows then from this." Finally it concludes, their error being
 evident, and it being therefore time to attend to the Truth; and it
 does this when it says, "Sound intellect reproves."
 
 I say, then, "They will not have the vile Turn noble." Where it is to
 be known that the opinion of these erroneous persons is, that a man
 who is a peasant in the first place can never possibly be called a
 Nobleman; and the man who is the son of a peasant in like manner can
 never be Noble; and this breaks or destroys their own argument when
 they say that Time is requisite to Nobility, adding that word
 "descent." For it is impossible by process of Time to come to the
 generation of Nobility in this way of theirs, which declares it to be
 impossible for the humble peasant to become Noble by any work that he
 may do, or through any accident; and declares the mutation of a
 peasant father into a Noble son to be impossible. For if the son of
 the peasant is also a peasant, and his son again is also a peasant,
 and so always, it will never be possible to discover the place where
 Nobility can begin to be established by process of Time.
 
 And if the adversary, wishing to defend himself, should say that
 Nobility will begin at that period of Time when the low estate of the
 ancestors will be forgotten, I reply that this goes against
 themselves, for even of necessity there will be a transmutation of
 peasant into Noble, from one man into another, or from father to son,
 which is against that which they propound.
 
 And if the adversary should defend himself pertinaciously, saying that
 indeed they do desire that it should be possible for this
 transmutation to take place when the low estate of the ancestors
 passes into oblivion, although the text takes no notice of this, it is
 right that the Commentary should reply to it. And therefore I reply
 thus: that from this which they say there follow four very great
 difficulties, so that it cannot possibly be a good argument. One is,
 that in proportion as Human Nature might become better, the slower
 would be the generation of Nobility, which is a very great
 inconvenience; since in proportion as a thing is honoured for its
 excellence, so much the more is it the cause of goodness; and Nobility
 is reckoned amongst the good. What this means is shown thus: If
 Nobility, which I understand as a good thing, should be generated by
 oblivion, Nobility would be generated in proportion to the speediness
 with which men might be forgotten, for so much the sooner would
 oblivion descend upon all. Hence, in proportion as men might be
 forgotten, so much the sooner would they be Noble; and, on the
 contrary, in proportion to the length of time during which they were
 held in remembrance, so much the longer it would be before they could
 be ennobled.
 
 The second difficulty is, that in nothing apart from men would it be
 possible to make this distinction, that is to say, Noble or Vile,
 which is very inconvenient; since, in each species of things we see
 the image of Nobility or of Baseness, wherefore we often call one
 horse noble and one vile; and one falcon noble and one vile; and one
 pearl noble and one vile. And that it would not be possible to make
 this distinction is thus proved; if the oblivion of the humble
 ancestors is the cause of Nobility, or rather the baseness of the
 ancestors never was, it is not possible for oblivion of them to be,
 since oblivion is a destruction of remembrance, and in those other
 animals, and in plants, and in minerals, lowness and loftiness are not
 observed, since in one they are natural or innate and in an equal
 state, and Nobility cannot possibly be in their generation, and
 likewise neither can vileness nor baseness; since one regards the one
 and the other as habit and privation, which are possible to occur in
 the same subject; and therefore in them it would not be possible for a
 distinction to exist between the one and the other.
 
 And if the adversary should wish to say, that in other things Nobility
 is represented by the goodness of the thing, but in a man it is
 understood because there is no remembrance of his humble or base
 condition, one would wish to reply not with words, but with the sword,
 to such bestiality as it would be to give to other things goodness as
 a cause for Nobility, and to found the Nobility of men upon
 forgetfulness or oblivion as a first cause.
 
 The third difficulty is, that often the person or thing generated
 would come before the generator, which is quite impossible; and it is
 possible to prove this thus: Let us suppose that Gherardo da Cammino
 might have been the grandson of the most vile peasant who ever drank
 of the Sile or of the Cagnano, and that oblivion had not yet overtaken
 his grandfather; who will be bold enough to say that Gherardo da
 Cammino was a vile man? and who will not agree with me in saying that
 he was Noble? Certainly no one, however presumptuous he may wish to
 be, for he was so, and his memory will always be treasured. If
 oblivion had not yet overtaken his ancestor, as is proposed in
 opposition, so that he might be great through Nobility, and the
 Nobility in him might be seen so clearly, even as one does see it,
 then it would have been first in him before the founder of his
 Nobility could have existed; and this is impossible in the extreme.
 
 The fourth difficulty is, that such a man, the supposed grandfather,
 would have been held Noble after he was dead who was not Noble whilst
 alive; and a more inconvenient thing could not be. One proves it thus:
 Let us suppose that in the age of Dardanus there might be a
 remembrance of his low ancestors, and let us suppose that in the age
 of Laomedon this memory might have passed away, and that oblivion had
 overtaken it. According to the adverse opinion, Laomedon was Noble and
 Dardanus was vile, each in his lifetime. We, to whom the remembrance
 of the ancestors of Dardanus has not come, shall we say that Dardanus
 living was vile, and dead a Noble? And is not this contrary to the
 legend which says that Dardanus was the son of Jupiter (for such is
 the fable, which one ought not to regard whilst disputing
 philosophically); and yet if the adversary might wish to find support
 in the fable, certainly that which the fable veils destroys his
 arguments. And thus it is proved that the argument, which asserted
 that oblivion is the cause of Nobility, is false.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV.
 
 
 Since, by their own argument, the Song has confuted them, and proved
 that Time is not requisite to Nobility, it proceeds immediately to
 confound their premisses, since of their false arguments no rust
 remains in the mind which is disposed towards Truth; and this it does
 when it says, "It follows then from this." Where it is to be known
 that if it is not possible for a peasant to become a Noble, or for a
 Noble son to be born of a humble father, as is advanced in their
 opinion, of two difficulties one must follow.
 
 The first is, that there can be no Nobility; the other is, that the
 World may have been always full of men, so that from one alone the
 Human Race cannot be descended; and this it is possible to prove.
 
 If Nobility is not generated afresh, and it has been stated many times
 that such is the basis of their opinion, the peasant man not being
 able to beget it in himself, or the humble father to pass it on to his
 son, the man always is the same as he was born; and such as the father
 was born, so is the son born; and so this process from one condition
 onwards is reached even by the first parent; for such as was the first
 father, that is, Adam, so must the whole Human Race be, because from
 him to the modern nations it will not be possible to find, according
 to that argument, any change whatever. Then, if Adam himself was
 Noble, we are all Noble; if he was vile, we are all vile or base;
 which is no other than to remove the distinction between these
 conditions, and thus it is to remove the conditions.
 
 And the Song states this, which follows from what is advanced, saying,
 "That all are high or base." And if this is not so, then any nation is
 to be called Noble, and any is to be called vile, of necessity.
 Transmutation from vileness into Nobility being thus taken away, the
 Human Race must be descended from different ancestors, that is, some
 from Nobles and some from vile persons, and so the Song says, "Or that
 in Time there never was Beginning to our race," that is to say, one
 beginning; it does not say beginnings. And this is most false
 according to the Philosopher, according to our Faith, which cannot
 lie, according to the Law and ancient belief of the Gentiles. For
 although the Philosopher does not assert the succession from one first
 man, yet he would have one essential being to be in all men, which
 cannot possibly have different origins. And Plato would have that all
 men depend upon one idea alone, and not on more or many, which is to
 give them only one beginning. And undoubtedly Aristotle would laugh
 very loudly if he heard of two species to be made out of the Human
 Race, as of horses and asses; and (may Aristotle forgive me) one might
 call those men asses who think in this way. For according to our Faith
 (which is to be preserved in its entirety) it is most false, as
 Solomon makes evident where he draws a distinction between men and the
 brute animals, for he calls men "all the sons of Adam," and this he
 does when he says: "Who knows if the spirits of the sons of Adam mount
 upwards, and if those of the beasts go downwards?" And that it is
 false according to the Gentiles, let the testimony of Ovid in the
 first chapter of his Metamorphoses prove, where he treats of the
 constitution of the World according to the Pagan belief, or rather
 belief of the Gentiles, saying: "Man is born "--he did not say "Men;"
 he said, "Man is born," or rather, "that the Artificer of all things
 made him from Divine seed, or that the new earth, but lately parted
 from the noble ether, retained seeds of the kindred Heaven, which,
 mingled with the water of the river, formed the son of Japhet into an
 image of the Gods, who govern all." Where evidently he asserts the
 first man to have been one alone; and therefore the Song says, "But
 that I cannot hold," that is, to the opinion that man had not one
 beginning; and the Song subjoins, "Nor yet if Christians they." And it
 says Christians, not Philosophers, or rather Gentiles, whose opinion
 also is adverse, because the Christian opinion is of greater force,
 and is the destroyer of all calumny, thanks to the supreme light of
 Heaven, which illuminates it.
 
 Then when I say, "Sound intellect reproves their words As false, and
 turns away," I conclude this error to be confuted, and I say that it
 is time to open the eyes to the Truth; and this is expressed when I
 say, "And now I seek to tell, As it appears to me." It is now evident
 to sound minds that the words of those men are vain, that is, without
 a crumb or particle of Truth; and I say sound not without cause. Our
 intellect may be said to be sound or unsound. And I say intellect for
 the noble part of our Soul, which it is possible to designate by the
 common word "Mind." It may be called sound or healthy, when it is not
 obstructed in its action by sickness of mind or body, which is to know
 what things are, as Aristotle expresses it in the third chapter on the
 Soul.
 
 For, owing to the sickness of the Soul, I have seen three horrible
 infirmities in the minds of men.
 
 One is caused by natural vanity, for many men are so presumptuous that
 they believe they know everything, and, owing to this, they assert
 things to be facts which are not facts. Tullius especially execrates
 this vice in the first chapter of the Offices, and St. Thomas in his
 book against the Gentiles, saying: "There are many men, so
 presumptuous in their conceit, who believe that they can compass all
 things with their intellect, deeming all that appears to them to be
 true, and count as false that which does not appear to them." Hence it
 arises that they never attain to any knowledge; believing themselves
 to be sufficiently learned, they never inquire, they never listen;
 they desire to be inquired of, and when a question is put, bad enough
 is their reply. Of those men Solomon speaks in Proverbs: "Seest thou a
 man that is hasty in his words? there is more hope of a fool than of
 him."
 
 Another infirmity of mind is caused by natural weakness or smallness,
 for many men are so vilely obstinate or stubborn that they cannot
 believe that it is possible either for them or for others to know
 things; and such men as these never of themselves seek knowledge, nor
 ever reason; for what other men say, they care not at all. And against
 these men Aristotle speaks in the first book of the Ethics, declaring
 those men to be insufficient or unsatisfactory hearers of Moral
 Philosophy. Those men always live, like beasts, a life of grossness,
 the despair of all learning.
 
 The third infirmity of mind is caused by the levity of nature; for
 many men are of such light fancy that in all their arguments they go
 astray, and even when they make a syllogism and have concluded, from
 that conclusion they fly off into another, and it seems to them most
 subtle argument. They start not from any true beginning, and truly
 they see nothing true in their imagination. Of those men the
 Philosopher says that it is not right to trouble about them, or to
 have business with them, saying, in the first book of Physics, that
 against him who denies the first postulate it is not right to dispute.
 And of such men as these are many idiots, who may not know their A B
 C, and who would wish to dispute in Geometry, in Astrology, and in the
 Science of Physics.
 
 Also through sickness or defect of body, it is possible for the Mind
 to be unsound or sick; even as through some primal defect at birth, as
 with those who are born fools, or through alteration in the brain, as
 with the madmen. And of this mental infirmity the Law speaks when it
 says: "In him who makes a Will or Testament, at the time when he makes
 the Will or Testament, health of mind, not health of body, is
 required."
 
 But to those intellects which from sickness of mind or body are not
 infirm, but are free, diligent, and whole in the light of Truth, I say
 it must be evident that the opinion of the people, which has been
 stated above, is vain, that is, without any value whatever, worthless.
 
 Afterwards the Song subjoins that I thus judge them to be false and
 vain; and this it does when it says, "Sound intellect reproves their
 words As false, and turns away." And afterwards I say that it is time
 to demonstrate or prove the Truth; and I say that it is now right to
 state what kind of thing true Nobility is, and how it is possible to
 know the man in whom it exists; and I speak of this where I say:
 
     And now I seek to tell
       As it appears to me,
     What is, whence comes, what signs attest
       A true Nobility.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 
 "The King shall rejoice in God, and all those shall be praised who
 swear by him, for closed is the mouth of those who speak wicked
 things." These words I can here propound in all truth; because each
 true King ought especially to love the Truth. Wherefore it is written
 in the Book of Wisdom, "Love the Light of Wisdom, you, who stand
 before, the people," and the Light of Wisdom is this same Truth. I
 say, then, every King shall rejoice that the most false and most
 injurious opinion of the wicked and deceitful men who have up to this
 time spoken iniquitously of Nobility is confuted.
 
 It is now requisite to proceed to the discussion of the Truth
 according to the division made above, in the third chapter of the
 present treatise. This second part, then, which begins, "I say that
 from one root Each Virtue firstly springs," intends to describe this
 Nobility according to the Truth, and this part is divided into two:
 for in the first the intention is to prove what this Nobility is; and
 in the second how it is possible to recognize him in whom it dwells,
 and this second part begins, "Such virtue shows its good." The first
 part, again, has two parts; for in the first certain things are sought
 for which are needful in order to perceive the definition of Nobility;
 in the second, one looks for its definition, and this second part
 begins, "Where virtue is, there is A Nobleman."
 
 That we may enter perfectly into the treatise, two things are to be
 considered in the first place. The one is, what is meant by this word
 Nobility, taken alone, in its simple meaning; the other is, in what
 path it is needful to walk in order to search out the before-named
 definition. I say, then, that, if we will pay attention to the common
 use of speech, by this word Nobility is understood the perfection of
 its own nature in each thing; wherefore it is predicated not only of
 the man, but also of all things; for the man calls a stone noble, a
 plant or tree noble, a horse noble, a falcon noble, whatever is seen
 to be perfect in its nature. And therefore Solomon says in
 Ecclesiastes, "Blessed is the land whose King is Noble;" which is no
 other than saying, whose King is perfect according to the perfection
 of the mind and body; and he thus makes this evident by that which he
 says previously, when he writes, "Woe unto the land whose King is a
 child." For that is not a perfect man, and a man is a child, if not by
 age, yet by his disordered manners and by the evil or defect of his
 life, as the Philosopher teaches in the first book of the Ethics.
 
 There are some foolish people who believe that by this word Noble is
 meant that which is to be named and known by many men; and they say
 that it comes from a verb which stands for _to know_, that is,
 _nosco_. But this is most false, for, if this could be, those
 things which were most named and best known in their species would in
 their species be the most noble. Thus the obelisk of St. Peter would
 be the most noble stone in the world; and Asdente, the shoemaker of
 Parma, would be more Noble than any one of his fellow-citizens; and
 Albuino della Scala would be more Noble than Guido da Castello di
 Reggio. Each one of those things is most false, and therefore it is
 most false that _nobile_ (noble) can come from _cognoscere_,
 to know. It comes from _non vile_ (not vile); wherefore
 _nobile_ (noble) is as it were _non vile_ (not vile).
 
 This perfection the Philosopher means in the seventh chapter of
 Physics, when he says: "Each thing is especially perfect when it
 touches and joins its own proper or relative virtue; and then it is
 especially perfect according to its nature. It is, then, possible to
 call the circle perfect when it is truly a circle, that is, when it is
 joined with its own proper or relative virtue, it is then complete in
 its nature, and it may then be called a noble circle." This is when
 there is a point in it which is equally distant from the
 circumference. That circle which has the figure of an egg loses its
 virtue and it is not Noble, nor that circle which has the form of an
 almost full moon, because in that its nature is not perfect. And thus
 evidently it is possible to see that commonly, or in a general sense,
 this word Nobility, expresses in all things perfection of their
 nature, and this is that for which one seeks primarily in order to
 enter more clearly into the discussion of that part which it is
 intended to explain.
 
 Secondly, it remains to be seen how one must proceed in order to find
 the definition of Human Nobility to which the present argument leads.
 I say, then, that since in those things which are of one species, as
 are all men, it is not possible by essential first principles to
 define their highest perfection, it is necessary to know and to define
 that by their effects. Therefore one reads in the Gospel of St.
 Matthew, when Christ speaks, "Beware of false prophets: by their
 fruits ye shall know them." And in a direct way the definition we seek
 is to be seen by the fruits, which are the moral and intellectual
 virtues of which this Nobility is the seed, as in its definition will
 be fully evident.
 
 And these are those two things we must see before one can proceed to
 the others, as is said in the previous part of this chapter.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII.
 
 
 Since those two things which it seemed needful to understand before
 the text could be proceeded with have been seen and understood, it now
 remains to proceed with the text and to explain it, and the text then
 begins:
 
     I say that from one root
       Each Virtue firstly springs,
     Virtue, I mean, that Happiness
       To man, by action, brings
 
 And I subjoin:
 
     This, as the Ethics teach,
       Is habit of right choice;
 
 placing the whole definition of the Moral Virtues as it is defined by
 the Philosopher in the second book of Ethics, in which two things
 principally are understood. One is, that each Virtue comes from one
 first principle or original cause; the other is, that by "Each Virtue"
 I mean the Moral Virtues, and this is evident from the words, "This,
 as the Ethics teach"
 
 Hence it is to be known that our most right and proper fruits are the
 Moral Virtues, since on every side they are in our power; and these
 are differently distinguished and enumerated by different
 philosophers. But it seems to me right to omit the opinion of other
 men in that part where the divine opinion of Aristotle is stated by
 word of mouth, and therefore, wishing to describe what those Moral
 Virtues are, I will pass on, briefly discoursing of them according to
 his opinion.
 
 There are eleven Virtues named by the said Philosopher. The first is
 called Courage, which is sword and bridle to moderate our boldness and
 timidity in things which are the ruin of our life. The second is
 Temperance, which is the law and bridle of our gluttony and of our
 undue abstinence in those things requisite for the preservation of our
 life. The third is Liberality, which is the moderator of our giving
 and of our receiving things temporal. The fourth is Magnificence,
 which is the moderator of great expenditures, making and supporting
 those within certain limits. The fifth is Magnanimity, which is the
 moderator and acquirer of great honours and fame. The sixth is the
 Love of Honour, which is the moderator and regulator to us of the
 honours of this World. The seventh is Mildness, which moderates our
 anger and our excessive or undue patience against our external
 misfortunes. The eighth is Affability, which makes us live on good
 terms with other men. The ninth is called Truth, which makes us
 moderate in boasting ourselves over and above what we are, and in
 depreciating ourselves below what we are in our speech. The tenth is
 called Eutrapelia, pleasantness of intercourse, which makes us
 moderate in joys or pleasures, causing us to use them in due measure.
 The eleventh is Justice, which teaches us to love and to act with
 uprightness in all things.
 
 And each of these Virtues has two collateral enemies, that is to say,
 vices; one in excess and one in defect. And these Moral Virtues are
 the centres or middle stations between them, and those Virtues all
 spring from one root or principle, that is to say, from the habit of
 our own good choice. Wherefore, in a general sense, it is possible to
 say of all, that they are a habit of choice standing firm in due
 moderation; and these are those which make a man happy in their active
 operation, as the Philosopher says in the first book of the Ethics
 when he defines Happiness, saying that Happiness is virtuous action in
 a perfect life.
 
 By many, Prudence, that is, good, judgment or wisdom, is well asserted
 to be a Moral Virtue. But Aristotle numbers that amongst the
 Intellectual Virtues, although it is the guide of the moral, and
 points out the way by which they are formed, and without it they could
 not be. Verily, it is to be known that we can have in this life two
 happinesses or felicities by following two different roads, both good
 and excellent, which lead us to them: the one is the Active Life and
 the other is the Contemplative Life, which (although by the Active
 Life one may attain, as has been said, to a good state of Happiness)
 leads us to supreme Happiness, even as the Philosopher proves in the
 tenth book of the Ethics; and Christ affirms it with His own Lips in
 the Gospel of Luke, speaking to Martha, when replying to her: "Martha,
 Martha, thou art anxious and troubled about many things: verily, one
 thing alone is needful," meaning, that which thou hast in hand; and He
 adds: "Mary has chosen the better part, which shall not be taken away
 from her." And Mary, according to that which is previously written in
 the Gospel, sitting at the feet of Christ, showed no care for the
 service of the house, but listened only to the words of the Saviour.
 
 For if we will explain this in the moral sense, our Lord wished to
 show thereby that the Contemplative Life was supremely good, although
 the Active Life might be good; this is evident to him who will give
 his mind to the words of the Gospel.
 
 It would be possible, however, for any one to say, in argument against
 me: Since the happiness of the Contemplative Life is more excellent
 than that of the Active Life, and both may be, and are, the fruit and
 end of Nobility, why not rather have proceeded in the argument along
 the line of the Intellectual Virtues than of the Moral? To this it is
 possible to reply briefly, that in all instruction it is desirable to
 have regard to the capability of the learner, and to lead him by that
 path which is easiest to him. Wherefore, since the Moral Virtues
 appear to be, and are, more general and more required than the others,
 and are more seen in outward appearances, it was more convenient and
 more useful to proceed along that path than by the other; for thus
 indeed we shall attain to the knowledge of the bees by arguing of
 profit from the wax, as well as by arguing of profit from the honey,
 for both the one and the other proceed from them.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII.
 
 
 In the preceding chapter has been determined how each Moral Virtue
 comes from one root, or first principle, that is, a good habit of
 choice; and the present text bears upon that, until the part which
 begins: "Nobility by right." In this part, then, it proceeds, by a way
 that is allowable, to teach that each Virtue mentioned above, taken
 singly, or otherwise generally, proceeds from Nobility as an effect
 from its cause, and it is founded upon a philosophical proposition,
 which says that, when two things are found to meet in one, both these
 things must be reduced to a third, or one to the other, as an effect
 to a cause: because one thing having stood first and of itself, it
 cannot exist except it be from one; and if those two could not be both
 the effect of a third, or else one the effect of the other, each would
 have had a separate first cause, which is impossible. It says, then,
 that
 
     Such virtue shows its good
       To others' intellect,
     For when two things agree in one,
       Producing one effect,
 
     One must from other come,
       Or each one from a third,
     If each be as each, and more, then one
       From the other is inferred.
 
 Where it is to be known that here one does not proceed by an evident
 demonstration; as it would be to say that the cold is the generative
 principle of water, when we see the clouds; but certainly by a
 beautiful and suitable induction. For if there are many laudable
 things in us, and one is the principle or first cause of them all,
 reason requires each to be reduced to that first cause, which
 comprehends more things; and this ought more reasonably to be called
 the principle of those things than that which comprehends in itself
 less of their principle. For as the trunk of a tree, which contains or
 encloses all the other branches, ought to be called the first
 beginning and cause of those branches, and not those branches the
 cause of the trunk, so Nobility, which comprehends each and every
 Virtue (as the cause contains the effect) and many other actions or
 operations of ours which are praiseworthy, it ought to be held for
 such; that the Virtue may be reduced to it, rather than to the other
 third which is in us. Finally it says that the position taken (namely,
 that each Moral Virtue comes from one root, and that such Virtue and
 Nobility unite in one thing, as is stated above, and that therefore it
 is requisite to reduce the one to the other, or both to a third; and
 that if the one contains the value of the other and more, from that it
 proceeds rather than from the other third) may be considered as a rule
 established and set forth, as was before intended.
 
 And thus ends this passage and this present part.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX.
 
 
 Since in the preceding part are discussed three certain definite
 things which were necessary to be seen before we define, if possible,
 this good thing of which we speak, it is right to proceed to the
 following part, which begins: "Where Virtue is, there is A Nobleman."
 And it is desirable to reduce this into two parts. In the first a
 certain thing is proved, which before has been touched upon and left
 unproved; in the second, concluding, the definition sought is found;
 and this second part begins; "Comes virtue from what's noble, as From
 black comes violet."
 
 In evidence of the first part, it is to be recalled to mind that it
 says previously that, if Nobility is worth more and extends farther
 than Virtue, Virtue rather will proceed from it, which this part now
 proves, namely, that Nobility extends farther, and produces a copy of
 Heaven, saying that wherever there is Virtue there is Nobility. And
 here it is to be known that (as it is written in the Books of the Law,
 and is held as a Rule of the Law) in those things which of themselves
 are evident there is no need of proof; and nothing is more evident
 than that Nobility exists wherever there is Virtue, and each thing,
 commonly speaking, that we see perfect according to its nature is
 worthy to be called Noble. It says then: "So likewise that is Heaven
 Wherein a star is hung, But Heaven may be starless." So there is
 Nobility wherever there is Virtue, and not Virtue wherever there is
 Nobility. And with a beautiful and suitable example; for truly it is a
 Heaven in which many and various stars shine. In this Nobility there
 shine the Moral and the Intellectual Virtues: there shine in it the
 good dispositions bestowed by nature, piety, and religion; the
 praiseworthy passions, as Modesty and Mercy and many others; there
 shine in it the good gifts of the body, that is to say, beauty,
 strength, and almost perpetual health; and so many are the stars which
 stud its Heaven that certainly it is not to be wondered at if they
 produce many and divers effects in Human Nobility; such are the
 natures and the powers of those stars, assembled and contained within
 one simple substance, through the medium of which stars, as through
 different branches, it bears fruit in various ways. Certainly, with
 all earnestness, I make bold to say that Human Nobility, so far as
 many of its fruits are considered, excels that of the Angel, although
 the Angelic may be more Divine in its unity.
 
 Of this Nobility of ours, which fructifies into such fruits and so
 numerous, the Psalmist had perception when he composed that Psalm
 which begins: "O Lord our God, how admirable is Thy Name through all
 the Earth!" where he praises man, as if wondering at the Divine
 affection for this Human Creature, saying: "What is man, that Thou,
 God, dost visit him? Thou hast made him a little lower than the
 Angels; Thou hast crowned him with glory and honour, and placed him
 over the works of Thy hands." Then, truly, it was a beautiful and
 suitable comparison to compare Heaven with Human Nobility.
 
 Then, when the Song says, "In women and the young A modesty is seen,
 Not virtue, noble yet," it proves that Nobility extends into parts
 where Virtue is not; and it says, "noble yet," alluding to Nobility as
 indeed a true safeguard, being where there is shame or modesty, that
 is to say, fear of dishonour, as it is in maidens and youths, where
 shame or modesty is good and praiseworthy; which shame or modesty is
 not virtue, but a certain good passion. And it says, "In women and the
 young," that is to say, in youths; because, as the Philosopher
 expresses it in the fourth book of the Ethics, shame, bashfulness,
 modesty, is not praiseworthy nor good in the old nor in men of
 studious habits, because to them it is fit that they beware of those
 things which would lead them to shame. In youths and maidens such
 caution is not so much required, and therefore in them the fear of
 receiving dishonour through some fault is praiseworthy. It springs
 from Nobility, and it is possible to account their timid bashfulness
 to be Nobility. Baseness and ignoble ways produce impudence: wherefore
 it is a good and excellent sign of Nobility in children and persons of
 tender years when, after some fault, their shame is painted in their
 face, which blush of shame is then the fruit of true Nobility.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 
 When it proceeds to say, "Comes virtue from what's noble, as From
 black comes violet," the text advances to the desired definition of
 Nobility, by which one may see what this Nobility is of which so many
 people speak erroneously. It says then, drawing a conclusion from that
 which has been said before, that each Virtue, or rather its generator,
 that is to say, the habit of right choice, which stands firm in due
 moderation, will spring forth from this, that is, Nobility. And it
 gives an example in the colours, saying, as from the black the violet,
 so this Virtue springs from Nobility. The violet is a mixed colour of
 purple and black, but the black prevails, and the colour is named from
 it. And thus the Virtue is a mixed thing of Nobility and Passion; but,
 because Nobility prevails, the Virtue takes its name from it, and is
 called Goodness. Then afterwards it argues, by that which has been
 said, that no man ought to say boastfully, "I am of such and such a
 race or family;" nor ought he to believe that he is of this Nobility
 unless the fruits of it are in him. And immediately it renders a
 reason, saying that those who have this Grace, that is to say, this
 Divine thing, are almost Gods as it were, without spot of vice, and no
 one has the power to bestow this except God alone, with whom there is
 no respect of persons, even as Divine Scripture makes manifest. And it
 does not appear too extravagant when it says, "They are as Gods," for
 as it is argued previously in the seventh chapter of the third
 treatise, even as there are men most vile and bestial so are men most
 Noble and Divine. And this Aristotle proves in the seventh chapter of
 Ethics by the text of Homer the poet; therefore, let not those men who
 are of the Uberti of Florence, nor those of the Visconti of Milan,
 say, "Because I am of such a family or race, I am Noble," for the
 Divine seed falls not into a race of men, that is, into a family; but
 it falls into individual persons, and, as will be proved below, the
 family does not make individual persons Noble, but the individual
 persons make the family Noble.
 
 Then when it says, "God only gives it to the Soul," the argument is of
 the susceptive, that is, of the subject whereon this Divine gift
 descends, which is indeed a Divine gift, according to the word of the
 Apostle: "Every good gift and every perfect gift comes from above,
 proceeding from the Father of Light." It says then that God alone
 imparts this Grace to the Soul that He sees pure, within the Soul of
 that man whom He sees to be perfectly prepared and fit to receive in
 his own proper person this Divine action; for, according as the
 Philosopher says in the second chapter Of the Soul, things must be
 prepared for their agents and qualified to receive their acts;
 wherefore if the Soul is imperfectly prepared, it is not qualified to
 receive this blessed and Divine infusion, even as a precious stone, if
 it is badly cut or prepared, wherever it is imperfect, cannot receive
 the celestial virtue; even as that noble Guido Guinizzelli said, in a
 Song of his which begins: "To gentle hearts Love ever will repair." It
 is possible for the Soul to be unqualified through some defect of
 temper, or perhaps through some sinister circumstances of the time in
 which the person lives, and into a Soul so unhappy as this the Divine
 radiance never shines. And it may be said of such men as these, whose
 Souls are deprived of this Light, that they are as deep valleys turned
 towards the North, or rather subterranean caves wherein the light of
 the Sun never enters unless it be reflected from another part which
 has caught its rays.
 
 Finally, it deduces, from that which has been previously said, that
 the Virtues are the fruit of Nobility, and that God places that
 Nobility in the Soul which has a good foundation. For to some, that
 is, to those who have intellect, who are but few, it is evident that
 human Nobility is no other than the seed of Happiness
 
     That seed of Happiness
       Falls in the hearts of few,
     Planted by God within the Souls
       Spread to receive His dew;
 
 that is to say, whose body is in every part perfectly prepared,
 ordered, or qualified.
 
 For if the Virtues are the fruit of Nobility, and Happiness is
 pleasure or sweetness acquired through or by them, it is evident that
 this Nobility is the seed of Happiness, as has been said. And if one
 considers well, this definition comprehends all the four arguments,
 that is to say, the material, the formal, the efficient, and the
 final: material, inasmuch as it says, "to the Soul spread to receive,"
 which is the material and subject of Nobility; formal, inasmuch as it
 says, "That seed;" efficient, inasmuch as it says, "Planted by God
 within the Soul;" final, inasmuch as it says, "of Happiness," Heaven's
 blessing. And thus is defined this our good gift, which descends into
 us in like manner from the Supreme and Spiritual Power, as virtue into
 a precious stone from a most noble celestial body.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI.
 
 
 That we may have more perfect knowledge of Human Goodness, as it is
 the original cause in us of all good that can be called Nobility, it
 is requisite to explain clearly in this especial chapter how this
 Goodness descends into us.
 
 In the first place, it comes by the Natural way, and then by the
 Theological way, that is to say, the Divine and Spiritual. In the
 first place, it is to be known that man is composed of Soul and body;
 but that Goodness or Nobility is of the Soul, as has been said, and is
 after the manner of seed from the Divine Virtue. By different
 philosophers it has been differently argued concerning the difference
 in our Souls; for Avicenna and Algazel were of opinion that Souls of
 themselves and from their beginning were Noble or Base. Plato and some
 others were of opinion that they proceeded by the stars, and were
 Noble more or less according to the nobility of the star. Pythagoras
 was of opinion that all were of one nobility, not only human Souls,
 but with human Souls those of the brute animals and of the trees and
 the forms of minerals; and he said that all the difference in the
 bodies is form. If each one were to defend his opinion, it might be
 that Truth would be seen to be in all. But since on the surface they
 seem somewhat distant from the Truth, one must not proceed according
 to those opinions, but according to the opinion of Aristotle and of
 the Peripatetics. And therefore I say that when the human seed falls
 into its receptacle, that is, into the matrix, it bears with it the
 virtue or power of the generative Soul, and the virtue or power of
 Heaven, and the virtue or power of the aliments united or bound
 together, that is the involution or complex nature of the seed. It
 matures and prepares the material for the formative power or virtue
 which the generating Soul bestows; and the formative power or virtue
 prepares the organs for the celestial virtue or power, which produces,
 from the power of the seed, the Soul in life; which, as soon as
 produced, receives from the power of the Mover of the Heaven the
 passive intellect or mind, which potentially brings together in itself
 all the universal forms according as they are in its producer, and so
 much the less in proportion as it is farther removed from the first
 Intelligence.
 
 Let no one marvel if I speak what seems difficult to understand; for
 to myself it seems a miracle how it is possible even to arrive at a
 conclusion concerning it, and to perceive it with the intellect. It is
 not a thing to reveal in language, especially the language of the
 Vulgar Tongue; wherefore I will say, even as did the Apostle: "Oh,
 great is the depth of the riches of Wisdom of God: how incomprehensible
 are Thy judgments, and Thy ways past finding out!" And since the
 complex nature of the seed may be better and less good, and the
 disposition of the receiver of the seed may be better and less good,
 and the disposition of the dominant Heaven to this effect may be good
 and better and best, which varies in the constellations, which are
 continually transformed; it befalls that from the human seed and from
 these virtues or powers the Soul is produced more or less pure; and
 according to its purity there descends into it the virtue or power of
 the possible or passive intellect, as it is called, and as it has been
 spoken of. And if it happen that through the purity of the receptive
 Soul the intellectual power is indeed separate and absolute, free from
 all corporeal shadow, the Divine Goodness multiplies in it, as in a
 thing sufficient to receive that good gift; and then it multiplies in
 the Soul of this intelligent being, according as it can receive it;
 and this is that seed of Happiness of which we speak at present. And
 this is in harmony with the opinion of Tullius in that book on Old Age
 when, speaking personally of Cato, he says: "For this reason a
 celestial spirit descended into us from the highest habitation, having
 come into a place which is adverse to the Divine Nature and to
 Eternity." And in such a Soul as this there is its own individual
 power, and the intellectual power, and the Divine power; that is to
 say, that influence which has been mentioned. Therefore it is written
 in the book On Causes: "Each Noble Soul has three operations, that is
 to say, the animal, the intellectual, and the Divine." And there are
 some men who hold such opinions that they say, if all the preceding
 powers were to unite in the production of a Soul in their best
 disposition, arrangement, order, that into that Soul would descend so
 much of the Deity that it would be as it were another God Incarnate;
 and this is almost all that it is possible to say concerning the
 Natural way.
 
 By the Theological way it is possible to say that, when the Supreme
 Deity, that is, God, sees His creature prepared to receive His good
 gift, so freely He imparts it to His creature in proportion as it is
 prepared or qualified to receive it. And because these gifts proceed
 from ineffable Love, and the Divine Love is appropriate to the Holy
 Spirit, therefore it is that they are called the gifts of the Holy
 Spirit, which, even as the Prophet Isaiah distinguishes them, are
 seven, namely, Wisdom, Intelligence, Counsel, Courage, Knowledge,
 Pity, and the Fear of God. O, good green blades, and good and
 wonderful the seed!
 
 And O, admirable and benign Sower of the seed, who dost only wait for
 human nature to prepare the ground for Thee wherein to sow! O, blessed
 are those who till the land to fit it to receive such seed!
 
 Here it is to be known that the first noble shoot which germinates
 from this seed that it may be fruitful, is the desire or appetite of
 the mind, which in Greek is called "hormen;" and if this is not well
 cultivated and held upright by good habits, the seed is of little
 worth, and it would be better if it had not been sown.
 
 And therefore St. Augustine urges, and Aristotle also in the second
 book of Ethics, that man should accustom himself to do good, and to
 bridle in his passions, in order that this shoot which has been
 mentioned may grow strong through good habits, and be confirmed in its
 uprightness, so that it may fructify, and from its fruit may issue the
 sweetness of Human Happiness.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII.
 
 
 It is the commandment of the Moral Philosophers that, of the good
 gifts whereof they have spoken, Man ought to put his thought and his
 anxious care into the effort to make them as useful as possible to the
 receiver. Wherefore I, wishing to be obedient to such a mandate,
 intend to render this my BANQUET [Convito] as useful as possible in
 each one of its parts. And because in this part it occurs to me to be
 able to reason somewhat concerning the sweetness of Human Happiness, I
 consider that there could not be a more useful discourse, especially
 to those who know it not; for as the Philosopher says in the first
 book of Ethics, and Tullius in that book Of the Ends of Good and Evil,
 he shoots badly at the mark who sees it not. Even thus a man can but
 ill advance towards this sweet joy who does not begin with a
 perception of it. Wherefore, since it is our final rest for which we
 live and labour as we can, most useful and most necessary it is to see
 this mark in order to aim at it the bow of this our work. And it is
 most essential to make it inviting to those who do not see the mark
 when simply pointed out. Leaving alone, then, the opinion which
 Epicurus the philosopher had concerning it, and that which Zeno
 likewise had, I intend to come summarily to the true opinion of
 Aristotle and of the other Peripatetics. As it is said above, of the
 Divine Goodness sown and infused in us, from the original cause of our
 production, there springs up a shoot, which the Greeks term "hormen,"
 that is to say, the natural appetite of the soul.
 
 And as it is with the blades of corn which, when they first shoot
 forth, have in the beginning one similar appearance, being in the
 grass-like stage, and then, by process of time, they become unlike, so
 this Natural appetite, which springs from the Divine Grace, in the
 beginning appears as it were not unlike that which comes nakedly from
 Nature; but with it, even as the herbage born of various grains of
 corn, it has the same appearance, as it were: and not only in the
 blades of corn, but in men and in beasts there is the same similitude.
 And it appears that every animal, as soon as it is born, both rational
 and brute beast, loves itself, and fears and flies from those things
 which are adverse to it, and hates them, then proceeding as has been
 said. And there begins a difference between them in the progress of
 this Natural appetite, for the one keeps to one road, and the other to
 another; even as the Apostle says: "Many run to the goal, but there is
 but one who reaches it." Even thus these Human appetites from the
 beginning run through different paths, and there is one path alone
 which leads us to our peace; and therefore, leaving all the others
 alone, it is for the treatise to follow the course of that one who
 begins well.
 
 I say, then, that from the beginning a man loves himself, although
 indistinctly; then comes the distinguishing of those things which to
 him are more or less; to be more or less loved or hated; and he
 follows after and flies from either more or less according as the
 right habit distinguishes, not only in the other things which he loves
 in a secondary manner, for he even distinguishes in himself which
 thing he loves principally; and perceiving in himself divers parts,
 those which are the noblest in him he loves most. But, since the
 noblest part of man is the Mind, he loves that more than the Body; and
 thus, loving himself principally, and through himself other things,
 and of himself loving the better part most, it is evident that he
 loves the Mind more than the Body or any other thing; and the Mind it
 is that, naturally, more than any other thing he ought to love.
 
 Then, if the Mind always delights in the use of the beloved thing,
 which is the fruit of love, the use of that thing which is especially
 beloved is especially delightful: the use of our Mind is especially
 delightful to us, and that which is especially delightful to us
 becomes our Happiness and our Beatitude, beyond which there is no
 greater delight or pleasure, nor any equal to it, as may be seen by
 him who looks well at the preceding argument.
 
 And no one ought to say that every appetite is Mind; for here one
 understands Mind solely as that which belongs to the Rational part,
 that is, the Will and the Intellect; so that if any one should wish to
 call Mind the appetite of the Senses, here it has no place, nor can it
 have any abiding; for no one doubts that the Rational appetite is more
 noble than the Sensual, and therefore more to be loved; and so is this
 of which we are now speaking.
 
 The use of our Mind is double, that is to say, Practical and
 Speculative (it is Practical insomuch as it has the power of acting);
 both the one and the other are delightful in their use, but that of
 Contemplation is the most pleasing, as has been said above. The use of
 the Practical is to act in or through us virtuously, that is to say,
 honestly or uprightly, with Prudence, with Temperance, with Courage,
 and with Justice. The use of the Speculative is not to work or act
 through us, but to consider the works of God and of Nature. This and
 the other form our Beatitude and Supreme Happiness, which is the
 sweetness of the before-mentioned seed, as now clearly appears. To
 this often such seed does not attain, through being ill cultivated, or
 through its tender growing shoots being perverted. In like manner it
 is quite possible, by much correction and cultivation of him into whom
 this seed does not fall primarily, to induce it by the process of
 steady endeavour after goodness, so that it may attain to the power of
 bearing this fruit. And it is, as it were, a method of grafting the
 nature of another upon a different stock.
 
 No man, therefore, can hold himself excused; for if from his natural
 root the man does not produce sweet fruit, it is possible for him to
 have it by the process of grafting; and in fact there would be as many
 who should be grafted as those are who, sprung from a good root, allow
 themselves to grow degenerate.
 
 Of the two ways of goodness, one is more full of bliss than the other,
 as is the Speculative, which is the use of our noblest part without
 any alloy, and which, for the root, Love, as has been said, is
 especially to be loved as the intellect. And in this life it is not
 possible to have the use of this part perfectly, which is to see God,
 who is the Supreme Being to be comprehended by the Mind, except
 inasmuch as the intellect considers Him and beholds Him through His
 effects, His Works. And that we may seek this Beatitude as the
 supreme, and not the other, that is, that of the Active Life, the
 Gospel of St. Mark teaches us, if we will look at it well.
 
 Mark says that Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James, and Mary
 Salome went to find the Saviour in the Tomb, and they found Him not,
 but they found a youth clothed in white, who said to them: "You seek
 the Saviour, and I tell you that He is not here; and therefore be not
 affrighted, but go and tell His disciples and Peter that He goeth
 before you into Galilee; and there ye shall see Him, as He said unto
 you." By these three women may be understood the three sects of the
 Active Life, that is to say, the Epicureans, the Stoics, and the
 Peripatetics, who go to the Tomb, that is to say, to the present
 World, which is the receptacle of corruptible things, and seek for the
 Saviour, that is, Beatitude, and they find it not; but they find a
 youth in white garments, who, according to the testimony of Matthew,
 and also of the other Evangelists, was an Angel of God. And therefore
 Matthew said: "The Angel of the Lord descended from Heaven, and came
 and rolled back the stone from the door, and sat upon it. His
 countenance was like lightning, and his raiment white as snow." The
 Angel is this Nobility of ours which comes from God, as it has been
 said, of which our argument speaks, and says to each one of these
 sects, that is, to whoever seeks perfect Happiness in the Active Life,
 that it is not here; but go and tell the disciples and Peter, that is,
 tell those who seek for it and those who are gone astray like Peter,
 who had denied Him, that He will go before them into Galilee; meaning
 that the Beatitude or Happiness will go before us into Galilee, that
 is, into Contemplation; Galilee is as much as to say, Whiteness.
 Whiteness is a colour full of material light, more so than any other;
 and thus, Contemplation is more full of Spiritual light than any other
 thing which is below.
 
 And it says, "He will go before you," but it does not say, "He will be
 with you," to make us understand that in our contemplation God always
 goes before. Nor is it ever possible to us to attain to Him here, to
 Him, our Supreme Bliss. And it says, "There shall ye see Him, as He
 said unto you;" that is to say, there you will receive of His
 Sweetness, that is, of the Happiness as it is promised to you here, as
 it is established that you may receive it.
 
 And thus it appears that our Beatitude, this Happiness of which we
 speak, first we are able to find imperfect in the Active Life, that
 is, in the operations of the Moral Virtues, and then almost perfect in
 the operations of the Intellectual Virtues; which two operations are
 speedy and most direct ways to lead to the Supreme Bliss, which it is
 not possible to have here below, even as appears by that which has
 been said.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII.
 
 
 Since the definition of Nobility is sufficiently demonstrated, and
 since in all its parts it has been made as explicit as possible, so
 that we can now see who is the Nobleman, it seems right to proceed to
 the part of the text which begins, "Souls whom this Grace adorns," in
 whom appear the signs by which it is possible to know the Noble Man.
 
 This part is divided into two. In the first it affirms that this
 Nobility is resplendent, and that it shines forth manifestly during
 the whole life of the Noble Man; in the second it appears specifically
 in its glory, and this second part begins, "In Childhood they obey."
 With regard to the first part, it is to be known that this Divine
 seed, which has been previously spoken of, germinates immediately in
 our Soul, combining with and changing its form with each form of the
 Soul, according to the exigency of that power. It germinates, then, as
 the Vegetative, as the Sensitive, and as the Rational, and it branches
 out through the virtues or powers of all of them, guiding all those to
 their perfection, and sustaining itself in them always, even to the
 point when, with that part of our Soul which never dies, it returns to
 the highest and the most glorious Sower of the seed in Heaven; and it
 expresses this in that first part which has been mentioned. Then when
 it says, "In Childhood they obey, Are gentle, modest," it shows how we
 can recognize the Noble Man by the apparent signs, which are the
 Divine operation of this goodness. And this part is divided into four,
 as it is made to represent four different ages, such as Adolescence,
 Youth, Old Age, and Extreme Old Age. The second part begins, "Are
 temperate in Youth;" the third begins, "Are prudent in their Age;" the
 fourth begins, "The fourth part of their life." Herein is contained
 the purpose of this part in general, with regard to which it is
 desirable to know that each effect, inasmuch as it is an effect,
 receives the likeness of its cause in proportion as it is capable of
 retaining it.
 
 Wherefore, since our life, as has been said, and also the life of
 every living creature here below, is caused by Heaven, Heaven is
 revealed in all such effects as these, not, indeed, with the complete
 circle, but with part of it, in them. Thus its movement must be not
 only with them, but beyond them, and as one arch of life retains (and
 I say retains, not only of men, but also of other living creatures)
 almost all the lives, ascending and descending, they must be, as it
 were, similar in appearance to the form of the arch. Returning, then,
 to our course of life which at present we are seeking to understand, I
 say that it proceeds after the manner of this arch, ascending and
 descending. And it is to be known that the ascent of this arch should
 be equal to its descent, if the material of the seed from which we
 spring, so complex in its nature, did not impede the law of Human
 Nature. But since the humid root is of better quality more or less,
 and stronger to endure in one effect more than in another, being
 subject to the nutriment of the heat, which is our life, it happens
 that the arch of the life of one man is of less or of greater extent
 than that of another, life being shortened by a violent death or by
 some accidental injury; but that which is called natural by the people
 is that span of which it is said by the Psalmist, "Thou settest up a
 boundary which it is not possible to pass." And since the Master among
 those here living, Aristotle, had perception of this arch of which we
 now speak, and seems to be of opinion that our life should be no other
 than one ascent and one descent, therefore he says, in that chapter
 where he treats of Youth and of Old Age, that Youth is no other than
 an increase of life. Where the top of this arch may be, it is
 difficult to know, on account of the inequality which has been spoken
 of above, but for the most part I believe between the thirtieth and
 the fortieth year, and I believe that in the perfectly natural man it
 is at the thirty-fifth year. And this reason has weight with me: that
 our Saviour Jesus Christ was a perfect natural man, who chose to die
 in the thirty-fourth year of His age; for it was not suitable for the
 Deity to have place in the descending segment; neither is it to be
 believed that He would not wish to dwell in this life of ours even to
 the summit of it, since He had been in the lower part even from
 childhood. And the hour of the day of His death makes this evident,
 for He willed that to conform with His life; wherefore Luke says that
 it was about the sixth hour when He died, that is to say, the height
 or supreme point of the day; wherefore it is possible to comprehend by
 that, as it were, that at the thirty-fifth year of Christ was the
 height or supreme point of His age. Truly this arch is not half
 distinguished in the Scriptures, but if we follow the four connecting
 links of the differing qualities which are in our composition, to each
 one of which appears to be appropriated one part of our age, it is
 divided into four parts, and they are called the four ages. The first
 is Adolescence, which is appropriated to the hot and moist; the second
 is Youth, which is appropriated to the hot and dry; the third is Old
 Age, which is appropriated to the cold and dry; the fourth is Extreme
 Old Age, which is appropriated to the cold and moist, as Albertus
 Magnus writes in the fourth chapter of the Metaura. And these parts or
 divisions are made in a similar manner in the year--in Spring, in
 Summer, in Autumn, and in Winter. And it is the same in the day even
 to the third hour, and then even to the ninth, leaving the sixth in
 the middle of this part, or division, for the reason which is
 understood, and then even to vespers, and from vespers onwards. And
 therefore the Gentiles said that the chariot of the Sun had four
 horses; they called the first Eoo, the second Piroi, the third Eton,
 the fourth Phlegon, even as Ovid writes in the second book of the
 Metamorphoses concerning the parts or divisions of the day.
 
 And, briefly, it is to be known that, as it has been said above in the
 sixth chapter of the third treatise, the Church makes use of the hours
 temporal in the division of the day, which hours are twelve in each
 day, long or short according to the amount of sunlight; and because
 the sixth hour, that is, the midday, is the most noble of the whole
 day, and has in it the most virtue, the Offices of the Church are
 approximated thereto in each side, that is, from the prime, and thence
 onwards as much as possible; and therefore the Office of prime, that
 is, the tertius, is said at the end of that part, and that of the
 third part and of the fourth is said at the beginning; and therefore,
 before the clock strikes in a division of the day, it is termed
 half-third or mid-tertius; or mid-nones, when in that division the
 clock has struck, and thus mid-vespers.
 
 And, therefore, let each one know that the right and lawful nones
 ought always to strike or sound at the beginning of the seventh hour
 of the day, and let this suffice to the present digression.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV.
 
 
 Returning to the proposition, I say that Human Life is divided into
 four ages or stages. The first is called Adolescence, that is, the
 growth or increase of life; the second is called Youth, that is, the
 age which can give perfection, and for this reason one understands
 this Youth to be perfect, because no man can give except of that which
 he has; the third is called Old Age; the fourth is called Senility,
 Extreme Old Age, as has been said above.
 
 Of the first no one doubts, but each wise man agrees that it lasts
 even to the twenty-fifth year; and up to that time our Soul waits for
 the increase and the embellishment of the body. While there are many
 and very great changes in the person, the rational part cannot possess
 perfectly the power of discretion; wherefore, the Civil Law wills
 that, previous to that age, a man cannot do certain things without a
 guardian of perfect age.
 
 Of the second, which is the height of our life, the time is variously
 taken by many. But leaving that which philosophers and medical men
 write concerning it, and returning to the proper argument, we may say
 that, in most men in whom one can and ought to be guided by natural
 judgment, that age lasts for twenty years. And the reason which leads
 me to this conclusion is, that the height or supreme point of our arc
 or bow is in the thirty-fifth year; just so much as this age has of
 ascent, so much it ought to have of descent; and this ascent passes
 into descent, as it were, at the point, the centre, where one would
 hold the bow in the hand, at which place a slight flexion may be
 discerned. We are of opinion, then, that Youth is completed in the
 forty-fifth year.
 
 And as Adolescence is in the twenty-five years which proceed mounting
 upwards to Youth: so the descent, that is, Old Age, is an equal amount
 of time which succeeds to Youth; and thus Old Age terminates in the
 seventieth year.
 
 But because Adolescence does not begin at the beginning of
 life--taking it in the way which has been said--but about eight months
 from birth; and because our life strives to ascend, and curbs itself
 in the descent; because the natural heat is lessened and can do
 little, and the moist humour is increased, not in quantity, but in
 quality, so that it is less able to evaporate and be consumed; it
 happens that beyond Old Age there remains of our life an amount,
 perhaps, of about ten years, a little more or a little less; and this
 time of life is termed Extreme Old Age, or Senility. Wherefore we know
 of Plato (of whom one may well say that he was a son of Nature, both
 because of his perfection and because of his countenance, which caused
 Socrates to love him when first he saw him), that he lived eighty and
 one years, according to the testimony of Tullius in that book On Old
 Age. And I believe that if Christ had not been crucified, and if He
 might have lived the length of time which His life according to nature
 could have passed over, at eighty and one years He would have been
 transformed from the mortal body into the eternal.
 
 Truly, as has been said above, these ages may be longer or shorter
 according to our complexion or temper and our constitution or
 composition; but, as they are, it seems to me that I observe this
 proportion in all men, as has been said, that is to say, that in such
 men the ages may be made longer or shorter according to the integrity
 of the whole term of the natural life.
 
 Throughout all these ages this Nobility of which we speak manifests
 its effects in different ways in the ennobled Soul; and it is that
 which this part of the Song, concerning which we write at present,
 intends to demonstrate. Where it is to be known that our good and
 upright nature makes forward progress in us in the reasoning powers,
 as we see the nature of the plants make forward progress; and
 therefore it is that different manners and different deportment are to
 be held reasonable at one age rather than at another. The ennobled
 Soul proceeds in due order along a single path, employing each of its
 powers in its time and season, or even as they are all ordained to the
 final production of the perfect fruit. And Tullius is in harmony with
 this in his book On Old Age. And putting aside the figurative sense
 which Virgil holds in the AEneid concerning this different progress of
 the ages, and letting that be which Egidius the hermit mentions in the
 first part On the Government of Princes, and letting that be to which
 Tullius alludes in his book Of Offices, and following that alone which
 Reason can see of herself, I say that this first age is the door and
 the path through which and along which we enter into our good life,
 And this entrance must of necessity have certain things which the good
 Nature, which fails not in things necessary, gives to us; as we see
 that she gives to the vine the leaves for the protection of the fruit,
 and the little tendrils which enable it to twine round its supports,
 and thus bind up its weakness, so that it can sustain the weight of
 its fruit. Beneficent Nature gives, then, to this age four things
 necessary to the entrance into the City of the Good Life. The first is
 Obedience, the second Suavity, the third Modesty, the fourth Beauty of
 the Body, even as the Song says in the first section of this part. It
 is, then, to be known that like one who has never been in a city, who
 would not know how to find his way about the streets without
 instruction from one who is accustomed to them, even so the adolescent
 who enters into the Wood of Error of this life would not know how to
 keep to the good path if it were not pointed out to him by his elders.
 Neither would the instruction avail if he were not obedient to their
 commands, and therefore at this age obedience is necessary. Here it
 might be possible for some one to speak thus: Then, is that man to be
 called obedient who shall follow evil guidance as well as he who shall
 believe the good? I reply that this would not be obedience, but
 transgression. For if the King should issue a command in one way and
 the servant give forth the command in another, it would not be right
 to obey the servant, for that would be to disobey the King; and thus
 it would be transgression. And therefore Solomon says, when he intends
 to correct his son, and this is his first commandment: "Listen, my
 son, to the instruction of thy father." And then he seeks to remove
 him immediately from the counsel and teaching of the wicked man,
 saying, "My son, if sinners entice thee, consent thou not."
 
 Wherefore, as soon as he is born, the son clings to the breast of the
 mother; even so soon as some light of the Mind appears in him, he
 ought to turn to the correction of the father, and the father to
 instruction. And let the father take heed that he himself does not set
 him an example in work or action that is contrary to the words of the
 correction; for naturally we see each son look more to the footprints
 of the paternal feet than to those of other men. And therefore the
 Law, which provides for this, says and commands that the life of the
 father should appear to his sons always honourable and upright. Thus
 it appears that obedience was necessary in this age; and therefore
 Solomon writes in the Book of Proverbs, that he who humbly and
 obediently sustains his just reproofs from the corrector shall be
 glorious. And he says "shall be," to cause men to understand that he
 speaks to the adolescent, who cannot be so in his present age. And if
 any one should reflect on me because I have said obedience is due to
 the father and not to other men, I say that to the father all other
 obedience ought to be referred; wherefore the Apostle says to the
 Colossians: "Sons, obey your fathers in all things, for such is the
 will of God." And if the father be not in this life, the son ought to
 refer to that which is said by the father in his last Will as a
 father; and if the father die intestate, the son ought to refer to him
 to whom the Law commits his authority; and then ought the masters and
 elders to be obeyed, for this appears to be a reasonable charge laid
 upon the son by the father, or by him who stands in the father's
 place.
 
 But because this present chapter has been long, on account of the
 useful digressions which it contains, in another chapter other things
 shall be discussed.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 
 Not only this Soul, naturally good in Adolescence, is obedient, but
 also gentle; which is the other thing necessary in this age to make a
 good entrance through the portal of Youth.
 
 It is necessary, since we cannot have a perfect life without friends,
 as Aristotle expresses it in the eighth book of Ethics; and the seed
 of the greater number of friendships seems to be sown in the first age
 of life, because in it a man begins to be gracious or the contrary.
 Such graciousness is acquired by gentle rules of conduct, as are sweet
 and courteous speech, gentle service courteously rendered, and actions
 kindly done or performed. And therefore Solomon says to the adolescent
 son: "Surely God scorneth the scorners; but He giveth grace unto the
 lowly." And elsewhere he says: "Put away from thee a forward mouth,
 and perverse lips put far from thee." Wherefore it appears that, as
 has been said, this suavity or affability is necessary.
 
 Likewise to this age the passion of modesty is necessary; and
 therefore the nature which is good and noble shows it in this age,
 even as the Song says. And since modesty is the clearest sign, in
 Adolescence, of Nobility, because there it is especially necessary to
 the good foundation of our life, at which the noble nature aims, it is
 right to speak of it somewhat. By modesty I mean three passions or
 strong feelings necessary to the foundation of our good life: the one
 is wonder, the next is modesty, the third is shame, although the
 common people do not discern this distinction. And all three of these
 are necessary to this life, for this reason: at this age it is
 requisite to be reverent and desirous for knowledge; at this age it is
 necessary or requisite to be self-controlled, so as not to transgress
 or pass beyond due bounds; at this age it is necessary to be penitent
 for a fault, so as not to grow accustomed to doing wrong. And all
 these things the aforesaid passions or strong feelings do, which
 vulgarly are called shame; for wonder is an amazement of the mind at
 beholding great and wonderful things, at hearing them, or feeling them
 in some way or other; for, inasmuch as they appear great, they excite
 reverence in him who sees them; inasmuch as they appear wonderful,
 they make him who perceives them desirous of knowledge concerning
 them. And therefore the ancient Kings in their palaces or habitations
 set up magnificent works in gold and in marble and works of art, in
 order that those who should see them should become astonished, and
 therefore reverent inquirers into the honourable conditions of the
 King. Therefore Statius, the sweet Poet, in the first part of the
 Theban History, says that, when Adrastus, King of the Argives, saw
 Polynices covered with the skin of a lion, and saw Tydeus covered with
 the hide of a wild boar, and recalled to mind the reply that Apollo
 had given concerning his daughters, he became amazed, and therefore
 more reverent and more desirous for knowledge. Modesty is a shrinking,
 a drawing-back of the mind from unseemly things, with the fear of
 falling into them; even as we see in virgins and in good women, and in
 adolescent or young men, who are so modest that not only when they are
 tempted to do wrong, and urged to do so, but even when some fancied
 joy flashes across the mind, the feeling is depicted in the face,
 which either grows pale with fear, or flushes rosy-red. Wherefore the
 before-mentioned poet, in the first book of the Thebaid already
 quoted, says that when Acesta the nurse of Argia and Deiphile, the
 daughters of King Adrastus, led them before the eyes of their holy
 father into the presence of the two pilgrims, that is to say,
 Polynices and Tydeus, the virgins grew pale and blushed rosy-red, and
 their eyes shunned the glance of any other person, and they kept them
 fixed on the paternal face alone, as if there were safety. This
 modesty--how many errors does it bridle in, or repress? On how many
 immodest questions and impure things does it impose silence! How much
 dishonest greed does it repress! In the chaste woman, against how many
 evil temptations does it rouse mistrust, not only in her, but also in
 him who watches over her! How many unseemly words does it restrain!
 for, as Tullius says in the first chapter of the Offices: "No action
 is unseemly which is not unseemly in the naming." And furthermore, the
 Modest and Noble Man never could speak in such a manner that to a
 woman his words would not be decent and such as she could hear. Alas,
 how great is the evil in every man who seeks for honour, to mention
 things which would be deemed evil in the mouth of any woman!
 
 Shame is a fear of dishonour through fault committed, and from this
 fear there springs up a penitence for the fault, which has in itself a
 bitter sorrow or grief, which is a chastisement and preservative
 against future wrong-doing. Wherefore this same poet says, in that
 same part, that when Polynices was questioned by King Adrastus
 concerning his life, he hesitated at first through shame to speak of
 the crime which he had committed against his father, and also for the
 sins of Oedipus, his father, which appeared to remain in the shame of
 the son; therefore he named not his father, but his ancestors, and his
 country, and his mother; and therefore it does indeed appear that
 shame is necessary to that age. And the noble nature reveals in this
 age, not only obedience, gentleness, affability, and modesty, but it
 shows beauty and agility of body, even as the Song expresses: "To
 furnish Virtue's person with The graces it may need." Here it is to be
 known that this work of beneficent Nature is also necessary to our
 good life, for our Soul must work in the greater part of all its
 operations with a bodily organ; and then it works well when the body
 through all its parts is well proportioned and appointed. And when it
 is well proportioned and appointed, then it is beautiful throughout
 and in all its parts; for the due ordering or proportion of our limbs
 produces a pleasing impression of I know not what of wonderful
 harmony; and the good disposition, that is to say, the health of mind
 and body, throws over all a colouring sweet to behold. And thus to say
 that the noble nature takes heed for the graces of the body, and makes
 it fair and harmonious, is tantamount to saying that it prepares it
 and renders it fit to attain the perfection ordained for it: and those
 other things which have been discussed seem to be requisite to
 Adolescence, which the noble Mind, that is to say, the noble Nature,
 furnishes forth to it in the first years of life, as growth of the
 seed sown therein by the Divine Providence.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI.
 
 
 Since the first section of this part, which shows how we can recognize
 the Noble Man by apparent signs, is reasoned out, it is right to
 proceed to the second section, which begins: "Are temperate in Youth,
 And resolutely strong."
 
 It says, then, that as the noble Nature in Adolescence or the
 Spring-time of Youth appears obedient, gentle, and modest, the
 beautifier of its person, so in Youth it is temperate, strong, and
 loving, courteous and loyal; which five things appear to be, and are,
 necessary to our perfection, inasmuch as we have respect unto
 ourselves. And with regard to this it is desirable to know that just
 as the noble Nature prepares in the first age, it is prepared and
 ordained by the care or foresight of Universal Nature, which ordains
 and appoints the particular Nature where-ever existing, to attain its
 perfection.
 
 This perfection of ours may be considered in a double sense. It is
 possible to consider it as it has respect to ourselves, and we ought
 to possess this in our Youth, which is the culminating point of our
 life. It is possible to consider it as it has respect to others, and
 since in the first place it is necessary to be perfect, and then to
 communicate the perfection to others, it is requisite to possess this
 secondary perfection after this age, that is to say, in Old Age, as
 will be said subsequently. Here, then, it is needful to recall to mind
 that which was argued in the twenty-second chapter of this treatise
 concerning the appetite or impulse which is born in us. This appetite
 or impulse never does aught else but to pursue and to flee, and
 whenever it pursues that which is to be pursued, and as far as is
 right, and flies from that which is to be fled from, and as much as is
 right, then is the man within the limits of his perfection. Truly,
 this appetite or natural impulse must have Reason for its rider; for
 as a horse at liberty, however noble it may be by nature, by itself
 without the good rider does not conduct itself well, even thus this
 appetite, however noble it may be, must obey Reason, which guides it
 with the bridle and spur, as the good knight uses the bridle when he
 hunts. And that bridle is termed Temperance, which marks the limit up
 to which it is lawful to pursue; he uses the spur in flight to turn
 the horse away from the place from which he would flee away; and this
 spur is called Courage, or rather Magnanimity, a Virtue that points
 out the place at which it is right to stop, and to resist evil even to
 mortal combat. And thus Virgil, our greatest Poet, represents AEneas as
 under the influence of powerful self control in that part of the AEneid
 wherein this age is typified, which part comprehends the fourth and
 the fifth and the sixth books of the AEneid. And what self-restraint
 was that when, having received from Dido so much pleasure, as will be
 spoken of in the seventh treatise, and enjoying so much delectation
 with her, he departed, in order to follow the upright and praiseworthy
 path fruitful of good works, even as it is written in the fourth book
 of the AEneid! What impetus was that when AEneas had the fortitude alone
 with Sybilla to enter into Hades, to search for the Soul of his father
 Anchises, in the face of so many dangers, as it is shown in the sixth
 book of the AEneid. Wherefore it appears that in our Youth, in order to
 be in our perfection, we must be Temperate and Brave. The good
 disposition secures this for us, even as the Song expressly states.
 
 Again, at this age it is necessary to its perfection to be Loving;
 because at this age it is requisite to look behind and before, as
 being midway over the arch. The youth ought to love his elders, from
 whom he has received his being, and his nutriment, and his
 instruction, so that he may not appear ungrateful. He ought to love
 his juniors, since, in loving them, he gives them of his good gifts,
 for which in after-years, when the younger friends are prospering, he
 may be supported and honoured by them. And the poet named above, in
 the fifth book before-mentioned, makes it evident that AEneas possessed
 this loving disposition, when he left the aged Trojans in Sicily,
 recommended to Acestes, and set them free from the fatigues of the
 voyage; and when he instructed, in the same place, Ascanius his son,
 with the other young men, in jousting or in feats of arms; wherefore
 it appears that to this age Love is necessary, even as the Song says.
 
 Again, to this age Courtesy is necessary, for, although to every age
 it is right or beautiful to be possessed of courteous manners, to this
 age it is especially necessary, because, on the contrary, Old Age,
 with its gravity and its severity, cannot possess courtesy, if it has
 been wanting in this youthful period of life; and with Extreme Old Age
 it is the same in a greater degree. And that most noble poet, in the
 sixth book before-mentioned, proves that AEneas possessed this
 courtesy, when he says that AEneas, then King, in order to pay honour
 to the dead body of Misenus, who had been the trumpeter of Hector, and
 afterwards accompanied AEneas, made himself ready and took the axe to
 assist in cutting the logs for the fire which must burn the dead body,
 as was their custom. Wherefore this courtesy does indeed appear to be
 necessary to Youth; and therefore the noble Soul reveals it in that
 age, as has been said.
 
 Again, it is necessary to this age to be Loyal. Loyalty is to follow
 and to put in operation that which the Laws command, and this
 especially is necessary in the young man; because the adolescent, as
 it has been said, on account of his minority, merits ready pardon; the
 old man, on account of greater experience, ought to be just, but not a
 follower of the Law except inasmuch as his upright judgment and the
 Law are at one as it were; and almost without any Law he ought to be
 able to follow the dictates of his own just mind. The young man is not
 able to do this, and it is sufficient that he should obey the Law, and
 take delight in that obedience; even as the before-said poet says, in
 the fifth book previously mentioned, that AEneas did when he instituted
 the games in Sicily on the anniversary of his father's death, for what
 he promised for the victories he loyally gave to each victor,
 according to their ancient custom, which was their Law.
 
 Wherefore, it is evident that, to this age, Loyalty, Courtesy, Love,
 Courage, and Temperance are necessary, even as the Song says, which at
 present I have reasoned out; and therefore the noble Soul reveals them
 all.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVII.
 
 
 That section which the text puts forward having been reasoned out and
 made sufficiently clear, showing the qualities of uprightness which
 the noble Soul puts into Youth, we go on to pay attention to the third
 part, which begins, "Are prudent in their Age," in which the Song
 intends to show those qualities which the noble Nature reveals and
 ought to possess in the third age, that is to say, Old Age. And it
 says that the noble Soul in Old Age is prudent, is just, is liberal
 and cheerful, willing to speak kindly and for the good of others, and
 ready to listen for the same reason, that is to say, that it is
 affable. And truly these four Virtues are most suitable to this age.
 And, in order to perceive this, it is to be known that, as Tullius
 says in his book On Old Age, "Our life has a certain course, and one
 simple path, that of natural moral goodness; and to each part of our
 age there is given a season for certain things." Wherefore, as to
 Adolescence is given, as has been said above, that by means of which
 it may attain perfection and maturity, so to youth is given perfection
 and maturity in order that the sweetness of its perfect fruit may be
 profitable to the man himself and to others; for, as Aristotle says,
 man is a civil or polite animal, because it is required of him to be
 useful, not only to himself, but to others as well. Wherefore one
 reads of Cato, that he believed himself to be born not only to
 himself, but to his country and to all the world. Then after our own
 perfection, which is acquired in Youth, there must follow that which
 may give light not only to one's self, but to others as well; and a
 man ought to open and broaden like a rose as it were, which can no
 longer remain closed, and spread abroad the sweet odour which is bred
 within; and this ought to be the case in that third age which we have
 now in hand.
 
 Then it must be Prudent, that is to say, Wise. And, in order to be
 this, a good memory of the things which have been seen is requisite,
 and a good knowledge of present things, and good foresight for things
 of the future. And, as the Philosopher says in the sixth book of
 Ethics, it is impossible for the man who is not good to be wise; and
 therefore he is not to be called a wise man who acts with cunning and
 with deception, but he is to be called an astute man. As no one would
 call him a wise man who might indeed know how to draw with the point
 of a knife in the pupil of the eye, even so he is not to be called a
 wise man who knows how to do a bad thing well, in the doing of which
 he must always first injure some other person. If we consider well,
 good counsel springs from Prudence, which leads or guides a man, and
 other men, to a good end in human affairs. And this is that gift which
 Solomon, perceiving himself to be placed as ruler over the people,
 asked of God, even as it is written in the Third Book of Kings; nor
 does the prudent man wait for counsel to be asked of him; but of
 himself, foreseeing the need for it, unasked he gives counsel or
 advice; like the rose, which not only to him who goes to her for her
 sweet odour freely gives it, but also to any one who passes near.
 
 Here it would be possible for any doctor or lawyer to say: Then shall
 I carry my counsel or advice, and shall I give it even before it be
 asked of me, and shall I not reap fruit from my art or skill? I reply
 in the words of our Saviour: "Freely ye have received, freely give." I
 say, then, Master Lawyer, that those counsels which have no respect to
 thine art, and which proceed alone from that good sense or wisdom
 which God gave thee (which is the prudence of which we speak), thou
 oughtest not to sell to the sons or children of Him who has given it
 to thee. But those counsels which belong to the art which thou hast
 purchased, thou mayst sell; but not in such a way but that at any time
 the tenth part of them may be fitly set apart and given unto God, that
 is, to those unhappy ones to whom the Divine protection is all that is
 left.
 
 Likewise at this age it is right to be Just, in order that the
 judgments and the authority of the man may be a light and a law to
 other men. And because this particular Virtue, that is to say,
 Justice, was seen by the ancient philosophers to appear perfect in men
 of this age, they entrusted the government of the cities to those men
 who had attained that age; and therefore the college of Rectors was
 called the Senate. Oh, my unhappy, unhappy country! how my heart is
 wrung with pity for thee whenever I read, whenever I write, anything
 which may have reference to Civil Government! But since in the last
 treatise of this book Justice will be discussed, to the present let
 this slight notice of it suffice.
 
 Also at this age a man ought to be liberal, because a thing is then
 most suitable when it gives most satisfaction to the due requirements
 of its nature: nor to the due requirements of Liberality is it ever
 possible to give more satisfaction than at this age. For if we will
 look well at the argument of Aristotle in the fourth book of Ethics,
 and at that of Tullius in his book Of Offices, Liberality desires to
 be seasonable in place and time; so that the liberal man may not
 injure himself nor other men; which thing it is not possible to have
 without Prudence and without Justice, Virtues that previous to this
 age it is impossible to have or possess in perfection in the Natural
 way.
 
 Alas! ye base-born ones, born under evil stars, ye who rob the widows
 and orphans, who ravish or despoil those who possess least, who steal
 from and occupy or usurp the homes of other men, and with that spoil
 you furnish forth feasts, women, horses, arms, robes, money; you wear
 wonderful garments, you build marvellous palaces; and you believe that
 you do deeds of great liberality: and this is no other than to take
 the cloth from the altar and to cover therewith the thief and his
 table! Not otherwise one ought to laugh, O tyrants, at your bounteous
 liberality than at the thief who should lead the invited guests into
 his house to his feast, and place upon his table the cloth stolen from
 the altar, with the ecclesiastical signs inwoven, and should not
 believe that other men might perceive the sacrilege. Hear, O ye
 obstinate men, what Tullius says against you in the book Of Offices:
 "Certainly there are many, desirous of being great and glorious, who
 rob some that they may give to others, believing themselves to be
 esteemed good men if they enrich their friends with what the Law
 allows. But this is so opposite or contrary to that which ought to be
 done, that nothing is more wrong."
 
 At this age also a man ought to be Affable, to speak for the good of
 others, and to listen to such speech willingly, since it is good for a
 man to discourse kindly at an age when he is listened to. And this age
 also has with it a shadow of authority, for which reason it appears
 that the aged man is more likely to be listened to than a person in a
 younger period of life. And of most good and beautiful Truths it seems
 that a man ought to have knowledge after the long experience of life.
 Wherefore Tullius says, in that book On Old Age, in the person of Cato
 the elder: "To me is increased the desire and the delight to remain in
 conversation longer than I am wont." And that all four of these things
 are right and proper to this age, Ovid teaches, in the seventh chapter
 of Metamorphoses, in that fable where he writes how Cephalus of Athens
 came to AEacus the King for help in the war which Athens had with the
 Cretans. He shows that AEacus, an old man, was prudent when, having,
 through pestilence caused by corruption of the air, lost almost all
 his people, he wisely had recourse to God, and besought of Him the
 restoration of the dead; and for his wisdom, which in patience
 possessed him and caused him to turn to God, his people were restored
 to him in greater number than before. He shows that he was just, when
 he says that AEacus was the divider and the distributor of his deserted
 land to his new people. He shows that AEacus was generous or liberal
 when he said to Cephalus, after his request for aid: "O Athens! ask me
 not to render assistance, but take it yourself; doubt not the strength
 of the forces which this island possesses, nor the power of my state
 and realm; troops are not wanting to us, nay, we have them in excess
 for offence and defence; it is indeed a happy time to give you aid,
 and without excuse."
 
 Alas, how many things are to be observed in this reply! but to a good,
 intelligent man it is sufficient for it to be placed here, even as
 Ovid puts it. He shows that AEacus was affable when he described, in a
 long speech to Cephalus, the history of the pestilence which destroyed
 his people, and the restoration of the same, which he tells readily.
 
 It is clear enough, then, that to this age four things are suitable,
 because the noble Nature reveals them in it, even as the Song says.
 And that the example given may be the more memorable, AEacus says that
 he was the father of Telamon and Peleus and of Phocus, from which
 Telamon sprang Ajax and from Peleus Achilles.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVIII.
 
 
 Following the section which has been discussed, we have now to proceed
 to the last, that is, to that which begins, "The fourth part of their
 life Weds them again to God," by which the text intends to show what
 the noble Soul does in the last age, that is, in Extreme Old Age, that
 is, Senility. And it says that it does two things: the one, that it
 returns to God as to that port or haven whence it departed when it
 issued forth to enter into the sea of this life; the other is, that it
 blesses the voyage which it has made, because it has been upright,
 straight, and good, and without the bitterness of storm and tempest.
 
 And here it is to be known that, even as Tullius says in that book On
 Old Age, the natural death is, as it were, a port or haven to us after
 our long voyage and a place of rest. And the Virtuous Man who dies
 thus is like the good mariner; for, as he approaches the port or
 haven, he strikes his sails, and gently, with feeble steering, enters
 port. Even thus we ought to strike the sails of our worldly affairs,
 and turn to God with all our heart and mind, so that one may come into
 that haven with all sweetness and all peace.
 
 And in this we have from our own proper nature great instruction in
 gentleness, for in such a death as this there is no pain nor
 bitterness, but even as a ripe apple easily and without violence
 detaches itself from its branch, so our Soul without grief separates
 itself from the body wherein it has dwelt.
 
 Aristotle, in his book On Youth and Old Age, says that the death which
 overtakes us in old age is without sadness. And as to him who comes
 from a long journey, before he enters into the gate of his city, the
 citizens thereof go forth to meet him, so do those citizens of the
 Eternal Life go forth to meet the noble Soul; and they do thus because
 of his good works and acts of contemplation, which were of old
 rendered unto God and withdrawn from worldly affairs and thoughts.
 Hear what Tullius says in the person of Cato the elder: "It seems to
 me that already I see, and I uplift myself in the greatest desire to
 see, your fathers, whom I loved, and not only those whom I knew
 myself, but also those of whom I have heard spoken." In this age,
 then, the noble Soul renders itself unto God, and awaits the end of
 this life with much desire; and to itself it seems that it goes out
 from the Inn to return home to the Father's mansion; to itself it
 seems to have reached the end of a long journey and to have reached
 the City; to itself it seems to have crossed the wide sea and returned
 into the port. O, miserable men and vile, who run into this port with
 sails unfurled; and there where you should find rest, are broken by
 the fury of the wind and wrecked in the harbour. Truly the Knight
 Lancelot chose not to enter it with sails unfurled, nor our most noble
 Italian Guido da Montefeltro. These noble Spirits indeed furled the
 sails after the voyage of this World, whose cares were rendered to
 Religion in their long old age, when they had laid down each earthly
 joy and labour. And it is not possible to excuse any man because of
 the bond of matrimony, which may hold him in his old age, from turning
 to Religion, even as he who adopts the habit of St. Benedict and St.
 Augustine and St. Francis and St. Dominic and the like mode of life,
 but also it is possible to turn to a good and true Religion whilst
 remaining in the bonds of matrimony, for God asks of us no more than
 the religious heart. And therefore St. Paul says to the Romans: "For
 he is not a Jew which is one outwardly; neither is that circumcision
 which is outward in the flesh. But he is a Jew which is one inwardly;
 and circumcision is that of the heart, in the spirit, and not in the
 letter; whose praise is not of men, but of God."
 
 And the Noble Soul in this age blesses likewise the time that is past,
 and it may well bless it; because when Memory turns back to them, the
 Noble Soul remembers her upright deeds, without which it were not
 possible for her to come to the port whither she is hastening with
 such wealth nor with such gain. And the Noble Soul does like the good
 merchant, who, when he draws near to his port, examines his cargo, and
 says: "If I had not passed along such a highway as that, I should not
 possess this treasure, and I should not have wherewith to rejoice in
 my city, to which I am approaching;" and therefore he blesses the
 voyage he has made.
 
 And that these two things are suitable to this age that great poet
 Lucan represents to us in the second book of his Pharsalia, when he
 says that Marcia returned to Cato, and entreated him that he would
 take her back in his fourth and Extreme Old Age, by which Marcia the
 Noble Soul is meant, and we can thus depict the symbol of it in all
 Truth. Marcia was a virgin, and in that state typifies Adolescence;
 she then espoused Cato, and in that state typifies Youth; she then
 bore sons, by whom are typified the Virtues which are becoming to
 young men, as previously described; and she departed from Cato and
 espoused Hortensius, by which it is typified that she quitted Youth
 and came to Old Age. She bore sons to this man also, by whom are
 typified the Virtues which befit Old Age, as previously said.
 Hortensius died, by which is typified the end of Old Age, and Marcia,
 made a widow, by which widowhood is typified Extreme Old Age, returned
 in the early days of her widowhood to Cato, whereby is typified the
 Noble Soul turning to God in the beginning of Extreme Old Age. And
 what earthly man was more worthy to typify God than Cato? None, of a
 certainty. And what does Marcia say to Cato? "Whilst there was blood
 in me [that is to say, Youth], whilst the maternal power was in me
 [that is, Age, which is indeed the Mother of all other Virtues or
 Powers, as has been previously shown or proved], I," says Marcia,
 "fulfilled all thy commandments [that is to say, that the Soul stood
 firm in obedience to the Civil Laws]." She says: "And I took two
 husbands," that is to say, I have been in two fruitful periods of
 life. "Now," says Marcia, "that I am weary, and that I am void and
 empty, I return to thee, being no longer able to give happiness to the
 other husband;" that is to say, that the Noble Soul, knowing well that
 it has no longer the power to produce, that is, feeling all its
 members to have grown feeble, turns to God, that is, to Him who has no
 need of members of the body. And Marcia says, "Give me the ancient
 covenanted privileges of the beds; give me the name alone of the
 Marriage Tie;" that is to say, the Noble Soul says to God, "O my Lord,
 give me now repose and rest;" the Soul says, "Give me at least
 whatsoever I may have called Thine in a life so long." And Marcia
 says, "Two reasons move or urge me to say this; the one is, that they
 may say of me, after I am dead, that I was the wife of Cato; the other
 is, that it may be said after me that thou didst not drive me away,
 but didst espouse me heartily." By these two causes the Noble Soul is
 stirred and desires to depart from this life as the spouse of God, and
 wishes to show that God was gracious to the creature that He made. O
 unhappy and baseborn men! you who prefer to depart from this life
 under the name of Hortensius rather than of Cato!
 
 From Cato's name a grace comes into the close of the discourse which
 it was fit to make touching the signs of Nobility; because in him
 Nobility reveals them all, through all the ages of his life.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIX.
 
 
 Since the Song has demonstrated those signs which in each age or
 period of life appear in the Noble Man, and by which it is possible to
 know him, and without which he cannot be, even as the Sun cannot be
 without light or the fire without heat, the text cries aloud to the
 People in the concluding part of this treatise on Nobility, and it
 says: "How many are deceived!" They are deceived who, because they are
 of ancient and famous lineage, and because they are descended of
 excellent and Noble fathers, believe themselves to be Noble, yet have
 in themselves no Nobility. And here arise two questions, to which it
 is right to attend at the end of this treatise. It would be possible
 for Manfredi da Vico, who but now is called Praetor and Prefect, to
 say: "Whatever I may be, I recall to mind and I represent my elders,
 who deserved the Office of Prefecture because of their Nobility, and
 they merited the honour of investiture at the coronation of the
 Emperor, and they merited the honour of receiving the Rose of Gold
 from the Roman Pontiff: I ought to receive from the People honour and
 reverence." And this is one question. The other is, that it would be
 possible for the scions of the families of San Nazzaro di Pavia and of
 the Piscitelli of Naples to say: "If Nobility is that which has been
 described, that is, that it is Divine seed graciously cast into the
 human Soul, and the progeny, or offshoots, have, as is evident, no
 Soul, it would not be possible to term any of its progeny or offshoots
 Noble; but this is opposed to the opinion of those who assert that our
 race is the most Noble in these cities."
 
 To the first question Juvenal replies in the eighth Satire, when he
 begins with exclaiming, as it were: "What is the use of all these
 honours and of this glory which remain from the past, except that they
 serve as a mantle or cloak to him who may wish to cover himself with
 them, badly as he may live; except for him who talks of his ancestors,
 and points out their great and wonderful works, giving his own mind to
 miserable and vile actions?" And this satirical poet asks: "Who will
 call that man Noble, because of his good race, who is not worthy of
 his race? It is no other than to call the Dwarf a Giant." Then
 afterwards he says to such an one as this: "Between thee and the
 statue erected in memory of thine ancestor there is no other
 dissimilarity except that its head is of marble and thine is alive."
 And in this (with reverence I say it) I disagree with the poet, for
 the statue of marble or of wood or of metal, which has remained in
 memory of some worthy brave man, differs much in effect from the
 wicked descendant: because the statue always confirms a good opinion
 in those who have heard of the good renown or fame of him whose statue
 it is, and it begets good opinion in others. But the wicked son or
 nephew does quite the contrary: he weakens the good opinion of those
 who have heard of the goodness of his ancestors. For some one says to
 himself in his thought: "It cannot possibly be true, all this that has
 been said about this man's ancestors, since from their seed one sees
 an offshoot such as that." Wherefore he ought to receive not honour,
 but dishonour, who bears false or evil witness against the good. And
 therefore Tullius says that the son of the brave man ought to strive
 to bear good witness to the father. Wherefore, in my judgment, even as
 he who defames an excellent man deserves to be shunned by all people
 and not listened to, even so the vile man descended from good
 ancestors deserves to be banned by all; and the good man ought to
 close his eyes in order not to see that infamous man casting infamy
 upon the goodness which remains in Memory alone. And let this suffice
 at present to the first question that was moved.
 
 To the second question it is possible to reply that a race of itself
 has no Soul; and indeed it is true that it is called Noble, but it is
 in a certain way. Wherefore it is to be known that every whole is
 composed of its parts, and there is a certain whole which has a simple
 essence in its parts, as in one man there is one essence in all and in
 each individual part; and this which is said to be in the part is said
 in the same way to be in the whole. There is another whole which has
 not a common essential form or essence with the parts, as a heap of
 corn; but there is a secondary essence which results from many grains,
 which possess in themselves a true and primary essence. And in such a
 whole as this they are said to be the qualities of the parts in a
 secondary way; wherefore it is called a white heap, because the grains
 whereof the heap is made are white. Truly this white appearance is
 more in the grains in the first place, and in the second place it
 results in the whole heap, and thus secondarily it is possible to call
 it white; and in such a way it is possible to call a race Noble.
 Wherefore it is to be known, that as in order to make a white heap the
 white grains must be most numerous, so to make a Noble race the Noble
 Men must be more numerous than the others, so that their goodness,
 with its good fame or renown, may cover the opposite quality which is
 within. And as from a white heap of corn it would be possible to pick
 up the wheat grain by grain, and substitute, grain by grain, red
 maize, till, finally, the whole heap or mass would change colour, so
 would it be possible for the good men of the Noble race to die out one
 by one, and the wicked ones to spring up therein, who would so change
 the name or fame thereof, that it would have to be called, not Noble,
 but vile, or base.
 
 And let this be a sufficient answer to the second question.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXX.
 
 
 As it has been shown previously in the third chapter of this treatise,
 this Song has three principal parts, whereof two have been reasoned or
 argued out, the first of which begins in the aforesaid chapter, and
 the second in the sixteenth (so that the first through thirteen, and
 the second through fourteen chapters, passes on to an end, without
 counting the Proem of the treatise on the Song, which is comprised in
 two chapters), in this thirtieth and last chapter we must briefly
 discuss the third principal part, which was made as a refrain and as a
 species of ornament for this Song; and it begins: "My Song, Against
 the strayers."
 
 Here it is chiefly to be known that every good workman, at the end of
 his work, ought to ennoble and embellish it as much as possible, that
 it may leave his hands so much the more precious, and more worthy of
 fame. And this I endeavour to do in this part, not as a good workman,
 but as the follower of one.
 
 I say, then, "My Song, Against the strayers." "Against the strayers"
 is a phrase, as, for example, from the good friar, Thomas of Aquinas,
 who, to a book of his, which he wrote to the confusion of all those
 who go astray from our Faith, gave the title "Contra Gentili," Against
 the Heathen. I say, then, that thou shalt go, which is as much as to
 say: "Thou art now perfect, and it is now time, not to stand still,
 but to go forward, for thy enterprise is great. And 'when you reach
 Our Lady, hide not from her that your end Is labour that would lessen
 wrong.'" Where it is to be observed that, as our Lord says, "We ought
 not to cast pearls before swine," because it is not to their
 advantage, and it is injury to the pearls; and, as Aesop the poet says
 in the first fable, a little grain of corn is of far more worth to a
 cock than a pearl, and therefore he leaves the pearl and picks up the
 grain of corn: reflecting on this, as a caution, I speak and give
 command to the Song that it reveal its high office where this Lady,
 that is, where Philosophy, will be found. And that most noble Lady
 will be found when her dwelling-place is found, that is, the Soul in
 which she finds her Inn. And this Philosophy dwells not in wise men
 alone, but likewise, as is proved above in another treatise, wherever
 the love for her inhabits, she is there. "And to such as these," I say
 to the Song, "thou mayst reveal thine office, because to them the
 purpose thereof will be useful, and by them its thoughts will be
 gathered in."
 
 And I bid it say to this Lady, "I travel ever talking of your Friend."
 
 Nobility is her Friend. For so much does the one love the other, that
 Nobility always seeks her, and Philosophy does not turn aside her most
 sweet glance to any other.
 
 O, what a great and beautiful ornament is this which is given to her
 in the last part of this Song, by giving to her the title of Friend,
 the Friend of her whose own abode is in the most secret depths of the
 Divine Mind.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 NOTE
 
 ON THE DATE OF THE CONVITO
 
 
 It is natural to suppose that Dante's death at Ravenna in 1321 caused
 the Convito, a work of his latter years, to be left unfinished. But
 there are arguments that have been especially dwelt upon by writers
 who regard the Convito as a work begun before the conception of the
 Divine Comedy, and dropped when the Poet's mind became intent upon
 that masterpiece.
 
 One argument is that the Divine Comedy is nowhere mentioned or alluded
 to in the Convito. But as the place designed for the Convito is midway
 between the Vita Nuova, which preceded it, and the Divine Comedy,
 which was to follow, references to the poem which was not yet before
 the reader would have been a fault in art.
 
 Another argument is drawn from the fourteenth chapter of the Second
 Treatise, where (on page 84 in this volume) the shadow in the Moon is
 ascribed to "the rarity of its body, in which the rays of the Sun can
 find no end wherefrom to strike back again as in the other parts." In
 the second canto of the Purgatorio, Beatrice opposes that opinion,
 whence it may be inferred that Dante had learnt better, and he speaks
 of this again in a later canto (the twenty-second) as a former
 opinion. This leads to an inference that the Second Treatise was
 written before 1300.
 
 Attention is due also to a passage in the third chapter of the First
 Treatise (on pages 16 and 17 in this volume), in which Dante speaks of
 his long exile and poverty. The exile and the wanderings of Dante
 began after the year 1300. He was befriended by Guido da Polenta in
 Ravenna, by Uguccione della Faggiola in Lucca, by Malaspina in the
 Lunigiana, by Can Grande della Scala in Verona, by Bosone de'
 Raffaelli in Gubbio, by the Patriarch Pagano della Torre in Udine. In
 1311, when the Emperor Henry of Luxembourg went to Italy, Dante had
 some hope of return, which passed away in 1313 when that Emperor died
 in Buonconvento. Dante remained in exile. In 1321 his patron, Guido
 Novello da Polenta, sent him on an embassy to Venice, in which he was
 unsuccessful. The sea way being blocked, he had to return by land, and
 he was struck by the malaria which caused his death by fever on the
 14th of September in that year, 1321. This reference to long exile
 leads to an inference that the First Treatise was written much later
 than 1300.
 
 But, again, there is a passage in the third chapter of the Fourth
 Treatise (on page 171 of this volume) that points to an earlier date.
 Frederick of Suabia is named as the Emperor who
 
                     held,
       As far as he could see,
     Descent of wealth, and generous ways,
       To make Nobility.
 
 Dante calls him "the last Emperor of the Romans," and adds, "I say
 last with respect to the present time, notwithstanding that Rudolf,
 and Adolphus, and Albert were elected after his death and from his
 descendants." This last of the Romans was that famous Frederick II.,
 who died in 1250, and of whom Dante said in his Treatise on the
 Language of the People: "The illustrious heroes, Frederick Caesar and
 his son Manfredi, followed after elegance and scorned what was mean;
 so that all the best compositions of the time came out of their Court.
 Thus, because their royal throne was in Sicily, all the poems of our
 predecessors in the Vulgar Tongue were called Sicilian." Rudolf I. of
 Hapsburg, founder of the Imperial House of Austria, was elected
 Emperor in 1273, after a time of confusion and nominal rule. He died
 in 1291, and, instead of his son Albert, Adolphus of Nassau was next
 elected Emperor. But in June 1298 Albert obtained election; Adolphus
 was deposed, and was soon afterwards killed in battle with his rival.
 Albert was murdered on the 6th of May, 1308, and, after an interregnum
 of seven months, he was succeeded by Henry VII. of Luxembourg. Now,
 Dante's list does not go on from Albert to Henry. It is assumed,
 therefore, that this passage must have been written before the end of
 the year 1308.
 
 There is another passage at the close of chapter vi. of the Fourth
 Treatise (on page 186 in this volume) that points to a like inference
 of date. Dante writes: "Ye enemies of God, look to your flanks, ye who
 have seized the sceptres of the kingdoms of Italy. And I say to you,
 Charles, and to you, Frederick, Kings, and to you, ye other Princes
 and Tyrants, see who sits by the side of you in council." The Charles
 and Frederick here addressed were Charles II. of Anjou, King of
 Naples, and Frederick of Aragon, King of Sicily; and King Charles died
 in the year 1310.
 
 It has been inferred, therefore, that the four treatises of the
 Convito were not written consecutively. The Second Treatise may have
 been begun some time after the death of Beatrice, in 1290, time being
 allowed after 1290 for the completion of the Vita Nuova and a period
 of devotion to philosophic studies. That Second Treatise having been
 first written, the Treatise on Nobility, the Fourth, may have next
 followed; and this may have been written before the end of the year
 1298. The Third Treatise may have been written later, and made to
 connect the Second and the Fourth. The First Treatise, or General
 Introduction, which has in it clear indication of a later date, may
 have been written last, when the whole design was brought into shape.
 Various reasons have been used for dating this final arrangement of
 the plan for an Ethical survey of human knowledge in fifteen
 treatises, and the suggested date is the year 1314. The whole work
 seems to have been planned. Besides the references to the Fifteenth
 Treatise, there is a glance forward to the matter of the Seventh
 Treatise in the twenty-sixth chapter of the Fourth.
 
 The question of date is not of great importance, and this may console
 us though we know that it can never be settled. Here it is only
 touched upon to show the significance of one or two historical
 allusions in the book.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 E-text prepared by Brian Foley, Barbara Magni, and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team (http://www.pgdp.net) from page images generously made
 available by Internet Archive/American Libraries
 (http://archive.org/details/americana)
 
 
 
 Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
       file which includes the original illustration.
       See 41085-h.htm or 41085-h.zip:
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/41085/41085-h/41085-h.htm)
       or
       (http://www.gutenberg.org/files/41085/41085-h.zip)
 
 
       Images of the original pages are available through
       Internet Archive/American Libraries. See
       http://archive.org/details/newlifelavitanuo00dantrich
 
 
 
 
 
 The Siddal Edition
 
 THE NEW LIFE
 
 (LA VITA NUOVA)
 
 of
 
 DANTE ALIGHIERI
 
 Translated by Dante Gabriel Rossetti
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Ellis and Elvey
 London
 1899
 
 Printed by Hazell, Watson, & Viney, Ld., London and Aylesbury.
 
 
 
 
 _PREFATORY NOTE_
 
 
 Dante Gabriel Rossetti, being the son of an Italian who was greatly
 immersed in the study of Dante Alighieri, and who produced a Comment on
 the _Inferno_, and other books relating to Dantesque literature, was
 from his earliest childhood familiar with the name of the stupendous
 Florentine, and to some extent aware of the range and quality of his
 writings. Neverthelessor perhaps indeed it may have been partly on
 that very accounthe did not in those opening years read Dante to
 any degree worth mentioning: he was well versed in Shakespeare, Walter
 Scott, Byron, and some other writers, years before he applied himself
 to Dante. He may have been fourteen years of age, or even fifteen (May
 1843), before he took seriously to the author of the _Divina Commedia_.
 He then read him eagerly, and with the profoundest admiration and
 delight; and from the _Commedia_ he proceeded to the lyrical poems and
 the _Vita Nuova_. I question whether he ever readunless in the most
 cursory wayother and less fascinating writings of Alighieri, such as
 the _Convito_ and the _De Monarchi_.
 
 From reading, Rossetti went on to translating. He translated at an
 early age, chiefly between 1845 and 1849, a great number of poems by
 the Italians contemporary with Dante, or preceding him; and, among
 other things, he made a version of the whole _Vita Nuova_, prose
 and verse. This may possibly have been the first important thing
 that he translated from the Italian: if not the first, still less
 was it the last, and it may well be that his rendering of the book
 was completed within the year 1846, or early in 1847. He did not, of
 course, leave his version exactly as it had come at first: on the
 contrary, he took counsel with friends (Alfred Tennyson among the
 number), toned down crudities and juvenilities, and worked to make the
 whole thing impressive and artisticfor in such matters he was much
 more chargeable with over-fastidiousness than with laxity. Still, the
 work, as we now have it, is essentially the work of those adolescent
 yearsfrom time to time reconsidered and improved, but not transmuted.
 
 Some few years after producing his translation of the _Vita Nuova_,
 Rossetti was desirous of publishing it, and of illustrating the volume
 with etchings from various designs, which he had meanwhile done, of
 incidents in the story. This project, however, had to be laid aside,
 owing to want of means, and the etchings were never undertaken. It was
 only in 1861 that the volume named _The Early Italian Poets_, including
 the translated _Vita Nuova_, was brought out: the same volume, with
 a change in the arrangement of its contents, was reissued in 1874,
 entitled _Dante and his Circle_. This book, in its original form, was
 received with favour, and settled the claim of Rossetti to rank as a
 poetic translator, or indeed as a poet in his own right.
 
 For _The Early Italian Poets_ he wrote a Preface, from which a passage,
 immediately relating to the _Vita Nuova_, is extracted in the present
 edition. There are some other passages, affecting the whole of the
 translations in that volume, which deserve to be borne in mind, as
 showing the spirit in which he undertook the translating work, and I
 give them here:
 
 The life-blood of rhythmical translation is this commandmentthat a
 good poem shall not be turned into a bad one. The only true motive for
 putting poetry into a fresh language must be to endow a fresh nation,
 as far as possible, with one more possession of beauty. Poetry not
 being an exact science, literality of rendering is altogether secondary
 to this chief law. I say _literality_,not fidelity, which is by no
 means the same thing. When literality can be combined with what is thus
 the primary condition of success, the translator is fortunate, and must
 strive his utmost to unite them; when such object can only be obtained
 by paraphrase, that is his only path. Any merit possessed by these
 translations is derived from an effort to follow this principle.... The
 task of the translator (and with all humility be it spoken) is one of
 some self-denial. Often would he avail himself of any special grace of
 his own idiom and epoch, if only his will belonged to him: often would
 some cadence serve him but for his authors structuresome structure
 but for his authors cadence: often the beautiful turn of a stanza must
 be weakened to adopt some rhyme which will tally, and he sees the poet
 revelling in abundance of language where himself is scantily supplied.
 Now he would slight the matter for the music, and now the music for the
 matter; but no, he must deal to each alike. Sometimes too a flaw in the
 work galls him, and he would fain remove it, doing for the poet that
 which his age denied him; but no, it is not in the bond.
 
 It may be as well to explain here a very small share which I myself
 took in the _Vita Nuova_ translation. When the volume _The Early
 Italian Poets_ was in preparation, my brother asked me (January
 1861) to aid by collating my _Vita Nuova_ with the original, and
 amending inaccuracies. He defined the work further as follows: What
 I want is that you should correct my translation throughout, removing
 inaccuracies and mannerisms. And, if you have time, it would be a great
 service to translate the analyses of the poems (which I omitted).
 This, however, if you think it desirable to include them. I did not
 at the time (on ground of readableness), but since think they may be
 desirable: only have become so unfamiliar with the book that I have
 no distinct opinion. On January 25th he wrote: Many and many thanks
 for a most essential service most thoroughly performed. I have not yet
 verified the whole of the notes, but I see they are just what I needed,
 and will save me a vast amount of trouble. I should very much wish that
 the translation were more literal, but cannot do it all again. _My_
 notes, which you have taken the trouble of revising, are, of course,
 quite paltry and useless.
 
 In order that the reader may judge as to this question of literality, I
 will give here the literal Englishing of the Sonnet at p. 38, and the
 paragraph which precedes it (I take the passage quite at random), and
 the reader can, if he likes, compare this rendering with that which
 appears in Dante Rossettis text:
 
 After the departure of this gentlewoman it was the pleasure of the
 Lord of the Angels to call to His glory a lady young and much of
 noble[1] aspect, who was very graceful in this aforesaid city: whose
 body I saw lying without the soul amid many ladies, who were weeping
 very piteously. Then, remembering that erewhile I had seen her keeping
 company with that most noble one, I could not withhold some tears.
 Indeed, weeping, I purposed to speak certain words about her death,
 in guerdon of my having at some whiles seen her with my lady. And
 somewhat of this I referred to in the last part of the words which I
 spoke of her, as manifestly appears to him who understands them: and
 then I composed these two Sonnetsof which the first begins, Weep,
 loversthe second, Villain Death.
 
   [1] _Gentile._ The word means noble rather than (in its modern
        shade of meaning) gentle. Genteel would sometimes apply,
        but has ceased to be admissible in serious writing.
 
 Weep, lovers, since Love weeps,hearkening what cause makes him
 wail: Love hears ladies invoking pity, showing bitter grief outwardly
 by the eyes; because villain Death has set his cruel working upon a
 noble heart, ruining that which in a noble lady is to be praised in the
 world, apart from honour. Hear how much Love did her honouring; for I
 saw him lamenting in very person over the dead seemly image: and often
 he gazed towards heaven, wherein was already settled the noble soul who
 had been a lady of such gladsome semblance.
 
 It would be out of place to enter here into any detailed observations
 upon the _Vita Nuova_, its meaning, and the literature which has grown
 out of it. I will merely name, as obvious things for the English reader
 to consult, the translation which was made by Sir Theodore Martin; the
 essay by Professor C. Eliot Norton; the translations published by Dr.
 Garnett in his book entitled _Dante, Petrarch, Camoens, 124 Sonnets_,
 along with the remarks in his valuable _History of Italian Literature_;
 Scartazzinis _Companion to Dante_; and the publications of the Rev.
 Dr. Moore, the foremost of our living Dante scholars.
 
                                                      W. M. ROSSETTI.
 
     _August 1899._
 
 
 
 
 _INTRODUCTION._
 
 
 The _Vita Nuova_ (the Autobiography or Autopsychology of Dantes youth
 till about his twenty-seventh year) is already well known to many in
 the original, or by means of essays and of English versions partial or
 entire. It is therefore, and on all accounts, unnecessary to say much
 more of the work here than it says for itself. Wedded to its exquisite
 and intimate beauties are personal peculiarities which excite wonder
 and conjecture, best replied to in the words which Beatrice herself
 is made to utter in the _Commedia_: Questi _f tal_ nella sua vita
 nuova.[2] Thus then young Dante _was_. All that seemed possible to be
 done here for the work was to translate it in as free and clear a form
 as was consistent with fidelity to its meaning; and to ease it, as far
 as possible, from notes and encumbrances.
 
   [2] Purgatorio, C. xxx.
 
 It may be noted here how necessary a knowledge of the _Vita Nuova_
 is to the full comprehension of the part borne by Beatrice in the
 _Commedia_. Moreover, it is only from the perusal of its earliest and
 then undivulged self-communings that we can divine the whole bitterness
 of wrong to such a soul as Dantes, its poignant sense of abandonment,
 or its deep and jealous refuge in memory. Above all, it is here that we
 find the first manifestations of that wisdom of obedience, that natural
 breath of duty, which afterwards, in the _Commedia_, lifted up a mighty
 voice for warning and testimony. Throughout the _Vita Nuova_ there is
 a strain like the first falling murmur which reaches the ear in some
 remote meadow, and prepares us to look upon the sea.
 
 Boccaccio, in his Life of Dante, tells us that the great poet, in later
 life, was ashamed of this work of his youth. Such a statement hardly
 seems reconcilable with the allusions to it made or implied in the
 _Commedia_; but it is true that the _Vita Nuova_ is a book which only
 youth could have produced, and which must chiefly remain sacred to
 the young; to each of whom the figure of Beatrice, less lifelike than
 lovelike, will seem the friend of his own heart. Nor is this, perhaps,
 its least praise. To tax its author with effeminacy on account of the
 extreme sensitiveness evinced by this narrative of his love, would be
 manifestly unjust, when we find that, though love alone is the theme of
 the _Vita Nuova_, war already ranked among its authors experiences at
 the period to which it relates. In the year 1289, the one preceding the
 death of Beatrice, Dante served with the foremost cavalry in the great
 battle of Campaldino, on the eleventh of June, when the Florentines
 defeated the people of Arezzo. In the autumn of the next year, 1290,
 when for him, by the death of Beatrice, the city as he says sat
 solitary, such refuge as he might find from his grief was sought in
 action and danger: for we learn from the _Commedia_ (Hell, C. xxi.)
 that he served in the war then waged by Florence upon Pisa, and was
 present at the surrender of Caprona. He says, using the reminiscence to
 give life to a description, in his great way:
 
     Ive seen the troops out of Caprona go
       On terms, affrighted thus, when on the spot
     They found themselves with foemen compassd so.
 
                                          (CAYLEYS _Translation_.)
 
 A word should be said here of the title of Dantes autobiography.
 The adjective _Nuovo_, _nuova_, or _Novello_, _novella_, literally
 _New_, is often used by Dante and other early writers in the sense of
 _young_. This has induced some editors of the _Vita Nuova_ to explain
 the title as meaning _Early Life_. I should be glad on some accounts
 to adopt this supposition, as everything is a gain which increases
 clearness to the modern reader; but on consideration I think the more
 mystical interpretation of the words, as _New Life_ (in reference to
 that revulsion of his being which Dante so minutely describes as having
 occurred simultaneously with his first sight of Beatrice), appears
 the primary one, and therefore the most necessary to be given in a
 translation. The probability may be that both were meant, but this I
 cannot convey.[3]
 
   [3] I must hazard here (to relieve the first page of my translation
        from a long note) a suggestion as to the meaning of the most
        puzzling passage in the whole _Vita Nuova_,that sentence
        just at the outset which says, La gloriosa donna della mia
        mente, la quale f chiamata da molti Beatrice, i quali non
        sapeano che si chiamare. On this passage all the commentators
        seem helpless, turning it about and sometimes adopting
        alterations not to be found in any ancient manuscript of the
        work. The words mean literally, The glorious lady of my
        mind who was called Beatrice by many who knew not how she
        was called. This presents the obvious difficulty that the
        ladys name really _was_ Beatrice, and that Dante throughout
        uses that name himself. In the text of my version I have
        adopted, as a rendering, the one of the various compromises
        which seemed to give the most beauty to the meaning. But
        it occurs to me that a less irrational escape out of the
        difficulty than any I have seen suggested may possibly be
        found by linking this passage with the close of the sonnet
        at page 104 of the _Vita Nuova_, beginning, I felt a spirit
        of love begin to stir, in the last line of which sonnet
        Love is made to assert that the name of Beatrice is _Love_.
        Dante appears to have dwelt on this fancy with some pleasure,
        from what is said in an earlier sonnet (page 39) about Love
        in his proper form (by which Beatrice seems to be meant)
        bending over a dead lady. And it is in connection with the
        sonnet where the name of Beatrice is said to be Love, that
        Dante, as if to show us that the Love he speaks of is only
        his own emotion, enters into an argument as to Love being
        merely an accident in substance,in other words, Amore e il
        cor gentil son una cosa. This conjecture may be pronounced
        extravagant; but the _Vita Nuova_, when examined, proves so
        full of intricate and fantastic analogies, even in the mere
        arrangement of its parts, (much more than appears on any but
        the closest scrutiny,) that it seems admissible to suggest
        even a whimsical solution of a difficulty which remains
        unconquered. Or to have recourse to the much more welcome
        means of solution afforded by simple inherent beauty: may not
        the meaning be merely that any person looking on so noble
        and lovely a creation, without knowledge of her name, must
        have spontaneously called her Beatrice,_i.e._, the giver
        of blessing? This would be analogous by antithesis to the
        translation I have adopted in my text.
 
 
 
 
 DANTE ALIGHIERI
 
 
 
 
 THE NEW LIFE.
 
 (LA VITA NUOVA.)
 
 
 In that part of the book of my memory before the which is little that
 can be read, there is a rubric, saying, _Incipit Vita Nova_.[4] Under
 such rubric I find written many things; and among them the words which
 I purpose to copy into this little book; if not all of them, at the
 least their substance.
 
   [4] Here beginneth the new life.
 
 Nine times already since my birth had the heaven of light returned to
 the selfsame point almost, as concerns its own revolution, when first
 the glorious Lady of my mind was made manifest to mine eyes; even she
 who was called Beatrice by many who knew not wherefore.[5] She had
 already been in this life for so long as that, within her time, the
 starry heaven had moved towards the Eastern quarter one of the twelve
 parts of a degree; so that she appeared to me at the beginning of her
 ninth year almost, and I saw her almost at the end of my ninth year.
 Her dress, on that day, was of a most noble colour, a subdued and
 goodly crimson, girdled and adorned in such sort as best suited with
 her very tender age. At that moment, I say most truly that the spirit
 of life, which hath its dwelling in the secretest chamber of the heart,
 began to tremble so violently that the least pulses of my body shook
 therewith; and in trembling it said these words: _Ecce deus fortior
 me, qui veniens dominabitur mihi._[6] At that moment the animate
 spirit, which dwelleth in the lofty chamber whither all the senses
 carry their perceptions, was filled with wonder, and speaking more
 especially unto the spirits of the eyes, said these words: _Apparuit
 jam beatitudo vestra._[7] At that moment the natural spirit, which
 dwelleth there where our nourishment is administered, began to weep,
 and in weeping said these words: _Heu miser! quia frequenter impeditus
 ero deinceps._[8]
 
   [5] In reference to the meaning of the name, She who confers
        blessing. We learn from Boccaccio that this first meeting
        took place at a May Feast, given in the year 1274 by Folco
        Portinari, father of Beatrice, who ranked among the principal
        citizens of Florence: to which feast Dante accompanied his
        father, Alighiero Alighieri.
 
   [6] Here is a deity stronger than I; who, coming, shall rule over
        me.
 
   [7] Your beatitude hath now been made manifest unto you.
 
   [8] Woe is me! for that often I shall be disturbed from this time
        forth!
 
 I say that, from that time forward, Love quite governed my soul; which
 was immediately espoused to him, and with so safe and undisputed a
 lordship (by virtue of strong imagination) that I had nothing left
 for it but to do all his bidding continually. He oftentimes commanded
 me to seek if I might see this youngest of the Angels: wherefore I in
 my boyhood often went in search of her, and found her so noble and
 praiseworthy that certainly of her might have been said those words
 of the poet Homer, She seemed not to be the daughter of a mortal man,
 but of God.[9] And albeit her image, that was with me always, was an
 exultation of Love to subdue me, it was yet of so perfect a quality
 that it never allowed me to be overruled by Love without the faithful
 counsel of reason, whensoever such counsel was useful to be heard.
 But seeing that were I to dwell overmuch on the passions and doings of
 such early youth, my words might be counted something fabulous, I will
 therefore put them aside; and passing many things that may be conceived
 by the pattern of these, I will come to such as are writ in my memory
 with a better distinctness.
 
   [9]
 
                                 
             ,  .
 
                                            (_Iliad_, xxiv. 258.)
 
 After the lapse of so many days that nine years exactly were completed
 since the above-written appearance of this most gracious being, on the
 last of those days it happened that the same wonderful lady appeared
 to me dressed all in pure white, between two gentle ladies elder
 than she. And passing through a street, she turned her eyes thither
 where I stood sorely abashed: and by her unspeakable courtesy, which
 is now guerdoned in the Great Cycle, she saluted me with so virtuous
 a bearing that I seemed then and there to behold the very limits of
 blessedness. The hour of her most sweet salutation was exactly the
 ninth of that day; and because it was the first time that any words
 from her reached mine ears, I came into such sweetness that I parted
 thence as one intoxicated. And betaking me to the loneliness of mine
 own room, I fell to thinking of this most courteous lady, thinking
 of whom I was overtaken by a pleasant slumber, wherein a marvellous
 vision was presented to me: for there appeared to be in my room a mist
 of the colour of fire, within the which I discerned the figure of a
 lord of terrible aspect to such as should gaze upon him, but who seemed
 therewithal to rejoice inwardly that it was a marvel to see. Speaking
 he said many things, among the which I could understand but few; and
 of these, this: _Ego dominus tuus._[10] In his arms it seemed to me
 that a person was sleeping, covered only with a blood-coloured cloth;
 upon whom looking very attentively, I knew that it was the lady of the
 salutation who had deigned the day before to salute me. And he who held
 her held also in his hand a thing that was burning in flames; and he
 said to me, _Vide cor tuum_.[11] But when he had remained with me a
 little while, I thought that he set himself to awaken her that slept;
 after the which he made her to eat that thing which flamed in his hand;
 and she ate as one fearing. Then, having waited again a space, all his
 joy was turned into most bitter weeping; and as he wept he gathered
 the lady into his arms, and it seemed to me that he went with her
 up towards heaven: whereby such a great anguish came upon me that my
 light slumber could not endure through it, but was suddenly broken. And
 immediately having considered, I knew that the hour wherein this vision
 had been made manifest to me was the fourth hour (which is to say, the
 first of the nine last hours) of the night.
 
   [10] I am thy master.
 
   [11] Behold thy heart.
 
 Then, musing on what I had seen, I proposed to relate the same to many
 poets who were famous in that day: and for that I had myself in some
 sort the art of discoursing with rhyme, I resolved on making a sonnet,
 in the which, having saluted all such as are subject unto Love, and
 entreated them to expound my vision, I should write unto them those
 things which I had seen in my sleep. And the sonnet I made was this:
 
     To every heart which the sweet pain doth move,
       And unto which these words may now be brought
       For true interpretation and kind thought,
     Be greeting in our Lords name, which is Love.
     Of those long hours wherein the stars, above,
       Wake and keep watch, the third was almost nought,
       When Love was shown me with such terrors fraught
     As may not carelessly be spoken of.
     He seemed like one who is full of joy, and had
       My heart within his hand, and on his arm
         My lady, with a mantle round her, slept;
     Whom (having wakened her) anon he made
       To eat that heart; she ate, as fearing harm.
         Then he went out; and as he went, he wept.
 
 _This sonnet is divided into two parts. In the first part I give
 greeting, and ask an answer; in the second, I signify what thing has to
 be answered to. The second part commences here: Of those long hours._
 
 To this sonnet I received many answers, conveying many different
 opinions; of the which one was sent by him whom I now call the first
 among my friends, and it began thus, Unto my thinking thou beheldst
 all worth.[12] And indeed, it was when he learned that I was he who
 had sent those rhymes to him, that our friendship commenced. But the
 true meaning of that vision was not then perceived by any one, though
 it be now evident to the least skilful.
 
   [12] The friend of whom Dante here speaks was Guido Cavalcanti.
 
 From that night forth, the natural functions of my body began to be
 vexed and impeded, for I was given up wholly to thinking of this most
 gracious creature: whereby in short space I became so weak and so
 reduced that it was irksome to many of my friends to look upon me;
 while others, being moved by spite, went about to discover what it
 was my wish should be concealed. Wherefore I (perceiving the drift of
 their unkindly questions), by Loves will, who directed me according
 to the counsels of reason, told them how it was Love himself who had
 thus dealt with me: and I said so, because the thing was so plainly to
 be discerned in my countenance that there was no longer any means of
 concealing it. But when they went on to ask, And by whose help hath
 Love done this? I looked in their faces smiling, and spake no word in
 return.
 
 Now it fell on a day, that this most gracious creature was sitting
 where words were to be heard of the Queen of Glory;[13] and I was in
 a place whence mine eyes could behold their beatitude: and betwixt
 her and me, in a direct line, there sat another lady of a pleasant
 favour; who looked round at me many times, marvelling at my continued
 gaze which seemed to have _her_ for its object. And many perceived
 that she thus looked; so that departing thence, I heard it whispered
 after me, Look you to what a pass _such a lady_ hath brought him;
 and in saying this they named her who had been midway between the most
 gentle Beatrice and mine eyes. Therefore I was reassured, and knew
 that for that day my secret had not become manifest. Then immediately
 it came into my mind that I might make use of this lady as a screen to
 the truth: and so well did I play my part that the most of those who
 had hitherto watched and wondered at me, now imagined they had found
 me out. By her means I kept my secret concealed till some years were
 gone over; and for my better security, I even made divers rhymes in
 her honour; whereof I shall here write only as much as concerneth the
 most gentle Beatrice, which is but a very little. Moreover, about the
 same time while this lady was a screen for so much love on my part, I
 took the resolution to set down the name of this most gracious creature
 accompanied with many other womens names, and especially with hers
 whom I spake of. And to this end I put together the names of sixty
 of the most beautiful ladies in that city where God had placed mine
 own lady; and these names I introduced in an epistle in the form of a
 _sirvent_, which it is not my intention to transcribe here. Neither
 should I have said anything of this matter, did I not wish to take
 note of a certain strange thing, to wit: that having written the list,
 I found my ladys name would not stand otherwise than ninth in order
 among the names of these ladies.
 
   [13] _i.e._, in a church.
 
 Now it so chanced with her by whose means I had thus long time
 concealed my desire, that it behoved her to leave the city I speak of,
 and to journey afar: wherefore I, being sorely perplexed at the loss
 of so excellent a defence, had more trouble than even I could before
 have supposed. And thinking that if I spoke not somewhat mournfully
 of her departure, my former counterfeiting would be the more quickly
 perceived, I determined that I would make a grievous sonnet[14]
 thereof; the which I will write here, because it hath certain words
 in it whereof my lady was the immediate cause, as will be plain to him
 that understands.
 
   [14] It will be observed that this poem is not what we now call a
        sonnet. Its structure, however, is analogous to that of the
        sonnet, being two sextetts followed by two quatrains, instead
        of two quatrains followed by two triplets. Dante applies the
        term sonnet to both these forms of composition, and to no
        other.
 
 And the sonnet was this:
 
     All ye that pass along Loves trodden way,
     Pause ye awhile and say
       If there be any grief like unto mine:
     I pray you that you hearken a short space
     Patiently, if my case
       Be not a piteous marvel and a sign.
 
     Love (never, certes, for my worthless part,
     But of his own great heart,)
       Vouchsafed to me a life so calm and sweet
     That oft I heard folk question as I went
     What such great gladness meant:
       They spoke of it behind me in the street.
 
     But now that fearless bearing is all gone
       Which with Loves hoarded wealth was given me;
       Till I am grown to be
     So poor that I have dread to think thereon.
     And thus it is that I, being like as one
       Who is ashamed and hides his poverty,
       Without seem full of glee,
     And let my heart within travail and moan.
 
 _This poem has two principal parts; for, in the first, I mean to call
 the Faithful of Love in those words of Jeremias the Prophet_, O vos
 omnes qui transitis per viam, attendite et videte si est dolor sicut
 dolor meus, _and to pray them to stay and hear me. In the second I
 tell where Love had placed me, with a meaning other than that which
 the last part of the poem shows, and I say what I have lost. The second
 part begins here, Love, (never, certes)._
 
 A certain while after the departure of that lady, it pleased the Master
 of the Angels to call into His glory a damsel, young and of a gentle
 presence, who had been very lovely in the city I speak of: and I saw
 her body lying without its soul among many ladies, who held a pitiful
 weeping. Whereupon, remembering that I had seen her in the company of
 excellent Beatrice, I could not hinder myself from a few tears; and
 weeping, I conceived to say somewhat of her death, in guerdon of having
 seen her somewhile with my lady; which thing I spake of in the latter
 end of the verses that I writ in this matter, as he will discern who
 understands. And I wrote two sonnets, which are these:
 
 
 I.
 
     Weep, Lovers, sith Loves very self doth weep,
       And sith the cause for weeping is so great;
       When now so many dames, of such estate
     In worth, show with their eyes a grief so deep:
     For Death the churl has laid his leaden sleep
       Upon a damsel who was fair of late,
       Defacing all our earth should celebrate,
     Yea all save virtue, which the soul doth keep.
     Now hearken how much Love did honour her.
       I myself saw him in his proper form
         Bending above the motionless sweet dead,
     And often gazing into Heaven; for there
       The soul now sits which when her life was warm
         Dwelt with the joyful beauty that is fled.
 
 _This first sonnet is divided into three parts. In the first, I call
 and beseech the Faithful of Love to weep; and I say that their Lord
 weeps, and that they, hearing the reason why he weeps, shall be more
 minded to listen to me. In the second, I relate this reason. In the
 third, I speak of honour done by Love to this Lady. The second part
 begins here, When now so many dames; the third here, Now hearken._
 
 
 II.
 
     Death, alway cruel, Pitys foe in chief,
     Mother who brought forth grief,
       Merciless judgment and without appeal!
       Since thou alone hast made my heart to feel
       This sadness and unweal,
     My tongue upbraideth thee without relief.
 
     And now (for I must rid thy name of ruth)
     Behoves me speak the truth
       Touching thy cruelty and wickedness:
       Not that they be not known; but neertheless
       I would give hate more stress
     With them that feed on love in very sooth.
 
     Out of this world thou hast driven courtesy,
       And virtue, dearly prized in womanhood;
       And out of youths gay mood
     The lovely lightness is quite gone through thee.
 
     Whom now I mourn, no man shall learn from me
       Save by the measure of these praises given.
       Whoso deserves not Heaven
     May never hope to have her company.[15]
 
   [15] The commentators assert that the last two lines here do not
        allude to the dead lady, but to Beatrice. This would make
        the poem very clumsy in construction; yet there must be some
        covert allusion to Beatrice, as Dante himself intimates. The
        only form in which I can trace it consists in the implied
        assertion that such person as _had_ enjoyed the dead ladys
        society was worthy of heaven, and that person was Beatrice.
        Or indeed the allusion to Beatrice might be in the first poem,
        where he says that Love _in forma vera_ (that is, Beatrice),
        mourned over the corpse: as he afterwards says of Beatrice,
        _Quella ha nome Amor_. Most probably _both_ allusions are
        intended.
 
 _This poem is divided into four parts. In the first I address Death by
 certain proper names of hers. In the second, speaking to her, I tell
 the reason why I am moved to denounce her. In the third, I rail against
 her. In the fourth, I turn to speak to a person undefined, although
 defined in my own conception. The second part commences here, Since
 thou alone; the third here, And now (for I must); the fourth here,
 Whoso deserves not._
 
 Some days after the death of this lady, I had occasion to leave
 the city I speak of, and to go thitherwards where she abode who had
 formerly been my protection; albeit the end of my journey reached
 not altogether so far. And notwithstanding that I was visibly in the
 company of many, the journey was so irksome that I had scarcely sighing
 enough to ease my hearts heaviness; seeing that as I went, I left
 my beatitude behind me. Wherefore it came to pass that he who ruled
 me by virtue of my most gentle lady was made visible to my mind, in
 the light habit of a traveller, coarsely fashioned. He appeared to me
 troubled, and looked always on the ground; saving only that sometimes
 his eyes were turned towards a river which was clear and rapid, and
 which flowed along the path I was taking. And then I thought that Love
 called me and said to me these words: I come from that lady who was
 so long thy surety; for the matter of whose return, I know that it may
 not be. Wherefore I have taken that heart which I made thee leave with
 her, and do bear it unto another lady, who, as she was, shall be thy
 surety; (and when he named her I knew her well). And of these words
 I have spoken, if thou shouldst speak any again, let it be in such
 sort as that none shall perceive thereby that thy love was feigned for
 her, which thou must now feign for another. And when he had spoken
 thus, all my imagining was gone suddenly, for it seemed to me that Love
 became a part of myself: so that, changed as it were in mine aspect, I
 rode on full of thought the whole of that day, and with heavy sighing.
 And the day being over, I wrote this sonnet:
 
     A day agone, as I rode sullenly
       Upon a certain path that liked me not,
       I met Love midway while the air was hot,
     Clothed lightly as a wayfarer might be.
     And for the cheer he showed, he seemed to me
       As one who hath lost lordship he had got;
       Advancing towrds me full of sorrowful thought,
     Bowing his forehead so that none should see.
     Then as I went, he called me by my name,
       Saying: I journey since the morn was dim
         Thence where I made thy heart to be: which now
     I needs must bear unto another dame.
       Wherewith so much passed into me of him
         That he was gone, and I discerned not how.
 
 _This sonnet has three parts. In the first part, I tell how I met Love,
 and of his aspect. In the second, I tell what he said to me, although
 not in full, through the fear I had of discovering my secret. In the
 third, I say how he disappeared. The second part commences here, Then
 as I went; the third here, Wherewith so much._
 
 On my return, I set myself to seek out that lady whom my master had
 named to me while I journeyed sighing. And because I would be brief,
 I will now narrate that in a short while I made her my surety, in such
 sort that the matter was spoken of by many in terms scarcely courteous;
 through the which I had oftenwhiles many troublesome hours. And by
 this it happened (to wit: by this false and evil rumour which seemed
 to misfame me of vice) that she who was the destroyer of all evil and
 the queen of all good, coming where I was, denied me her most sweet
 salutation, in the which alone was my blessedness.
 
 And here it is fitting for me to depart a little from this present
 matter, that it may be rightly understood of what surpassing virtue her
 salutation was to me. To the which end I say that when she appeared in
 any place, it seemed to me, by the hope of her excellent salutation,
 that there was no man mine enemy any longer; and such warmth of charity
 came upon me that most certainly in that moment I would have pardoned
 whosoever had done me an injury; and if one should then have questioned
 me concerning any matter, I could only have said unto him Love, with
 a countenance clothed in humbleness. And what time she made ready to
 salute me, the spirit of Love, destroying all other perceptions, thrust
 forth the feeble spirits of my eyes, saying, Do homage unto your
 mistress, and putting itself in their place to obey: so that he who
 would, might then have beheld Love, beholding the lids of mine eyes
 shake. And when this most gentle lady gave her salutation, Love, so far
 from being a medium beclouding mine intolerable beatitude, then bred
 in me such an overpowering sweetness that my body, being all subjected
 thereto, remained many times helpless and passive. Whereby it is made
 manifest that in her salutation alone was there any beatitude for me,
 which then very often went beyond my endurance.
 
 And now, resuming my discourse, I will go on to relate that when, for
 the first time, this beatitude was denied me, I became possessed with
 such grief that, parting myself from others, I went into a lonely place
 to bathe the ground with most bitter tears: and when, by this heat of
 weeping, I was somewhat relieved, I betook myself to my chamber, where
 I could lament unheard. And there, having prayed to the Lady of all
 Mercies, and having said also, O Love, aid thou thy servant, I went
 suddenly asleep like a beaten sobbing child. And in my sleep, towards
 the middle of it, I seemed to see in the room, seated at my side, a
 youth in very white raiment, who kept his eyes fixed on me in deep
 thought. And when he had gazed some time, I thought that he sighed and
 called to me in these words: _Fili mi, tempus est ut prtermittantur
 simulata nostra._[16] And thereupon I seemed to know him; for the
 voice was the same wherewith he had spoken at other times in my sleep.
 Then looking at him, I perceived that he was weeping piteously, and
 that he seemed to be waiting for me to speak. Wherefore, taking heart,
 I began thus: Why weepest thou, Master of all honour? And he made
 answer to me: _Ego tanquam centrum circuli, cui simili modo se habent
 circumferenti partes: tu autem non sic._[17] And thinking upon his
 words, they seemed to me obscure; so that again compelling myself unto
 speech, I asked of him: What thing is this, Master, that thou hast
 spoken thus darkly? To the which he made answer in the vulgar tongue:
 Demand no more than may be useful to thee. Whereupon I began to
 discourse with him concerning her salutation which she had denied me;
 and when I had questioned him of the cause, he said these words: Our
 Beatrice hath heard from certain persons, that the lady whom I named
 to thee while thou journeyedst full of sighs is sorely disquieted by
 thy solicitations: and therefore this most gracious creature, who is
 the enemy of all disquiet, being fearful of such disquiet, refused to
 salute thee. For the which reason (albeit, in very sooth, thy secret
 must needs have become known to her by familiar observation) it is my
 will that thou compose certain things in rhyme, in the which thou shalt
 set forth how strong a mastership I have obtained over thee, through
 her; and how thou wast hers even from thy childhood. Also do thou call
 upon him that knoweth these things to bear witness to them, bidding him
 to speak with her thereof; the which I, who am he, will do willingly.
 And thus she shall be made to know thy desire; knowing which, she shall
 know likewise that they were deceived who spake of thee to her. And so
 write these things, that they shall seem rather to be spoken by a third
 person; and not directly by thee to her, which is scarce fitting. After
 the which, send them, not without me, where she may chance to hear
 them; but have them fitted with a pleasant music, into the which I will
 pass whensoever it needeth. With this speech he was away, and my sleep
 was broken up.
 
   [16] My son, it is time for us to lay aside our counterfeiting.
 
   [17] I am as the centre of a circle, to the which all parts of
        the circumference bear an equal relation: but with thee it
        is not thus. This phrase seems to have remained as obscure
        to commentators as Dante found it at the moment. No one, as
        far as I know, has even fairly tried to find a meaning for
        it. To me the following appears a not unlikely one. Love is
        weeping on Dantes account, and not on his own. He says,
        I am the centre of a circle (_Amor che muove il sole e
        laltre stelle_): therefore all lovable objects, whether in
        heaven or earth, or any part of the circles circumference,
        are equally near to me. Not so thou, who wilt one day lose
        Beatrice when she goes to heaven. The phrase would thus
        contain an intimation of the death of Beatrice, accounting
        for Dante being next told not to inquire the meaning of the
        speech,Demand no more than may be useful to thee.
 
 Whereupon, remembering me, I knew that I had beheld this vision during
 the ninth hour of the day; and I resolved that I would make a ditty,
 before I left my chamber, according to the words my master had spoken.
 And this is the ditty that I made:
 
     Song, tis my will that thou do seek out Love,
       And go with him where my dear lady is;
       That so my cause, the which thy harmonies
     Do plead, his better speech may clearly prove.
     Thou goest, my Song, in such a courteous kind,
       That even companionless
         Thou mayst rely on thyself anywhere.
     And yet, an thou wouldst get thee a safe mind,
       First unto Love address
         Thy steps; whose aid, mayhap, twere ill to spare,
         Seeing that she to whom thou makst thy prayer
     Is, as I think, ill-minded unto me,
     And that if Love do not companion thee,
       Thoult have perchance small cheer to tell me of.
 
     With a sweet accent, when thou comst to her,
       Begin thou in these words,
         First having craved a gracious audience:
     He who hath sent me as his messenger,
     Lady, thus much records,
         An thou but suffer him, in his defence.
         Love, who comes with me, by thine influence
     Can make this man do as it liketh him:
     Wherefore, if this fault _is_ or doth but _seem_
       Do thou conceive: for his heart cannot move.
 
     Say to her also: Lady, his poor heart
       Is so confirmed in faith
         That all its thoughts are but of serving thee:
     Twas early thine, and could not swerve apart.
       Then, if she wavereth,
         Bid her ask Love, who knows if these things be.
         And in the end, beg of her modestly
     To pardon so much boldness: saying too:
     If thou declare his death to be thy due,
       The thing shall come to pass, as doth behove.
 
     Then pray thou of the Master of all ruth,
       Before thou leave her there,
         That he befriend my cause and plead it well.
     In guerdon of my sweet rhymes and my truth
       (Entreat him) stay with her;
         Let not the hope of thy poor servant fail;
         And if with her thy pleading should prevail,
     Let her look on him and give peace to him.
     Gentle my Song, if good to thee it seem,
       Do this: so worship shall be thine and love.
 
 _This ditty is divided into three parts. In the first, I tell it
 whither to go, and I encourage it, that it may go the more confidently,
 and I tell it whose company to join if it would go with confidence and
 without any danger. In the second, I say that which it behoves the
 ditty to set forth. In the third, I give it leave to start when it
 pleases, recommending its course to the arms of Fortune. The second
 part begins here, With a sweet accent; the third here, Gentle my
 Song. Some might contradict me, and say that they understand not whom
 I address in the second person, seeing that the ditty is merely the
 very words I am speaking. And therefore I say that this doubt I intend
 to solve and clear up in this little book itself, at a more difficult
 passage, and then let him understand who now doubts, or would now
 contradict as aforesaid._
 
 After this vision I have recorded, and having written those words which
 Love had dictated to me, I began to be harassed with many and divers
 thoughts, by each of which I was sorely tempted; and in especial,
 there were four among them that left me no rest. The first was this:
 Certainly the lordship of Love is good; seeing that it diverts
 the mind from all mean things. The second was this: Certainly the
 lordship of Love is evil; seeing that the more homage his servants pay
 to him, the more grievous and painful are the torments wherewith he
 torments them. The third was this: The name of Love is so sweet in
 the hearing that it would not seem possible for its effects to be other
 than sweet; seeing that the name must needs be like unto the thing
 named; as it is written: _Nomina sunt consequentia rerum._[18] And the
 fourth was this: The lady whom Love hath chosen out to govern thee is
 not as other ladies, whose hearts are easily moved.
 
   [18] Names are the consequents of things.
 
 And by each one of these thoughts I was so sorely assailed that I was
 like unto him who doubteth which path to take, and wishing to go, goeth
 not. And if I bethought myself to seek out some point at the which all
 these paths might be found to meet, I discerned but one way, and that
 irked me; to wit, to call upon Pity, and to commend myself unto her.
 And it was then that, feeling a desire to write somewhat thereof in
 rhyme, I wrote this sonnet:
 
     All my thoughts always speak to me of Love,
       Yet have between themselves such difference
       That while one bids me bow with mind and sense,
     A second saith, Go to: look thou above;
     The third one, hoping, yields me joy enough;
       And with the last come tears, I scarce know whence:
       All of them craving pity in sore suspense,
     Trembling with fears that the heart knoweth of.
     And thus, being all unsure which path to take,
       Wishing to speak I know not what to say,
         And lose myself in amorous wanderings:
     Until, (my peace with all of them to make,)
       Unto mine enemy I needs must pray,
         My Lady Pity, for the help she brings.
 
 _This sonnet may be divided into four parts. In the first, I say and
 propound that all my thoughts are concerning Love. In the second, I say
 that they are diverse, and I relate their diversity. In the third, I
 say wherein they all seem to agree. In the fourth, I say that, wishing
 to speak of Love, I know not from which of these thoughts to take my
 argument; and that if I would take it from all, I shall have to call
 upon mine enemy, my Lady Pity. Lady I say, as in a scornful mode
 of speech. The second begins here, Yet have between themselves; the
 third, All of them craving; the fourth, And thus._
 
 After this battling with many thoughts, it chanced on a day that my
 most gracious lady was with a gathering of ladies in a certain place;
 to the which I was conducted by a friend of mine; he thinking to do
 me a great pleasure by showing me the beauty of so many women. Then
 I, hardly knowing whereunto he conducted me, but trusting in him (who
 yet was leading his friend to the last verge of life), made question:
 To what end are we come among these ladies? and he answered: To the
 end that they may be worthily served. And they were assembled around
 a gentlewoman who was given in marriage on that day; the custom of the
 city being that these should bear her company when she sat down for the
 first time at table in the house of her husband. Therefore I, as was
 my friends pleasure, resolved to stay with him and do honour to those
 ladies.
 
 But as soon as I had thus resolved, I began to feel a faintness and
 a throbbing at my left side, which soon took possession of my whole
 body. Whereupon I remember that I covertly leaned my back unto a
 painting that ran round the walls of that house; and being fearful
 lest my trembling should be discerned of them, I lifted mine eyes
 to look on those ladies, and then first perceived among them the
 excellent Beatrice. And when I perceived her, all my senses were
 overpowered by the great lordship that Love obtained, finding himself
 so near unto that most gracious being, until nothing but the spirits
 of sight remained to me; and even these remained driven out of their
 own instruments because Love entered in that honoured place of theirs,
 that so he might the better behold her. And although I was other than
 at first, I grieved for the spirits so expelled, which kept up a sore
 lament, saying: If he had not in this wise thrust us forth, we also
 should behold the marvel of this lady. By this, many of her friends,
 having discerned my confusion, began to wonder; and together with
 herself, kept whispering of me and mocking me. Whereupon my friend, who
 knew not what to conceive, took me by the hands, and drawing me forth
 from among them, required to know what ailed me. Then, having first
 held me at quiet for a space until my perceptions were come back to me,
 I made answer to my friend: Of a surety I have now set my feet on that
 point of life, beyond the which he must not pass who would return.[19]
 
   [19] It is difficult not to connect Dantes agony at this
        wedding-feast with our knowledge that in her twenty-first year
        Beatrice was wedded to Simone de Bardi. That she herself was
        the bride on this occasion might seem out of the question,
        from the fact of its not being in any way so stated: but on
        the other hand, Dantes silence throughout the _Vita Nuova_
        as regards her marriage (which must have brought deep sorrow
        even to his ideal love) is so startling, that we might almost
        be led to conceive in this passage the only intimation of it
        which he thought fit to give.
 
 Afterwards, leaving him, I went back to the room where I had wept
 before; and again weeping and ashamed, said: If this lady but knew
 of my condition, I do not think that she would thus mock at me; nay,
 I am sure that she must needs feel some pity. And in my weeping I
 bethought me to write certain words, in the which, speaking to her, I
 should signify the occasion of my disfigurement, telling her also how
 I knew that she had no knowledge thereof: which, if it were known, I
 was certain must move others to pity. And then, because I hoped that
 peradventure it might come into her hearing, I wrote this sonnet:
 
     Even as the others mock, thou mockest me;
       Not dreaming, noble lady, whence it is
       That I am taken with strange semblances,
     Seeing thy face which is so fair to see:
     For else, compassion would not suffer thee
       To grieve my heart with such harsh scoffs as these.
       Lo! Love, when thou art present, sits at ease,
     And bears his mastership so mightily,
     That all my troubled senses he thrusts out,
       Sorely tormenting some, and slaying some,
         Till none but he is left and has free range
         To gaze on thee. This makes my face to change
       Into anothers; while I stand all dumb,
     And hear my senses clamour in their rout.
 
 _This sonnet I divide not into parts, because a division is only
 made to open the meaning of the thing divided: and this, as it is
 sufficiently manifest through the reasons given, has no need of
 division. True it is that, amid the words whereby is shown the occasion
 of this sonnet, dubious words are to be found; namely, when I say
 that Love kills all my spirits, but that the visual remain in life,
 only outside of their own instruments. And this difficulty it is
 impossible for any to solve who is not in equal guise liege unto Love;
 and, to those who are so, that is manifest which would clear up the
 dubious words. And therefore it were not well for me to expound this
 difficulty, inasmuch as my speaking would be either fruitless or else
 superfluous._
 
 A while after this strange disfigurement, I became possessed with a
 strong conception which left me but very seldom, and then to return
 quickly. And it was this: Seeing that thou comest into such scorn by
 the companionship of this lady, wherefore seekest thou to behold her?
 If she should ask thee this thing, what answer couldst thou make unto
 her? yea, even though thou wert master of all thy faculties, and in
 no way hindered from answering. Unto the which, another very humble
 thought said in reply: If I were master of all my faculties, and in
 no way hindered from answering, I would tell her that no sooner do I
 image to myself her marvellous beauty than I am possessed with a desire
 to behold her, the which is of so great strength that it kills and
 destroys in my memory all those things which might oppose it; and it
 is therefore that the great anguish I have endured thereby is yet not
 enough to restrain me from seeking to behold her. And then, because
 of these thoughts, I resolved to write somewhat, wherein, having
 pleaded mine excuse, I should tell her of what I felt in her presence.
 Whereupon I wrote this sonnet:
 
     The thoughts are broken in my memory,
       Thou lovely Joy, wheneer I see thy face;
       When thou art near me, Love fills up the space,
     Often repeating, If death irk thee, fly.
     My face shows my hearts colour, verily,
       Which, fainting, seeks for any leaning-place;
       Till, in the drunken terror of disgrace,
     The very stones seem to be shrieking, Die!
     It were a grievous sin, if one should not
       Strive then to comfort my bewildered mind
         (Though merely with a simple pitying)
     For the great anguish which thy scorn has wrought
       In the dead sight o the eyes grown nearly blind,
         Which look for death as for a blessed thing.
 
 _This sonnet is divided into two parts. In the first, I tell the cause
 why I abstain not from coming to this lady. In the second, I tell
 what befalls me through coming to her; and this part begins here When
 thou art near. And also this second part divides into five distinct
 statements. For, in the first, I say what Love, counselled by Reason,
 tells me when I am near the lady. In the second, I set forth the state
 of my heart by the example of the face. In the third, I say how all
 ground of trust fails me. In the fourth, I say that he sins who shows
 not pity of me, which would give me some comfort. In the last, I say
 why people should take pity: namely, for the piteous look which comes
 into mine eyes; which piteous look is destroyed, that is, appeareth not
 unto others, through the jeering of this lady, who draws to the like
 action those who peradventure would see this piteousness. The second
 part begins here, My face shows; the third, Till, in the drunken
 terror; the fourth, It were a grievous sin; the fifth, For the
 great anguish._
 
 Thereafter, this sonnet bred in me desire to write down in verse four
 other things touching my condition, the which things it seemed to me
 that I had not yet made manifest. The first among these was the grief
 that possessed me very often, remembering the strangeness which Love
 wrought in me; the second was, how Love many times assailed me so
 suddenly and with such strength that I had no other life remaining
 except a thought which spake of my lady; the third was, how, when Love
 did battle with me in this wise, I would rise up all colourless, if
 so I might see my lady, conceiving that the sight of her would defend
 me against the assault of Love, and altogether forgetting that which
 her presence brought unto me; and the fourth was, how, when I saw her,
 the sight not only defended me not, but took away the little life that
 remained to me. And I said these four things in a sonnet, which is
 this:
 
     At whiles (yea oftentimes) I muse over
       The quality of anguish that is mine
       Through Love: then pity makes my voice to pine,
     Saying, Is any else thus, anywhere?
     Love smiteth me, whose strength is ill to bear;
       So that of all my life is left no sign
       Except one thought; and that, because tis thine,
     Leaves not the body but abideth there.
     And then if I, whom other aid forsook,
       Would aid myself, and innocent of art
         Would fain have sight of thee as a last hope,
     No sooner do I lift mine eyes to look
       Than the blood seems as shaken from my heart,
         And all my pulses beat at once and stop.
 
 _This sonnet is divided into four parts, four things being therein
 narrated; and as these are set forth above, I only proceed to
 distinguish the parts by their beginnings. Wherefore I say that the
 second part begins, Love smiteth me; the third, And then if I; the
 fourth, No sooner do I lift._
 
 After I had written these three last sonnets, wherein I spake unto
 my lady, telling her almost the whole of my condition, it seemed to
 me that I should be silent, having said enough concerning myself. But
 albeit I spake not to her again, yet it behoved me afterward to write
 of another matter, more noble than the foregoing. And for that the
 occasion of what I then wrote may be found pleasant in the hearing, I
 will relate it as briefly as I may.
 
 Through the sore change in mine aspect, the secret of my heart was
 now understood of many. Which thing being thus, there came a day when
 certain ladies to whom it was well known (they having been with me
 at divers times in my trouble) were met together for the pleasure of
 gentle company. And as I was going that way by chance, (but I think
 rather by the will of fortune,) I heard one of them call unto me, and
 she that called was a lady of very sweet speech. And when I had come
 close up with them, and perceived that they had not among them mine
 excellent lady, I was reassured; and saluted them, asking of their
 pleasure. The ladies were many; divers of whom were laughing one to
 another, while divers gazed at me as though I should speak anon. But
 when I still spake not, one of them, who before had been talking with
 another, addressed me by my name, saying, To what end lovest thou this
 lady, seeing that thou canst not support her presence? Now tell us this
 thing, that we may know it: for certainly the end of such a love must
 be worthy of knowledge. And when she had spoken these words, not she
 only, but all they that were with her, began to observe me, waiting
 for my reply. Whereupon I said thus unto them:Ladies, the end and
 aim of my Love was but the salutation of that lady of whom I conceive
 that ye are speaking; wherein alone I found that beatitude which is
 the goal of desire. And now that it hath pleased her to deny me this,
 Love, my Master, of his great goodness, hath placed all my beatitude
 there where my hope will not fail me. Then those ladies began to talk
 closely together; and as I have seen snow fall among the rain, so was
 their talk mingled with sighs. But after a little, that lady who had
 been the first to address me, addressed me again in these words: We
 pray thee that thou wilt tell us wherein abideth this thy beatitude.
 And answering, I said but thus much: In those words that do praise my
 lady. To the which she rejoined: If thy speech were true, those words
 that thou didst write concerning thy condition would have been written
 with another intent.
 
 Then I, being almost put to shame because of her answer, went out
 from among them; and as I walked, I said within myself: Seeing that
 there is so much beatitude in those words which do praise my lady,
 wherefore hath my speech of her been different? And then I resolved
 that thenceforward I would choose for the theme of my writings only the
 praise of this most gracious being. But when I had thought exceedingly,
 it seemed to me that I had taken to myself a theme which was much
 too lofty, so that I dared not begin; and I remained during several
 days in the desire of speaking, and the fear of beginning. After
 which it happened, as I passed one day along a path which lay beside
 a stream of very clear water, that there came upon me a great desire
 to say somewhat in rhyme: but when I began thinking how I should say
 it, methought that to speak of her were unseemly, unless I spoke to
 other ladies in the second person; which is to say, not to _any_ other
 ladies, but only to such as are so called because they are gentle, let
 alone for mere womanhood. Whereupon I declare that my tongue spake as
 though by its own impulse, and said, Ladies that have intelligence in
 love. These words I laid up in my mind with great gladness, conceiving
 to take them as my commencement. Wherefore, having returned to the city
 I spake of, and considered thereof during certain days, I began a poem
 with this beginning, constructed in the mode which will be seen below
 in its division. The poem begins here:
 
     Ladies that have intelligence in love,
       Of mine own lady I would speak with you;
       Not that I hope to count her praises through,
         But telling what I may, to ease my mind.
     And I declare that when I speak thereof,
     Love sheds such perfect sweetness over me
     That if my courage failed not, certainly
         To him my listeners must be all resignd.
         Wherefore I will not speak in such large kind
     That mine own speech should foil me, which were base;
     But only will discourse of her high grace
         In these poor words, the best that I can find,
     With you alone, dear dames and damozels:
     Twere ill to speak thereof with any else.
 
     An Angel, of his blessed knowledge, saith
       To God: Lord, in the world that Thou hast made,
       A miracle in action is displayd,
         By reason of a soul whose splendours fare
     Even hither: and since Heaven requireth
     Nought saving her, for her it prayeth Thee,
     Thy Saints crying aloud continually.
         Yet Pity still defends our earthly share
         In that sweet soul; God answering thus the prayer:
     My well-belovd, suffer that in peace
     Your hope remain, while so My pleasure is,
         There where one dwells who dreads the loss of her:
     And who in Hell unto the doomed shall say,
     I have looked on that for which Gods chosen pray.
 
     My lady is desired in the high Heaven:
       _Wherefore_, it now behoveth me to tell,
       Saying: Let any maid that would be well
         Esteemed keep with her: for as she goes by,
     Into foul hearts a deathly chill is driven
     By Love, that makes ill thought to perish there:
     While any who endures to gaze on her
         Must either be ennobled, or else die.
         When one deserving to be raised so high
     Is found, tis then her power attains its proof,
     Making his heart strong for his souls behoof
         With the full strength of meek humility.
     Also this virtue owns she, by Gods will:
     Who speaks with her can never come to ill.
 
     Love saith concerning her: How chanceth it
       That flesh, which is of dust, should be thus pure?
       Then, gazing always, he makes oath: Forsure,
         This is a creature of God till now unknown.
     She hath that paleness of the pearl thats fit
     In a fair woman, so much and not more;
     She is as high as Natures skill can soar;
         Beauty is tried by her comparison.
         Whatever her sweet eyes are turned upon,
     Spirits of love do issue thence in flame,
     Which through their eyes who then may look on them
         Pierce to the hearts deep chamber every one.
     And in her smile Loves image you may see;
     Whence none can gaze upon her steadfastly.
 
     Dear Song, I know thou wilt hold gentle speech
       With many ladies, when I send thee forth:
       Wherefore (being mindful that thou hadst thy birth
         From Love, and art a modest, simple child),
     Whomso thou meetest, say thou this to each:
     Give me good speed! To her I wend along
     In whose much strength my weakness is made strong.
         And if, i the end, thou wouldst not be beguiled
         Of all thy labour, seek not the defiled
     And common sort; but rather choose to be
     Where man and woman dwell in courtesy.
         So to the road thou shalt be reconciled,
     And find the lady, and with the lady, Love.
     Commend thou me to each, as doth behove.
 
 _This poem, that it may be better understood, I will divide more
 subtly than the others preceding; and therefore I will make three
 parts of it. The first part is a proem to the words following. The
 second is the matter treated of. The third is, as it were, a handmaid
 to the preceding words. The second begins here, An Angel; the third
 here, Dear Song, I know. The first part is divided into four. In
 the first, I say to whom I mean to speak of my lady, and wherefore I
 will so speak. In the second, I say what she appears to myself to be
 when I reflect upon her excellence, and what I would utter if I lost
 not courage. In the third, I say what it is I purpose to speak so as
 not to be impeded by faintheartedness. In the fourth, repeating to
 whom I purpose speaking, I tell the reason why I speak to them. The
 second begins here, And I declare; the third here, Wherefore I will
 not speak; the fourth here, With you alone. Then, when I say An
 Angel, I begin treating of this lady: and this part is divided into
 two. In the first, I tell what is understood of her in heaven. In the
 second, I tell what is understood of her on earth: here, My lady is
 desired. This second part is divided into two; for, in the first, I
 speak of her as regards the nobleness of her soul, relating some of
 her virtues proceeding from her soul; in the second, I speak of her
 as regards the nobleness of her body, narrating some of her beauties:
 here, Love saith concerning her. This second part is divided into
 two, for, in the first, I speak of certain beauties which belong to
 the whole person; in the second, I speak of certain beauties which
 belong to a distinct part of the person: here, Whatever her sweet
 eyes. This second part is divided into two; for, in the one, I speak
 of the eyes, which are the beginning of love; in the second, I speak
 of the mouth, which is the end of love. And that every vicious thought
 may be discarded herefrom, let the reader remember that it is above
 written that the greeting of this lady, which was an act of her mouth,
 was the goal of my desires, while I could receive it. Then, when I say,
 Dear Song, I know, I add a stanza as it were handmaid to the others,
 wherein I say what I desire from this my poem. And because this last
 part is easy to understand, I trouble not myself with more divisions.
 I say, indeed, that the further to open the meaning of this poem, more
 minute divisions ought to be used; but nevertheless he who is not of
 wit enough to understand it by these which have been already made is
 welcome to leave it alone; for certes, I fear I have communicated its
 sense to too many by these present divisions, if it so happened that
 many should hear it._
 
 When this song was a little gone abroad, a certain one of my friends,
 hearing the same, was pleased to question me, that I should tell him
 what thing love is; it may be, conceiving from the words thus heard
 a hope of me beyond my desert. Wherefore I, thinking that after such
 discourse it were well to say somewhat of the nature of Love, and also
 in accordance with my friends desire, proposed to myself to write
 certain words in the which I should treat of this argument. And the
 sonnet that I then made is this:
 
     Love and the gentle heart are one same thing,
       Even as the wise man[20] in his ditty saith:
       Each, of itself, would be such life in death
     As rational soul bereft of reasoning.
     Tis Nature makes them when she loves: a king
       Love is, whose palace where he sojourneth
       Is called the Heart; there draws he quiet breath
     At first, with brief or longer slumbering.
     Then beauty seen in virtuous womankind
       Will make the eyes desire, and through the heart
         Send the desiring of the eyes again;
     Where often it abides so long enshrind
       That Love at length out of his sleep will start.
         And women feel the same for worthy men.
 
   [20] Guido Guinicelli, in the canzone which begins, Within the
        gentle heart Love shelters him.
 
 _This sonnet is divided into two parts. In the first, I speak of him
 according to his power. In the second, I speak of him according as
 his power translates itself into act. The second part begins here,
 Then beauty seen. The first is divided into two. In the first, I
 say in what subject this power exists. In the second, I say how this
 subject and this power are produced together, and how the one regards
 the other, as form does matter. The second begins here, Tis Nature.
 Afterwards when I say, Then beauty seen in virtuous womankind, I
 say how this power translates itself into act; and, first, how it
 so translates itself in a man, then how it so translates itself in a
 woman: here, And women feel._
 
 Having treated of love in the foregoing, it appeared to me that I
 should also say something in praise of my lady, wherein it might be
 set forth how love manifested itself when produced by her; and how not
 only she could awaken it where it slept, but where it was not she could
 marvellously create it. To the which end I wrote another sonnet; and it
 is this:
 
     My lady carries love within her eyes;
       All that she looks on is made pleasanter;
       Upon her path men turn to gaze at her;
     He whom she greeteth feels his heart to rise,
     And droops his troubled visage, full of sighs,
       And of his evil heart is then aware:
       Hate loves, and pride becomes a worshipper.
     O women, help to praise her in somewise.
     Humbleness, and the hope that hopeth well,
       By speech of hers into the mind are brought,
         And who beholds is blessd oftenwhiles.
         The look she hath when she a little smiles
       Cannot be said, nor holden in the thought;
     Tis such a new and gracious miracle.
 
 _This sonnet has three sections. In the first, I say how this lady
 brings this power into action by those most noble features, her eyes;
 and, in the third, I say this same as to that most noble feature, her
 mouth. And between these two sections is a little section, which asks,
 as it were, help for the previous section and the subsequent; and it
 begins here, O women, help. The third begins here, Humbleness. The
 first is divided into three; for, in the first, I say how she with
 power makes noble that which she looks upon; and this is as much as
 to say that she brings Love, in power, thither where he is not. In the
 second, I say how she brings Love, in act, into the hearts of all those
 whom she sees. In the third, I tell what she afterwards, with virtue,
 operates upon their hearts. The second begins, Upon her path; the
 third, He whom she greeteth. Then, when I say, O women, help, I
 intimate to whom it is my intention to speak, calling on women to help
 me to honour her. Then, when I say, Humbleness, I say that same which
 is said in the first part, regarding two acts of her mouth, one whereof
 is her most sweet speech, and the other her marvellous smile. Only, I
 say not of this last how it operates upon the hearts of others, because
 memory cannot retain this smile, nor its operation._
 
 Not many days after this (it being the will of the most High God,
 who also from Himself put not away death), the father of wonderful
 Beatrice, going out of this life, passed certainly into glory. Thereby
 it happened, as of very sooth it might not be otherwise, that this lady
 was made full of the bitterness of grief: seeing that such a parting
 is very grievous unto those friends who are left, and that no other
 friendship is like to that between a good parent and a good child;
 and furthermore considering that this lady was good in the supreme
 degree, and her father (as by many it hath been truly averred) of
 exceeding goodness. And because it is the usage of that city that men
 meet with men in such a grief, and women with women, certain ladies
 of her companionship gathered themselves unto Beatrice, where she kept
 alone in her weeping: and as they passed in and out, I could hear them
 speak concerning her, how she wept. At length two of them went by me,
 who said: Certainly she grieveth in such sort that one might die for
 pity, beholding her. Then, feeling the tears upon my face, I put up
 my hands to hide them: and had it not been that I hoped to hear more
 concerning her (seeing that where I sat, her friends passed continually
 in and out), I should assuredly have gone thence to be alone, when I
 felt the tears come. But as I still sat in that place, certain ladies
 again passed near me, who were saying among themselves: Which of us
 shall be joyful any more, who have listened to this lady in her piteous
 sorrow? And there were others who said as they went by me: He that
 sitteth here could not weep more if he had beheld her as we have beheld
 her; and again: He is so altered that he seemeth not as himself. And
 still as the ladies passed to and fro, I could hear them speak after
 this fashion of her and of me.
 
 Wherefore afterwards, having considered and perceiving that there was
 herein matter for poesy, I resolved that I would write certain rhymes
 in the which should be contained all that those ladies had said. And
 because I would willingly have spoken to them if it had not been for
 discreetness, I made in my rhymes as though I had spoken and they had
 answered me. And thereof I wrote two sonnets; in the first of which
 I addressed them as I would fain have done; and in the second related
 their answer, using the speech that I had heard from them, as though it
 had been spoken unto myself. And the sonnets are these:
 
 
 I.
 
     You that thus wear a modest countenance
       With lids weighd down by the hearts heaviness,
       Whence come you, that among you every face
     Appears the same, for its pale troubled glance?
     Have you beheld my ladys face, perchance,
       Bowd with the grief that Love makes full of grace?
       Say now, This thing is thus; as my heart says,
     Marking your grave and sorrowful advance.
     And if indeed you come from where she sighs
       And mourns, may it please you (for his hearts relief)
         To tell how it fares with her unto him
     Who knows that you have wept, seeing your eyes,
       And is so grieved with looking on your grief
         That his heart trembles and his sight grows dim.
 
 _This sonnet is divided into two parts. In the first, I call and ask
 these ladies whether they come from her, telling them that I think they
 do, because they return the nobler. In the second, I pray them to tell
 me of her; and the second begins here, And if indeed._
 
 
 II.
 
     Canst thou indeed be he that still would sing
       Of our dear lady unto none but us?
       For though thy voice confirms that it is thus,
     Thy visage might another witness bring.
     And wherefore is thy grief so sore a thing
       That grieving thou makst others dolorous?
       Hast thou too seen her weep, that thou from us
     Canst not conceal thine inward sorrowing?
     Nay, leave our woe to us: let us alone:
       Twere sin if one should strive to soothe our woe,
         For in her weeping we have heard her speak:
     Also her looks so full of her hearts moan
       That they who should behold her, looking so,
         Must fall aswoon, feeling all life grow weak.
 
 _This sonnet has four parts, as the ladies in whose person I reply
 had four forms of answer. And, because these are sufficiently shown
 above, I stay not to explain the purport of the parts, and therefore I
 only discriminate them. The second begins here, And wherefore is thy
 grief; the third here, Nay, leave our woe; the fourth, Also her
 look._
 
 A few days after this, my body became afflicted with a painful
 infirmity, whereby I suffered bitter anguish for many days, which at
 last brought me unto such weakness that I could no longer move. And I
 remember that on the ninth day, being overcome with intolerable pain, a
 thought came into my mind concerning my lady: but when it had a little
 nourished this thought, my mind returned to its brooding over mine
 enfeebled body. And then perceiving how frail a thing life is, even
 though health keep with it, the matter seemed to me so pitiful that I
 could not choose but weep; and weeping I said within myself: Certainly
 it must some time come to pass that the very gentle Beatrice will die.
 Then, feeling bewildered, I closed mine eyes; and my brain began to be
 in travail as the brain of one frantic, and to have such imaginations
 as here follow.
 
 And at the first, it seemed to me that I saw certain faces of women
 with their hair loosened, which called out to me, Thou shalt surely
 die; after the which, other terrible and unknown appearances said
 unto me, Thou art dead. At length, as my phantasy held on in its
 wanderings, I came to be I knew not where, and to behold a throng of
 dishevelled ladies wonderfully sad, who kept going hither and thither
 weeping. Then the sun went out, so that the stars showed themselves,
 and they were of such a colour that I knew they must be weeping:
 and it seemed to me that the birds fell dead out of the sky, and
 that there were great earthquakes. With that, while I wondered in
 my trance, and was filled with a grievous fear, I conceived that a
 certain friend came unto me and said: Hast thou not heard? She that
 was thine excellent lady hath been taken out of life. Then I began to
 weep very piteously; and not only in mine imagination, but with mine
 eyes, which were wet with tears. And I seemed to look towards Heaven,
 and to behold a multitude of angels who were returning upwards, having
 before them an exceedingly white cloud: and these angels were singing
 together gloriously, and the words of their song were these: _Osanna
 in excelsis_; and there was no more that I heard. Then my heart that
 was so full of love said unto me: It is true that our lady lieth
 dead; and it seemed to me that I went to look upon the body wherein
 that blessed and most noble spirit had had its abiding-place. And so
 strong was this idle imagining, that it made me to behold my lady in
 death; whose head certain ladies seemed to be covering with a white
 veil; and who was so humble of her aspect that it was as though she
 had said, I have attained to look on the beginning of peace. And
 therewithal I came unto such humility by the sight of her, that I cried
 out upon Death, saying: Now come unto me, and be not bitter against
 me any longer: surely, there where thou hast been, thou hast learned
 gentleness. Wherefore come now unto me who do greatly desire thee:
 seest thou not that I wear thy colour already? And when I had seen
 all those offices performed that are fitting to be done unto the dead,
 it seemed to me that I went back unto mine own chamber, and looked up
 towards Heaven. And so strong was my phantasy, that I wept again in
 very truth, and said with my true voice: O excellent soul! how blessed
 is he that now looketh upon thee!
 
 And as I said these words, with a painful anguish of sobbing and
 another prayer unto Death, a young and gentle lady, who had been
 standing beside me where I lay, conceiving that I wept and cried out
 because of the pain of mine infirmity, was taken with trembling and
 began to shed tears. Whereby other ladies, who were about the room,
 becoming aware of my discomfort by reason of the moan that she made,
 (who indeed was of my very near kindred,) led her away from where I
 was, and then set themselves to awaken me, thinking that I dreamed, and
 saying: Sleep no longer, and be not disquieted.
 
 Then, by their words, this strong imagination was brought suddenly to
 an end, at the moment that I was about to say, O Beatrice! peace be
 with thee. And already I had said, O Beatrice! when being aroused,
 I opened mine eyes, and knew that it had been a deception. But albeit
 I had indeed uttered her name, yet my voice was so broken with sobs,
 that it was not understood by these ladies; so that in spite of the
 sore shame that I felt, I turned towards them by Loves counselling.
 And when they beheld me, they began to say, He seemeth as one dead,
 and to whisper among themselves, Let us strive if we may not comfort
 him. Whereupon they spake to me many soothing words, and questioned
 me moreover touching the cause of my fear. Then I, being somewhat
 reassured, and having perceived that it was a mere phantasy, said unto
 them, This thing it was that made me afeard; and told them of all
 that I had seen, from the beginning even unto the end, but without
 once speaking the name of my lady. Also, after I had recovered from my
 sickness, I bethought me to write these things in rhyme; deeming it a
 lovely thing to be known. Whereof I wrote this poem:
 
     A very pitiful lady, very young,
       Exceeding rich in human sympathies,
         Stood by, what time I clamourd upon Death;
     And at the wild words wandering on my tongue
       And at the piteous look within mine eyes
         She was affrighted, that sobs choked her breath.
         So by her weeping where I lay beneath,
     Some other gentle ladies came to know
     My state, and made her go:
       Afterward, bending themselves over me,
       One said, Awaken thee!
         And one, What thing thy sleep disquieteth?
     With that, my soul woke up from its eclipse,
     The while my ladys name rose to my lips:
 
     But utterd in a voice so sob-broken,
       So feeble with the agony of tears,
         That I alone might hear it in my heart;
     And though that look was on my visage then
       Which he who is ashamed so plainly wears,
         Love made that I through shame held not apart,
         But gazed upon them. And my hue was such
     That they lookd at each other and thought of death;
     Saying under their breath
       Most tenderly, O let us comfort him:
       Then unto me: What dream
         Was thine, that it hath shaken thee so much?
     And when I was a little comforted,
     This, ladies, was the dream I dreamt, I said.
 
     I was a-thinking how life fails with us
       Suddenly after such a little while;
         When Love sobbd in my heart, which is his home.
     Whereby my spirit waxd so dolorous
       That in myself I said, with sick recoil:
         Yea, to my lady too this Death must come.
         And therewithal such a bewilderment
     Possessd me, that I shut mine eyes for peace;
     And in my brain did cease
       Order of thought, and every healthful thing.
       Afterwards, wandering
         Amid a swarm of doubts that came and went,
     Some certain womens faces hurried by,
     And shriekd to me, Thou too shalt die, shalt die!
 
     Then saw I many broken hinted sights
       In the uncertain state I steppd into.
         Meseemd to be I know not in what place,
     Where ladies through the street, like mournful lights,
       Ran with loose hair, and eyes that frightend you
         By their own terror, and a pale amaze:
         The while, little by little, as I thought,
     The sun ceased, and the stars began to gather,
     And each wept at the other;
       And birds droppd in mid-flight out of the sky;
       And earth shook suddenly;
         And I was ware of one, hoarse and tired out,
     Who askd of me: Hast thou not heard it said?...
     Thy lady, she that was so fair, is dead.
 
     Then lifting up mine eyes, as the tears came,
       I saw the Angels, like a rain of manna,
         In a long flight flying back Heavenward;
     Having a little cloud in front of them,
       After the which they went and said, Hosanna;
         And if they had said more, you should have heard.
         Then Love said, Now shall all things be made clear:
     Come and behold our lady where she lies.
     These wildering phantasies
       Then carried me to see my lady dead.
       Even as I there was led,
         Her ladies with a veil were covering her;
     And with her was such very humbleness
     That she appeared to say, I am at peace.
 
     And I became so humble in my grief,
       Seeing in her such deep humility,
         That I said: Death, I hold thee passing good
     Henceforth, and a most gentle sweet relief,
       Since my dear love has chosen to dwell with thee:
         Pity, not hate, is thine, well understood.
         Lo! I do so desire to see thy face
     That I am like as one who nears the tomb;
     My soul entreats thee, Come.
       Then I departed, having made my moan;
       And when I was alone
         I said, and cast my eyes to the High Place:
     Blessed is he, fair soul, who meets thy glance!
     ... Just then you woke me, of your complaisance.
 
 _This poem has two parts. In the first, speaking to a person undefined,
 I tell how I was aroused from a vain phantasy by certain ladies, and
 how I promised them to tell what it was. In the second, I say how I
 told them. The second part begins here, I was a-thinking. The first
 part divides into two. In the first, I tell that which certain ladies,
 and which one singly, did and said because of my phantasy, before I had
 returned into my right senses. In the second, I tell what these ladies
 said to me after I had left off this wandering: and it begins here,
 But uttered in a voice. Then, when I say, I was a-thinking, I say
 how I told them this my imagination; and concerning this I have two
 parts. In the first, I tell, in order, this imagination. In the second,
 saying at what time they called me, I covertly thank them: and this
 part begins here, Just then you woke me._
 
 After this empty imagining, it happened on a day, as I sat thoughtful,
 that I was taken with such a strong trembling at the heart, that it
 could not have been otherwise in the presence of my lady. Whereupon I
 perceived that there was an appearance of Love beside me, and I seemed
 to see him coming from my lady; and he said, not aloud but within my
 heart: Now take heed that thou bless the day when I entered into thee;
 for it is fitting that thou shouldst do so. And with that my heart was
 so full of gladness, that I could hardly believe it to be of very truth
 mine own heart and not another.
 
 A short while after these words which my heart spoke to me with the
 tongue of Love, I saw coming towards me a certain lady who was very
 famous for her beauty, and of whom that friend whom I have already
 called the first among my friends had long been enamoured. This ladys
 right name was Joan; but because of her comeliness (or at least it
 was so imagined) she was called of many _Primavera_ (Spring), and
 went by that name among them. Then looking again, I perceived that
 the most noble Beatrice followed after her. And when both these ladies
 had passed by me, it seemed to me that Love spake again in my heart,
 saying: She that came first was called Spring, only because of that
 which was to happen on this day. And it was I myself who caused that
 name to be given her; seeing that as the Spring cometh first in the
 year, so should she come first on this day,[21] when Beatrice was to
 show herself after the vision of her servant. And even if thou go about
 to consider her right name, it is also as one should say, She shall
 come first; inasmuch as her name, Joan, is taken from that John who
 went before the True Light, saying: _Ego vox clamantis in deserto:
 Parate viam Domini._[22] And also it seemed to me that he added other
 words, to wit: He who should inquire delicately touching this matter,
 could not but call Beatrice by mine own name, which is to say, Love;
 beholding her so like unto me.
 
   [21] There is a play in the original upon the words _Primavera_
        (Spring) and _prima verr_ (she shall come first), to which I
        have given as near an equivalent as I could.
 
   [22] I am the voice of one crying in the wilderness: Prepare ye
        the way of the Lord.
 
 Then I, having thought of this, imagined to write it with rhymes and
 send it unto my chief friend; but setting aside certain words[23] which
 seemed proper to be set aside, because I believed that his heart still
 regarded the beauty of her that was called Spring.
 
   [23] That is (as I understand it), suppressing, from delicacy
        towards his friend, the words in which Love describes Joan as
        merely the forerunner of Beatrice. And perhaps in the latter
        part of this sentence a reproach is gently conveyed to the
        fickle Guido Cavalcanti, who may already have transferred his
        homage (though Dante had not then learned it) from Joan to
        Mandetta.
 
 And I wrote this sonnet:
 
     I felt a spirit of love begin to stir
       Within my heart, long time unfelt till then;
       And saw Love coming towards me, fair and fain
     (That I scarce knew him for his joyful cheer),
     Saying, Be now indeed my worshipper!
       And in his speech he laughd and laughd again.
       Then, while it was his pleasure to remain,
     I chanced to look the way he had drawn near,
     And saw the Ladies Joan and Beatrice
       Approach me, this the other following,
         One and a second marvel instantly.
     And even as now my memory speaketh this,
       Love spake it then: The first is christend Spring;
         The second Love, she is so like to me.
 
 _This sonnet has many parts: whereof the first tells how I felt
 awakened within my heart the accustomed tremor, and how it seemed that
 Love appeared to me joyful from afar. The second says how it appeared
 to me that Love spake within my heart, and what was his aspect. The
 third tells how, after he had in such wise been with me a space, I saw
 and heard certain things. The second part begins here, Saying, Be
 now; the third here, Then, while it was his pleasure. The third
 part divides into two. In the first, I say what I saw. In the second,
 I say what I heard; and it begins here, Love spake it then._
 
 It might be here objected unto me, (and even by one worthy of
 controversy,) that I have spoken of Love as though it were a thing
 outward and visible: not only a spiritual essence, but as a bodily
 substance also. The which thing, in absolute truth, is a fallacy;
 Love not being of itself a substance, but an accident of substance.
 Yet that I speak of Love as though it were a thing tangible and even
 human, appears by three things which I say thereof. And firstly, I
 say that I perceived Love coming towards me; whereby, seeing that _to
 come_ bespeaks locomotion, and seeing also how philosophy teacheth us
 that none but a corporeal substance hath locomotion, it seemeth that
 I speak of Love as of a corporeal substance. And secondly, I say that
 Love smiled: and thirdly, that Love spake; faculties (and especially
 the risible faculty) which appear proper unto man: whereby it further
 seemeth that I speak of Love as of a man. Now that this matter may be
 explained (as is fitting), it must first be remembered that anciently
 they who wrote poems of Love wrote not in the vulgar tongue, but
 rather certain poets in the Latin tongue. I mean, among us, although
 perchance the same may have been among others, and although likewise,
 as among the Greeks, they were not writers of spoken language, but
 men of letters, treated of these things.[24] And indeed it is not a
 great number of years since poetry began to be made in the vulgar
 tongue; the writing of rhymes in spoken language corresponding to
 the writing in metre of Latin verse, by a certain analogy. And I say
 that it is but a little while, because if we examine the language of
 _oco_ and the language of _s_,[25] we shall not find in those tongues
 any written thing of an earlier date than the last hundred and fifty
 years. Also the reason why certain of a very mean sort obtained at
 the first some fame as poets is, that before them no man had written
 verses in the language of _s_: and of these, the first was moved to
 the writing of such verses by the wish to make himself understood of
 a certain lady, unto whom Latin poetry was difficult. This thing is
 against such as rhyme concerning other matters than love; that mode of
 speech having been first used for the expression of love alone.[26]
 Wherefore, seeing that poets have a license allowed them that is not
 allowed unto the writers of prose, and seeing also that they who write
 in rhyme are simply poets in the vulgar tongue, it becomes fitting and
 reasonable that a larger license should be given to these than to other
 modern writers; and that any metaphor or rhetorical similitude which
 is permitted unto poets, should also be counted not unseemly in the
 rhymers of the vulgar tongue. Thus, if we perceive that the former have
 caused inanimate things to speak as though they had sense and reason,
 and to discourse one with another; yea, and not only actual things,
 but such also as have no real existence, (seeing that they have made
 things which are not, to speak; and oftentimes written of those which
 are merely accidents as though they were substances and things human);
 it should therefore be permitted to the latter to do the like; which
 is to say, not inconsiderately, but with such sufficient motive as may
 afterwards be set forth in prose.
 
   [24] On reading Dantes treatise _De Vulgari Eloquio_, it will
        be found that the distinction which he intends here is not
        between one language, or dialect, and another; but between
        vulgar speech (that is, the language handed down from mother
        to son without any conscious use of grammar or syntax), and
        language as regulated by grammarians and the laws of literary
        composition, and which Dante calls simply Grammar. A great
        deal might be said on the bearings of the present passage, but
        it is no part of my plan to enter on such questions.
 
   [25] _i.e._, the languages of Provence and Tuscany.
 
   [26] It strikes me that this curious passage furnishes a reason,
        hitherto (I believe) overlooked, why Dante put such of
        his lyrical poems as relate to philosophy into the form of
        love-poems. He liked writing in Italian rhyme rather than
        Latin metre; he thought Italian rhyme ought to be confined
        to love-poems: therefore whatever he wrote (at this age)
        had to take the form of a love-poem. Thus any poem by Dante
        not concerning love is later than his twenty-seventh year
        (1291-2), when he wrote the prose of the _Vita Nuova_; the
        poetry having been written earlier, at the time of the events
        referred to.
 
 That the Latin poets have done thus, appears through Virgil, where he
 saith that Juno (to wit, a goddess hostile to the Trojans) spake unto
 olus, master of the Winds; as it is written in the first book of the
 neid, _ole, namque tibi, etc._; and that this master of the Winds
 made reply: _Tuus, o regina, quid optesExplorare labor, mihi jussa
 capessere fas est._ And through the same poet, the inanimate thing
 speaketh unto the animate, in the third book of the neid, where it is
 written: _Dardanid duri, etc._ With Lucan, the animate thing speaketh
 to the inanimate; as thus: _Multum, Roma, tamen debes civilibus armis._
 In Horace, man is made to speak to his own intelligence as unto another
 person; (and not only hath Horace done this, but herein he followeth
 the excellent Homer), as thus in his Poetics: _Dic mihi, Musa, virum,
 etc._ Through Ovid, Love speaketh as a human creature, in the beginning
 of his discourse _De Remediis Amoris_: as thus: _Bella mihi, video,
 bella parantur, ait._ By which ensamples this thing shall be made
 manifest unto such as may be offended at any part of this my book.
 And lest some of the common sort should be moved to jeering hereat, I
 will here add, that neither did these ancient poets speak thus without
 consideration, nor should they who are makers of rhyme in our day
 write after the same fashion, having no reason in what they write; for
 it were a shameful thing if one should rhyme under the semblance of
 metaphor or rhetorical similitude, and afterwards, being questioned
 thereof, should be unable to rid his words of such semblance, unto
 their right understanding. Of whom, (to wit, of such as rhyme thus
 foolishly,) myself and the first among my friends do know many.
 
 But returning to the matter of my discourse. This excellent lady, of
 whom I spake in what hath gone before, came at last into such favour
 with all men, that when she passed anywhere folk ran to behold her;
 which thing was a deep joy to me: and when she drew near unto any, so
 much truth and simpleness entered into his heart, that he dared neither
 to lift his eyes nor to return her salutation: and unto this, many who
 have felt it can bear witness. She went along crowned and clothed with
 humility, showing no whit of pride in all that she heard and saw: and
 when she had gone by, it was said of many, This is not a woman, but
 one of the beautiful angels of Heaven: and there were some that said:
 This is surely a miracle; blessed be the Lord, who hath power to work
 thus marvellously. I say, of very sooth, that she showed herself so
 gentle and so full of all perfection, that she bred in those who looked
 upon her a soothing quiet beyond any speech; neither could any look
 upon her without sighing immediately. These things, and things yet
 more wonderful, were brought to pass through her miraculous virtue.
 Wherefore I, considering thereof and wishing to resume the endless tale
 of her praises, resolved to write somewhat wherein I might dwell on her
 surpassing influence; to the end that not only they who had beheld her,
 but others also, might know as much concerning her as words could give
 to the understanding. And it was then that I wrote this sonnet:
 
     My lady looks so gentle and so pure
       When yielding salutation by the way,
       That the tongue trembles and has nought to say,
     And the eyes, which fain would see, may not endure.
     And still, amid the praise she hears secure,
       She walks with humbleness for her array;
       Seeming a creature sent from Heaven to stay
     On earth, and show a miracle made sure.
     She is so pleasant in the eyes of men
     That through the sight the inmost heart doth gain
       A sweetness which needs proof to know it by:
     And from between her lips there seems to move
     A soothing essence that is full of love,
       Saying for ever to the spirit, Sigh!
 
 This sonnet is so easy to understand, from what is afore narrated,
 that it needs no division; and therefore, leaving it, I say also that
 this excellent lady came into such favour with all men, that not only
 she herself was honoured and commended, but through her companionship,
 honour and commendation came unto others. Wherefore I, perceiving this,
 and wishing that it should also be made manifest to those that beheld
 it not, wrote the sonnet here following; wherein is signified the power
 which her virtue had upon other ladies:
 
     For certain he hath seen all perfectness
       Who among other ladies hath seen mine:
       They that go with her humbly should combine
     To thank their God for such peculiar grace.
     So perfect is the beauty of her face
       That it begets in no wise any sign
       Of envy, but draws round her a clear line
     Of love, and blessed faith, and gentleness.
     Merely the sight of her makes all things bow:
       Not she herself alone is holier
         Than all; but hers, through her, are raised above.
     From all her acts such lovely graces flow
       That truly one may never think of her
         Without a passion of exceeding love.
 
 _This sonnet has three parts. In the first, I say in what company this
 lady appeared most wondrous. In the second, I say how gracious was
 her society. In the third, I tell of the things which she, with power,
 worked upon others. The second begins here, They that go with her;
 the third here, So perfect. This last part divides into three. In
 the first, I tell what she operated upon women, that is, by their own
 faculties. In the second, I tell what she operated in them through
 others. In the third, I say how she not only operated in women, but in
 all people; and not only while herself present, but, by memory of her,
 operated wondrously. The second begins here, Merely the sight; the
 third here, From all her acts._
 
 Thereafter on a day, I began to consider that which I had said of my
 lady: to wit, in these two sonnets aforegone: and becoming aware that
 I had not spoken of her immediate effect on me at that especial time,
 it seemed to me that I had spoken defectively. Whereupon I resolved
 to write somewhat of the manner wherein I was then subject to her
 influence, and of what her influence then was. And conceiving that
 I should not be able to say these things in the small compass of a
 sonnet, I began therefore a poem with this beginning:
 
     Love hath so long possessed me for his own
       And made his lordship so familiar
     That he, who at first irked me, is now grown
       Unto my heart as its best secrets are.
       And thus, when he in such sore wise doth mar
     My life that all its strength seems gone from it,
     Mine inmost being then feels throughly quit
       Of anguish, and all evil keeps afar.
     Love also gathers to such power in me
       That my sighs speak, each one a grievous thing,
       Always soliciting
     My ladys salutation piteously.
     Whenever she beholds me, it is so,
     Who is more sweet than any words can show.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 _Quomodo sedet sola civitas plena populo! facta est quasi vidua domina
 gentium!_[27]
 
   [27] How doth the city sit solitary, that was full of people!
        how is she become as a widow, she that was great among the
        nations!_Lamentations of Jeremiah_, i. I.
 
 I was still occupied with this poem, (having composed thereof only
 the above-written stanza,) when the Lord God of justice called my most
 gracious lady unto Himself, that she might be glorious under the banner
 of that blessed Queen Mary, whose name had always a deep reverence in
 the words of holy Beatrice. And because haply it might be found good
 that I should say somewhat concerning her departure, I will herein
 declare what are the reasons which make that I shall not do so.
 
 And the reasons are three. The first is, that such matter belongeth
 not of right to the present argument, if one consider the opening of
 this little book. The second is, that even though the present argument
 required it, my pen doth not suffice to write in a fit manner of this
 thing. And the third is, that were it both possible and of absolute
 necessity, it would still be unseemly for me to speak thereof, seeing
 that thereby it must behove me to speak also mine own praises: a thing
 that in whosoever doeth it is worthy of blame. For the which reasons,
 I will leave this matter to be treated of by some other than myself.
 
 Nevertheless, as the number nine, which number hath often had mention
 in what hath gone before, (and not, as it might appear, without
 reason,) seems also to have borne a part in the manner of her death:
 it is therefore right that I should say somewhat thereof. And for
 this cause, having first said what was the part it bore herein, I
 will afterwards point out a reason which made that this number was so
 closely allied unto my lady.
 
 I say, then, that according to the division of time in Italy, her most
 noble spirit departed from among us in the first hour of the ninth day
 of the month; and according to the division of time in Syria, in the
 ninth month of the year: seeing that Tismim, which with us is October,
 is there the first month. Also she was taken from among us in that
 year of our reckoning (to wit, of the years of our Lord) in which the
 perfect number was nine times multiplied within that century wherein
 she was born into the world: which is to say, the thirteenth century of
 Christians.[28]
 
   [28] Beatrice Portinari will thus be found to have died during the
        first hour of the 9th of June, 1290. And from what Dante says
        at the commencement of this work, (viz., that she was younger
        than himself by eight or nine months,) it may also be gathered
        that her age, at the time of her death, was twenty-four
        years and three months. The perfect number mentioned in the
        present passage is the number ten.
 
 And touching the reason why this number was so closely allied unto
 her, it may peradventure be this. According to Ptolemy (and also to
 the Christian verity), the revolving heavens are nine; and according to
 the common opinion among astrologers, these nine heavens together have
 influence over the earth. Wherefore it would appear that this number
 was thus allied unto her for the purpose of signifying that, at her
 birth, all these nine heavens were at perfect unity with each other
 as to their influence. This is one reason that may be brought: but
 more narrowly considering, and according to the infallible truth, this
 number was her own self: that is to say, by similitude. As thus. The
 number three is the root of the number nine; seeing that without the
 interposition of any other number, being multiplied merely by itself,
 it produceth nine, as we manifestly perceive that three times three
 are nine. Thus, three being of itself the efficient of nine, and the
 Great Efficient of Miracles being of Himself Three Persons (to wit:
 the Father, the Son, and the Holy Spirit), which, being Three, are also
 One:this lady was accompanied by the number nine to the end that men
 might clearly perceive her to be a nine, that is, a miracle, whose
 only root is the Holy Trinity. It may be that a more subtile person
 would find for this thing a reason of greater subtilty: but such is the
 reason that I find, and that liketh me best.
 
 After this most gracious creature had gone out from among us, the
 whole city came to be as it were widowed and despoiled of all dignity.
 Then I, left mourning in this desolate city, wrote unto the principal
 persons thereof, in an epistle, concerning its condition; taking for
 my commencement those words of Jeremias: _Quomodo sedet sola civitas!
 etc._ And I make mention of this, that none may marvel wherefore I set
 down these words before, in beginning to treat of her death. Also if
 any should blame me, in that I do not transcribe that epistle whereof I
 have spoken, I will make it mine excuse that I began this little book
 with the intent that it should be written altogether in the vulgar
 tongue; wherefore, seeing that the epistle I speak of is in Latin, it
 belongeth not to mine undertaking: more especially as I know that my
 chief friend, for whom I write this book, wished also that the whole of
 it should be in the vulgar tongue.
 
 When mine eyes had wept for some while, until they were so weary with
 weeping that I could no longer through them give ease to my sorrow, I
 bethought me that a few mournful words might stand me instead of tears.
 And therefore I proposed to make a poem, that weeping I might speak
 therein of her for whom so much sorrow had destroyed my spirit; and I
 then began The eyes that weep.
 
 _That this poem may seem to remain the more widowed at its close,
 I will divide it before writing it; and this method I will observe
 henceforward. I say that this poor little poem has three parts. The
 first is a prelude. In the second, I speak of her. In the third, I
 speak pitifully to the poem. The second begins here, Beatrice is gone
 up; the third here, Weep, pitiful Song of mine. The first divides
 into three. In the first, I say what moves me to speak. In the second,
 I say to whom I mean to speak. In the third, I say of whom I mean to
 speak. The second begins here, And because often, thinking; the third
 here, And I will say. Then, when I say, Beatrice is gone up, I
 speak of her; and concerning this I have two parts. First, I tell the
 cause why she was taken away from us: afterwards, I say how one weeps
 her parting; and this part commences here, Wonderfully. This part
 divides into three. In the first, I say who it is that weeps her not.
 In the second, I say who it is that doth weep her. In the third, I
 speak of my condition. The second begins here, But sighing comes, and
 grief; the third, With sighs. Then, when I say, Weep, pitiful Song
 of mine, I speak to this my song, telling it what ladies to go to, and
 stay with._
 
     The eyes that weep for pity of the heart
       Have wept so long that their grief languisheth,
         And they have no more tears to weep withal:
     And now, if I would ease me of a part
       Of what, little by little, leads to death,
         It must be done by speech, or not at all.
         And because often, thinking, I recall
     How it was pleasant, ere she went afar,
       To talk of her with you, kind damozels,
       I talk with no one else,
     But only with such hearts as womens are.
       And I will say,still sobbing as speech fails,
     That she hath gone to Heaven suddenly,
     And hath left Love below, to mourn with me.
 
     Beatrice is gone up into high Heaven,
       The kingdom where the angels are at peace;
         And lives with them; and to her friends is dead.
     Not by the frost of winter was she driven
       Away, like others; nor by summer-heats;
         But through a perfect gentleness, instead.
         For from the lamp of her meek lowlihead
     Such an exceeding glory went up hence
       That it woke wonder in the Eternal Sire,
       Until a sweet desire
     Entered Him for that lovely excellence,
       So that He bade her to Himself aspire;
     Counting this weary and most evil place
     Unworthy of a thing so full of grace.
 
     Wonderfully out of the beautiful form
       Soared her clear spirit, waxing glad the while;
         And is in its first home, there where it is.
     Who speaks thereof, and feels not the tears warm
       Upon his face, must have become so vile
         As to be dead to all sweet sympathies.
         Out upon him! an abject wretch like this
     May not imagine anything of her,
       He needs no bitter tears for his relief.
       But sighing comes, and grief,
     And the desire to find no comforter,
       (Save only Death, who makes all sorrow brief),
     To him who for a while turns in his thought
     How she hath been among us, and is not.
 
     With sighs my bosom always laboureth
       In thinking, as I do continually,
         Of her for whom my heart now breaks apace;
     And very often when I think of death,
       Such a great inward longing comes to me
         That it will change the colour of my face;
         And, if the idea settles in its place,
     All my limbs shake as with an ague-fit:
       Till, starting up in wild bewilderment,
       I do become so shent
     That I go forth, lest folk misdoubt of it.
       Afterward, calling with a sore lament
     On Beatrice, I ask, Canst thou be dead?
     And calling on her, I am comforted.
 
     Grief with its tears, and anguish with its sighs,
       Come to me now wheneer I am alone;
         So that I think the sight of me gives pain.
     And what my life hath been, that living dies,
       Since for my lady the New Births begun,
         I have not any language to explain.
         And so, dear ladies, though my heart were fain,
     I scarce could tell indeed how I am thus.
       All joy is with my bitter life at war;
       Yea, I am fallen so far
     That all men seem to say, Go out from us,
       Eyeing my cold white lips, how dead they are.
     But she, though I be bowed unto the dust,
     Watches me; and will guerdon me, I trust.
     Weep, pitiful Song of mine, upon thy way,
       To the dames going and the damozels
       For whom and for none else
     Thy sisters have made music many a day.
     Thou, that art very sad and not as they,
       Go dwell thou with them as a mourner dwells.
 
 After I had written this poem, I received the visit of a friend whom
 I counted as second unto me in the degrees of friendship, and who,
 moreover, had been united by the nearest kindred to that most gracious
 creature. And when we had a little spoken together, he began to solicit
 me that I would write somewhat in memory of a lady who had died; and he
 disguised his speech, so as to seem to be speaking of another who was
 but lately dead: wherefore I, perceiving that his speech was of none
 other than that blessed one herself, told him that it should be done
 as he required. Then afterwards, having thought thereof, I imagined to
 give vent in a sonnet to some part of my hidden lamentations; but in
 such sort that it might seem to be spoken by this friend of mine, to
 whom I was to give it. And the sonnet saith thus: Stay now with me,
 etc.
 
 _This sonnet has two parts. In the first, I call the Faithful of Love
 to hear me. In the second, I relate my miserable condition. The second
 begins here, Mark how they force._
 
     Stay now with me, and listen to my sighs,
       Ye piteous hearts, as pity bids ye do.
       Mark how they force their way out and press through;
     If they be once pent up, the whole life dies.
     Seeing that now indeed my weary eyes
       Oftener refuse than I can tell to you
       (Even though my endless grief is ever new),
     To weep and let the smothered anguish rise.
     Also in sighing ye shall hear me call
       On her whose blessd presence doth enrich
         The only home that well befitteth her:
     And ye shall hear a bitter scorn of all
       Sent from the inmost of my spirit in speech
         That mourns its joy and its joys minister.
 
 But when I had written this sonnet, bethinking me who he was to whom
 I was to give it, that it might appear to be his speech, it seemed
 to me that this was but a poor and barren gift for one of her so near
 kindred. Wherefore, before giving him this sonnet, I wrote two stanzas
 of a poem: the first being written in very sooth as though it were
 spoken by him, but the other being mine own speech, albeit, unto one
 who should not look closely, they would both seem to be said by the
 same person. Nevertheless, looking closely, one must perceive that it
 is not so, inasmuch as one does not call this most gracious creature
 _his lady_, and the other does, as is manifestly apparent. And I gave
 the poem and the sonnet unto my friend, saying that I had made them
 only for him.
 
 _The poem begins, Whatever while, and has two parts. In the first,
 that is, in the first stanza, this my dear friend, her kinsman,
 laments. In the second, I lament; that is, in the other stanza, which
 begins, For ever. And thus it appears that in this poem two persons
 lament, of whom one laments as a brother, the other as a servant._
 
     Whatever while the thought comes over me
       That I may not again
         Behold that lady whom I mourn for now,
     About my heart my mind brings constantly
       So much of extreme pain
         That I say, Soul of mine, why stayest thou?
         Truly the anguish, Soul, that we must bow
     Beneath, until we win out of this life,
       Gives me full oft a fear that trembleth:
       So that I call on Death
     Even as on Sleep one calleth after strife,
       Saying, Come unto me. Life showeth grim
       And bare; and if one dies, I envy him.
 
     For ever, among all my sighs which burn,
       There is a piteous speech
         That clamours upon death continually:
     Yea, unto him doth my whole spirit turn
       Since first his hand did reach
         My ladys life with most foul cruelty.
         But from the height of womans fairness, she,
     Going up from us with the joy we had,
       Grew perfectly and spiritually fair;
       That so she spreads even there
     A light of Love which makes the Angels glad,
       And even unto their subtle minds can bring
       A certain awe of profound marvelling.
 
 On that day which fulfilled the year since my lady had been made of
 the citizens of eternal life, remembering me of her as I sat alone, I
 betook myself to draw the resemblance of an angel upon certain tablets.
 And while I did thus, chancing to turn my head, I perceived that some
 were standing beside me to whom I should have given courteous welcome,
 and that they were observing what I did: also I learned afterwards that
 they had been there a while before I perceived them. Perceiving whom,
 I arose for salutation, and said: Another was with me.[29]
 
   [29] Thus according to some texts. The majority, however, add
        the words, And therefore was I in thought: but the shorter
        speech is perhaps the more forcible and pathetic.
 
 Afterwards, when they had left me, I set myself again to mine
 occupation, to wit, to the drawing figures of angels: in doing which, I
 conceived to write of this matter in rhyme, as for her anniversary, and
 to address my rhymes unto those who had just left me. It was then that
 I wrote the sonnet which saith, That lady; and as this sonnet hath
 two commencements, it behoveth me to divide it with both of them here.
 
 _I say that, according to the first, this sonnet has three parts. In
 the first, I say that this lady was then in my memory. In the second,
 I tell what Love therefore did with me. In the third, I speak of the
 effects of Love. The second begins here, Love knowing; the third
 here, Forth went they. This part divides into two. In the one, I say
 that all my sighs issued speaking. In the other, I say how some spoke
 certain words different from the others. The second begins here, And
 still. In this same manner is it divided with the other beginning,
 save that, in the first part, I tell when this lady had thus come into
 my mind, and this I say not in the other._
 
     That lady of all gentle memories
       Had lighted on my soul;whose new abode
       Lies now, as it was well ordained of God,
     Among the poor in heart, where Mary is.
     Love, knowing that dear image to be his,
       Woke up within the sick heart sorrow-bowd,
       Unto the sighs which are its weary load
     Saying, Go forth. And they went forth, I wis;
     Forth went they from my breast that throbbed and ached;
       With such a pang as oftentimes will bathe
         Mine eyes with tears when I am left alone.
       And still those sighs which drew the heaviest breath
     Came whispering thus: O noble intellect!
         It is a year to-day that thou art gone.
 
 Second Commencement.
 
     That lady of all gentle memories
       Had lighted on my soul;for whose sake flowd
       The tears of Love; in whom the power abode
     Which led you to observe while I did this.
     Love, knowing that dear image to be his, etc.
 
 Then, having sat for some space sorely in thought because of the time
 that was now past, I was so filled with dolorous imaginings that it
 became outwardly manifest in mine altered countenance. Whereupon,
 feeling this and being in dread lest any should have seen me, I lifted
 mine eyes to look; and then perceived a young and very beautiful lady,
 who was gazing upon me from a window with a gaze full of pity, so that
 the very sum of pity appeared gathered together in her. And seeing that
 unhappy persons, when they beget compassion in others, are then most
 moved unto weeping, as though they also felt pity for themselves, it
 came to pass that mine eyes began to be inclined unto tears. Wherefore,
 becoming fearful lest I should make manifest mine abject condition,
 I rose up, and went where I could not be seen of that lady; saying
 afterwards within myself: Certainly with her also must abide most
 noble Love. And with that, I resolved upon writing a sonnet, wherein,
 speaking unto her, I should say all that I have just said. And as this
 sonnet is very evident, I will not divide it:
 
     Mine eyes beheld the blessed pity spring
       Into thy countenance immediately
       A while agone, when thou beheldst in me
     The sickness only hidden grief can bring;
     And then I knew thou wast considering
       How abject and forlorn my life must be;
       And I became afraid that thou shouldst see
     My weeping, and account it a base thing.
     Therefore I went out from thee; feeling how
       The tears were straightway loosened at my heart
         Beneath thine eyes compassionate control.
         And afterwards I said within my soul:
       Lo! with this lady dwells the counterpart
     Of the same Love who holds me weeping now.
 
 It happened after this, that whensoever I was seen of this lady, she
 became pale and of a piteous countenance, as though it had been with
 love; whereby she remembered me many times of my own most noble lady,
 who was wont to be of a like paleness. And I know that often, when I
 could not weep nor in any way give ease unto mine anguish, I went to
 look upon this lady, who seemed to bring the tears into my eyes by the
 mere sight of her. Of the which thing I bethought me to speak unto her
 in rhyme, and then made this sonnet: which begins, Loves pallor, and
 which is plain without being divided, by its exposition aforesaid:
 
     Loves pallor and the semblance of deep ruth
       Were never yet shown forth so perfectly
       In any ladys face, chancing to see
     Griefs miserable countenance uncouth,
     As in thine, lady, they have sprung to soothe,
       When in mine anguish thou hast looked on me;
       Until sometimes it seems as if, through thee,
     My heart might almost wander from its truth.
     Yet so it is, I cannot hold mine eyes
       From gazing very often upon thine
         In the sore hope to shed those tears they keep;
     And at such time, thou makst the pent tears rise
       Even to the brim, till the eyes waste and pine;
         Yet cannot they, while thou art present, weep.
 
 At length, by the constant sight of this lady, mine eyes began to be
 gladdened overmuch with her company; through which thing many times
 I had much unrest, and rebuked myself as a base person: also, many
 times I cursed the unsteadfastness of mine eyes, and said to them
 inwardly: Was not your grievous condition of weeping wont one while
 to make others weep? And will ye now forget this thing because a lady
 looketh upon you? who so looketh merely in compassion of the grief ye
 then showed for your own blessed lady. But whatso ye can, that do ye,
 accursed eyes! many a time will I make you remember it! for never, till
 death dry you up, should ye make an end of your weeping. And when
 I had spoken thus unto mine eyes, I was taken again with extreme and
 grievous sighing. And to the end that this inward strife which I had
 undergone might not be hidden from all saving the miserable wretch who
 endured it, I proposed to write a sonnet, and to comprehend in it this
 horrible condition. And I wrote this which begins, The very bitter
 weeping.
 
 _The sonnet has two parts. In the first, I speak to my eyes, as my
 heart spoke within myself. In the second, I remove a difficulty,
 showing who it is that speaks thus: and this part begins here, So
 far. It well might receive other divisions also; but this would be
 useless, since it is manifest by the preceding exposition._
 
     The very bitter weeping that ye made
       So long a time together, eyes of mine,
       Was wont to make the tears of pity shine
     In other eyes full oft, as I have said.
     But now this thing were scarce rememberd
       If I, on my part, foully would combine
       With you, and not recall each ancient sign
     Of grief, and her for whom your tears were shed
     It is your fickleness that doth betray
       My mind to fears, and makes me tremble thus
         What while a lady greets me with her eyes.
     Except by death, we must not any way
       Forget our lady who is gone from us.
         So far doth my heart utter, and then sighs.
 
 The sight of this lady brought me into so unwonted a condition that
 I often thought of her as of one too dear unto me; and I began to
 consider her thus: This lady is young, beautiful, gentle, and wise;
 perchance it was Love himself who set her in my path, that so my
 life might find peace. And there were times when I thought yet more
 fondly, until my heart consented unto its reasoning. But when it had
 so consented, my thought would often turn round upon me, as moved by
 reason, and cause me to say within myself: What hope is this which
 would console me after so base a fashion, and which hath taken the
 place of all other imagining? Also there was another voice within me,
 that said: And wilt thou, having suffered so much tribulation through
 Love, not escape while yet thou mayst from so much bitterness? Thou
 must surely know that this thought carries with it the desire of Love,
 and drew its life from the gentle eyes of that lady who vouchsafed
 thee so much pity. Wherefore I, having striven sorely and very often
 with myself, bethought me to say somewhat thereof in rhyme. And seeing
 that in the battle of doubts, the victory most often remained with such
 as inclined towards the lady of whom I speak, it seemed to me that I
 should address this sonnet unto her: in the first line whereof, I call
 that thought which spake of her a gentle thought, only because it spoke
 of one who was gentle; being of itself most vile.[30]
 
   [30] Boccaccio tells us that Dante was married to Gemma Donati
        about a year after the death of Beatrice. Can Gemma then be
        the lady of the window, his love for whom Dante so contemns?
        Such a passing conjecture (when considered together with
        the interpretation of this passage in Dantes later work,
        the _Convito_) would of course imply an admission of what I
        believe to lie at the heart of all true Dantesque commentary;
        that is, the existence always of the actual events even
        where the allegorical superstructure has been raised by Dante
        himself.
 
 _In this sonnet I make myself into two, according as my thoughts
 were divided, one from the other. The one part I call Heart, that is,
 appetite; the other, Soul, that is, reason; and I tell what one saith
 to the other. And that it is fitting to call the appetite Heart, and
 the reason Soul, is manifest enough to them to whom I wish this to be
 open. True it is that, in the preceding sonnet, I take the part of
 the Heart against the Eyes; and that appears contrary to what I say
 in the present; and therefore I say that, there also, by the Heart I
 mean appetite, because yet greater was my desire to remember my most
 gentle lady than to see this other, although indeed I had some appetite
 towards her, but it appeared slight: wherefrom it appears that the one
 statement is not contrary to the other. This sonnet has three parts. In
 the first, I begin to say to this lady how my desires turn all towards
 her. In the second, I say how the Soul, that is, the reason, speaks to
 the Heart, that is, to the appetite. In the third, I say how the latter
 answers. The second begins here, And what is this? the third here,
 And the heart answers._
 
     A gentle thought there is will often start,
       Within my secret self, to speech of thee:
       Also of Love it speaks so tenderly
     That much in me consents and takes its part.
     And what is this, the soul saith to the heart,
       That cometh thus to comfort thee and me,
       And thence where it would dwell, thus potently
     Can drive all other thoughts by its strange art?
     And the heart answers: Be no more at strife
       Twixt doubt and doubt: this is Loves messenger
         And speaketh but his words, from him received;
     And all the strength it owns and all the life
       It draweth from the gentle eyes of her
         Who, looking on our grief, hath often grieved.
 
 But against this adversary of reason, there rose up in me on a certain
 day, about the ninth hour, a strong visible phantasy, wherein I seemed
 to behold the most gracious Beatrice, habited in that crimson raiment
 which she had worn when I had first beheld her; also she appeared to me
 of the same tender age as then. Whereupon I fell into a deep thought
 of her: and my memory ran back, according to the order of time, unto
 all those matters in the which she had borne a part; and my heart began
 painfully to repent of the desire by which it had so basely let itself
 be possessed during so many days, contrary to the constancy of reason.
 
 And then, this evil desire being quite gone from me, all my thoughts
 turned again unto their excellent Beatrice. And I say most truly that
 from that hour I thought constantly of her with the whole humbled and
 ashamed heart; the which became often manifest in sighs, that had among
 them the name of that most gracious creature, and how she departed from
 us. Also it would come to pass very often, through the bitter anguish
 of some one thought, that I forgot both it, and myself, and where
 I was. By this increase of sighs, my weeping, which before had been
 somewhat lessened, increased in like manner; so that mine eyes seemed
 to long only for tears and to cherish them, and came at last to be
 circled about with red as though they had suffered martyrdom: neither
 were they able to look again upon the beauty of any face that might
 again bring them to shame and evil: from which things it will appear
 that they were fitly guerdoned for their unsteadfastness. Wherefore
 I, (wishing that mine abandonment of all such evil desires and vain
 temptations should be certified and made manifest, beyond all doubts
 which might have been suggested by the rhymes aforewritten) proposed to
 write a sonnet wherein I should express this purport. And I then wrote,
 Woes me!
 
 _I said, Woes me! because I was ashamed of the trifling of mine
 eyes. This sonnet I do not divide, since its purport is manifest
 enough._
 
     Woes me! by dint of all these sighs that come
       Forth of my heart, its endless grief to prove,
       Mine eyes are conquered, so that even to move
     Their lids for greeting is grown troublesome.
     They wept so long that now they are griefs home,
       And count their tears all laughter far above:
       They wept till they are circled now by Love
     With a red circle in sign of martyrdom.
     These musings, and the sighs they bring from me,
       Are grown at last so constant and so sore
         That love swoons in my spirit with faint breath;
     Hearing in those sad sounds continually
       The most sweet name that my dead lady bore,
         With many grievous words touching her death.
 
 About this time, it happened that a great number of persons undertook a
 pilgrimage, to the end that they might behold that blessed portraiture
 bequeathed unto us by our Lord Jesus Christ as the image of His
 beautiful countenance,[31] (upon which countenance my dear lady now
 looketh continually). And certain among these pilgrims, who seemed very
 thoughtful, passed by a path which is well-nigh in the midst of the
 city where my most gracious lady was born, and abode, and at last died.
 
   [31] The Veronica (_Vera icon_, or true image); that is, the napkin
        with which a woman was said to have wiped our Saviours face
        on His way to the cross, and which miraculously retained its
        likeness. Dante makes mention of it also in the _Commedia_
        (Parad. xxi. 103), where he says:
 
       Qual  colui che forse di Croazia
         Viene a veder la Veronica nostra,
       Che per lantica fama non si sazia
         Ma dice nel pensier fin che si mostra:
       Signor mio Ges Cristo, Iddio verace,
         Or fu s fatta la sembianza vostra? etc.
 
 Then I, beholding them, said within myself: These pilgrims seem to be
 come from very far; and I think they cannot have heard speak of this
 lady, or know anything concerning her. Their thoughts are not of her,
 but of other things; it may be, of their friends who are far distant,
 and whom we, in our turn, know not. And I went on to say: I know that
 if they were of a country near unto us, they would in some wise seem
 disturbed, passing through this city which is so full of grief. And
 I said also: If I could speak with them a space, I am certain that I
 should make them weep before they went forth of this city; for those
 things that they would hear from me must needs beget weeping in any.
 
 And when the last of them had gone by me, I bethought me to write a
 sonnet, showing forth mine inward speech; and that it might seem the
 more pitiful, I made as though I had spoken it indeed unto them. And I
 wrote this sonnet, which beginneth: Ye pilgrim-folk. I made use of
 the word _pilgrim_ for its general signification; for pilgrim may
 be understood in two senses, one general, and one special. General,
 so far as any man may be called a pilgrim who leaveth the place of
 his birth; whereas, more narrowly speaking, he only is a pilgrim who
 goeth towards or frowards the House of St. James. For there are three
 separate denominations proper unto those who undertake journeys to the
 glory of God. They are called Palmers who go beyond the seas eastward,
 whence often they bring palm-branches. And Pilgrims, as I have said,
 are they who journey unto the holy House of Gallicia; seeing that no
 other apostle was buried so far from his birthplace as was the blessed
 Saint James. And there is a third sort who are called Romers; in that
 they go whither these whom I have called pilgrims went: which is to
 say, unto Rome.
 
 _This sonnet is not divided, because its own words sufficiently declare
 it._
 
     Ye pilgrim-folk, advancing pensively
       As if in thought of distant things, I pray,
       Is your own land indeed so far away
     As by your aspect it would seem to be
     That this our heavy sorrow leaves you free
       Though passing through the mournful town midway;
       Like unto men that understand to-day
     Nothing at all of her great misery?
     Yet if ye will but stay, whom I accost,
       And listen to my words a little space,
         At going ye shall mourn with a loud voice.
     It is her Beatrice that she hath lost;
       Of whom the least word spoken holds such grace
         That men weep hearing it, and have no choice.
 
 A while after these things, two gentle ladies sent unto me, praying
 that I would bestow upon them certain of these my rhymes. And I (taking
 into account their worthiness and consideration) resolved that I would
 write also a new thing, and send it them together with those others, to
 the end that their wishes might be more honourably fulfilled. Therefore
 I made a sonnet, which narrates my condition, and which I caused to be
 conveyed to them, accompanied by the one preceding, and with that other
 which begins, Stay now with me and listen to my sighs. And the new
 sonnet is, Beyond the sphere.
 
 _This sonnet comprises five parts. In the first, I tell whither my
 thought goeth, naming the place by the name of one of its effects.
 In the second, I say wherefore it goeth up, and who makes it go thus.
 In the third, I tell what it saw, namely, a lady honoured. And I then
 call it a Pilgrim Spirit, because it goes up spiritually, and like
 a pilgrim who is out of his known country. In the fourth, I say how
 the spirit sees her such (that is, in such quality) that I cannot
 understand her; that is to say, my thought rises into the quality
 of her in a degree that my intellect cannot comprehend, seeing that
 our intellect is, towards those blessed souls, like our eye weak
 against the sun; and this the Philosopher says in the Second of the
 Metaphysics. In the fifth, I say that, although I cannot see there
 whither my thought carries methat is, to her admirable essenceI at
 least understand this, namely, that it is a thought of my lady, because
 I often hear her name therein. And, at the end of this fifth part,
 I say, Ladies mine, to show that they are ladies to whom I speak.
 The second part begins, A new perception; the third, When it hath
 reached; the fourth, It sees her such; the fifth, And yet I know.
 It might be divided yet more nicely, and made yet clearer; but this
 division may pass, and therefore I stay not to divide it further._
 
     Beyond the sphere which spreads to widest space
       Now soars the sigh that my heart sends above:
       A new perception born of grieving Love
     Guideth it upward the untrodden ways.
     When it hath reached unto the end, and stays,
       It sees a lady round whom splendours move
       In homage; till, by the great light thereof
     Abashed, the pilgrim spirit stands at gaze.
     It sees her such, that when it tells me this
       Which it hath seen, I understand it not,
         It hath a speech so subtile and so fine.
     And yet I know its voice within my thought
       Often remembereth me of Beatrice:
         So that I understand it, ladies mine.
 
 After writing this sonnet, it was given unto me to behold a very
 wonderful vision:[32] wherein I saw things which determined me that
 I would say nothing further of this most blessed one, until such time
 as I could discourse more worthily concerning her. And to this end I
 labour all I can; as she well knoweth. Wherefore if it be His pleasure
 through whom is the life of all things, that my life continue with me
 a few years, it is my hope that I shall yet write concerning her what
 hath not before been written of any woman. After the which, may it
 seem good unto Him who is the Master of Grace, that my spirit should go
 hence to behold the glory of its lady: to wit, of that blessed Beatrice
 who now gazeth continually on His countenance _qui est per omnia scula
 benedictus_.[33] _Laus Deo._
 
   [32] This we may believe to have been the Vision of Hell,
        Purgatory, and Paradise, which furnished the triple argument
        of the _Divina Commedia_. The Latin words ending the _Vita
        Nuova_ are almost identical with those at the close of the
        letter in which Dante, on concluding the _Paradise_, and
        accomplishing the hope here expressed, dedicates his great
        work to Can Grande della Scala.
 
   [33] Who is blessed throughout all ages.
 
 
                                 THE END.
 
 
 
 
                            THE SIDDAL EDITION
                                    OF
                         D. G. ROSSETTIS WORKS.
 
 
                            Volumes now Ready.
 
           THE HOUSE OF LIFE:
                    A Sonnet Sequence.
 
           BALLADS: Rose Mary;
                    The White Ship;
                    The Kings Tragedy.
 
           THE NEW LIFE (La Vita Nuova)
           Of DANTE ALIGHIERI.
 
        _Small 8vo, with Photogravure Frontispieces, cloth extra,
                gilt edges, price 2s. 6d. per vol., net._
 
 
                    Other Volumes are in Preparation.
 
 
                             ELLIS AND ELVEY
                     29, NEW BOND STREET, LONDON, W.
 
 
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's note:
 
 Original spelling and punctuation have been preserved.
 
 Minor typographical errors have been corrected without note.
 
